 18 that they will cut monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, citing improvements in the US.
 He said two days ago that weak payroll growth last month shouldn’t discourage policy makers from reducing monthly bond purchases as long as the economy continues to gain strength.
 Asian LNG importers typically purchase spot cargoes from December to March to meet peak heating and power demand during the northern hemisphere winter.
 Argentina’s YPF SA will close a tender today for five cargoes delivered to Bahia Blanca and Recalada, according to three people who received the company’s purchase offer.
 (DD), the biggest USchemical maker by market value, will repurchase $5 billion ofits shares after posting fourth-quarter earnings that exceededanalysts’ estimates.
 Therepurchase plan is the largest since a similar sized programbegan in 2005 and the biggest since Ellen Kullman took over aschairman and chief executive officer in 2009.
 Based on current prices, the anticipated repurchase ofabout 30 million shares this year will cut the number ofoutstanding shares by 1 percent to 15 percent, according toFanandakis.
 DuPont is pursuing “smaller” acquisitions with geographicsignificance, such as last year’s purchase of Pannar Seed Ltd,Africa’s largest seed producer, the CEO said.
 An improving job market prompted the Federal Reserve to announce last month it would trim its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 Debenhams rose as much as 66 percent in London trading after Sports Direct disclosed the purchase and said it “wishes to explore options at an operational level” Sports Direct, controlled by billionaire Mike Ashley, may seek to put sportswear concessions inside Debenhams stores, according to Chris Chaviaras, an analyst at Barclays in London.
 The stake purchase comes two weeks after the department-store chain warned of a profit slide after a weak Christmas period.
 The stake purchase was made “without the prior knowledge of the Debenhams board of directors, but Sports Direct has communicated to Debenhams’ board its desire to work together and its intention to be a supportive shareholder,” Sports Direct said in a statement today, without being more specific.
 Remove pricefrom the purchase decision and consumers would stick with BestBuy because they can find a wide assortment of products, getadvice from knowledgeable staff and test gadgets.
 That approach failed to boost holiday sales in the US,which includes stores and online purchases.
 Instead of losing purchases when a shopperin a store realizes there is a better offer, Best Buy is keepingthose sales, he said.
 More than 1,000 champagne-drinking VIPs got a preview of works at Marina Bay Sands Convention Center today, where traditionally some of the most important purchases are made before Art Stage opens to the public on Jan.
 Only higher rates can do that” The Federal Open Market Committee said yesterday it will cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, keeping the pace of the reduction from the previous month.
 19 dismissed a suit against Deutsche Bank AG by mortgage-bond investors, saying the case over a requirement for the issuer to repurchase loans that failed to match their promised quality needed to be filed within six years of the sale.
 Subprime debt has gained as housing recovered, the Federal Reserve provided unprecedented stimulus to markets and investors wagered on loan repurchases.
 Krause said the new accounting treatment of the deal, a 2 billion-euro ($27 billion) repurchase agreement backed by Italian government bonds, won’t affect Deutsche Bank’s income statement, nor its balance sheet.
 Fed officials saw diminishing economic benefits from their bond-buying program and voiced concern about future risks to financial stability during their last meeting, when they began to cut the pace of purchases.
 sold $2 billion of bonds today to speed up stock buybacks, following through on plans for a record repurchase program announced last year at the operator of the world’s largest cargo airline.
 Accelerated repurchase agreements with Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Since FedEx’s repurchase plans were already known, the impact of today’s push to quicken the transactions may be muted, Helane Becker, an analyst at Cowen & Co, said in a note to investors.
 “We believe the share repurchase program will be accretive to earnings, but believe the Street has already priced in the buyback,” said Becker, who rates FedEx as market perform.
 “But it’s just one piece of new shareholder feedback that they would have weighed along with all the other shareholder feedback” The buyback follows through on FedEx’s comments in December that it planned additional share purchases.
 More than $940 billion has been erased from the value of emerging-market equities since the Fed signaled in May that it could start scaling back bond purchases that boosted demand for higher-yielding assets.
 The Federal Open Market Committee will probably decide to reduce its bond purchases by $10 billion and by increments of the same amount at the next five meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey on Jan.
 A halt in the biggest buyer China’s purchases of DDGS will hurt prices of corn and reduce profits for ethanol producers such as Archer-Daniels-Midland Co.
 Buyers stand to lose about $20-30 per ton on their purchases if they cancel orders, Shi said.
 The Plan Other items in the turnaround plan announced by the company today include slashing fuel costs by 650 billion yen a year and setting up a joint venture with other utilities to purchase as much as 40 million metric tons of liquefied natural gas a year.
 The Federal Open Market Committee said yesterday it will cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to a plan for a gradual withdrawal from its unprecedented monetary easing.
 Economists surveyed by Bloomberg project policy makers will cut purchases by an additional $10 billion to $65 billion at the conclusion of this meeting.
 debt rallied as the Federal Open Market Committee cut monthly purchases to $65 billion from $75 billion and left unchanged a statement that it will probably hold its target interest rate at almost zero “well past the time” that unemployment falls below 65 percent, “especially if projected inflation” remains below the committee’s 2 percent goal.
 18 after Fed policy makers announced the first cut to monthly purchases.
 The purchases have swelled its balance sheet to a record $41 trillion.
 The Treasuries-purchase schedule for February will be announced at 3 pm.
 Fed policy makers also extended for a year tests of an overnight fixed-rate reverse repurchase program that could serve as an additional tool for the Fed when it eventually seeks to raise interest rates.
 The Monetary Policy Committee lifted the repurchase rate to 55 percent from 5 percent, Governor Gill Marcus told reporters in Pretoria today.
 Ergen knew the credit agreement barred competitors such as Dish from owning the debt and he blocked attempts to reveal who was behind the purchases, according to LightSquared.
 The trial may let LightSquared get any profit Ergen’s fund made from the debt purchases, which would help in a stand-alone restructuring, a company lawyer said.
 Competitor Barred LightSquared has said that Ergen’s investment vehicle, SP Special Opportunities LLC, was prohibited from buying the debt because it’s a competitor, and that Kiser was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish when he caused SP to execute its purchases.
 Ergen has called the debt purchases smart and said he made no “false representations” about the investment.
 Kiser said when he first started looking into purchases of LightSquared debt at Ergen’s request in 2011, he sought legal advice from Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, which told him the terms of the credit agreement prohibited ownership by a rival.
 Board Inquiry Kiser said he didn’t use money from Dish or EchoStar to buy the debt and didn’t reply when a member of Dish’s board asked whether Ergen may have made some large purchases in May 2012.
 In contrast, developed markets have rallied as the Fed’s decision to slow asset purchases boosted confidence in the US.
 A court in India’s Karnataka state last month ruled Diageo’s purchase of a stake in United Spirits void, after a petition filed by creditor banks.
 The new emphasis came after the company’s $53 billion purchase of Amylin Pharmaceuticals for its diabetes products, and the $25 billion hepatitis C deal for Inhibitex Inc.
 The purchase gave Bristol-Myers its first immune system-based cancer drug, Yervoy.
 “The road to inflation targeting is going to be long and hard, well beyond the 24 months envisaged in this well-intentioned report” Rajan surprised economists last month by holding the benchmark repurchase rate at 775 percent instead of adding to increases totaling 50 basis points since taking over the RBI.
 Simon also purchased the company’s 50 percent stake in Arizona Mills, a shopping center in Tempe, Arizona, built in 1997.
 In August, he announced the first dividend since 2008 and a stock repurchase program of $1 billion.
 population are spurring purchases of medical office buildings, with investors sending prices to a record on bets that Americans’ demand for health services will increase.
 “It’s a really competitive space,” said Steve Sikes, manager of real assets at the Alaska Retirement Management Board, which is considering buying $150 million to $200 million of medical offices in what would be its first direct purchases of the properties.
 The Irvine, California-based company, a nonlisted trust, purchased $816 million of medical offices in the two years through Jan.
 2, making it the biggest buyer after publicly traded Ventas Inc, which acquired 72 such buildings in its April 2012 purchase of Cogdell Spencer Inc.
 Capitalization rates, a measure of returns that declines as purchase prices rise, reached a six-year low of 73 percent nationally in 2013, Real Capital data show.
 Among his company’s 2013 acquisitions were six buildings purchased from Middletown, New York-based Crystal Run Healthcare, a specialty physician practice group, for a combined $141 million.
 The currency has swung between gains and losses since the central bank more than doubled its benchmark repurchase rate to 10 percent after an emergency meeting late on Jan.
 3 contractor, rose the most in nine months after it forecast higher business-jet sales and said it would step up share repurchases.
 “So, much like last year, beating our guidance must come from outperforming the plan and the use of capital to repurchase shares,” Novakovic said on the call.
 After falling short of its share-repurchase goal in 2013 because of pension funding needs, the company intends to step up the plan to return more cash to shareholders, she said.
 That’s prompted more Chinese cities to introduce restrictions on vehicle purchases.
 IAG shares rose as much as 22 percent today following a 34 percent gain yesterday, when it said full-year traffic rose 58 percent, buoyed by the purchase of Spanish discount carrier Vueling SA.
 “If you look at our defense purchases, a lot of it is centered around US.
 system was so difficult to navigate,” he said of his role in negotiating arms purchases from the US.
 Amazoncom knows what books and movies you have purchased, and it offers suggestions on the basis of those purchases.
 Everything changes when he purchases an operating system, a form of artificial intelligence (think Siri 40), who names herself Samantha (an excellent choice, to be sure).
 He also loaned the family thousands of dollars to cover their losses in resort property they had purchased, according to the government.
 Governor Raghuram Rajan surprised economists last month by holding the benchmark repurchase rate at 775 percent instead of adding to increases totaling 50 basis points since taking over the RBI in September.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury 10-year note yields hovered at almost a six-week low as investors weighed whether the US economic recovery is strong enough for the Federal Reserve to make more cuts to its debt-purchase program.
 The Federal Open Market Committee has cut its monthly debt purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion this month and holds a policy meeting next week.
 It will probably keep cutting the purchases by $10 billion at each FOMC meeting, economists forecast in a Bloomberg survey conducted Jan.
 “A reduction in purchases is still baked into the cake, and we won’t have any big data between now and the FOMC meeting to change the market’s outlook” Economic Update The Markit Economics preliminary index of US.
 While buying AirWatch will cut into profit initially, it will ultimately help VMware drive growth, and will speed up the adoption of mobile computing among corporations, wrote Abhey Lamba, a New York-based analyst at Mizuho Securities USA Inc, in a note after the purchase was announced.
 Dow said in a separate statement that it raised its quarterly dividend to 37 cents from 32 cents and would repurchase $45 billion of shares by 2014, increasing a $15 billion program announced last February.
 The company has incurred C$15 billion of the project’s cost and the Alberta government and the other partner in the venture, Canadian Natural Resources Ltd, have committed to further financing through the purchase of C$600 million of subordinated debt, North West said.
 Equity Decline More than $940 billion has been erased from the value of emerging-market equities since the Federal Reserve signaled in May that it could start scaling back bond purchases that boosted demand for higher-yielding assets.
 central bank decided at its December meeting to start cutting its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 He copied Hollywood by setting up a permanent production site on 46 acres purchased from the British Crown government in Clearwater Bay, in eastern Hong Kong.
 tri-party repurchase agreement market contracted $257 billion, or 14 percent, in 2013 to $161 trillion as of the end of 2013, according to Federal Reserve data, Fitch wrote in a report published today.
 “The interest rate sensitivity of collateral means agency MBS and Treasury repos were more affected as rates started to rise in May 2013 on expectation of taper” of bond purchases by the Fed, the Fitch report said.
 Dealers agree to repurchase the securities at a later date, and cash is sent back to lenders, which often are money funds.
 Fed policy makers, who in December decided to cut monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, cited improvement in the labor market.
 China’s seven-day repurchase rate slid 88 basis points today to 544 percent in Shanghai, after surging 153 basis points yesterday amid rising demand for cash before the Lunar New Year.
 “For the wider market, liquidity remains tight” Cash Injection The People’s Bank of China said it supplied money to the largest commercial banks yesterday through a lending facility and, according to traders, conducted 255 billion yuan ($42 billion) of reverse-repurchase agreements today.
 Vodafone’s purchase in October of German cable provider Kabel Deutschland illustrated the telecom company’s commitment to TV, Hartley said.
 The company has purchased about half of the 12 million shares in a buyback program announced in March, he said on the call.
 The transaction now faces regulatory scrutiny, including a likely national-security review that could slow or scuttle the purchase.
 Municipal issuers refunded much of their higher-cost debt before 2013 as the Fed kept its benchmark overnight interest rate near zero and purchased long-term bonds to stimulate the economy, Mosley said.
 The Federal Open Market Committee in December decided to cut monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt by $10 billion, to $75 billion, citing improvement in the labor market that pushed the jobless rate to a five-year low of 7 percent in November.
 Among his targets: a lack of clarity toward bank rescues, congressional standoffs over the budget and bond purchases known as quantitative easing by the Fed.
 The purchase, expected to cost about 30 million euros ($41 million), will be funded with Aurobindo’s own cash, the Indian company said in a separate statement.
 Investors challenged Oracle’s purchase of Pillar Data Systems Inc.
 The monetary authority has said it would maintain order if excessive volatility endangers financial stability, after the Federal Reserve said it would reduce its monthly bond purchases.
 Lansdowne may repurchase UBS and Ryanair shares, “should conditions or price improve their risk/reward,” according to the letter.
 Some retailers have said current plans for EMV don’t address all deficiencies that lead to fraud and that requiring PIN entry, as opposed to signatures, on purchases is most effective.
 Federal Reserve officials saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond-buying program and expressed concern about risks to financial stability when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases, according to minutes of their last meeting released today.
 The acquisition marks at least the fourth purchase for Schorsch’s company in the past four months after announcing it would buy brokerages Summit Financial Services Group Inc.
 Requiring companies to take deductions for many capital asset purchases over a longer period shouldn’t be part of changes to the US.
 The BOJ announced on April 4 it would double its monthly bond purchases to more than 7 trillion yen ($67 billion).
 17 (Bloomberg) -- American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said fourth-quarter profit doubled as consumer spending climbed.
 AmEx, the second-best performer in the Dow Jones Industrial Average last year, is benefiting from a pickup in household wealth and consumer confidence that has propelled purchases on cards and mobile devices.
 Fed policy makers decided last month to cut the $85 billion they were pumping into the financial system each month through bond purchases to $75 billion starting this month.
 Officials at Gavea, Apax, KKR and Carlyle declined to comment on a potential purchase of Fleury.
 The currency had risen as much as 4 percent after the central bank raised its repurchase rate to 10 percent from 45 percent and boosted other key borrowing costs.
 The central bank will probably reduce its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion, followed by further increments of the same amount at the next five meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey this month.
 The Federal Open Market Committee will cut purchases of Treasury and mortgage debt for a second time, from $75 billion to $65 billion a month, as it concludes a two-day meeting today, according to a Bloomberg News survey of economists on Jan.
 While the Indian central bank has said further rate increases may not be warranted, it’s not a given, and would all depend on how the inflation scenario evolves” Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan unexpectedly raised the benchmark repurchase rate to 8 percent from 775 percent yesterday while saying that more increases are unlikely in the “near term” should inflation cool as expected.
 Lenders granted 71,638 loans for house purchase, the most since January 2008 and up from with 70,820 in November, the Bank of England said in a report in London today.
 That followed a net purchase of 159 billion pounds in November.
 The brokerage said the maker of recycled paper has expanded its business with its purchase of Svenska Cellulosa AB’s packaging unit in 2012.
 Fed Policy The Federal Reserve, which is trimming the pace of its bond purchases this month, may reduce them by $10 billion in each of its next seven meetings and end the program in December 2014, according to the median forecast of economists in a Bloomberg survey last month.
 In July, the company purchased cloud-computing storageprovider SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 One loonie purchases 9403 US.
 By contrast, the Fed’s decision to begin tapering monthly bond purchases on Dec.
 Now, 2013’s increases in interest rates and equities probably will continue this year as the Fed begins to taper bond purchases, pushing defined-benefit plans closer to full funding levels, Towers Watson said.
 Revenue from DRAM products rose 69 percent from the previous period, Micron said today, buoyed by a gain in sales volume caused by the Elpida purchase.
 “This could mean that a Telefonica purchase is the end game for NII Holdings, even in the case of a restructuring” Telefonica rose 1 percent to 1226 euros in Madrid, where it’s based.
 The price the technology giant paid to acquire the Dallas-based company last year was the biggest it has disclosed for a takeover since the purchase of software company Lotus Development Corp.
 Dow said in a separate statement that it raised its quarterly dividend to 37 cents from 32 cents and would repurchase $45 billion of shares by 2014, increasing a $15 billion program announced last February.
 The company changed its name to Morgan Stanley Wealth Management in 2012, and its parent completed its purchase of the wire house last year.
 The acquisition size would probably surpass the $28 billion OCBC paid in 2001 for Keppel Capital Holdings Ltd, making it the lender’s biggest purchase.
 That year, China Merchants Bank completed a $47 billion purchase of Wing Lung Bank Ltd.
 The early results are showing that the discounts -- as steep as 75 percent off at luxury department-store chain Neiman Marcus Group LLC -- didn’t generate sufficient traffic or spur enough purchases of full-priced merchandise to make up for the lost revenue.
 That was the fifth straight year of net purchases and the largest amount since the bourse began compiling the figures in 1982.
 Abe’s hand-picked Bank of Japan governor, Haruhiko Kuroda, doubled monthly bond purchases to more than 7 trillion yen at his first policy board meeting in April 2013, aiming to spur 2 percent inflation in about two years.
 The purchase price is about $550 million, said a person with knowledge of the deal, who asked not to be identified because the details are private.
 It will probably reduce purchases in $10 billion increments over the next seven meetings before ending them in December, according to the median forecast in a Bloomberg survey.
 Yields have risen as the Fed pares its monthly debt purchases starting in January to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 China National Nuclear will purchase uranium from the project at market prices, Paladin said today in the statement.
 The central bank decided at its December gathering to begin cutting its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Etihad Airways PJSC, the third-largest Middle Eastern airline, said it’s looking for purchases in the Americas and China to round out its strategy of buying airline stakes that funnel traffic through its Abu Dhabi hub.
 The setup helps fill Etihad’s planes while offering its partners a much-needed equity injection and assistance in areas such as fleet renewal, where it has begun to bundle purchases.
 In October, Broadcom said it purchased LTE-related assets from affiliates of Japan’s Renesas Electronics Corp.
 The real depreciated 06 percent to a five-month low of 24370 per dollar on speculation the Fed will pare back monthly bond purchases by another $10 billion today.
 China, the world’s largest consumer, received about 52 percent of its nickel ore purchases from Indonesia in 2012, according to an RBC Capital Markets report dated Dec.
 The calmer hurricane season allowed the insurer to increase repurchases in the third quarter.
 Travelers repurchased $1 billion of its own stock in the fourth quarter.
 The central bank, which starts a two-day meeting tomorrow, decided at its December gathering to begin cutting its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 Volcker Rule2 Of course that rule means nothing without a definition of "proprietary trading" Here it is:3 "proprietary trading" means using own capital or borrowed money to take positions in any type of transaction to purchase, sell or otherwise acquire or dispose of any financial instrument or commodities for the sole purpose of making a profit for own account, and without any connection to actual or anticipated client activity or for the purpose of hedging the entity’s risk as result of actual or anticipated client activity, through the use of desks, units, divisions or individual traders specifically dedicated to such position taking and profit making, including through dedicated web-based proprietary trading platforms; That's sort of delightful! I mean, it's 95 words.
 This is very favorable for IPOs” S&P 500 Rally Three rounds of bond purchases from the Federal Reserve have triggered a 173 percent gain in the S&P 500 since March 2009 and the lowest volatility in almost seven years, encouraging companies to sell stock.
 consumer lender subsidiary, which originates subprime loans for new-vehicle purchases and leases, this month filed to raise as much as $156 billion in an IPO.
 Big Gains The gain on the Nest investment is one of the largest to date for Shasta Ventures, whose other payoffs have included Intuit Inc’s acquisition of Mint in 2009 and Citrix System Inc’s purchase of Zenprise.
 He raised rates twice before leaving the key repurchase rate unchanged at 775 percent at the last review on Dec.
 Separately, McKesson purchased Celesio convertible bonds from hedge fund Elliott Management Corp, providing the distributor with ownership of more than 75 percent of Celesio’s shares.
 If you buy a company with 50 percent equity and 50 percent bank loans, then your purchase is financed .
 Dodd-Frank, the regulatory overhaul enacted in July 2010, required the Fed to ensure that fees charged for debit-card purchases were “reasonable and proportional” to the cost of processing transactions.
 ’Intense’ Talks Saudi Arabia and BAE remain in talks over pricing of Typhoon jets that have already been sold, even as the parties explore the purchase of 48 to 72 additional units of the twin-engine fighters.
 Early on, he had invested with activist managers such as Icahn, who is agitating for share repurchases at Apple, and Lichtenstein, the investor who runs Steel Partners LLC.
 Nestle recently completed the purchase of Zuke’s, a Durango, Colorado-based marketer of natural pet snacks, the company said today in a e-mailed statement.
 The rule, intended to protect taxpayers from overbilling, focuses on systems that companies use to estimate costs for bids, purchase goods from subcontractors, manage government property and materials and track costs and schedule progress.
 It’s difficult to justify that it’s time to go out and buy emerging markets at the moment” Record Lows More than $940 billion has been erased from the value of emerging-market equities since the Fed signaled in May that it could start scaling back bond purchases that boosted demand for higher-yielding assets.
 Argentines will be able to buy dollars for savings in line with their income more than two years after first installing restrictions on foreign-currency purchases, he said today in Buenos Aires.
 central bank decided at its December meeting to start cutting its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 Stratasys “would be an appealing little nugget to sort of fast-forward that process” While Stratasys would be a pricey purchase for a buyer with its stock near a record, the company is valued at a 33 percent discount to rival 3D Systems Corp, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Stratasys may be a more attractive target than competitor 3D Systems because a greater portion of its business is tied to consumers after its purchase of MakerBot, according to Jon Shaffer, a New York-based analyst at Credit Suisse.
 “The actions we are taking and have taken show this” The Bank of Israel cut the benchmark interest rate three times last year, bringing it to its lowest since 2009, and purchased about $53 billion in foreign-currency in an effort to weaken the shekel.
 Prime Minister David Cameron’s coalition government introduced a second phase of Help-to-Buy in October, enabling buyers with a down payment of as little as 5 percent to purchase a home valued as high as 600,000 pounds.
 The company said today that it sold the London Edition, and the total purchase price for all three properties is expected to be about $815 million.
 Asian LNG importers typically purchase spot cargoes from December to March to meet peak heating and power demand during the northern hemisphere winter.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion.
 Call Options The SEC claims that Rodrigo Terpins placed an order to purchase the Heinz call options while he was vacationing at Walt Disney World in Florida and the trade was based on nonpublic information he obtained from his brother Michael Terpins.
 Buying Climate All three components of the comfort index cooled last week, led by a drop in buying climate, which fell to minus 332 from a seven-month high of minus 318 as fewer people said now is a good time to make purchases.
 Even with its recent gains, unemployment remains high enough to make the recovery story a tough sell to many Americans” Holiday Sales Retail sales rose 35 percent during the holiday season, helped by deep discounts at malls and purchases of children’s apparel and jewelry, MasterCard Advisors SpendingPulse said.
 Hewlett-Packard and Chief Executive Officer Meg Whitman last year lost a bid to dismiss a shareholder securities fraud lawsuit alleging investors were misled about the purchase of Autonomy.
 “Companies are feeling pressure to evaluate M&A opportunities more aggressively in part because their stocks have underperformed competitors who have engaged in material strategic acquisitions” Adding $85 Billion Perhaps the most dramatic example is Gilead Sciences Inc’s purchase of hepatitis C drug maker Pharmasset Inc.
 30, has said it will be aggressive in dealmaking, looking for purchases in cancer, virology and specialty drugs.
 Blackstone is set to purchase three buildings from Ireland’s National Asset Management Agency in Dublin, said the people, who asked not to be named as the deal isn’t complete.
 Uncertainty around the Federal Reserve’s decision to taper its monthly bond purchases, and a US.
 “If credit continues to grow at such a rapid pace, then what China faces is either a financial crisis or a bust, in which flows of credit will be disrupted and the trend of growth will be sharply reduced” Bad Borrowing The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, has averaged 47 percent this month, the second highest since June, according to a daily fixing rate announced by the National Interbank Funding Center.
 The People’s Bank of China suspended reverse-repurchase agreements, which it uses to inject money into financial markets, for almost three weeks in December, the longest pause since July.
 A presidential decree would be required authorizing the swap and approving any purchase by an international company, should such a buyer emerge.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- West Texas Intermediate crude fell for a second day as purchases of new US.
 18 that it’s paring monthly purchases to $75 billion a month from $85 billion.
 Auto Dealers Motor vehicle dealers reported a 18 percent drop in purchases last month, the most since October 2012.
 Auto purchases fell to a 153 million annualized rate from a 163 million pace in November, according to data from Ward’s Automotive Group.
 The disappointing earnings prospects underscore the rationale behind Chief Executive Officer Sergio Marchionne’s purchase of Chrysler to create a more global carmaker.
 Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s $23 billion equity sale in June helped fund its takeover of Bausch & Lomb Holdings Inc, Empire Co’s C$184 billion ($173 billion) offering of subscription receipts helped pay for its purchase of Safeway Inc’s Canadian stores, and Fortis Inc’s C$159 billion debenture sale last month went toward its purchase of Tucson, Arizona-based UNS Energy Corp.
 Scotiabank, which led banks on the Fortis deal, expects an “active” first quarter, with some deals tied to acquisition funding and asset purchases in the early part of the year, according to Lawrence Lewis, head of equity capital markets at the Toronto-based firm.
 The central bank will discuss returning to the one-week repurchase rate as its sole benchmark at tonight’s meeting, Basci said today.
 Bank of America Corp, the Charlotte, North Carolina-based company that purchased Merrill Lynch during the financial crisis, let most of its leases at 250 Vesey and 225 Liberty St.
 Fiat is due to complete the purchase of a 415 percent stake in Chrysler as early as today, capping a five-year effort to gain full ownership of the No.
 In the US, the Fed said last month it would reduce its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 Winners, Losers “As the Fed announced its intent to reduce asset purchases, you really came up with one game in town,” said Robert Pavlik, New York-based chief market strategist at Banyan Partners LLC, which manages about $45 billion.
 Gains of 17 percent through the first four months of 2013 evaporated as investors unloaded debt securities in anticipation the Fed would curtail its own bond purchases.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Manchester Airports Group reaped an early traffic boost from its 15 billion-pound ($25 billion) purchase of London Stansted in March, with passenger numbers at the low-cost hub growing for the first time since 2007.
 The Stansted purchase took the number of UK.
 The Fed took the first step toward the exit last month when it reduced the monthly pace of asset purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, citing evidence of improvement in the labor market.
 Asset Prices The Fed’s Republican critics say its bond purchases risk creating asset-price bubbles and eventually stoking inflation, even as price increases remain subdued.
 As the economy improves, the Fed is forecast to keep cutting the pace of bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next seven meetings before ending the program in December 2014, according to the median forecast in a Dec.
 Asian LNG importers typically purchase spot cargoes from December to March to meet peak heating and power demand during winter in the northern hemisphere.
 Other reasons include a 22 percent appreciation of the Korean won and a “marginally higher” purchase multiple, Stirling said in a note.
 AB InBev’s purchase would be the second takeover of an alcoholic beverage company this year after Japan’s Suntory Holdings Ltd.
 Fourth-quarter noninterest income increased $162 million, primarily from the release of reserves for residential mortgage repurchase obligations.
 The signaling-systems industry may continue to consolidate after the recent purchase of the rail division of Invensys Plc.
 Target is trying to keep customers’ loyalty after their card data was stolen while they made purchases in stores during the holidays, retailers’ most important season of the year and a time when many shoppers already were showing restraint.
 The breach occurred when a computer virus infected Target’s point-of-sale terminals where shoppers swipe a credit or debit card to make a purchase, a person familiar with the matter said last month.
 The Nikkei 225 last year capped its biggest gain since 1972 as Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and Bank of Japan Governor Haruhiko Kuroda sought to end deflation with fiscal easing and by pumping unprecedented cash into the economy through bond purchases.
 Icahn released a seven-page open letter to shareholders of Cupertino, California-based Apple yesterday, repeating his recommendation that the company increase its share-repurchase program.
 22 stating he purchased $500 million of shares in the past two weeks.
 “Given that the company has $130 billion of net cash and $40 billion of expected annual earnings, and the fact that it is hard to find a better time in history to borrow money, a $50 billion share repurchase over the course of fiscal year 2014 seems more than reasonable to us,” Icahn wrote in the letter, which was included in a filing with the US.
 “We believe that by choosing not to increase the size of the repurchase program, the directors are actually performing a great disservice to the owners, especially smaller shareholders who may not be in a position to buy more stock themselves,” Icahn said in yesterday’s letter.
 That’s prompted more Chinese cities to introduce restrictions on vehicle purchases.
 “Vehicle sales in China are facing pressures brought on by environmental protection, traffic jams and more cities limiting purchases,” Shi Jianhua, a vice secretary general at the auto association, said in Beijing.
 14 remarks to the National Association of Corporate Directors that signs are emerging that Fed stimulus has made for “an intoxicating brew” Economic Boost Even as the central bank starts slowing monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, yields on dollar-denominated speculative-grade bonds have fallen to 621 percent, 022 percentage point from the record low in May 2013, according to Bank of America Merrill Lynch index data.
 A cap rate is derived by dividing a property’s net operating income by its purchase price, so it moves down as values rise.
 Still, even at a 41 percent premium, the $16 billion purchase could boost Coca-Cola’s earnings, according to Bank of Montreal.
 In April of that year, after the talks had fizzled, the Wall Street Journal reported Coca-Cola explored a purchase.
 While PepsiCo’s Americas Beverages division has the most to gain initially from acquiring Monster, Chief Executive Officer Indra Nooyi doesn’t seem interested in such a large purchase, the report said.
 Among the largest Israeli technology companies changing hands in 2013 were the purchase of map software producer Waze Inc.
 Inflation Expectations Other choices include removing the ECB’s requirement for financial institutions to hold deposits at their national central banks, and stopping the sterilization of government bond purchases conducted under the now-terminated Securities Markets Program.
 “There are clearly also drawbacks to that option such as the public perception around sterilizing the SMP purchases” Knot played down any concern that subdued inflation in the euro area will turn into broadly falling prices that could also derail the economy.
 30, with the rest in bonds, asset-backed securities and reverse repurchase agreements, according to its quarterly report.
 Customers using ICBC’s website or mobile-phone application can purchase its mutual funds, wealth-management products, insurance policies, gold, currencies and other services.
 The purchase will advance ICBC Chairman Jiang Jianqing’s target of tripling the contribution of overseas earnings to 10 percent by 2016 as the bank follows corporate clients expanding abroad and seeks to tap demand for yuan-denominated goods and services.
 China’s biggest lender bought a 20 percent stake in Standard Bank for $54 billion in 2008, making it the Asian nation’s largest overseas purchase at the time.
 The purchase price of about $765 million is based on the unit’s net asset value of $141 billion at the end of June, the African lender said.
 Starwood Loan In case of a loan default, Marriott agreed to purchase the hotel portion of the property for $3146 million during the first two years after opening, Winthrop said.
 The total purchase price for that property, the Manhattan Clock Tower and a project in Miami Beach is expected to be about $815 million, according to the company.
 testified yesterday in Manhattan bankruptcy court that a fund manager and an attorney later found to be working for Ergen refused to answer when he tried to find out whether the Dish chairman was behind the purchases.
 “There was a strong suspicion at that time” about Ergen’s involvement in the purchases when LightSquared filed for bankruptcy in May 2012, Hootnick said.
 Stephen Ketchum of Sound Point Capital, who made the purchases for Ergen, “refused to answer any of those questions,” Hootnick said.
 ‘‘The strategy of GDF Suez is to develop mostly through organic growth, from time to time with small or medium-sized acquisitions,’’ Mestrallet said, citing last year’s purchase of a facility-management business from Balfour Beatty.
 24 deadline to complete the purchase of a 292 percent stake in Jakarta-based PT Bumi Resources, it said.
 The Federal Reserve is scheduled to release minutes of policy makers’ December meeting amid bets the central bank will keep reducing monthly debt purchases.
 The fund’s actual withdrawals or deposits may differ from Morningstar’s estimates because of the timing of purchases and redemptions or dividend distributions.
 In the US, applications for unemployment benefits rose in the latest week while purchases of previously-owned homes climbed less in December than projected.
 The MSCI Emerging Markets Index has lost about 10 percent since the Fed signaled in May that it could start scaling back bond purchases that boosted demand for higher-yielding assets.
 That compares with a median of 12 times historic Ebitda paid in 16 purchases of wine and spirits assets over the past five years, the data show.
 Co-Op Bank also suffered from bad debts stemming from the purchase of Britannia Building Society in 2009.
 Even after announcing a firm order today for 16 CSeries jets from Saudi Arabia’s Al Qahtani Group, Bombardier is still 102 units short of a target of 300 firm purchases by the time that the jet enters service.
 Bombardier has typically unveiled purchases in smaller batches than those for Airbus’s A320 and Boeing’s 737.
 It’s keeping the majority of the patents, which it valued at $55 billion when the purchase was announced.
 “We’d much rather innovate than litigate” Bubble Over Google’s purchase of Motorola Mobility, as well as the bidding contest in which Apple, Microsoft Corp, BlackBerry Ltd.
 and Ericsson AB topped Google for Nortel’s patents, created a pricing contest unlikely to be replicated, said Ron Laurie, managing director of Inflexion Point Strategy LLC, which counsels companies on intellectual-property purchases.
 For Google, the benefit in its patent purchase lies in what didn’t happen.
 ‘Level’ Field No new lawsuits have been filed by competitors against makers of Android phones since Google’s purchase of Motorola Mobility.
 Rockstar Consortium, the patent-owning entity set up after the Nortel purchase, has shown few tangible results so far, having spent about a year deciding what to do with the patents not chosen by its individual companies.
 Lenovo gets a fair number of cross-licensing deals with the purchase of Motorola Mobility so has relatively little to worry about when it comes to litigation, Rivette said.
 said yesterday that some unauthorized purchases may have been made with customer cards, the second retailer after Target Corp.
 Four years later, it purchased Hong Kong-based Lloyd George Management, which had an office in the UK, and introduced its BMO Global Asset Management brand.
 “People are taking profits rather than putting fresh money, but the fundamentals haven’t turned for the worse” The Federal Open Market Committee said yesterday it will cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, keeping to a plan for a gradual withdrawal from its monetary easing.
 Separate data showed that contracts to purchase previously owned homes in the US.
 18 that it would reduce monthly bond purchases, the worst performance among all emerging market currencies according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Moyer asked the court to recognize a class comprised of anyone who has made a Michaels purchase using a credit or debit card before Jan.
 Across the US, new-home purchases dropped 7 percent in December from the previous month, suggesting that rising prices and mortgage rates discouraged buyers at the end of 2013, Commerce Department figures released yesterday showed.
 ‘Strategic Relationship’ The king “explicitly told me that he saw the huge purchase as an investment in a long-term strategic relationship,” while “at the same time, Abdullah was very cautious about any kind of overt military cooperation or planning” that the Iranians “might consider an act of war” The package includes 84 new F-15s and upgrades to 70 more in the Saudi inventory at a cost of $30 billion, and helicopter sales totaling about $30 billion that included spare parts, training simulators, long-term logistics support and some munitions.
 The benchmark seven-day repurchase rate rose to a record 1077 percent on June 20 and averaged 409 percent last year, from 350 percent in 2012.
 Surveys show consumers want labels; still, such considerations may not be driving purchases, Anderson said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries and gold retreated while the dollar strengthened after minutes from the Federal Reserve’s last meeting indicated policy makers see risks to financial stability from continued monthly bond purchases.
 Fed policy makers saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s record bond buying program and expressed concern over the potential for “excessive risk-taking in the financial sector,” according to minutes of their last meeting, when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases.
 17-18 meeting that it would reduce monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion beginning in January.
 The minutes released today didn’t describe a set schedule for the pace of asset-purchase reductions, although “a few” officials mentioned the need for a “more deterministic path” The Fed will probably taper asset buying in $10 billion increments over the next seven meetings before ending them in December, according to a Dec.
 The policy-setting Federal Open Market Committee, citing improvement in the labor market, said in December it will cut its monthly purchases of bonds to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month.
 Treasuries” Lei said he purchased the Philippine 2024 bonds that were sold this week with a 42 percent coupon.
 The records didn’t describe a set schedule for the pace of asset-purchase reductions, although “a few” officials mentioned the need for a “more deterministic path” Companies in the US.
 It needs to be a structural solution, which is market-based” “We live in a very competitive environment and not many of our customers are interested in long-term purchase contracts.
 The utility known as Tepco aims to reduce annual fuel costs by about 650 billion yen ($62 billion) through the joint purchases and other measures, it said in a business turnaround plan released today in Tokyo.
 “Joint purchases could help Japan improve bargaining power and reduce fuel costs,” Osamu Fujisawa, a Tokyo-based independent oil economist, said by phone today before the plan was announced.
 Tepco plans to set up a venture for joint purchases by the end of fiscal 2014 after selecting partners, the company said in the business plan approved by the government.
 Since July 2011, Boston Scientific has repurchased 14 percent of its shares outstanding.
 Policy makers set up an asset-management company to purchase soured loans from banks in July.
 VAMC, as the entity is known, bought 39 trillion dong of debt from 35 banks through December, and may extend purchases to as much as 150 trillion dong by the end of 2014, State Bank of Vietnam Governor Nguyen Van Binh said last month.
 The prime minister, who today went to Southampton in southern England to visit a home purchased under Help to Buy, dismissed suggestions that it’s helping create a housing bubble.
 We are helping people who do not have wealthy parents, who cannot get a big deposit together, and helping them to realize their dreams” The government introduced the second phase of Help to Buy in October, enabling purchasers to take out a loan with a down payment of as little as 5 percent on homes with a value of as much as 600,000 pounds.
 Almost 750 people have completed purchases under Help to Buy in the 12 weeks since the program started, Cameron said.
 The purchase was made in part to get Motorola Mobility’s trove of more than 17,000 patents, which Google hoped would be used to counter attacks that its Android operating system was infringing Apple and Microsoft Corp.
 The government, which in November hammered out details on a 9 billion-euro ($122 billion) plan comprising structural measures to tackle costs from an aging population, welcomed the purchase of Rautaruukki.
 The purchase would be a “dream come true for the family,” he said.
 President Abdelaziz Bouteflika’s government announced plans last month to let banks finance the purchase of goods produced at least partially in Algeria.
 However, it has been completely ineffective, as imports and domestic demand have grown nonetheless, often bypassing this ban” A partial removal “will buy the government some sympathy, as Algerians regain access again to credit for their purchases, and could boost somewhat domestic production,” Fabiani said.
 Scant signs of accelerating inflation have given Federal Reserve policy makers room to move gradually as they wind down their unprecedented asset-purchase program.
 Fed’s View Federal Reserve officials are watching inflation closely as the central bank slows its monthly pace of asset purchases, which have been boosting the economy.
 “If inflation stepped lower in a clear way, I think that would give me some pause” about supporting more trims to bond purchase, said Federal Reserve Bank of St.
 Louis President James Bullard, a supporter of tapering bond purchases, speaking in Indianapolis last week.
 and funds consumer purchases at Kroger Co.
 Brazil has no long-term purchase contracts, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Three years ago, the two governments pledged in what’s known as the Lancaster House Treaty to intertwine their armed forces through joint operations and purchases.
 Equities briefly erased gains after minutes from the Federal Reserve’s last meeting indicated policy makers see risks to financial stability from continued monthly bond purchases.
 Alcoa’s Australian subsidiary used a consultant who paid bribes to Bahraini officials using money from markups he made between the purchase price of the product from the Alcoa unit and the sale price to Alba, according to the regulator.
 The men went on trial in Munich today over claims they overpaid by 550 million euros when they purchased a majority stake of Hypo Alpe-Adria-Bank International AG for 163 billion euros in May 2007.
 Schmidt said today he stood by the purchase.
 German Peculiarity In an initial ruling in the case, the court said the men could only be tried on the two related charges and not over the majority stake purchase.
 The central bank will probably reduce its monthly bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey this month.
 “It’s no longer a recovery led by affluent second-home buyers with high equity, or by government support of first-time buyers; most of our customer target groups are showing growth” More than 2,900 customers used Help-to-Buy to purchase homes from Taylor Wimpey last year, the company said today.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 It repurchased $228 million in the fourth quarter, bringing the yearly total to $350 million.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Dangote Group, controlled by Africa’s richest man Aliko Dangote, is considering the purchase of Nigerian oil fields as international companies plan to sell onshore assets in the continent’s top crude producer.
 Lenovo agreed to pay a reverse breakup fee of 8 percent to 9 percent of the $23 billion purchase price, or about $200 million, one of the people said, asking not to be identified because the details are private.
 The size of the fee highlights the risk Lenovo agreed to bear for its largest-ever purchase ahead of a probable national-security review by the US.
 The group reviews purchases of US.
 government cleared Lenovo’s $175 billion purchase of IBM’s personal-computer business in 2005 after a monthlong investigation.
 The purchase is at least the second for Longfor in as many months.
 Longfor gained 16 percent to close at HK$1136 in Hong Kong trading yesterday, before it announced the purchase.
 Investors will watch the speeches for clues on the direction of the monetary policy as the Fed begins tapering its bond purchases.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Japan’s finance industry is bracing for higher consumer prices by raising wages of its youngest recruits and recommending purchases of inflation-protected debt.
 The Montreal-based company has already expanded its market value to $44 billion from less than $3 billion in 2010 after striking deals including last year’s purchase of Bausch & Lomb Holdings Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The company has been the busiest dealmaker among North American pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies since 2010, with at least 34 purchases, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The activists have been so nice to the banks! For one thing, a lot of go-to suggestions in the activist playbook ("sell yourself," "do a big levered share repurchase," "split up the company," etc) tend to be the sorts of projects that require well-paid investment banking help.
 The maker of Smirnoff created a joint venture with Combs to buy DeLeon, London-based Diageo said today in a statement, without disclosing the purchase price.
 “Ultra-premium and above tequila is a very exciting segment –- we already have a strong brand there with Don Julio” Diageo ended talks on a purchase of Cuervo tequila in December 2012 and started dissolving an agreement to distribute the tequila outside Mexico.
 Only being in China and emerging markets is not enough” Investors panned the Motorola purchase yesterday, driving down Lenovo’s shares the most in 19 months.
 When he bought IBM’s PC unit for $125 billion in 2005, skeptics said North America was too risky for a Chinese company and that Lenovo’s purchase would undermine IBM’s ThinkPad brand.
 That could slow or even scuttle the purchases as growing Chinese investment in the US.
 “As we get to a more purchase-driven market, we actually think we’ve got a great opportunity to grow the business” Responding to analysts’ concerns about the quality of the bank’s earnings, Sloan said in an interview that equity gains were less than the prior year’s fourth quarter, while annual figures were in line with the prior year.
 Lenovo Group Ltd’s purchase of Motorola’s consumer-hardware business, which Google bought two years ago for $124 billion including patents, lets the search company refocus on software and exit competition with other manufacturers of smartphones based on its Android software.
 It cut monthly bond purchases to $65 billion from $75 billion.
 Brazil has no long-term purchase contracts, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 GameStop probably accounted for at least 18 million of the 72 million new consoles purchased, and will sell another 300,000 before the end of the month, said Michael Pachter, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles, said in a research note on Jan.
 7 after Sony announced plans for a new video-game streaming service that would give users the ability to download titles from the Internet rather than purchase them new or used from GameStop stores.
 The new consoles probably led some consumers to delay purchases after the new machines sold out in some locations.
 Wells Fargo has been expanding in investment banking after acquiring a securities business in the 2008 purchase of Wachovia Corp.
 Foreigners have sold a net 532 billion rand ($482 million) of South African debt this year, after five years of inflows, as the Federal Reserve tapers bond purchases that fueled demand for emerging-market assets.
 The central bank, which aims to keep inflation between 3 percent and 6 percent, has left the repurchase rate at a three-decade low of 5 percent since a surprise cut in July 2012 to support growth.
 Former Deutsche Telekom AG CEO Rene Obermann, who took over as Ziggo’s chief this month, will leave the company after the purchase is complete.
 Separately, Liberty Global agreed to buy back shares worth $1 billion, which will be added to a two-year $35 billion stock repurchase program that’s under way.
 Liberty Global has repurchased more than $10 billion of its equity since 2005, it said in a statement.
 for proposals for the purchase of 10 to 20 single-aisle planes, and is also considering twin-aisle planes, either the Boeing 777X or Airbus’s A350, of which it has already ordered 14, CEO Tewolde Gebre Mariam said today.
 That comprised Cnooc’s $6 billion bridge loan in February as part of its purchase of Canadian oil-sand operator Nexen Inc, and its parent’s $3 billion two-part loan in September, the data show.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury yields rose to the highest levels since 2011 as the Federal Reserve prepared to start cutting bond purchases amid data that signaled the recovery of the world’s biggest economy is picking up speed.
 18 it will cut its bond purchases under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy to $75 billion a month from $85 billion, starting in January.
 The central bank will make its first Treasuries purchase under the smaller program on Jan.
 Policy makers will pare purchases by $10 billion in each of its next seven meetings before ending the program late this year as the economy strengthens and unemployment decreases, according to analysts surveyed by Bloomberg Dec.
 A cap rate is derived by dividing a property’s net operating income by its purchase price, so it moves down as values rise.
 In Ghana, bean purchases rose 27 percent from Oct.
 Telefonica’s plan to purchase KPN’s E-Plus will merge the two companies’ German units, reducing the country’s mobile operators from four to three.
 policy makers began slowing stimulus this month as the economy of Canada’s biggest trade partner improves, cutting monthly bond purchases to $85 billion from $75 billion.
 The purchase was made in part to get Motorola Mobility’s trove of more than 17,000 patents, which Google hoped would be used to counter attacks that its Android operating system was infringing Apple and Microsoft Corp.
 and a likely agreement by Liberty Global Plc to purchase Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV.
 The largest previous deal by any of the three companies was the purchase of Virgin Media Inc.
 Liberty Global, Malone’s European telecommunications holding company, is nearing an agreement to purchase Dutch broadband provider Ziggo, which has a 675 billion euro ($92 billion) market value, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The plaintiffs, a class of industrial purchasers of the chemicals used to make such products as cushions, auto seats and insulation, had settled with the other defendants for a total of $139 million before trial.
 Fed Meeting The Federal Reserve begins its two-day policy meeting tomorrow and will cut its $75 billion of monthly bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six gatherings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to the median forecasts of economists in a Bloomberg survey Jan.
 The benchmark seven-day repurchase rate jumped to a record 1077 percent on June 20 and averaged 409 percent last year, from 350 percent in the previous year.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Bill Gross, the money manager known as “The Bond King,” misjudged the timing and impact of the Federal Reserve’s plan to scale back its asset purchases in 2013, spurring the Pimco Total Return Fund’s biggest decline in almost two decades.
 The deal adds to purchases of Australian fuel by Japan, the world’s biggest importer of LNG.
 When boats are canceled, which occurs in storms or high winds, unembalmed bodies marooned on Nantucket can now be stored at the island’s sole hospital, which recently purchased a freezer.
 The two state-run explorers will together purchase 10 percent of Indian Oil Corp.
 More than $995 billion has been erased from the value of emerging-market equities since the Fed signaled in May that it could start scaling back asset purchases.
 Spending Bitcoins to purchase goods may trigger capital gains and losses or ordinary income and losses, which have different tax rates, Olson said in her annual report to Congress.
 International investors bought a net $92 million of shares on the Ho Chi Minh City Stock Exchange yesterday, a 19th day of purchases, the longest such streak since October, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 They bought $232 million of shares this week through yesterday, poised for the biggest week of purchases since the period ended Dec.
 They also produce sponsorships, ticket sales, merchandise purchases and championship payouts from the NCAA.
 didn’t properly inspect products it purchased in China, leading to fox DNA being found in meat sold as donkey, the state-owned radio broadcaster reported, citing the provincial food regulator.
 Federal Trade Commission complaint that it billed for mobile application purchases made by children without their parents’ consent.
 Ramirez said the $325 million figure is just a floor and that consumers will get full refunds to cover purchases from March 2011.
 Many games in the App Store use what’s called “in-app purchases” in which a player can pay to get more features or advance more quickly.
 Apple takes a 30 percent cut of App Store purchases.
 The agreement with the FTC “extends our existing refund program for in-app purchases which may have been made without a parent’s permission” Apple’s deal with the FTC comes after the company settled a similar class-action lawsuit in California last year, resolving claims that the company induced children to make game-related purchases on iPhones and iPads without their parents’ knowledge or permission.
 Apple also often showed a screen that didn’t explain that a password entry would finalize a purchase, the FTC said.
 Apple received “at least tens of thousands of complaints about unauthorized in-app purchases by children,” the FTC said.
 Debt Refinancing Caesars, based in Las Vegas, was purchased in a 2008 buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 Whether it buys Revel or not, it needs to restructure by the end of 2015” A purchase of Revel by Caesars might reshape New Jersey’s gambling industry should the company be forced to sell or close an existing property.
 Caesars is building a convention center in Atlantic City and in December purchased the property and fixtures of the Atlantic Club, which ceased operations this month.
 A pickup in hiring coupled with wage gains are helping to spur faster growth in the consumer purchases that make up almost 70 percent of the economy.
 Rupee Drops The rupiah fell this week on speculation companies are boosting dollar purchases to fulfill month-end payments.
 China’s benchmark seven-day repurchase rate rose to a record 1077 percent on June 20 and averaged 409 percent last year, compared with 350 percent in 2012.
 central bank started trimming its debt purchases this month by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 The Fed will cut its purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six gatherings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to the median forecasts of economists in a Bloomberg survey Jan.
 Obermann’s Future Former Deutsche Telekom AG CEO Rene Obermann, who took over as Ziggo’s chief this month, will leave the company after the purchase is completed.
 Separately, Liberty Global agreed to buy back shares worth $1 billion, which will be added to its two-year $35 billion stock repurchase program already under way.
 Liberty Global has repurchased more than $10 billion of its equity since 2005, Fries said in a separate statement.
 Ergen is accused of surreptitiously buying LightSquared debt and blocking attempts to reveal who was behind the purchases.
 According to Ergen, the purchases were smart and the entity that bought the debt, SP Special Opportunities LLC, is distinct from Dish and EchoStar.
 He has said he was buying on his own, personal account, and made no “false representations” about the purchases.
 Joshua Sussberg, a lawyer who represents LightSquared, told the judge today that proceeding with the trial may let his client get any profit Ergen’s fund made from its debt purchases, something that would help with a stand-alone restructuring.
 Friedman argued that Ergen felt confident taking money from his daughter’s fund because he was making the investment as someone who controlled Dish and thought he would be able to “recycle” the money back to his daughter through the purchase of LightSquared.
 LightSquared has said that SP Special Opportunities is also linked to Dish because Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser was acting on the satellite-TV company’s behalf when he caused SP to execute its purchases.
 Closely held Bupa will also purchase a 49 percent stake in Highway to Health Inc, a company owned by the Blue Cross plans that sells global insurance products.
 In Blue Cross and Blue Shield, the venture has “a brand everybody knows and Americans trust” The companies weren’t releasing terms of the purchase by London-based Bupa, Elfinger said, and he declined to estimate possible future membership, sales or profitability.
 Monthly Performance Treasuries headed for the biggest monthly advance since May 2012, even after the Federal Open Market Committee voted in December to trim monthly asset purchases by $10 billion.
 government securities in trades in the market for repurchase agreements, or repos.
 The Fed decided at its December meeting to reduce monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, starting in this month.
 28-29, will cut purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six gatherings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to the median forecasts of economists in a Bloomberg News survey Jan.
 The insurer repurchased $13 billion of shares in 2013.
 said the number of initial public offerings it handles may rise this year, buoyed by strong equity markets and the Federal Reserve’s announcement that it will reduce bond purchases.
 It is the biggest purchase of a New York building ever by a Chinese company, and caps a year in which Chinese investors made some of the city’s most high-profile real estate deals.
 Housing Dream The distinction between purchases by mainland Chinese and by Chinese who have already immigrated to Australia is blurry.
 “It was an unprecedented level of interest in the development,” with about 870 people paying a A$5,000 refundable deposit to register possible intention to purchase and receive priority, said Ben Stewart, a director at CBRE’s residential projects division, adding that agents do their best to also cater to walk-ins.
 The broker has also been approached by sellers wanting to reach Chinese purchasers, he said.
 When buying as investments, mainland purchasers prefer new construction with good rental potential, said Grace Yeung, who set up Sydney-based GBE Property Investments as a division of realty marketer Golden Berg Enterprises Pty, in May to match Chinese buyers with Australian sellers.
 While residential real estate doesn’t qualify as an investment, the rules allow 888 recipients to purchase homes.
 Two-thirds of new London homes sold before completion are being purchased by Southeast Asian buyers, according to Land Securities Group Plc, the UK’s largest real estate investment trust.
 Buyers in Mexico pushed purchases up 77 percent last year to 106 million vehicles, a trade group representing auto dealers said today in Mexico City.
 Last month’s 119,364 new-car purchases were the most for any month since December 2007.
 “We’re seeing a rebound from purchases that were delayed during the crisis years,” Guillermo Rosales, executive director of institutional relations at the dealers group, told reporters in Mexico City.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank could cut its key interest rates further and engage in asset purchases if the outlook for the euro area economy requires, said European Central Bank Governing Council member Ignazio Visco.
 Within the ECB’s mandate, “there are assets that can be considered” for direct purchase in case of crisis, he said.
 Federal Reserve board members Charles Plosser and Richard Fisher separately called for an end to the central bank’s monthly bond purchases after Atlanta Fed President Dennis Lockhart yesterday backed reductions.
 listing after the purchase.
 Amec will use current funds and new debt for that portion of the purchase.
 Japan purchased a record 873 million metric tons of LNG in 2012, paying 6 trillion yen ($575 billion), double the amount in 2011, according to customs data.
 It earlier bought the maker of American Standard toilets for $542 million and has also purchased Permasteelisa SpA, which made walls for the Guggenheim Museum and Sydney Opera House.
 He said it draws on an existing program that permits workers to purchase US.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo Argos SA rallied the most since March 2011 after the Colombian cement and energy conglomerate canceled its plan to purchase a majority stake in the state-controlled power producer Isagen SA.
 Grupo Argos had planned to pay for the purchase either by issuing new shares or selling stock holdings, according to Velez.
 13 it will raise the annual dividend to 54 cents a share based on a C$109 million light-oil purchase.
 The purchases have swelled the Fed’s balance sheet to more than $4 trillion as Fed Chairman Ben S.
 -Bank of England rate decision: The Monetary Policy Committee will probably keep its benchmark interest rate at 05 percent and its bond-purchase program at 375 billion pounds ($618 billion), in line with Governor Mark Carney’s forward guidance on policy.
 As the Federal Reserve plans to slow its monthly bond purchases, strategists including Bank of America’s Hans Mikkelson say investors may find shelter in high-grade bonds, which pay a cushion of extra yield over benchmark rates.
 Officials saw diminishing economic benefits from asset purchases, according to the minutes of the meeting, where the Fed decided to reduce buying by $10 billion starting this month.
 The transfer window is a period during which teams are allowed to purchase contracted players from other clubs and register them as their own.
 The festival, a key occasion for consumers to purchase expensive gifts of high-end cognac, is this year on Jan.
 18, saying it would reduce the pace of its monthly asset purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 India’s central bank Governor Raghuram Rajan boosted the repurchase rate to 8 percent from 775 percent, while only three of 45 analysts in a Bloomberg News survey predicted the move.
 Chairman Charlie Ergen’s secret purchases of debt in broadband provider LightSquared Inc.
 Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser, who advised Ergen on the purchases, told the court last week that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or its chairman when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 6, Chinese regulators said the donkey contamination stemmed from Wal-Mart’s failure to properly inspect products purchased in China, according to the state-owned radio broadcaster.
 The seven-day repurchase rate surged 112 basis points from a week ago to 514 percent as of 3:25 pm.
 That prompted the Reserve Bank of India to raise its repurchase rate a quarter-point to 8 percent on Jan.
 “Action in the bond market will slow down after the RBI’s rate increase” Offerings Plunge Morgan Stanley first used the term “fragile five” in a report in August, amid an emerging-market rout caused by investors pulling out their money on speculation the Federal Reserve would soon reduce its bond purchases.
 The RBI has raised the repurchase rate by 75 basis points since September to 8 percent to calm price pressures in Asia’s third-biggest economy.
 went through to integrate its purchase of a Hong Kong-based lender.
 While the negotiations may lead nowhere, they stirred memories of DBS’s $54 billion purchase of Dao Heng Bank Ltd.
 A purchase of the Hong Kong lender would be OCBC’s biggest, surpassing the $28 billion it paid in 2001 for Keppel Capital Holdings Ltd.
 DBS purchased Dao Heng for 33 times book.
 The following table shows Tepco’s consumption and purchases of fuel oil, crude, LNG and coal in 2012 and 2013.
 The Indonesian carrier has relied on self-funding and bank loans to fund aircraft purchase in the past, Kirana said today.
 unit slid 19 percent, in line with estimates, led by declines in Coors Light and Miller Lite purchases.
 28-29, decided last month to begin trimming monthly bond purchases, citing improvement in the labor market.
 sales of interest rate-tied notes dropped 18 percent to $475 billion, as the Federal Reserve’s monthly $85 billion of bond purchases kept rates low.
 predicts a jump in the proportion of aircraft financed through private placements after Norwegian Air Shuttle ASA last week funded the purchase of five of the planemaker’s 737-800 jets using such a deal.
 Capital markets -- including EETCs and private placements -- will provide about 22 percent of the anticipated $112 billion in financing required for aircraft purchases this year, up from 14 percent in 2013, according to Boeing.
 Ergen, who is positioning Dish to enter the wireless business, has said his purchases of the debt were smart, not illegal.
 He announced last week that the insurer authorized the repurchase of as much as $150 million of shares.
 Jazz’s enviable tax base is only part of the appeal as the $73 billion company bolsters its product lineup with the $1 billion purchase of rare-disease drug developer Gentium SpA.
 Perrigo said the purchase will help it save more than $150 million a year because of lower taxes and cost cuts.
 Jazz also offers a growing and diversified revenue stream from its treatments for rare diseases, especially following its purchase of Gentium, Yang said.
 In 2012, Jazz purchased EUSA Pharma Inc, the maker of leukemia drug Erwinaze.
 The company, which bought back $11 billion of stock in the first quarter, plans to repurchase $850 million more this period, Chief Executive Officer Philippe Dauman said on a conference call.
 The Sendai-based utility will nearly double North American coal purchases to 5 percent of its total, according to Takayoshi Enomoto, the group manager of the company’s fuel department.
 The country, which imports almost all of its coal requirements, has more than doubled purchases from the US, where a shale boom has encouraging buyers to switch to gas, driving down coal demand.
 “We’re also in talks with some companies to jointly purchase coal” to reduce prices and increase flexibility, he said, without providing details.
 Some, including Debenhams, offered discounts of as much as 50 percent before Christmas as shoppers delayed purchases to wait for bargains, taking a toll on profitability.
 Local governments provide matching subsidies -- funded by local tax revenues -- on top of incentives by central government of as much as 60,000 yuan toward the purchase of an all-electric passenger vehicle and as much as 500,000 yuan for an electric bus.
 Shannon Barbara, a spokeswoman for the online reseller, said this game may shake previous patterns, because New York is an attractive destination and annually one of the largest sources of ticket purchasers.
 Last Year For last year’s Super Bowl, 30 percent of tickets purchased on Razorgator were bought the week before the game, including 15 percent the weekend before kickoff.
 Facebook, the world’s largest social network, said after the close of trading yesterday that it reached a milestone last quarter by getting more than half of its advertising revenue from mobile devices, while Visa benefited from an uptick in consumer sentiment that fueled purchases on cards.
 Qunar also started a “price war” in hotel group-purchases on Jan.
 economy is automobile purchases, which reached the best annualized sales pace since 2007 in November.
 “Saputo has to find financial gains in Asia to justify a large purchase here as a beachhead acquisition,” said Paul Jensz, a Melbourne-based analyst at PAC Partners Pty.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, rose the most in more than two years after reporting fourth-quarter profit doubled and Sanford C.
 The lender is benefiting from a pickup in household wealth and consumer confidence that has propelled card purchases.
 CNPC’s LNG-purchase agreement, for at least 3 million tons a year, will be fully linked to oil prices, while the other contracts will have mixed pricing, according to the executive.
 Items removed from the organizing budget include the purchase of 27,000 radio communication devices, energy generators and buses needed to ferry the thousands of athletes, team delegates and media around the coastal city.
 The Fed announced plans this week to reduce monthly bond purchases further to $65 billion from $75 billion.
 was raising money for a purchase.
 Now, with Microsoft searching for direction, Allen’s investments have recovered from that rocky stretch thanks in part to the football team he once said he purchased out of “civic duty” The Seahawks, buoyed by TV broadcast fees, are worth about six times what Allen paid.
 Wholesale purchasers in eastern Australia, who paid A$3 ($267) to A$4 per million British thermal units on average over the past decade, are being asked for more than twice as much when they sign new supply contracts or renew existing ones, says Wood Mackenzie Ltd, an energy research company.
 AB InBev AB InBev, the world’s biggest brewer, sold $525 billion of bonds in six parts to help fund its purchase of South Korea’s Oriental Brewery Co, Bloomberg data show.
 “A lot of those Russians who made online purchases in global online stores aren’t eager to switch to the local ones,” said Boris Ovchinnikov, co-founder of Data Insight.
 “They would rather make more purchases while traveling abroad” Tax Initiative President Vladimir Putin said last month that e-commerce should be put “in order” with more tax collected from it.
 Subsequently, Russia’s Finance Ministry proposed to lower the threshold for tax-exempt online purchases to 150 euros ($206) from 1,000 euros.
 The central bank will probably reduce its monthly bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey this month.
 The binding memorandum of understanding provides a minimum purchase volume and China Telecom was granted exclusivity for the China territory, LifeWatch said.
 The company said last year it plans to use the proceeds to repurchase preferred stock held by other Mitsubishi companies before resuming dividends for common shareholders.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- NXP Semiconductor NV is considering acquisition targets and could make a purchase of as much as $15 billion, said Chief Executive Officer Richard Clemmer.
 We are thinking about what alternatives are out there” NXP is considering large purchases again after reducing its debt over the last several years, Clemmer said.
 　　“The BOJ might come in for more asset purchases” to alleviate the impact on the economy from the planned tax hike, said Alvin Liew, a Singapore-based economist at United Overseas Bank Ltd.
 Ortberg said smaller companies, whose purchases typically drive that market segment, are refurbishing older planes and won’t begin placing new orders until they see robust revenue gains.
 It will keep weighing purchase reductions amid job gains, Richmond Fed President Jeffrey Lacker said.
 18 it will cut its stimulus program of bond purchases, known as quantitative easing, to $75 billion a month from $85 billion, starting in January.
 Fed Purchase The central bank will make its first Treasuries purchase under the reduced program on Jan.
 Policy makers will pare purchases by $10 billion in each of its next meetings before ending the program late this year as the economy strengthens and unemployment decreases, according to the median forecast of analysts surveyed by Bloomberg Dec.
 “For the US, the main driver is still the Fed and how the market ultimately responds to bond purchases slowing down.
 The Fed will continue to review reductions to bond purchases because improvements in the job market are meeting the central bank’s objectives, Lacker of the Richmond Fed said today at a Maryland Bankers Association forum in Baltimore.
 purchases will reach a five-year high of 230,000 tons, the government said.
 phone company said the purchase will speed up the introduction of new features for its FiOS network, and Verizon will offer it as an Internet-based service outside of its coverage area and on mobile devices.
 As part of the deal, New York-based Verizon will purchase intellectual property rights and other assets related to the OnCue platform, the companies said.
 The $6 billion purchase of Neiman Marcus Inc, a Dallas-based luxury chain, by Canada Pension Plan Investment Board and Ares Management LLC was the second-largest, with Empire Co’s $569 billion takeover of Safeway Inc’s Canadian grocery stores ranking third.
 Other retail deals included Hudson’s Bay Co’s $27 billion purchase of luxury retailer Saks Inc, the data show.
 and Chennai Petroleum Corp, said earlier this month they will defer resuming purchases of Iranian crude by at least three months, having failed to get reinsurance for shipments after Europe said it would relax a coverage ban.
 Hedge fund manager Robert Chapman, who has criticized Ackman’s Herbalife allegations and previously bought and sold a stake in the company, said he purchased some shares today at about $64.
 Robust purchases by the world’s second-biggest economy underscore the resilient domestic demand that is poised to support growth.
 It left the benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 775 percent on Dec.
 is adding new business units for enterprise computing and cloud services ahead of the company’s planned $23 billion purchase of International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit.
 The new enterprise unit will absorb the business acquired from IBM once the purchase clears all regulatory approvals, Lenovo said in a statement.
 The central bank decided at its December meeting to start reducing the pace of asset purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion this month.
 “If these numbers don’t get revised upward, it will keep the Fed careful about wanting to taper too quickly” Cutting Purchases The Federal Reserve said last month it will cut monthly asset purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 “I do believe that by the end of 2014, the Fed wants to be out,” Gross said in a radio interview on “Bloomberg Surveillance” with Tom Keene, referring to the central bank’s purchases in its quantitative easing program.
 online retail sales are set to exceed 100 billion pounds ($164 billion) for the first time in 2014, with growth forecast to accelerate slightly from last year as more Britons make purchases using smartphones or tablets.
 American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said Jan.
 The S&P BSE Sensex rose 9 percent in 2013, its best annual performance among the four-largest emerging markets, boosted by $20 billion of equity purchases by global investors last year, the most in Asia after Japan.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Further gains in consumer spending, which accounts for 70 percent of the economy, will be needed to drive demand for credit beyond loans for big-ticket purchases such as automobiles.
 Non-revolving credit, such as that for college tuition and the purchase of vehicles and mobile homes, climbed by $119 billion after October’s $139 billion increase.
 Even as some consumers remain cautious about using debt to pay for purchases, credit card companies can still benefit through better credit quality, Richard Fairbank, chief executive officer of Capital One Financial Corp, said at the Goldman Sachs Financial Services Conference on Dec.
 Many Americans have been less hesitant to borrow for auto purchases during the industry’s best year since 2007.
 The central bank is trimming its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, “reflecting cumulative progress and an improved outlook for the job market,” Chairman Ben S.
 Offerings slowed amid a sell-off in emerging-market stocks and currencies in the lead-up to the Federal Reserve announcing a $10 billion reduction in monthly bond purchases yesterday.
 “If there’s news coming out over the holiday about emerging markets or China, the market will be extra sensitive to that, but it’s fair to say that stabilization came quite quickly this time around” Fed, PMI The Federal Open Market Committee reduced debt purchases to $65 billion a month, citing labor-market indicators that “were mixed but on balance showed further improvement” and economic growth that has “picked up in recent quarters” The US.
 The $11 trillion spending legislation for the current fiscal year funds all 29 F-35 aircraft that the Defense Department had requested, as well as the start of advance hardware purchases for 39 of the 42 jets on the military’s wish list for the year that begins Oct.
 General Dynamics rose 46 percent yesterday after the third-biggest federal contractor forecast higher business-jet sales and said it would step up share repurchases.
 The Fed’s bond purchases have kept borrowing costs at historic lows, bolstering a housing recovery that has also benefited from job growth and a tight supply of properties for sale.
 The committee meets next week after deciding in December to cut purchases by $10 billion a month.
 The purchase gauge declined 36 percent from a seven-week high.
 “This is due to the rise in shareholder activism which could push these companies to distribute more of their large cash flows to shareholders via share repurchases and dividends” Still, there are limits to how much oil companies can cut spending if they want to maintain output over the next few years, said Christine Tiscareno, an equity analyst at S&P Capital IQ in London.
 in December gained the fewest jobs in two years, Labor Department figures showed last week, bolstering speculation that an uneven economic recovery may slow the pace of the Federal Reserve’s cuts to its bond-purchase program.
 The committee in December decided to cut purchases to $75 billion, from $85 billion, citing improvements in the labor market.
 chemical maker by market value, will repurchase $5 billion of its shares after posting fourth-quarter earnings that exceeded analysts’ estimates.
 The repurchase plan is the largest since a similar sized program began in 2005 and the biggest since Ellen Kullman took over as chairman and chief executive officer in 2009.
 Based on current prices, the anticipated repurchase of about 30 million shares this year will cut the number of outstanding shares by 1 percent to 15 percent, according to Fanandakis.
 DuPont is pursuing “smaller” acquisitions with geographic significance, such as last year’s purchase of Pannar Seed Ltd, Africa’s largest seed producer, the CEO said.
 In addition to the expansion of the discounters, business at Morrison was hurt by the lack of an online grocery offering as more consumers purchased holiday provisions over the Web.
 Price Cuts Marks & Spencer reported a 10th straight quarter of falling clothing sales, largely because of a steep decline in October when mild weather caused shoppers to delay purchases of coats and sweaters.
 Rental bonds are providing a new source of capital to landlords, after private-equity firms, hedge funds and other investors went on a $20 billion buying spree in the last two years to purchase as many as 200,000 homes to lease, according to Jade Rahmani, a housing analyst with Keefe Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 Federal Reserve policy makers said yesterday the central bank will cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to a plan for a gradual withdrawal from its unprecedented monetary easing.
 Buyers of potash deferred purchases in the second half of 2013 after OAO Uralkali, the world’s largest producer, quit a sales accord in July with its Belarusian competitor and announced plans to boost output.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan increased the benchmark repurchase rate to 8 percent from 775 percent, a decision predicted by only three of 45 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg, with the rest expecting no change.
 6 Pentagon directive to reduce the number of ships it purchases by 20 to 32.
 By the end of fiscal 2015, the Navy had planned to purchase the first 24 of the ships.
 Asian LNG importers typically purchase more spot shipments from December to March to meet peak heating and power demand during winter in the northern hemisphere.
 He raised the benchmark repurchase rate twice before leaving it unchanged at 775 percent at the last review on Dec.
 22, taking this month’s purchases to $4434 million, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Carl Icahn has acquired $36 billion in shares in Apple Inc, and is lobbying CEO Tim Cook to funnel more of its cash into large share repurchases.
 Icahn this month purchased an 082 percent stake in EBay Inc.
 The owner of USA Today has rallied 42 percent since saying last year it was adding to its TV assets with the purchase of Belo Corp.
 While Gannett’s stock price surged after the purchase of Belo, the newspaper unit is still dragging the company’s profit multiple down to the lowest among US.
 Assets under management rose to 877 billion Swiss francs ($98 billion) from 80 billion francs a year earlier, including client accounts absorbed from the Lloyds purchase, the bank said in an e-mailed statement today.
 The company will use the money to fund potential solar-plant purchases.
 28-29, decided at its December meeting to start reducing the pace of monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 The decline accelerated in October when the bank dropped language about the need to raise interest rates, and has come amid a slowing labor market and persistent trade deficits, leading investors to curb purchases of Canada’s top-rated government bonds.
 The Bank of Canada’s shift away from talk of raising rates comes as the Federal Reserve begins to taper its asset-purchase program known as quantitative easing, while investors gain confidence in Europe’s economic improvement with Ireland and Portugal returning to the sovereign debt market.
 target customers more effectively, could lure technology companies seeking their own purchases to keep up with the consolidation, said Raymond James Financial Inc.
 The bigger tech players need to look into some of these hyper-growth areas in order to build up their product portfolio” Deal Speculation When asked if Marketo would be amenable to a sale, Chief Executive Officer Phil Fernandez said in an e-mailed response yesterday that Oracle’s purchase of Responsys “only further validates that marketing technology is truly the next big software category” Fernandez said in June that while Marketo could be sold at the right price, he is committed to keeping it independent.
 The company has about $420 million remaining to spend in the repurchase program that expires March 31.
 Sending Money As more consumers adopt Bitcoin and other digital currencies for purchases and money transfers, that could adversely impact established financial companies such as Western Union Co, Luria said.
 “We will continue to track the use of virtual currency in the market, and expect that it should comply with the same regulations and oversight that the rest of the financial services industry must adhere to, to ensure that consumers are protected” Bitcoins aren’t controlled by any country or banking authority, so fees on using the currency to make purchases or transfer money can be much lower.
 A purchase of the Alcatel-Lucent unit would give Unify access to a broader customer base, improving the Munich-based company’s ability to compete with Cisco Systems Inc, particularly in North America, one of the people said.
 The London-based company completed the takeover of Spain’s Vueling SA in August following the purchase of UK.
 The purchase of Vueling allowed the company to maintain traffic growth at twice the rate of its peers even after a near 17 percent drop at Iberia, where it’s wrestling with its own cost and overcapacity issues.
 Over-the-Counter J&J has brought new medicines to the market the past two years while it integrated the 2012 acquisition of closely held device maker Synthes Inc, the largest purchase in company history.
 The transactions, brokered by a London dealer, included another portrait of Dyer and an early 1960s painting of a pope that were purchased by Martinez.
 At least 10 works in Sotheby’s and Christie’s November evening contemporary auctions had been purchased since the start of 2010, according to the catalogs.
 Hoffman, a trustee of the Dallas Museum of Art, said the deal’s privacy agreement was broken when Studio Capital Inc, a Belize-registered company she claimed is controlled by Martinez “for the purpose of maintaining the secrecy of his purchases and sales of art,” entered the Rothko in Sotheby’s May 2010 auction in New York and marketing materials revealed her prior ownership.
 A Fed policy announcement is projected to include a $10 billion cut to bond purchases.
 Fed Policy The Federal Open Market Committee will cut purchases of Treasury and mortgage debt for a second time to $65 billion a month, from $75 billion, as it concludes a two-day meeting today, according to a Bloomberg News survey of economists on Jan.
 The central bank will scale down the program by $10 billion at each subsequent meeting to end the purchases this year, the analysts forecast.
 The Monetary Policy Committee lifted the repurchase rate to 55 percent from 5 percent, Governor Gill Marcus told reporters in Pretoria today.
 “The fact that Aisin is interested in acquiring tech parts makers means they can finance that” Japanese automobile component makers spent $499 million on acquisitions last year, lower than the $11 billion spent on purchases in 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Basci’s Pledge At the central bank’s policy meeting last month, Governor Erdem Basci maintained the one-week repurchase rate at 45 percent and held the upper and lower bands of his rates corridor at 775 percent and 35 percent, respectively.
 In December, the Fed said it would cut monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 Chief Executive Officer Paul Bulcke said the investment will create 700 direct and 3,500 indirect jobs, as well as bolster the amount of raw materials purchased locally.
 There is scarcely any stock exchange organization in the world with such a presence in Asia as Deutsche Boerse” Deutsche Boerse, which is seeking to combat declining trading volumes at home, is focused on expanding in Asia after European regulators blocked its purchase of NYSE Euronext in 2012.
 Following the South African unit’s purchase of Barclays’s operations in eight African countries last year, the investment bank has access to offices, customers, staff and information in nations including Kenya, Ghana, Mozambique and Botswana.
 The Bank of Thailand cut its one-day bond repurchase rate by a quarter of a percentage point to 225 percent in November.
 China, which imports about 60 percent of global iron-ore output, increased purchases to a record last year as demand for steel from the car and construction industries climbed.
 The social-media company will be located around the corner from 111 Eighth Ave, the converted freight terminal in the Chelsea neighborhood purchased by Google Inc.
 Changing Sentiment Last year, the sentiment shifted as the Federal Reserve signaled plans to slow bond purchases, while gains in US.
 Consumer purchases of gold in China surged 30 percent in the 12 months through September to 9963 tons, overtaking demand in India, where usage gained 24 percent to 9776 tons, the World Gold Council estimates.
 The 24 percent rise in Indian jewelry, bar and coin purchases to 9776 tons in the 12 months through September lagged the 30 percent gain to 9963 tons in China, the gold council said.
 That purchase was allowed by the government because it said the deal would result in only “a modest increase in spectrum concentration by the incumbents” Under pressure to liberalize the industry, the government compromised in 2012 by allowing carriers with less than 10 percent market share to be bought by foreign investors.
 18 it will cut its bond purchases, which focus on mortgage debt and longer-term Treasuries, to $75 billion a month from $85 billion starting in January.
 “The changes will have quite a big impact on Bitcoin trading in China” A number of third-party payment systems have also stopped processing transactions for Bitcoin purchases.
 The draft EU law on shadow banking, also published today, focuses on boosting transparency of securities financing transactions, such as trades in repurchase agreements -- repos.
 Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc, the largest publicly traded copper producer, raised $7 billion of loans in February to back its purchase of Plains Exploration & Production Co.
 By contrast, developed markets have rallied as the Fed’s decision to slow asset purchases boosted confidence in the US.
 “While it might not fit necessarily with Dish, that spectrum could fit with different companies” LightSquared said Ergen, 60, blocked attempts to reveal who was behind the debt purchases and knew the credit agreement prohibited competitors such as Englewood, Colorado-based Dish from owning the debt.
 Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser, who advised on the debt purchases, testified last week that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or Ergen when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 LightSquared has said Kiser, who has known Ergen for 27 years, was acting on behalf of Dish when he caused an investment vehicle Ergen controlled to execute its purchases.
 Bank Debt Ergen testified he heard from Kiser that Dish wasn’t eligible to purchase the bank debt, removing a possible conflict.
 The purchase of NaturalMotion, which had total 2013 bookings of about $62 million, will add 1 cent a share to earnings this year, contributing about $15 million to $25 million in adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, Zynga said.
 A measure of purchases excluding vehicles jumped by the most in almost a year.
 It also decided to begin a new 12-month share repurchase program of as much as 15 billion kroner.
 The Fed will reduce bond purchases in $10 billion increments over its next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to the median forecasts of economists in a Bloomberg News survey on Jan.
 Leahy has touted the A330’s “unbeatable economics” as a much cheaper alternative to purchase than the Dreamliner for customers who don’t need the extra range.
 Household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, rose 04 percent, after a 06 percent gain the previous month, Commerce Department figures showed today.
 The increase in California land values has sparked deals including Toll Brothers Inc’s agreement in November to purchase Shapell Industries Inc’s homebuilding business for about $16 billion.
 The central bank said after that meeting it would reduce its monthly asset purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion from January.
 Bunds fell along with Treasuries as the Federal Reserve said it would reduce its $85 billion in monthly asset purchases.
 18 that it would cut its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion starting this month.
 John Calagna, a MetLife spokesman, declined to comment on the purchase.
 Pacific Bell purchased the land from Sunset in 1983 and developed the office complex.
 3 to brief about the purchase plan and receive feedback, according to a Jan.
 Last year, GDF Suez SA and Centrica Plc purchased shares in licenses in the Bowland Basin, an area estimated to hold 1,300 trillion cubic feet of gas, enough to meet demand for almost five decades if just 10 percent is extracted.
 Debt Refinancing Caesars, based in Las Vegas, was purchased in a 2008 buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 Whether it buys Revel or not, it needs to restructure by the end of 2015” A purchase of Revel by Caesars might reshape New Jersey’s gambling industry should the company be forced to sell or close an existing property.
 Caesars is building a convention center in Atlantic City and in December purchased the property and fixtures of the Atlantic Club, which ceased operations this month.
 Auto Purchases Motor vehicle purchases fell to a 153 million annualized rate from a 163 million pace in November, according to data from Ward’s Automotive Group.
 ‘Specific Conditions’ The Basel group said that “limited netting” would be permitted on securities financial transactions such as repurchase agreements, or repos, provided that “specific conditions” are met.
 Water Commitment Ridinger said he will keep hold of the water treatmentbusiness, acquired through the purchase of Arch Chemicals for$135 billion, even as a slow start to the summer in bothNorthern and Southern hemispheres dragged down sales of itsswimming pool chemicals.
 A purchase would give Malone more flexibility to combine the cable provider with Liberty Global’s Dutch unit, UPC Holding BV.
 The bank bought the local currency because of “unhealthy price formations,” according to a statement on its website, which didn’t specify the size of the purchases.
 The improvement has allowed the Federal Reserve to reduce the bond purchases it uses to pump money into the economy from a monthly $85 billion.
 “Even if India renews fertilizer purchases this year, I think I will sell zero tons to the country,” Guryev said in an interview in Phosagro’s Moscow offices.
 28-29, decided at its December gathering to start cutting monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion from this month.
 central bank will reduce purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to the median forecast of economists in a Bloomberg News survey Jan.
 Google has spent more than $17 billion in the past two years to purchase hardware, software and advertising-technology companies, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “The company faces a risk that its plan won’t work if resumption of the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa plant is delayed” Other items in the turnaround plan announced by the company yesterday evening in Tokyo include slashing fuel costs by 650 billion yen a year and setting up a joint venture with other utilities to purchase as much as 40 million metric tons of liquefied natural gas annually.
 The Justice Department in 2011 challenged AT&T’s proposed $39 billion purchase of T-Mobile, arguing that reducing the mobile market from four to three national players would limit competition and lead to higher prices for consumers.
 Pacific Century was founded by Li and has also purchased Asian insurers from ING for more than $2 billion.
 Rosengren dissented from the Fed’s decision last month to taper its bond purchases, citing elevated unemployment and an inflation rate that is less than the central bank’s target.
 Gradual Tapering Rosengren said he is now comfortable with the Fed’s strategy to gradually cut monthly purchases in the future.
 18 it will cut the bond purchases, which focus on mortgage debt and longer-term Treasuries, to $75 billion a month from $85 billion starting this month.
 The Justice Department sued in August 2011 to block AT&T’s proposed $39 billion purchase of T-Mobile, arguing that reducing the mobile market from four to three national firms would limit competition and lead to higher prices for consumers.
 This caused consumers to expect falling prices over a longer period of time and prompted them to delay purchases, further harming already-contracting output.
 The Fed will probably end its monthly asset purchases by the end of this year while keeping short-term interest rates low into 2016, said Gundlach, whose Los Angeles-based firm had about $52 billion in assets as of Sept.
 The Beverly Hills, California-based investment firm said last week that it was under contract to pay about about $152 million for the “potential purchase” of loans secured against the Shelbourne, where US.
 “There is much, much stronger demand” Barratt said purchasers used Help-to-Buy in 29 percent of the home sales the company completed during the reporting period.
 The purchase “provides us with greater intellectual property protection and gives us freedom of action to innovate on behalf of all those who use our service,” Ben Lee, legal director for Twitter, said in a statement.
 That’s prompted more Chinese cities to introduce restrictions on vehicle purchases.
 None of the guests who purchased cruises through Boutimar were on the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List maintained by the US.
 14 the company was studying an initial public offering for Sigma to cut debt from a Campofrio purchase, which would be the business’s first European acquisition.
 Shuanghui closed in September on a $47 billion purchase of Smithfield Foods Inc, the world’s largest pork processor.
 While Alfa would still need to sell shares in Sigma to reduce debt at the unit, a lower financial burden from the Campofrio purchase might shrink the size of an IPO, according to Fernando Bolanos, an analyst at Monex Casa de Bolsa in Mexico City with a hold rating on Alfa.
 The purchase also would let Sigma sell its products in Europe and distribute Campofrio’s offerings more widely in the US, he said.
 They have struggled to purchase property because of stiffer mortgage standards following the housing crash and a weak job market.
 18 that it will trim its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion while reaffirming its stance to keep monetary policy “highly accommodative” Yellen, currently vice chairman of the Fed, was nominated by President Barack Obama in October to lead the central bank after Bernanke’s eight-year run as chairman.
 Shaving Yields Economists expect the Fed to cut bond purchases in $10 billion incremental moves until ending the program late in the year, according to the median estimate in a Dec.
 The purchases have shaved as much as 12 percentage points off the Treasury yields that are used as a benchmark for mortgage rates, Bernanke said in a 2012 speech.
 “The Fed under Yellen will continue to make purchases, but at a lower rate as the economy improves,” Case said.
 The MSCI Emerging Markets Index advanced 06 percent on bets the weaker jobs data will make it harder for the Fed to increase the pace at which it cuts the monthly asset purchases that benefited the region’s securities, including that of Turkey.
 The European Central Bank’s pledge to purchase government bonds if needed to fight the fiscal crisis eased investors’ concerns about a euro-region breakup, prompting them to trade shares on company fundamentals, Rambourg, 43, said in a Jan.
 Investors purchased 13 percent of existing homes in 2013, compared with 10 percent the previous year, according to Sherry FitzGerald.
 In 2006, investors purchased 20 percent, the firm said.
 “One of the things that turns markets around is that you get prices down to a low enough level that a different kind of buyer is willing to step in to purchase the asset,” Shaoul said.
 Marc Godart, an economics student with a goatee from Luxembourg, said a bank in his home country helped finance his purchase of a vacant six-story office block in Dublin for a “fabulous” 335,000 euros last month.
 central bank this month began paring purchases by $10 billion a month to $75 billion.
 Kley, who joined Merck as CEO in 2007 from Deutsche Lufthansa AG, where he was CFO for seven years, oversaw the purchase of lab equipment maker Millipore in 2010 for about $6 billion.
 economy will improve enough for the Federal Reserve to end bond purchases in 2014.
 17-18 meeting that it will cut monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion starting in January.
 The Fed decided at the meeting to start reducing its asset purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion from this month.
 “Participants were most concerned about the marginal cost of additional asset purchases arising from risks to financial stability,” according to the minutes.
 The purchases have kept borrowing costs at historic lows, bolstering the housing recovery.
 Symantec acquired its way into that business with the $102 billion purchase of Veritas Software Corp.
 18, when the Federal Reserve said it would start trimming bond purchases to unwind its unprecedented stimulus, making it the second-worst performer among Asia’s 11 most-traded currencies tracked by Bloomberg.
 The company repurchased $242 million of shares in the period.
 consumer lender subsidiary, which originates subprime loans for new-vehicle purchases and leases, is seeking to raise as much as $156 billion in an initial public offering.
 More common are bootleg videos: Nine out of 10 movies purchased in the country are pirated copies, according to data from the Mexico City-based Business Coordinating Council, known as CCE.
 Monthly Move Treasuries headed for the biggest monthly advance since May 2012, even after the Federal Open Market Committee voted in December to trim monthly asset purchases by $10 billion.
 The Fed decided at its December meeting to reduce monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, starting in January.
 It will cut purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six gatherings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to the median forecasts of economists in a Bloomberg News survey Jan.
 government securities in trades in the market for repurchase agreements, or repos.
 added fewer jobs than forecast spurred traders to unwind bets the Federal Reserve will accelerate its tapering of bond purchases.
 “By the end of 2014, the Fed wants to be out,” Gross said in a radio interview on “Bloomberg Surveillance” with Tom Keene, referring to the central bank’s purchases in its quantitative easing program.
 Bond-Buying The committee cut monthly purchases to $75 billion starting in January, from $85 billion, citing improvement in the labor market.
 Subsequent purchases from other Tata family members have made the Mistry family Tata Son’s largest individual shareholder with an 18 percent stake.
 Grocery shoppers are turning increasingly to the Internet for purchases.
 The Fed last month trimmed its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, taking the first step toward unwinding the unprecedented stimulus that Chairman Ben S.
 10 that some unauthorized purchases may have been made with credit cards.
 The Target breach occurred when a computer virus infected Target’s point-of-sale terminals where shoppers swipe a credit or debit card to make a purchase, a person familiar with the matter said last month on condition of anonymity.
 About $47 million of the VA purchases came from Alachua, Florida-based RTI Surgical Inc.
 The agency is making changes in its procurement process to allow it to make better purchases, he said.
 If officials don’t use such contracts, purchases may cost taxpayers more and not include assurances about the country of origin for the tissue, said Representative Jeff Miller, a Florida Republican and the House veterans committee chairman.
 No issues have been raised with these purchases.
 Purchases Continue The VA continued to purchase from RTI after the FDA warning letter, according to online federal contracting data.
 Chief Executive Officer Evan Greenberg, who typically shunned share repurchases as he focused on expansion and buyouts, said the authorization of additional buybacks won’t halt his commitment to growth.
 Southwest agreed to purchase slots for 27 daily round trips, while JetBlue will buy rights for 12 round trips and acquire eight pairs now being leased from American, the airlines said today in statements.
 The BOE publishes the minutes of the Monetary Policy Committee’s January meeting, when it left the benchmark interest rate at a record low of 05 percent and kept its asset-purchase program on hold.
 1 credit-card issuer by purchases.
 The Federal Reserve last month took the first step to reining in asset purchases that have helped to reduce borrowing costs.
 18 that it would reduce asset purchases by $10 billion this month.
 for $210 million, undoing a purchase completed in 2008 to expand its coal business.
 William Ackman, whose Pershing Square Capital Management is the Calgary-based railroad’s biggest shareholder, said it was “a blunder” to purchase the DM&E as he successfully fought to oust former Chief Executive Officer Fred Green and replace him with current CEO Hunter Harrison.
 The purchase is Genesee & Wyoming’s first since August 2012, when it acquired RailAmerica Inc.
 Hanlong, based in Chengdu, owns 14 percent of Sundance, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, and a purchase of the rest of Sundance would have given it control of the Mbalam iron ore project straddling the Republic of Congo and Cameroon.
 American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said Jan.
 In October 2012, it slapped a 15 percent extra tax on home purchases by all non-Hong Kong residents.
 Federal Reserve would reduce debt purchases and a rally in equities.
 Southwest agreed to purchase slots for 27 daily roundtrips, while JetBlue will buy rights for 12 round trips andacquire eight pairs now being leased from American, the airlinessaid today in statements.
 “If Mizuho can’t get a board seat, the purchase may end up being a pure investment,” Shinichiro Nakamura, an analyst at SMBC Nikko Securities Inc.
 recovery is accelerating boosted speculation the Federal Reserve will keep reducing its debt-purchase program.
 Fed policy makers meet next week after voting in December to trim bond purchases by $10 billion a month.
 “Contained inflation measures and expectations that the Fed will remain on hold for quite some time to come, despite further tapering of asset purchases next week, have likely contributed to the better performance on the long end of the curve,” Gennadiy Goldberg, US.
 The Fed decided at its December meeting to reduce monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, starting in January, while reaffirming its view that the key interest rate will stay at almost zero at least as long as the unemployment rate is more than 65 percent.
 Fed Buys The Fed purchased $28 billion of Treasuries maturing from May 2022 to November 2023 today under its quantitative-easing program aimed at stimulating the economy through lower borrowing costs.
 29 even as legislation on the nation’s borrowing limit causes it to scale back bill sales and as dealers reduce activity in the repurchase agreement market.
 The one-week repurchase and overnight borrowing rates were also held, as predicted in surveys.
 While TaylorMade purchased Adams in 2012, the companies produce two separate lines of clubs.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Bill Gross, who runs the world’s biggest bond fund at Pacific Investment Management Co, increased holdings of Treasuries and government-related debt in December, as the fund suffered record redemptions in 2013 after the Federal Reserve said it would slow its bond purchases.
 Bernanke indicated May 22 the central bank might reduce asset purchases during the next few meetings if economic growth accelerated.
 10 in an interview with Tom Keene on Bloomberg Radio’s “Bloomberg Surveillance,” referring to purchases of shorter-term Treasuries.
 Policy makers saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond-buying program and expressed concern about risks to financial stability when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases, a record of the Federal Open Market Committee’s Dec.
 “A majority of participants judged that the marginal efficacy of purchases was likely declining as purchases continue” The minutes didn’t describe a set schedule for the pace of asset-purchase reductions, although “a few” officials mentioned the need for a “more deterministic path” Gross held emerging-market bonds at 6 percent and raised non-US.
 The parent company is studying the purchase of an energy company with $10 billion in sales, he said, declining to identify it.
 The purchases leave room for more beverage deals in Asia, Africa and Americas, Fitch Ratings said in a Jan.
 Beyond Food The Philippines’ biggest electricity producer and owner of Petron Corp, the nation’s largest oil company, has announced 41 purchases worth $78 billion since 2000, about three-fourths of which were made since 2008 when it started to expand out of the food and brewery business, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The company repurchased $242 million of shares in the period.
 Legal Impact Greenlight purchased Anadarko shares at an average of $7855 in mid-December after investors “dumped” the stock when a federal judge ruled that the company may have to pay $5 billion to $14 billion in a lawsuit, according to the letter.
 Jana Partners, the $8 billion activist hedge-fund firm run by Barry Rosenstein, took a stake in Cameron and urged the company to make additional asset sales and share repurchases.
 “We believe there remains still more portfolio pruning to be done and that asset sales, balance sheet capacity and future free cash flow provide considerable powder for even more share repurchases,” the firm wrote in its fourth-quarter letter, a copy of which was obtained by Bloomberg News.
 None of the economic data is concerning, so our feeling is once again, stocks should react to earnings” The Fed today announced plans to press on with another $10 billion reduction in monthly bond purchases intended to speed a recovery from the worst recession since the Great Depression.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- The Democratic Republic of Congo’s government breached its own regulations by failing to publish a contract for its purchase of an oil block from Israeli billionaire Dan Gertler last year, Global Witness said.
 Fleurette said in its statement that the Nessergy block increased in value since its 2006 purchase because of new oil finds in the region, higher oil prices, and the advent of the common-interest zone, which it says it helped create.
 Midcontinent gasoline climbed to a 12-week high relative to New York futures as buyers from Texas purchased more of the fuel.
 Neiman Marcus said earlier this month some unauthorized purchases may have been made with customer cards, without disclosing the scope of the breach.
 10 that some unauthorized purchases may have been made with credit cards.
 18 that it will reduce its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, reflecting an improved economic outlook.
 The central bank will probably trim monthly bond purchases by an additional $10 billion at each Federal Open Market Committee meeting through September, a Bloomberg News survey forecasts, after the body announced initial cuts last month.
 Financial terms weren’t disclosed for Facebook’s first purchase in India and Carson Dalton, the India spokesman of Menlo Park, California-based company, declined to comment on the terms of the deal.
 The Fed will cut its purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six gatherings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to the median forecasts of economists in a Bloomberg survey Jan.
 Fed officials said last month they will reduce their monthly purchases of assets to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month, citing faster-than-estimated economic growth Equity returns will slow this year, Wall Street strategists forecast.
 Paulo reported that Lebanon is considering the purchase of at least 10 attack planes from the Brazilian manufacturer.
 expansion forecast to narrow the budget shortfall to a six-year low this year, the drop in bond supply may support Treasuries as the Fed pares its own debt purchases.
 Demand for Treasuries was aided by the Fed, which dropped its benchmark interest rate close to zero in 2008 and started its purchases of government bonds and mortgage-backed securities, which worked to suppress borrowing costs by inundating the US.
 The Fed decided in December to reduce its monthly debt purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, starting in January.
 “BG Group and Vodafone have certainly contributed the lion’s share” Currency Slide Currencies from Turkey’s lira to Argentina’s peso and South Africa’s rand tumbled last week amid concern the Fed will continue slowing its pace of monthly bond purchases.
 The MSCI Emerging Markets Index slid 19 percent today, extending its loss since the Fed signaled in May that it could start scaling back bond purchases that boosted demand for higher-yielding assets to about 12 percent.
 purchased a “large quantity of tickets,” also to be given to military families, “in an effort to assist in reaching a sellout” for the Bengals’ game against the San Diego Chargers on Sunday, the team completed the task yesterday with support from Cincinnati-based Procter & Gamble Co’s Tide, Gillette, CoverGirl and Bounty brands.
 In a statement yesterday afternoon, the team said Fox affiliates WITI in Milwaukee, WLUK in Green Bay and WFXS in Wausau were among the purchasers of tickets.
 To increase the stock price, Elliott is pushing for additional share repurchases and the payment of a dividend.
 wireless carrier, will purchase 700-megahertz A-block spectrum licenses from Verizon, according to a statement today.
 The Narodna Banka Srbije in Belgrade, the capital, left its one-week repurchase rate at 95 percent, according to a statement on its website today.
 The Paris project, called In Situ, will be completed in 2015 and was purchased from Vinci Immobilier and Nexity Enterprises.
 Foreign investors have purchased a net $190 million of Indonesian equities this month through yesterday, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Independent researchers say that while individuals have suffered, the lawyers’ estimate probably exaggerates the regional impact as purchases were deferred or pushed to areas not affected by the water ban.
 It received about 71 percent of its bauxite imports and 52 percent of its nickel ore purchases from the Southeast Asian country in 2012, RBC Capital Markets said in a report Dec.
 Issuance slowed after Fed Chairman Ben S Bernanke said in May the central bank may reduce asset purchases, pushing up borrowing costs.
 The CEO said the airline’s business model is being stretched with deliveries of only three 787s out of the 10 it has committed to purchase or lease.
 Tepco cut staff and deferred repair work to keep expenses from ballooning, despite increased fossil fuel purchases to make up for lost nuclear capacity amid a depreciating Japanese currency, the utility said.
 These include slashing fuel costs by 650 billion yen a year and setting up a joint venture with other utilities to purchase as much as 40 million metric tons of liquefied natural gas a year.
 stocks declined as investors weighed data that showed a manufacturing contraction in China and an increase in purchases of previously owned US.
 American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said Jan.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries rose after government reports showed an increase in continuing unemployment claims and inflation that remains below the Federal Reserve’s target as the central bank begins cuts to its unprecedented debt purchases.
 Fed Policy The central bank’s reduction in bond purchases should be seen as a shift in emphasis toward keeping the benchmark interest rate at almost zero for a longer period, he said.
 The Fed decided last month to trim its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 The Cupertino, California-based company often purchases startups, then shuts the services down and integrates the technology into future products.
 Stocks retreated around the world as evidence of weakness in China’s economy added to concern that smaller monthly asset purchases by the Federal Reserve will destabilize emerging markets.
 They also purchase bonds, which managers may have to sell to help banks remain compliant under the Volcker Rule, according to the Wells Fargo report.
 The rate increased when the Federal Reserve signaled plans to reduce $85 billion in monthly bond purchases and already has diminished the refinancing that accounted for two-thirds all home loans in the last two years.
 Sony said it sold 42 million PlayStation 4 consoles, while Microsoft said that consumers purchased more than 3 million Xbox One units in 2013.
 “We see a similar kind of instrument now being pioneered” While Takano will find it difficult to gain traction in the Republican-controlled House of Representatives, other policy makers, regulators and investors are increasingly scrutinizing private-equity purchases of homes across the US.
 Institutional buyers purchased 8,208 foreclosed homes in Riverside and San Bernardino counties in 2013, said John Husing, an economist whose firm, Economics & Politics Inc, focuses on the Inland Empire area that covers Riverside and San Bernardino counties.
 Bidding Wars Corporate landlords have said their mass purchases and renovations improved blighted areas and are providing more housing opportunities to residents in neighborhoods with good public schools.
 and two other state-run refiners said they will defer resuming purchases of Iranian crude by at least three months, having failed to get reinsurance for shipments after Europe said it would relax a coverage ban.
 Indian Oil, which has an accord to buy 24,000 barrels a day from Iran in the year ending March 31, halted purchases after importing in the first quarter of the fiscal year.
 Hindustan Petroleum Corp, which planned to import 16,000 barrels a day, will hold back purchases, Refineries Director BK.
 “Our insurers are saying foreign reinsurers want to observe the situation for six months before extending any cover” European rules have yet to be rewritten, so reinsurers are still unable to provide cover to Indian refineries that purchase cargoes from the Persian Gulf state, Andrew Bardot, executive officer at the International Group of P&I Clubs, said by e-mail.
 Sanction Pressure State-controlled Indian refiners halted Iranian purchases in May after insurers denied coverage to plants using Iranian crude following growing pressure of sanctions against the Islamic republic from the US.
 Mangalore Refinery & Petrochemicals Ltd, which gets more than a quarter of its crude requirement from the country, resumed purchases in August using tankers underwritten by two Iranian insurers with sovereign guarantees from India.
 The company plans to buy 4 million tons from Iran this financial year and increase purchases next year, he said.
 Essar spokesman Rabin Ghosh declined to comment on the purchases.
 PulteGroup has focused on increasing house prices and managing spending as rising mortgage rates cut into homebuyer demand by making purchases more expensive.
 “Though their orders may not look impressive, the average sales price will be up nicely” New-home purchases in the US.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries rose, with 10-year yields dropping to the least in 12 weeks, as a slowdown at Chinese factories and emerging-market losses from the Federal Reserve’s cuts in bond purchases drove demand for the safest assets.
 Duration Extension Treasuries were also boosted by fixed-income funds that manage portfolios against benchmark indexes and typically purchase longer-maturity Treasuries at month-end to align interest-rate sensitivity of their holdings with the indexes.
 “We’ve reversed all of the big increase in yields we had in December” Fed Policy The Fed announced this week that it will cut its purchases of Treasury and mortgage debt to $65 billion a month starting in February from $75 billion.
 A cap rate is calculated by dividing a property’s net operating income by its purchase price, so it moves down as values rise.
 Now the wider push has put Pasadena, California, where East West Bank and Downtown Properties bought Plaza Las Fuentes at a 57 percent cap rate in July, and Scottsdale, Arizona, where Oaktree Capital Management LP purchased the Republic Services Corp.
 Lower Yields Jamestown’s Santa Monica purchase came with a 54 percent cap rate, Phillips said.
 in Seattle, and the 2011 purchases of New York’s 636 Avenue of the Americas and Houston’s Wells Fargo Plaza, Wang said.
 The investor’s 10 Brookline Place purchase in the Longwood Medical Area had a 59 percent cap rate, compared with 61 percent in central Boston, Real Capital data show.
 for German institutions, paid $100 million in the third quarter for offices outside Austin at a cap rate “100 to 200 basis points higher” than a comparable core-market deal, its only purchase since 2012, he said, declining to give further details.
 “We’re looking for solid job growth, typically in tech, energy or health-care markets with a research university, lifestyle appeal and good long-term liquidity prospects” Silicon Valley The recent surge has occasionally compressed yields to less than cap rates in Manhattan, including a purchase at 4 percent in Palo Alto, south of San Francisco, and one at 39 percent in Beverly Hills, both among California’s most coveted office locations, according to Real Capital data.
 CBRE last month brokered the sale of research-and-development buildings in Sunnyvale, in Silicon Valley, at a lower cap rate than office purchases in some primary markets, according to the brokerage.
 Yellen voted in January with the majority of Fed policy makers to taper the central bank’s monthly bond purchases.
 The nine-member Monetary Policy Committee will leave its key rate at a record low 05 percent and its bond-purchase program target at 375 billion pounds ($617 billion), according to Bloomberg surveys.
 will purchase ING Groep NV’s Taiwanese investment unit, becoming the first Japanese asset manager to operate in the market.
 The patents cover shopping cart technology, in which buyers store their intention to purchase an item on a computer network, then buy it and can later view the shopping history.
 “Results are very strong, and with industry experts projecting attractive growth in the future, we would expect the portfolio to continue to produce great results” Cancellation Sought After Innkeepers won approval of the terms of a bankruptcy reorganization in August 2011, Cerberus and Chatham sought to cancel their purchase of the bulk of the company’s extended-stay, mid-priced and upscale hotels.
 In case of a loan default, Marriott agreed to purchase the hotel portion of the property for $3146 million during the first two years after opening, Winthrop said.
 The total purchase price for that property, the Manhattan Clock Tower and a project in Miami Beach is expected to be about $815 million, according to the company.
 The plant will allow Nucor Chairman and Chief Executive Officer John Ferriola to reduce the company’s dependence on scrap steel purchases by making a substitute from iron ore processed with natural gas.
 Policy makers, who begin a two-day meeting tomorrow, have said they’ll take measured steps in reducing monthly bond purchases.
 central bankers last year signaled they would pare purchases of mortgage-backed securities and other bonds, a process that began this month.
 The Fed probably will stick to its plan to gradually reduce asset purchases, tapering by $10 billion over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey of economists.
 October and November purchases were weaker than initially reported.
 Higher prices, along with borrowing costs, have made purchases more difficult for some buyers.
 By Region December purchases dropped in three of four regions, led by a 364 percent plunge in the Northeast, the smallest market.
 18 it would cut its monthly purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion, citing an improving economy.
 and funds purchases at Kroger Co.
 Mizuho joined Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc, the nation’s second-biggest lender, in posting a profit decline after trimming their Japanese government bond holdings as the central bank purchases the assets to defeat deflation.
 USI Insurance Services will purchase 42 of Wells Fargo’s insurance brokerage and consulting offices, according to a statement today from the San Francisco-based lender.
 “It’s changed the course for others, and specifically for us, because we’re right in the middle of it, wells are literally across the street” The refinery contracts with Genesis Energy LP to purchase oil that it processes into jet fuel, diesel used by drillers and feedstock sold to nearby refineries.
 Blue Dolphin also has an option to purchase an idled 40,000-barrel-a-day refinery in Ingleside, Texas, near Corpus Christi.
 28-29, decided at its December meeting to start reducing the pace of monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 To convince motorists, it offered to buy back its Manza sedan at 60 percent of the purchase price after three years.
 expect the central bank to trim bond purchases by a further $10 billion after starting to wind back unprecedented stimulus following their last meeting in December.
 “You will see some in Power & Water going forward” In April, the world’s largest maker of jet engines and medical scanners agreed to purchase Lufkin Industries Inc, a maker of oilfield machinery, for $33 billion to bolster its rapidly growing oil and gas division.
 Getting support and purchase commitments from customers will be a key consideration in building the plants and Foxconn is still in talks about what products clients want from US.
 The seven-day repurchase rate jumped to an unprecedented 1077 percent on June 20, pushing the average rate in 2013 to 409 percent, up from 350 percent in 2012.
 Sales Opportunity With 488 million consumers planning to purchase or lease a car in the next three years, the opportunity to cater to this generation is coming on fast, according to the study.
 Making that purchase affordable is the top priority to Generation Y.
 Lawmaker opposition to the purchase swelled last week after a former prime minister called Goldman a “shady partner” whose involvement in Dong would jeopardize Denmark’s environmental agenda.
 Central bank officials said last month they will reduce their monthly purchases of assets to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month, citing faster-than-estimated economic growth.
 Bernanke said the decision to taper bond purchases “did not indicate any diminution of its commitment to maintain a highly accommodative monetary policy for as long as needed” ‘Right Thing’ “What he was trying to do is rationalize the decision, saying we did the right thing with the headwinds disappearing,” Selkin said.
 “I expect further reductions in the pace of purchases to be under consideration at upcoming meetings” The Federal Open Market Committee, scheduled to meet Jan.
 28-29, will probably reduce its purchases in $10 billion increments over the next seven meetings before ending them in December, according to a Bloomberg News survey of economists after the FOMC announced its tapering on Dec.
 ‘Hunky-Dory’ Fed Bank of Philadelphia President Charles Plosser, an opponent of bond purchases by the Fed, said central bankers may be too optimistic they can smoothly pull back accommodation.
 Mortgage rates have climbed from near-record lows in May on speculation that the Federal Reserve would begin to taper bond purchases that have stimulated the economy.
 18 that it would trim the monthly asset purchases starting this month.
 A delayed slowdown in the Fed’s bond purchases, an unexpectedly strong euro and the highest currency volatility in more than a year resulted in a positive annual return for just two of eight US.
 18, the date Fed officials announced plans to reduce the central bank’s $85 billion of monthly asset purchases.
 Missed Out The $53 million Samson STRONG Nations Currency Fund, which doesn’t purchase the dollar, euro or pound, missed out on the returns generated by the currencies in 2013.
 18 they would trim monthly purchases of bonds to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month.
 “But it’s still premature to declare any victory” The Bank of England also kept its benchmark rate at a record-low 05 percent today, while its bond-purchase target stayed at 375 billion pounds ($618 billion).
 The Fed decided at the meeting to start reducing the size of its asset purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion starting this month.
 “When the new refineries start operations, it would cut imports of oil products, but raise crude purchases because we won’t produce much oil,” Marzan Iskandar, the head of BPPT, said in a separate interview.
 South African Reserve Bank Governor Gill Marcus yesterday raised the nation’s benchmark repurchase rate by 50 basis points to 55 percent, the first tightening since 2008.
 Revenue from DRAM products rose 69 percent from the previous period, Micron said yesterday, buoyed by a gain in sales volume caused by the Elpida purchase.
 The UK’s Takeover Code, which applies to offers for all London-listed companies, was tightened in the wake of the protracted hostile purchase of confectioner Cadbury Plc by Kraft Foods Group Inc.
 A Vodafone purchase of ONO wouldn’t impact AT&T’s interest, another person said.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Emirates, the biggest international airline, has yet to sign off on its $76 billion purchase of 150 Boeing Co.
 Fuel costs rose 55 percent to C$422 million, while purchased services and materials advanced 71 percent to C$364 million.
 Fed Effect The reduction of monthly bond purchases by the Fed may continue to damp fixed-income trading.
 Asset Purchases During Hartmann’s eight-year chairmanship of the supervisory board, EON purchased more than 15 billion euros ($205 billion) in assets, including 115 billion euros from Enel SpA.
 To help fund the purchase, Verizon sold $49 billion in bonds -- the biggest company debt offering ever.
 Retail purchases rose 02 percent in December, exceeding the median forecast of 01 percent from economists surveyed by Bloomberg, Commerce Department figures showed today in Washington.
 The stock purchase makes Bidvest the largest shareholder in Johannesburg-based drugmaker Adcock, and its stake is now big enough to block a 128 billion rand ($11 billion) cash and stock bid from Chile’s CFR Pharmaceuticals SA.
 Weakening Currency A possible extension of the Brazilian real’s 77 percent slump in the past three months, which makes overseas purchases more costly in local-currency terms, along with any increase in US.
 Bernanke said the central bank could consider reducing the pace of Treasury and mortgage debt purchases over the next meetings.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion, the data show.
 The breach occurred when a computer virus infected Target’s point-of-sale terminals where shoppers swipe a credit or debit card to make a purchase, a person familiar with the matter said last month.
 In 2012, the Japanese government’s purchase of a group of uninhabited islands claimed by both countries prompted some demonstrators to torch dealerships and vandalize cars associated with Japan.
 “Despite this top-line pressure, we expect other positive trends, particularly the benefit of our planned share repurchases, to support continued earnings per share growth in 2014” F-35 Jets The military has protected large programs such as Lockheed Martin Corp’s F-35 jet, the Pentagon’s most expensive weapons system, from automatic federal spending cuts.
 Qualcomm said in a statement yesterday that the purchased portfolio consists of about 1,400 granted patents and pending applications in the US, and about 1,000 granted and being applied for in other countries.
 “Hewlett-Packard may still be able to participate in the upside of the monetization efforts of Qualcomm” Qualcomm said the patents it purchased include those related to Palm, as well as to Hewlett-Packard’s iPaq mobile devices.
 The purchase will add to Teva’s lineup of drugs to treat central nervous system illnesses, and the company said it can use NuPathe’s patch technology in other areas.
 Companies and governments in developing countries are seeking to pre-empt any rise in borrowing costs that could result from the next round of tapering by the Fed, which decided in December to trim monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 The purchase will add to Teva’s lineup of drugs to treat central nervous system illnesses.
 won an order for 38 business jets valued at $22 billion, the third and largest such purchase announced by the planemaker in the past week.
 Bombardier didn’t identify either of those purchasers.
 While that beat the 10 percent increase for the Standard & Poor’s/TSX Composite Index, it trailed the 35 percent surge for industrial stocks in that benchmark gauge The widely traded Class B shares slid 07 percent to C$461 at the close today in Toronto, before the business-jet purchase was announced.
 The China Securities Regulatory Commission recommended large companies repurchase shares when their stock price falls below book value, Shanghai Securities News reported today, citing an unidentified person.
 Goodsincluding dog food joined electronics and restaurant meals amongthe purchases subject to the value-added levy, which applies tomost products and services, with the exception of produce andmedicine.
 to make purchases, he said.
 Symantec acquired its way into that business with the $102 billion purchase of Veritas Software Corp.
 Sumitomo Mitsui led Japanese banks in reducing government bond holdings last year as the central bank embarked on record asset purchases as part of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe’s stimulus measures designed to end deflation.
 BOJ Governor Haruhiko Kuroda that month announced a plan to target 2 percent inflation with bond purchases, stoking concern that higher interest rates may erode the value of fixed-income securities.
 “We are pleased to be partnering with LCIH to help grow its helicopter leasing business” LCI is considering the purchase of Airbus Helicopter EC225s and EC175s choppers and S-92s built by United Technologies Corp’s Sikorsky unit, Crispin said.
 Meanwhile, two surges in money-market rates hit the country’s interbank market last year, with the seven-day repurchase rate reaching 108 percent in June and 88 percent last month.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, dropped 19 basis points to 525 percent in Shanghai, according to a daily fixing compiled by the National Interbank Funding Center.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Open Market Committee is likely to further trim bond purchases as it meets for the last time before Janet Yellen takes over as head of the US.
 The central bank, which has pledged to continue buying bonds until the labor market has “improved substantially,” will probably trim bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey.
 18 announced its first step to taper monthly purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 Senate Banking Committee in November that it’s “imperative that we do what we can to promote a very strong recovery” She voted in January with the majority of policy makers to taper the Fed’s monthly bond purchases.
 Overseas crude purchases exceeded exports by 2669 million metric tons in December, according to data released on the website of the General Administration of Customs in Beijing today.
 China, the first country to sell more than 20 million vehicles domestically in a year, is increasing crude purchases to meet fuel demand.
 Gottschall, citing defense filings, said more than 99 percent of the liquid-crystal-display purchases at issue were made by Motorola’s foreign affiliates, which later assigned their claims to the US-based company.
 An $85 billion settlement with investors who claim Countrywide failed to repurchase defective mortgages pooled is waiting to be approved by a New York state judge.
 “Rockstar has misused and attempted to obtain exorbitant royalties from licensing the patents it purchased,” Stamford, Connecticut-based Charter said in the complaint.
 The equity benchmark lost 1 percent yesterday as the Federal Reserve decided to reduce its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion.
 “Given this momentum and recent sharp declines in the unemployment rate, the Federal Reserve looks justified in its decision to continue to taper bond purchases yesterday,” David Kelly, the chief global strategist at JPMorgan Funds in New York, said in a note.
 Home Sales Stocks briefly pared gains today as a report showed contracts to purchase existing homes in the US.
 The homebuilder has focused on increasing house prices and managing spending as rising mortgage rates cut into homebuyer demand by making purchases more expensive.
 Most emerging-market currencies rose after the Reserve Bank of India unexpectedly increased the repurchase rate to 8 percent from 775 percent to bolster the rupee.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- BlackBerry Ltd, seeking to show that its handset business can still attract customers, said a German technology company is upgrading to its Enterprise Service 10 system and will purchase more than 1,000 phones.
 Policy makers cut the monthly bond purchases to $75 billion in January, from $85 billion, amid an improving economy.
 BC Hydro agreed to purchase the power under a 20-year contract.
 After pressuring management to significantly repurchase stock without success, Goldstein’s Bulldog Investors turned up the heat in November, announcing it planned to nominate new board members and proposed liquidating the company.
 In that scenario, every dollar of equity repurchased would yield a 20 percent return.
 Anworth has already repurchased at least 28 million shares in the fourth quarter and last month announced board approval to buy back as many as 5 million more.
 30 for as many as to 2 million shares to be repurchased.
 For a REIT to repurchase shares, it may need to sell assets and reduce its use of borrowed money.
 “Liquidation will at least allow shareholders to recoup some of their losses” Javelin repurchased 516,000 shares directly from Bulldog in December and its stock gained 10 percent in three weeks; about the time it took for the two firms to reach an agreement after the hedge fund threatened a proxy fight.
 Bulldog is very good at finding those undervalued companies and a mechanism to help realize the value gap” Some REITs have already accelerated stock repurchases.
 “There seems to be a fairly wide consensus that stimulus should be gradually taken out” Fed officials saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond buying program, according to the minutes of the meeting, when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases.
 The minutes didn’t describe a set schedule for the pace of asset-purchase reductions, although “a few” officials mentioned the need for a “more deterministic path” Fed Minutes “A majority of participants judged that the marginal efficacy of purchases was likely declining as purchases continue,” the record of the Federal Open Market Committee’s Dec.
 Participants also were “concerned about the marginal cost of additional asset purchases arising from risks to financial stability” citing the potential for “excessive risk-taking in the financial sector” The central bank is trimming monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $75 billion this month.
 EMC has been seeking new ways to profit from the storage market as companies slow purchases, especially of more expensive products.
 Asset Sales Li Ka-shing, Asia’s richest man, said in November his companies have slowed land purchases in mainland China after prices rose.
 Its purchase of Barclays Plc’s investment division made it into the world’s largest asset manager.
 Today, Schneiderman said BlackRock expanded the surveys after it purchased BGI.
 Icahn said he purchased $500 million worth of shares in the past two weeks, in one of three Twitter Inc.
 He called the additional investment a “no brainer” and said an in-depth letter is coming soon on the company’s need to repurchase more shares.
 It repurchased $228 million in the fourth quarter, bringing the yearly total to $350 million.
 Deferred Payment Philips will transfer the stake for a deferred purchase price, similar to when the company sold the previous 70 percent to TPV Technology.
 Some Danish lawmakers want to block the 8 billion-krone ($15 billion) purchase, saying Goldman Sachs bears responsibility for the global financial crisis and that the government is giving the New York-based company too much control.
 mortgage rates were little changed as investors awaited this week’s unemployment report and signs of the Federal Reserve’s next move on bond purchases.
 The committee in December cut purchases to $75 billion, from $85 billion, citing improvements in the labor market.
 Volatility Eases Global funds pulled $18 billion from Indonesian equities in 2013, exchange data show, as investors sold the nation’s assets on concern about the current-account gap and as the Federal Reserve prepares to reduce debt purchases.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion, the data show.
 As the central bank starts to trim bond purchases, company fundamentals would have to improve to drive further gains, he said.
 Comcast also increased its dividend by 15 percent to 90 cents a year and authorized an additional $75 billion in share repurchases, with $3 billion planned for this year.
 18 it would cut its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month.
 Three years ago, they purchased Wellesley Books in their hometown of Wellesley, Massachusetts, even as independent sellers struggle.
 KKR said the stake purchase is one of several components in the deal.
 Benson Elliot Capital Management LLP, a UK-based private-equity real estate firm, in December made its first commercial-property purchase in Germany since 2006.
 $11 Billion Fund Blackstone’s real estate business has stepped up investments since 2008, when it raised an $11 billion fund to purchase buildings around the world.
 Nations are being drawn by low yields before the Fed further reduces its $85 billion monthly bond-purchase program after deciding to trim its buying by $10 billion at its most recent meeting Dec.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, dropped 88 basis points to 544 percent in Shanghai, according to a daily fixing compiled by the National Interbank Funding Center.
 The fuel-driven drop in purchases from abroad overshadowed record demand for foreign autos, parts and capital goods that indicate spending by American consumers and businesses is strengthening.
 Turkey Deals Turkey accounted for about 12 percent of deals in eastern Europe last year, as purchasers including Germany’s Allianz SE and Japan’s Panasonic Corp.
 15 as consumers made purchases in stores in what is a critical period for retailers.
 The chain, which said it has since identified and resolved the issue, agreed to give shoppers free credit reporting and offered them a 10 percent discount on purchases during the weekend before Christmas.
 Stake Spending Including earlier purchases of holdings from the US.
 The Chrysler stake purchase won’t immediately help resolve those issues.
 Federal Reserve started talking about tapering and then ending its $85 billion a month of security purchases.
 Bigger employment gains that lead to more wage growth will help provide a further push for sentiment and drive the consumer purchases that account for almost 70 percent of the economy.
 Senegal has received bids for the purchase of at least 30 percent of its national carrier from companies including South African Airways, Finance Minister Amadou Ba said in an interview.
 The effort, which included the purchase of Tokyo-based Schaft, came after Rubin stepped down in March from Android, which he built into a leading smartphone operating system.
 The issuance is part of President Osamu Masuko’s reorganization of Mitsubishi Motors as sales recover and as the company purchases preferred stock back from affiliates such as Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc, which extended loans to stop the automaker from collapsing a decade ago.
 Last year’s repurchases reduced America Movil’s total outstanding shares by 71 percent, the most in at least a decade, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 America Movil’s cash flow generation is very good, but it’s limited” Wiggle Room America Movil has regularly repurchased its own shares for years, Zetina said.
 The mobile-phone operator will generate about $3 billion in free cash flow this year, which gives it enough wiggle room to consider acquisitions even if its level of repurchases continues, Martin Lara, an analyst at Corp.
 “It should be a big number” Weighing Options An activist could then seek to direct any proceeds from a divestment as well as increased free cash flow toward debt repayment and share repurchases, according to the Nashville, Tennessee-based analyst.
 The company has almost finished integrating its purchase of Dollar Thrifty and the outlook for the economy and demand for capital equipment has improved significantly, Lowrance said.
 Buyers of potash, a form of potassium used to increase crop yields, deferred purchases in the second half of 2013 after OAO Uralkali, the world’s largest producer, quit a sales accord in July with its Belarusian competitor and announced plans to boost output.
 That follows last week’s $16 billion purchase by Suntory Holdings Ltd.
 Jack Daniels Suntory’s purchase of Beam, one of the last big independent non-family-owned liquor assets, sparked speculation that companies like Diageo and Pernod Ricard SA could next turn their attention to family companies like Brown-Forman Corp, the maker of Jack Daniels whiskey.
 23 that the purchased portfolio consists of about 1,400 granted patents and pending applications in the US, and about 1,000 granted and being applied for in other countries.
 Qualcomm said the patents it purchased include those related to Palm, as well as to Hewlett-Packard’s iPaq mobile devices.
 And since Fernandez’s re-election in 2011, her administration has put in place an increasingly complex array of controls to curb capital flight -- including, most recently, regulations to discourage Internet purchases from abroad.
 The Sao Jose dos Campos, Brazil-based company, which is developing a military transport, could rise further in the ranking through industrial ties from Brazil’s planned purchase of Gripen fighters made by Sweden’s Saab AB, which slipped five spots to become the 32nd largest armsmaker, Perlo-Freeman said.
 Prosecutors said federal investigators purchased a version of the program for $8,500.
 In Ghana, bean purchases rose 27 percent from Oct.
 Deficit “If you take the arrival numbers in Ivory Coast and the purchase numbers in Ghana at face value, then the size of the deficit for this current season is probably lower than most of us expected say six weeks ago,” Jonathan Parkman, co-head of agriculture at London-based brokerage Marex Spectron Group, said by phone today.
 The purchase of the cell culture, gene modulation and magnetic beads units will let Fairfield, Connecticut-based GE bolster technologies for the discovery and manufacture of new medicines, vaccines and diagnostics, according to a company statement today.
 Repurchase Rate The Shanghai Composite Index rallied 22 percent, the biggest gain since Nov.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, dropped 19 basis points to 525 percent in Shanghai, according to a daily fixing compiled by the National Interbank Funding Center.
 “However, it still begs the question about RSA Ireland’s strong growth in recent years” 123ie Purchase CFO Richard Houghton cited the “rapid growth” of RSA in Ireland, including its purchase of 123ie in 2010, as a contributing factor to how its reserve strengthening in the nation became so large relative to the size of the business.
 Federal Reserve said it would reduce its bond purchases.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, averaged 516 percent last month, the highest since June, according to a daily fixing rate announced by the National Interbank Funding Center.
 Under Colombia’s new program, road builders would have to bear 20 percent to 25 percent of the cost of projects, much of that in the “pre-building phase” including land purchases, Clemente del Valle, president of the Colombian development bank Fondo de Desarrollo Nacional, said yesterday in an interview.
 Online Petition An online petition seeking to block Goldman’s Dong purchase has gathered more than 175,000 signatures and organizers plan rallies today in Copenhagen and Aarhus, Denmark’s second-largest city.
 and funds purchases at Kroger and other grocers with food stamps, its biggest cost.
 We’ve been investing for over a decade in enabling aircraft with the capability to move information on and off the aircraft” Arinc, purchased from Carlyle Group LP, is the largest acquisition in Rockwell Collins’ history and bolsters its product lineup as older jets increasingly are replaced by “smart” aircraft run by powerful computers, such as Boeing Co’s 787 Dreamliner and Airbus SAS’s A380 and A350 jets.
 The biggest credit-card issuer by purchases benefited from a pickup in household wealth and consumer confidence that has propelled card purchases.
 employment rose at the slowest pace in three years in December, spurring speculation that the Fed won’t speed up its plan for trimming bond purchases, which have been a source of liquidity for most emerging markets.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion, the data show.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- PPF Group NV, the Czech financial group controlled by billionaire Petr Kellner, said its buyout offer for all outstanding shares of Telefonica Czech Republic AS will be based on 305625 koruna a share, at which the stock was purchased from Spain’s Telefonica SA.
 The proposed consideration in the mandatory takeover offer will also take into account “further relevant conditions” of the transaction, including the deferred payment of part of the purchase price, PPF said in a statement on its website today.
 The deferred part of the purchase price will be adjusted to its present value, Prague-based PPF said.
 PPF said it completed the purchase of 659 percent stake in Telefonica Czech yesterday.
 CEOs who raised dividends and increased share repurchases in recent years now must lay the groundwork for future profit increases, said Mark Luschini, chief investment strategist at Janney Montgomery Scott LLC.
 Nye’s company will double the percentage of sales in the Lone Star state with the $27 billion purchase of Dallas-based Texas Industries, Nye said in a interview.
 The board also approved $4 billion of share buybacks from asset-sale proceeds, of which $500 million was repurchased in the third quarter, according to a Nov.
 Under a trading program set up in 2011, companies unable to source enough locally must purchase credits from clean-power plants.
 A drop in the cap rate, which is a property’s net income divided by the purchase price, usually signals an increase in real estate prices.
 MGPA, the firm acquired by BlackRock, bought two Tokyo office properties last year, the South Shin Otsuka and Shinjuku TX buildings, according to a statement dated April 15, 2013, on the website of law firm Clifford Chance, which advised the investment firm on the purchases.
 1 began rolling back tax breaks for the purchase of vehicles.
 The closely held retailer said it will offer free credit-monitoring services to all shoppers who made a credit-card purchase at the company in the last year.
 unit can probably walk away from its proposed purchase of Philip Falcone’s LightSquared Inc, a judge said, dealing a setback to a lender group that contends the bid must remain a part of its plan to get the wireless venture out of bankruptcy.
 Chapman, who said she will make a final decision later, said the lenders group may move ahead with its plan regardless that the bid “has in fact been withdrawn” The lenders group, which holds debt in LightSquared unit LightSquared LP, argued the bid was “irrevocable” The lenders urged the judge to push forward their plan, which called for Lightsquared’s purchase by the Dish unit, even though the unit said its bid was no longer on the table.
 A trial taking place before Chapman over Ergen’s purchases may determine whether his claim for the $1 billion in debt will be disallowed.
 Within the ECB’s mandate, “there are assets that can be considered” for direct purchase in case of crisis, he said.
 Rupiah Drops The rupiah fell this week on speculation companies are boosting dollar purchases to fulfill month-end payments.
 Lessors provide close to half the more than $100 billion in financing required to fund annual jetliner purchases, with a spate of mergers paralleling consolidation among top airlines, Jeff Knittel, who runs the transportation-finance unit of New York-based CIT Group Inc, said earlier this week at the Airline Economics Growth Frontiers conference, also held in Dublin.
 and Aviation Capital Group’s $25 billion purchase of Boullioun Aviation Services Inc.
 More Curbs Singapore began introducing curbs four years ago with some of the strictest measures implemented in 2013, including a cap on debt at 60 percent of a borrower’s income, higher stamp duties on home purchases and an increase in real estate taxes.
 The purchase of the Los Angeles tower was the start of the company’s plan to expand in the US, Mochtar Riady told Bloomberg Television in September.
 The Federal Open Market Committee said in December it will trim its monthly asset purchases starting this month, taking the first step toward unwinding the stimulus as the economy strengthens.
 gained in New York trading after the insurer’s board approved the repurchase of as much as $150 million in shares following a stock slump last month.
 The timing and size of repurchases will be based on market conditions and liquidity needs, AmTrust said in a statement today.
 ICE Chief Executive Officer Jeff Sprecher took ownership of the businesses, which provide customers with trading and data services, in November when he purchased NYSE Euronext, creating the world’s second-largest exchange owner by market value.
 18, saying it would reduce the pace of its monthly asset purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 The Federal Reserve’s decision to taper its monthly bond purchases probably will lead to lower prices for similar assets, the analysts wrote.
 With the European Central Bank and Bank of England pursuing policies to suppress borrowing costs as the Fed curtails its own debt purchases, it’s now about 076 percentage point cheaper for developing-nation companies to sell bonds in euros and convert to dollars than it is to issue in greenbacks directly, data compiled by Bloomberg and Bank of America Corp.
 England’s Monetary Policy Committee kept its key rate at a record low 05 percent yesterday and its bond-purchase program at 375 billion pounds ($617 billion).
 Fed Taper The Fed announced last month it’s trimming monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, citing improvement in the labor market.
 for more than $2 billion and FireEye Inc’s $105 billion purchase of Mandiant Corp.
 Deutsche Telekom may also work with partners to offer clients who purchase security services insurance against breaches, he said.
 Qatar Petroleum International Ltd’s $1 billion purchase of 23 percent of the Parque das Conchas oilfield off Brazil from Royal Dutch Shell Plc is the latest of three foreign deals in the past year.
 The purchase in Brazil is “really a general strategy to simply put to work the money they have outside their economy, which is very small,” Philippe Dauba-Pantanacce, a senior economist at Standard Chartered Plc, said today by telephone.
 Federal Reserve board members Charles Plosser and Richard Fisher separately called for an end to the central bank’s monthly bond-purchase program after Atlanta Fed President Dennis Lockhart backed reductions yesterday.
 payrolls report shouldn’t discourage central-bank policy makers from pursuing cuts to asset purchases after they announced the first $10 billion reduction last month, Lockhart, who won’t vote on policy in 2014, told reporters yesterday.
 Plosser, an opponent of bond purchases, said today that the Fed’s decision to taper was the right move and that the economy is on “firmer footing” Fisher said he “would have preferred to pull back our purchases by double the announced amount” Fed policy makers next meet Jan.
 and fire and security units last year after completing the purchase of Goodrich Corp.
 The company plans to repurchase $1 billion of its stock this year, down 17 percent from 2013, according to the statement.
 payrolls in December shouldn’t deter plans to reduce monthly bond purchases.
 The borrowings have been used to finance some of the biggest buyouts in history including the purchase of Energy Future Holdings Corp.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Perrigo Co, the largest maker of generic over-the-counter medicines in the US, climbed to a record on prospects the company will push for more acquisitions after the purchase of Elan Corp.
 31, when consumers traditionally increase gold purchases.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Argentine billionaire Eduardo Eurnekian is eyeing his third deal in Brazil since 2011 with the purchase of a stake from Eike Batista in a semiconductor venture as he expands operations in Latin America’s largest economy.
 The purchase illustrates the value of sports broadcasting and continues Discovery’s push overseas in recent years to fuel growth through new channels and programming.
 might be to handle these changes to the current stimulus, it is becoming apparent that all too many other countries are not yet ready to be weaned from the teat” The Fed will announce its decision on slowing the pace of monthly bond purchases at the end of its final policy meeting under Chairman Ben S.
 The central bank will probably reduce its monthly bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey this month.
 Apple released an upgraded smartphone, the iPhone 5s, last year with a fingerprint sensor that opens more opportunities for the device to be a tool for making purchases at stores, technology analysts have said.
 The fingerprint technology is initially being used to confirm the purchase of a song or movie through iTunes, or an application from Apple’s App Store.
 The Dearborn, Michigan-based company spent as long as 18 months assessing its ability to service, manufacture and purchase material before deciding on an aluminum body, he said at the Automotive News World Congress in Detroit, also held last week.
 Hogan said last week that he’s also looking for purchases in the Americas -- as well as China -- to round out a strategy of buying stakes to help funnel traffic through the Abu Dhabi hub.
 Saudi Airlines and budget carrier Flynas currently serveSaudi Arabia’s domestic market, and the duo will be joined byupstart Saudi Gulf that’s owned by conglomerate Al QahtaniGroup, which announced at the show that it will introduce afull-service airline in Saudi Arabia after agreeing to purchaseBombardier Inc.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, slid 77 basis points to 461 percent.
 Investors are losing confidence in some of the biggest developing nations, extending the rout in currencies that began last year when the Federal Reserve signaled it would slow the pace of its monthly bond purchases.
 unemployment benefits held near a six-week low while purchases of previously owned homes climbed less than projected in December.
 28-29, decided at its December meeting to start cutting its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 Four years later, it purchased Hong Kong-based Lloyd George Management, which had an office in the UK, and introduced its BMO Global Asset Management brand.
 wealth management platform with its biggest takeover, the C$41 billion purchase of Milwaukee-based consumer bank Marshall & Ilsley Corp.
 The purchase price includes 107 million pounds in cash, 90 million pounds in stock and a loan note of 20 million pounds payable one year after the deal is completed, Hain said in a filing.
 reported profit that beat analysts’ estimates after lowering its industry-high tax rate, an effort the world’s biggest drugmaker said will continue as it repurchases billions in stock.
 That came through exchanging Pfizer shares for stock in Zoetis Inc, the animal health company that had an initial public offering last year, and $163 billion in repurchases, for about 13 percent of Pfizer’s stock.
 That’s prompted more Chinese cities to introduce restrictions on vehicle purchases.
 “Vehicle sales in China are facing pressures brought on by environmental protection, traffic jams and more cities limiting purchases,” Shi Jianhua, a vice secretary general at the auto association, said in Beijing.
 Silver Lake Partners, a private-equity firm that helped acquire Avago before its 2009 initial public offering, will provide a $1 billion for the purchase of Milpitas, California-based LSI.
 “That’s why judges don’t like them” H-P Division The purchase would be the largest deal for Avago, which was founded in 1961 as an electronics division of Hewlett-Packard.
 20 that Diageo’s purchase of United Spirits is void, ruling on a petition filed by creditor banks.
 “In reality, the official’s wife served as a conduit for bribe payments to the official” Prosecutors also charged the three men with a separate kickback scheme involving the purchase of another company on behalf of PetroTiger and several of its directors, who helped fund the deal.
 The defendants increased the purchase price, and two owners of the target company agreed to kick back a portion of the higher amount, according to Fishman.
 Information about Apple’s share repurchase program also will be scrutinized because the company can boost its earnings-per-share results when fewer shares are in circulation, Piecyk said.
 Icahn, who has been pressuring the company to boost its buyback plan, last week revealed that he had increased his stake in Apple to about $36 billion and reiterated a call for a $50 billion share repurchase in fiscal 2014.
 Pearson’s 5 percent stake, which came after Microsoft announced about an 18 percent purchase, valued the subsidiary at $179 billion.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Anheuser-Busch InBev NV sold $525 billion of bonds in six parts to help fund its purchase of South Korea’s Oriental Brewery Co.
 “With an expectation that the improving economy and employment trends will lead to a more robust purchase market in the US, we think the space offers an attractive longer term play on the improving real estate cycle,” Janney analysts led by Larry Greenberg wrote in a note to clients today.
 housing market after yesterday completing its purchase of Lender Processing Services Inc.
 He left the benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 775 percent last month to assess whether a November spike in inflation would be sustained.
 Declining prices of onions and other vegetables give Rajan scope to hold the repurchase rate at 775 percent on Jan.
 The Canadian dollar has dropped 10 percent in the past three months and foreign investors cut purchases of the country’s bonds last year, showing the country’s status as a haven is over.
 They have also called for more scope to use netting on securities financing transactions such as repurchase agreements, or repos.
 “Our priority is that cash held with central banks should be excluded from the leverage ratio calculations, as well as gilt purchases made as part of central bank monetary policy operations.
 The purchase will advance ICBC Chairman Jiang Jianqing’s target of tripling the contribution of overseas earnings to 10 percent by 2016 as the bank follows corporate clients expanding abroad and seeks to tap demand for yuan-denominated goods and services.
 China’s biggest lender bought a 20 percent stake in Standard Bank for $54 billion in 2008, making it the Asian nation’s largest overseas purchase at the time.
 The purchase price of about $765 million is based on the unit’s net asset value of $141 billion at the end of June, the African lender said.
 Athene Chief Executive Officer Jim Belardi has built the company by acquiring sellers of annuities, completing the purchase of Aviva Plc’s US.
 The Bermuda-based firm has purchased other insurers including Liberty Life Insurance Co.
 government reimbursement and its failure to build Germany’s first pharmacy chain after the company’s 2007 purchase of the DocMorris mail-order drugstore.
 The Nest purchase brings new devices and talent to Google, following the $124 billion acquisition of Motorola Mobility in 2012 and the company’s jump into connected products like Google Glass eyewear.
 “But their design has historically been relatively weak” The purchase is the third largest for Google, trailing only smartphone maker Motorola Mobility and display-ad company DoubleClick, which cost slightly more at $324 billion in 2008.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- A Cypriot lawmaker investigating the nation’s banking crisis of last year said she has asked German regulators to probe Commerzbank AG over its alleged role in helping a failed local lender to purchase its own stock.
 Irene Charalambides said she wrote to Germany’s financial watchdog Bafin in December, as well as the Cyprus Securities and Exchange Commission, over the purchase of structured bonds by the now-defunct Cyprus Popular Bank Pcl from Commerzbank that the Cypriot lender may have illegally used to support its own share price.
 “It seems that money from depositors was channeled through the cover of so-called structured instruments for the purchase of shares of the bank and of legal entities connected with the bank’s previous management and its key shareholders,” Charalambides said by telephone yesterday.
 Oando expects the purchase of ConocoPhillips’s assets to raise production from its Oando Energy Resources unit to about 50,000 barrels a day from 5,000, Akindele said.
 “Coffee is an impulse purchase largely so we want to make sure we can capture that traffic” In the US, coffee and snack-shop sales are projected to outpace that of fast-food chains, according to reports from researcher IBISWorld Inc.
 Stocks extended losses yesterday after Fed Bank of Atlanta President Dennis Lockhart said weak payroll growth last month shouldn’t discourage policy makers from reducing monthly bond purchases as long as the economy continues to gain strength.
 Fox purchased 49 percent in 2012, in a deal that valued the business at about $3 billion.
 With that regard, I would have looked at other more favorable locations” Fiat completed the purchase of the 415 percent stake held by a United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust on Jan.
 The central bank’s assets have since climbed above $4 trillion as it purchases Treasury and mortgage-backed bonds to pump cash into the financial system, limit interest-rate increases and encourage investment in riskier assets.
 Funds Paring Money-market funds, among the biggest investors in the debt, may have reduced the amount of unsecured commercial paper from foreign banks they were holding at the end of the year in favor of assets perceived to be safer, such as repurchase agreements, which are backed by collateral, according to Howard Simons, strategist at Bianco Research LLC in Chicago.
 Ergen is accused of surreptitiously buying LightSquareddebt and blocking attempts to reveal who was behind thepurchases.
 According to Ergen, the purchases were smart and the entitythat bought the debt, SP Special Opportunities LLC, is distinctfrom Dish and EchoStar.
 He has said he made no “falserepresentations” about the purchases and has called the suit anattempt to derail his offer to buy LightSquared’s assets.
 American Express, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, advanced 27 percent to a record $9097.
 A pickup in household wealth and consumer confidence propelled card purchases, boosting fourth-quarter net income to $13 billion from $637 million a year earlier.
 The purchase wasn’t popular with investors and WellPoint CEO Angela Braly left the company about three months later.
 It ran into financial difficulty following unprofitable investments in a Las Vegas hotel project, a Credit Suisse AG share purchase and domestic regulations to boost competition among mobile-phone carriers.
 jobless rate fell to a five-year low in November and gross domestic product climbed to its strongest since 2011 in the third quarter of 2013, giving the Federal Reserve the confidence to trim monthly bond purchases.
 The Moscow-based bank purchased most of Oesterreichische Volksbanken’s eastern European business for 505 million euros ($688 million) in 2012.
 Clariant Chief Executive Officer Hariolf Kottmann, who acquired the water-treatment unit through the purchase of German catalyst maker Sued-Chemie for about $23 billion in 2011, has been revamping the company to make it less dependent on commodity chemicals.
 Brian Johnson, an auto analyst for Barclays Plc, has said that GM has sufficient cash and liquidity to pay an annual dividend of 40 cents a share and repurchase stock in addition to buying back remaining common shares owned by the Canadian government and a union health-care trust.
 Norges Bank Investment Management and MetLife purchased a 12-story office at 555 12th St.
 The Norway fund, which oversees about $830 billion, also purchased 475 percent of a San Francisco property at 425 Market St.
 “During the last half of the year, higher mortgage rates, higher home prices and lower consumer confidence due to uncertainty in Washington triggered a pause among homebuyers who are now being more cautious as they consider their purchase,” he said during a Dec.
 In 2012, the Japanese government’s purchase of a group of uninhabited islands claimed by both countries prompted some demonstrators to torch dealerships and vandalize cars associated with Japan.
 and funds consumer purchases at Kroger Co.
 After teaming up with Malone, Rutledge completed a $163 billion purchase of Cablevision Systems Corp’s Optimum West division last July.
 Investors are losing confidence in some of the biggest developing nations, extending the rout in currencies that began last year when the Federal Reserve signaled it would slow the pace of its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage bonds.
 Wall Street strategists have forecast the weakest share advance in almost a decade for 2014, as a reduction in Federal Reserve bond purchases pushes up Treasury yields from 175 percent at the end of 2012.
 Thornburg Investment Management Inc’s Jason Brady is buying bonds more aggressively, while Huntington Asset Advisors’ Sorrentino is selling call options, a bet stock gains will be limited, to finance the purchase of protective puts.
 18, 2013 that it would cut its monthly purchases by $10 billion to $75 billion, citing an improving economy.
 central bank may start reducing its fixed-income purchases.
 for the lead in a new generation of game consoles, said consumers purchased more than 3 million Xbox One players in 2013, following the Nov.
 Bosch agreed in November to continue funding Aleo through March as it searches for a purchaser.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion, the data show.
 central bank also left the stock of asset purchases at 375 billion pounds ($617 billion).
 Some of the measures undertaken in the current revamp hark back to Akzo’s purchase of ICI in 2008 for $17 billion and the need to create a more coherent company from diverse operations making Dulux paint and chemicals.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a benchmark money-market rate indicating cash availability in the banking system, jumped 26 basis points yesterday to 429 percent, according to a daily fixing compiled by China’s National Interbank Funding Center.
 He said it draws on an existing program that permits workers to purchase US.
 The Fed ends a two-day meeting today with economists projecting a further reduction in monthly bond purchases.
 Global investors purchased a net $67 million of Indian equities in January, the least in five months, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “We expect the Fed to continue with a reduction in asset purchases and that has implications on emerging markets,” Tai Hui, chief Asia market strategist at JPMorgan Asset Management in Hong Kong, said in an interview to Bloomberg TV India today.
 The gains aren’t driven “by large amounts of loan money as it was during the bubble” Last year, 54 percent of purchases were financed by bank loans, down from the peak of 99 percent in 2007, and banks have raised their lending standards, he said.
 “Also, some increase in supply is expected in coming years, which should slow down the price growth” Though more home purchases are funded from the buyer’s own resources, “it is important that banks don’t relax their mortgage terms, like the interest margin, down payment size and standards of creditworthiness,” Jaak Tors, head of the Estonian central bank’s financial stability department, said by e-mail.
 Governor Raghuram Rajan raised borrowing cost twice since September to counter inflation before leaving the repurchase rate at 775 percent at the last review on Dec.
 Net purchases in 2012 were $246 billion, the data show.
 Also "WAM did not notify its ERISA clients that it had erroneously purchased the Glen Meadow security for their accounts until August 2010, by which time WAM was aware of the SEC investigation" Eventually they sold the stuff, in May and June 2009, at a loss to the clients of around $8 million, or around 10 percent2 That loss, by the way, was caused by market moves, not coding errors: Prices for subordinated insurance debt that may or may not have been asset-backed looked rather different in 2007 and 2009.
 Believing that these securities represented good long-term investments for other clients, Western frequently sought to repurchase for those other clients the same securities it was required to sell.
 But it looks weird if you do that without a price check: How do you decide what price the one client sells at and the other buys at? So Wamco dutifully went off and sold the bonds to independent dealers at whatever price the dealer bid, then bought them back for its buyer clients at whatever price the dealers offered: In its dealings with most counterparties, the sale and the repurchase were separate arms-length transactions.
 But sometimes apparently they weren't: In its dealings with several other counterparty dealers, however, Western engaged in unlawful cross trades by entering into prearranged sale and repurchase transactions.
 Specifically, prior to the sale transactions, Western and the dealers’ representatives formed an agreement or understanding that the dealer would purchase securities from Western’s selling client account and then sell the same securities to Western’s purchasing client account.
 That's pretty easy work for the dealers, so they didn't get paid very much for doing it3 The default approach in which "the sale and the repurchase were separate arms-length transactions" would mean that clients would in effect pay the full bid/offer spread just so that Wamco could blamelessly move bonds between their accounts.
 Here is one notorious private placement memo for an asset-backed thingy; note in particular the ALL-CAPS language on page 110, requiring purchasers of Issuer Notes to warrant that they are not Erisa plans and won't sell to Erisa plans.
 Western executed the sale transactions at the highest current independent bid available for the securities, and executed the repurchase transactions at a small prearranged markup over the sale price.
 For example, in 2007, all but 1 of the 88 repurchases were effected at an identical markup over the sale price of just 003125% of the par value of the security, or, in bond parlance, a ½ 'tick' In the eight-month period September 2009 through April 2010, Western caused its client accounts to engage in 108 prearranged sale and repurchase transactions, and 96% of these repurchases were effected at a 2 'tick' spread over the sale price.
 The purchase would be OCBC’s biggest acquisition, giving it a network of 70 branches in Hong Kong, Macau and mainland China.
 The policy makers more than doubled the one-week repurchase rate to 10 percent from 45 percent in a bid to halt a currency run partly propelled by domestic political upheaval.
 More than $11 trillion has been erased from the value of emerging-market equities since the Fed signaled in May that it could start scaling back bond purchases that boosted demand for higher-yielding assets.
 The central bank will continue to cut purchases by $10 billion at each of the next six FOMC meetings, with the program ending no later than December, according to Bloomberg’s Jan.
 It could also stop the sterilization of government bond purchases conducted under the now-terminated Securities Markets Program.
 “There are assets that can be considered,” for direct purchase in case tensions flare up again, he said in a Bloomberg Television interview.
 Chief Executive Officer Paul Bulcke said the investment will create 700 direct and 3,500 indirect jobs and increase the amount of raw materials purchased locally.
 Steps by authorities, which have included three rate cuts that brought borrowing costs down to 1 percent and Bank of Israel foreign currency purchases of more than $5 billion, have failed to stop the shekel’s ascent.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Nigerian Bulk Electricity Trading Plc, which acts as a clearing house for power generating and distribution companies, will guarantee all purchases in the market’s transitional phase, Chief Executive Officer Rumundara Wonodi said.
 jobs data eased concern the Federal Reserve will quicken reductions in its debt purchases that have buoyed emerging markets.
 VAMC, as the entity is known, may purchase as much as 150 trillion dong ($71 billion) by the end of 2014, central bank Governor Nguyen Van Binh said in December.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Korea Gas Corp, the company that buys the most liquefied natural gas globally, last month purchased spot cargoes to be delivered by March to meet South Korea’s winter demand.
 The LNG be supplied from Asia and the Atlantic, according to the official, who declined to say how many shipments were purchased.
 Asian LNG importers typically purchase such shipments from December to March to meet peak heating and power demand during winter in the northern hemisphere.
 Regulation has obviously not been a place where he has concentrated and done what the Fed needed to do to help bring under control the too-big-to-fail banks” Yellen, 67, will take over as the Fed trims monthly bond purchases in a first step toward lessening the unprecedented economic stimulus commenced under Bernanke’s leadership.
 Growth of electric vehicles will slow to 50 percent, with 300,000 units sold around the world in 2014, from 100 percent growth last year, as the young market faces supply constraints and early adopters already made purchases, he said.
 “The prospects and demand for better health care in China are great” Alibaba may use the purchase to help it compete against Tencent Holdings Ltd.
 The buyers will seek a waiver from Hong Kong rules that require purchasers of a majority stake in company to make a buyout offer for all outstanding shares, Citic 21CN said.
 builder and buyer of solar farms, plans to purchase as much as 250 megawatts of US.
 Solar projects of at least 10 megawatts that have long-term power-purchase agreements with utilities are the most attractive, Gorton said.
 The central bank will probably reduce its monthly bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey this month.
 Amazon Shopping By shopping with Seattle-based Amazon, customers may have been able to stick closer to their budgets and less likely to make impulse purchases, said Leon Nicholas, senior vice president at Kantar Retail in Boston.
 Early results show that the season’s discounts -- as steep as 75 percent off at luxury department-store chain Neiman Marcus Group LLC -- didn’t generate sufficient traffic or spur enough purchases of full-priced merchandise to make up for the lost revenue.
 Merchandise purchased via personal computers in November and December gained 10 percent from the same period a year earlier, ComScore Inc.
 Fed policy makers may give an indication of plans for a further cut in bond purchases at the end of a Jan.
 RBI Meeting The RBI will hold the repurchase rate at 775 percent at a Jan.
 Federal Reserve trimmed its bond-purchase program.
 Sumitomo Mitsui led banks in reducing Japanese government bond holdings last year as the central bank embarked on record asset purchases amid Prime Minister Shinzo Abe’s efforts to end deflation.
 BOJ Governor Haruhiko Kuroda that month announced a plan to target 2 percent inflation with bond purchases, stoking concern that higher interest rates may erode the value of fixed-income securities.
 The purchase was earlier reported by the Maeil Business Newspaper, which cited S-Oil Chief Executive Officer Nasser Al-Mahasher saying Aramco will buy Hanjin’s entire stake.
 and Apax Partners LLP agreed to purchase BT Group Plc’s Yellow Pages unit in 2001.
 Fed policy makers, who this month began to cut monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, have cited improvement in the labor market.
 The Fed cut the pace of monthly bond buying for a second straight meeting, saying it will reduce purchases by another $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to a plan for a gradual withdrawal from its unprecedented monetary easing.
 They’re among a number of top money managers betting markets are robust enough to weather a gradual reduction in the pace of the Federal Reserve’s asset purchases as the central bank signaled it will keep interest rates at their current low for the foreseeable future, according to interviews with more than half a dozen investors.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker, plans to borrow as much as $12 billion to finance the purchase of Beam Inc, two people familiar with the matter said.
 That compares with a median of 12 times historic Ebitda paid in 16 purchases of wine and spirits assets over the past five years, the data show.
 “There’s a suitable allowance and allocation to fixed income, especially when dealing with such an uncertain environment” Bond Reversal The bond gains mark a reversal from the 057 percent loss in January 2013 that kicked off the first annual decline for the securities since 1999, as speculation started to mount that the Fed would begin curtailing its $85 billion in monthly bond purchases.
 vehicle owners say they want to make in-car purchases of songs, audio books and movies for their passengers.
 Oil, Power Naren’s funds purchased shares of Oil & Natural Gas Corp, the largest energy explorer, and Power Grid Corp, the biggest electricity distributor, last month.
 Visa repurchased 55 million shares in the quarter at an average price of $19956 and had $42 billion remaining for buybacks as of Dec.
 American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said Jan.
 Since Snyder purchased the Redskins in 1999, the franchise has managed one playoff victory and has had four winning seasons.
 Local governments provide matching subsidies on top of incentives by central government of as much as 60,000 yuan toward the purchase of an all-electric passenger vehicle and as much as 500,000 yuan for an electric bus.
 First-time buyers accounted for 27 percent of completed purchases last month, down from 30 percent a year earlier.
 This year’s report, released today, may draw particular scrutiny because the Pentagon will propose increasing purchases to 42 planes in fiscal 2015 from the 29 Congress authorized this year.
 The purchase of NaturalMotion, which had total 2013 bookings of about $62 million, will add 1 cent a share to earnings this year, contributing about $15 million to $25 million in adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, Zynga said.
 Non-AT&T customers will be able to buy data servicesthrough OnStar or purchase it directly from AT&T, Chan saidCustomers will be able to turn on 4G for short periods, such afamily vacation, she said.
 Asset managers bought 62 percent of the notes sold, while insurers or pension funds purchased 16 percent and central banks about 3 percent, according to debt agency IGCP.
 The purchases may slow further to avoid exceeding the average annual target of a 50 trillion yen increase in the bank’s holdings for the year, according to Tokai Tokyo Securities Co.
 Brazil has no long-term purchase contracts, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Like its peers, American Eagle is struggling as teens and parents pull back on apparel purchases.
 had purchased a “large quantity of tickets,” also to be given to military families, “in an effort to assist in reaching a sellout” The NFL yesterday gave the teams an extension to its rule that allows for a blackout in local television markets if games aren’t sold out 72 hours before kickoff.
 In a statement this afternoon, the team said Fox affiliates WITI in Milwaukee, WLUK in Green Bay and WFXS in Wausau were among the purchasers of tickets.
 “We encourage our fellow shareholders to continue to press this board and management team to act urgently and return significant additional capital in 2014” Sotheby’s board has authorized the share buyback primarily as part of a new policy to offset annual employee stock dilution, with approximately $25 million of shares being repurchased by the end of 2014, it said in the statement.
 The Mitsui and Mitsubishi venture, Japan Australia LNG Pty, won’t go ahead with the purchase of about 15 million metric tons of LNG annually from Browse because the deal depended on the project reaching an investment decision by the end of 2013, Perth-based Woodside said today in a statement.
 Click-and-collect, where customers order online and pick up the purchase from their local store, was a particular area of growth.
 Discounting was spurred by unseasonably warm weather in Europe that caused shoppers to delay purchases of coats, jackets and sweaters.
 Big Data In July, the company purchased cloud-computing storage provider SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 The Fed, which has made job creation a condition for reducing asset purchases, said on Dec.
 The company extended its presence in the region last year with the purchase of three mines from Barrick Gold Corp.
 Ntelos, Gabelli Dish is seen adding to spectrum holdings that includes swaths purchased in 2012 from bankrupt satellite providers, as “a minimal critical mass of spectrum is necessary for a new competitor to enter the wireless market,” Piecyk said.
 The CVM technical staff’s ruling, if it’s upheld, would let some minority shareholders demand that Oi purchase their stock, which could cost the debt-laden company about 950 million reais ($403 million), according to Exane BNP Paribas.
 High Stakes If Oi is forced by the CVM to make an offer to repurchase shares from minority investors, the amount won’t affect the company’s liquidity much, Mathieu Robilliard, an analyst at Exane BNP Paribas, said in a research note.
 central bank will cut purchases in $10 billion installments over its next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to economists in a Bloomberg survey on Jan.
 In the past two years, he purchased eight brokerages from Philadelphia to Seattle.
 expect loans to underperform compared with 2013 as the Federal Reserve begins to taper its bond purchases, paving the way for an increase in rates that have been kept near zero for the last five years.
 central bank is trimming its monthly asset purchases by $10 billion, the Federal Open Market Committee said Dec.
 stocks to the biggest gain since 1997 last year as the Federal Reserve maintained asset purchases, while Japanese shares soared more than 50 percent as the central bank expanded stimulus measures.
 The central bank said in December that it had enough faith in the labor market to reduce monthly purchases by $10 billion and Chairman Ben S.
 Fed Bank of Philadelphia President Charles Plosser, an opponent of bond purchases by the Fed, has warned that central bankers may be too optimistic that they can smoothly pull back accommodation, including raising the main interest rate held near zero since December 2008.
 He declined to comment on whether the business is looking at a purchase.
 Alibaba may use the purchase to help it compete against Tencent Holdings Ltd.
 The buyers will seek a waiver from Hong Kong rules that require purchasers of a majority stake in company to make a buyout offer for all outstanding shares, Citic 21CN said.
 Brian Johnson, an auto analyst for Barclays Plc, has said that GM has sufficient cash and liquidity to pay an annual dividend of 40 cents a share and repurchase stock in addition to buying back remaining common shares owned by the Canadian government and a union health-care trust.
 life insurers will use cash for acquisitions rather than share repurchases after buybacks helped drive a rally last year, Deloitte LLP said in its 2014 industry outlook.
 “There are indications that the impact of such a strategy may be playing out” Erik Bass, an analyst at Citigroup Inc, projects repurchases of about 56 percent of shareholders’ equity this year, and expects life insurers to boost dividends, according to a research note yesterday.
 said last month that it plans to repurchase fewer shares in 2014 than in recent years because other options for using capital provide better returns.
 The company repurchased $350 million of shares in the first nine months of 2013, Chief Financial Officer Randy Freitag said on a conference call in October.
 The purchase of EagleView “advances our position in the imagery analytics market, adding new municipal and commercial customers,” Verisk Chief Executive Officer Scott Stephenson said in the statement.
 The purchase will be funded with about $50 million in cash and $585 million from a revolving credit facility, Verisk Chief Financial Officer Mark Anquillare said on a conference call.
 The lender could achieve a multiple higher than one times book value, “well above the valuation of our purchase levels,” according to the letter.
 8-9, keeping the benchmark rate at a record-low 05 percent and leaving its target for the stock of asset purchases at 375 billion pounds ($621 billion).
 The purchase from Iberdrola SA and GDF Suez SA totals about 100 million pounds ($164 million), the Japanese company said in a statement today.
 (AXP), thebiggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said Jan.
 5 that interest rates will be kept low “for an extended period” Fed policy makers will cut their monthly bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next seven meetings before ending the program in December 2014, according to the median forecast of analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 The Federal Open Market Committee yesterday said it will cut monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgages to a combined $65 billion, from $75 billion.
 farmers aren’t making early purchases like they did last year, Monsanto said.
 By the end of fiscal 2015, the Navy planned to purchase the first 24 of the ships.
 The appeals court was due to rule on a 2012 preliminary decision canceling Cemex’s 1999 purchase of Assiut and returning the unit to state ownership.
 American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said Jan.
 18 said it will trim monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month.
 Northern Star, which produced 103,566 ounces in the 12 months to June 30, will fund the purchase from a combination of A$15 million cash, a A$50 million debt facility and proceeds from a planned A$100 million equity raising, the company said.
 28-29, is beginning to trim monthly bond purchases, citing an improvement in the labor market.
 India’s arms-buying has been affected by officials’ sensitivities over corruption scandals in previous purchases, including one that helped drive the ruling Congress Party to defeat in 1989 elections.
 Sontag was among the Weil team advising commercial real-estate company Brookfield Property Partners LP, on its agreement to purchase US.
 Increased stock purchases by the fund last year helped stabilize the slumping equity market.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- WhiteWave Foods Co, the maker of Silk soy milk and Horizon Organic products, obtained a $500 million loan to support its purchase of Earthbound Farm LLC.
 “We’d much rather innovate than litigate” Good Buy? Patents were a key part of the Motorola purchase, which cost $124 billion in 2012.
 Google has said $55 billion of the purchase price was tied to the intellectual property, which comprised about 17,000 patents that cover some fundamental phone technology.
 Santander UK’s pretax profit for 2013 fell 1 percent to 114 billion pounds ($188 billion) from the year-earlier period after a one-time gain on the repurchase of its own debt wasn’t repeated, the company said.
 The MSCI Emerging Markets Index dropped 03 percent, heading for its biggest January decline since 2008, after the Fed said it will trim monthly bond purchases.
 Fed policy makers said yesterday they will reduce monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion.
 “Women are becoming more independent, becoming richer, and so are buying for themselves” Men accounted for 90 percent of China’s high-end purchases in 1995, according to industry consultant Bain & Co.
 Although Chinese customers are the world’s biggest luxury buyers by nationality, accounting for 29 percent of high-end purchases last year, mainland sales have slowed as Chinese shoppers now buy more than two-thirds of their items overseas, according to Bain.
 12 that the original agreement states AB InBev can repurchase Oriental Brewery at 11 times earnings before interest, taxation and amortization, or about $415 billion.
 It will cut monthly bond purchases to $65 billion from $75 billion.
 The purchase will be completed in the “near term,” KKR said today.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc’s purchase of Forest Laboratories Inc.
 last year in its only purchase for more than $1 billion since 2007, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Safeway felt obligated to tell shareholders that it was discussing a sale because management had announced plans to buy back shares, one of the people said, and if it had gone through with the repurchase and a sale eventually happened, shareholders could have sued for tendering shares and missing a takeover premium.
 “We buy sustainably sourced palm oil, and where it’s not available we buy the green certificates to cover it” Such certificates, purchased from certified palm oil producers and traded on specialized exchanges, allow companies to claim they have supported the sustainable production of palm oil, according to trading platform GreenPalm.
 The cash purchase will add 22 million undeveloped acres near Canadian Natural’s fields in western Canada, President Steve Laut said in a conference call today.
 The purchase will reduce the percentage of company output that is heavy oil to about 41 percent from 45 percent, according to Phil Skolnick, an analyst at Canaccord Genuity Corp.
 Rocky Mountains, Arkoma Woodford shale and Gulf Coast to help pay for its $6 billion purchase in the Eagle Ford of Texas.
 Canadian Natural may also monetize its royalty streams “which would allow for some future debt repayment” Canadian Natural financed the purchase using credit facilities, Chief Financial Officer Corey Bieber said on the conference call.
 Users who click, retweet, reply or favorite an auto advertisers’ promoted tweet were 32 percent more likely to purchase a new vehicle than the average Twitter user, according to the findings of the Datalogix study.
 gained 18 percent as activist investor Carl Icahn backed away from his push to increase share repurchases at the iPhone maker.
 Fed Stimulus The Fed has already decided to slow the pace of its asset-purchase program twice, reducing its monthly buying of bonds to $65 billion from $85 billion in 2013.
 Icahn indicated he will drop his shareholder proposal asking Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, citing recent repurchases and the opposition of a proxy-advisory firm.
 28, bringing its repurchases to more than $40 billion in the past 12 months.
 Steelmakers in the world’s second-biggest economy purchased a record amount of ore in 2013 even as growth slowed.
 The Houston-based firm said today in a statement it will repurchase $70 million of stock by the end of next year.
 She repeated the Fed’s outlook for further reductions in “measured steps” and that asset purchases are not on a “pre-set course” Fed Stimulus The Fed said in December that it would start cutting the monthly pace of asset purchases.
 The purchase of Hoffman Estates, Illinois-based Amcol will add to Imerys earnings from the first full year of integration in 2015, it said today.
 Roberts has spent at least $91 billion acquiring companies in the past dozen years, including the $52 billion purchase of AT&T Inc’s cable business in 2002.
 If his purchase of Time Warner Cable is approved, that would bring his acquisition tally to at least $136 billion.
 The improving economy and the Fed dialing back stimulus mean that rates will move higher as the year unfolds” The central bank is tapering the bond purchases that have kept borrowing costs close to historic lows.
 17 high amid weaker-than-forecast Chinese data, a reduction in Federal Reserve bond purchases and a rout in emerging-market currencies.
 King will work closely with Tom Farley, who became chief operating officer of the NYSE after Atlanta-based ICE purchased the company in November, according to the person, who asked to not be identified because the personnel change hasn’t been announced publicly yet.
 Both led deals including the company’s 2006 purchase of Houlihan Lokey Howard & Zukin, a merger and acquisition adviser.
 The FAA said it spoke with the operator and the hobby shop’s owner to explain the rules, and the owner agreed to provide training for customers who purchase model drones.
 VW currently has no firm plan and a purchase isn’t imminent, said the people, who asked not to be identified discussing private deliberations.
 VW could finance a purchase of Scania’s remaining shares out of its own coffers.
 VW has also accumulated a 75 percent stake in MAN since 2006, when it first purchased a holding to thwart the German truckmaker’s effort to take over Scania.
 The purchase of the remaining Scania shares might be pursued once VW has a new executive to run trucks, Gommel said.
 The growth of the industry has boosted inbound shipment of photovoltaic gear, with the value of the purchases reaching $24 billion since 2010 when India started its solar program, according to data from the Ministry of Commerce.
 The total amount spent in the first quarter is almost the same as the company spent on repurchases in 2013, CBS said in a separate statement.
 The benchmark index fell for a second week as emerging-market currencies slid and the Federal Reserve reduced the size of its monthly bond purchases for a second consecutive time.
 The Federal Open Market Committee said it will cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to a plan for a gradual withdrawal from its unprecedented monetary easing.
 Valeant Pharmaceuticals has since grown from a $14 billion company into a $45 billion drugmaker that last year said it would purchase Bausch & Lomb Holdings Inc.
 payrolls in three years are unlikely to prompt the Federal Reserve to shelve its strategy of gradually trimming bond purchases, according to economists.
 Range of Data Fed officials will consider a range of labor-market data as they consider whether to keep cutting bond purchases at the same pace, Roberto Perli, a partner at Cornerstone Macro LP in Washington, said after the jobs report.
 The Fed announced in December that it would start paring stimulus by cutting monthly bond purchases by $10 billion per month, and it decided on another reduction of the same size in January, to $65 billion.
 “The committee will likely reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps at future meetings,” the Fed said.
 Rajan last week unexpectedly raised the repurchase rate by 25 basis points to 8 percent and signaled he is ready to implement inflation targeting in the most sweeping changes in the 78-year history of the RBI.
 made the first two cuts to asset purchases in December and January, slowing to $65 billion a month from $85 billion.
 “Market participants, I think, on both sides would have a benefit from issuing through something that’s transparent and set by market, or the regulator” The province linked the sale of all three tranches of its impending C$475 million ($433 million) of floating-rate notes to the Canadian overnight repurchase agreement rate average, rather than the Canadian dealer offered rate, which is set from a survey of banks.
 In the past three years, the company’s purchases include Germany’s Medion AG, NEC Corp’s PC division in Japan and Brazilian PC maker CCE.
 The company will expand its share of the global smartphone market through the purchase of Motorola that was announced Jan.
 The company’s proposal to purchase the stake was referred to Prime Minister Manmohan Singh’s cabinet, as it involved an investment of more than 12 billion rupees, the Foreign Investment Promotion Board of the trade ministry said in a Jan.
 “The fact that central banks have really agreed to keep policy stimulative should give investors a little bit of reassurance that they’re not going to undo the recovery that’s taken place” Fed Stimulus Fisher, an opponent of added stimulus who votes on policy this year, said he’ll remain a strong advocate of tapering the purchase of bond buying.
 Cote concluded some consumers paid more for e-books or bought cheaper ones than those they preferred, while still others deferred purchases altogether rather than pay higher prices.
 Orange Polska, which targets net debt at 15 times Ebitda, may breach that limit, depending on the price of the spectrum purchase, according to de Galzain.
 have their hands full with recent purchases, OZ Minerals and Teck are on the short list of possible “white knights” for Augusta, Chang said.
 Sirius Shares Liberty Media Corp, another Malone unit, offered to buy Sirius XM last month and the billionaire will continue to pursue the purchase of remaining shares, said Keith Moore, an analyst at MKM Partners.
 Last month, Malone’s Liberty Global Plc, based in London, expanded its European footprint with the 49 billion-euro ($67 billion) purchase of Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV.
 She also repeated the Fed’s statement that asset purchases aren’t on a “pre-set course” Yellen’s congressional testimony “was a key uncertainty coming into the week,” Anthony Valeri, a market strategist in San Diego with LPL Financial Corp, said in a telephone interview.
 announced the purchase of full control of its wireless business, a price war and stock decline are forcing executives to convince shareholders of the deal’s merits all over again.
 29 it would further trim its monthly bond purchases to $65 billion starting in February from $75 billion in January, based on optimism that economic growth is improving.
 Manila Water last year failed to win approval for its proposed purchase of a 51 percent stake in PT PAM Lyonnaise Jaya, which supplies water to western Jakarta.
 was charged with impersonating his father in a multimillion-dollar fraud tied to the purchase of Maxim magazine, US.
 He also allegedly provided lenders interested in the Maxim purchase with a fabricated bank statement purportedly from an account held by his father.
 After one lender put about $55 million into an escrow account, Darden used a Russia-based e-mail service to impersonate the lender, to secure the release of about $49 million toward the Maxim purchase, the government said.
 in the fourth quarter after the stock climbed by at least 60 percent from when the billionaire’s family office purchased the shares last year.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Comcast Corp’s proposed purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Rogers purchased 22 licenses for C$33 billion, while BCE bought 31 for C$566 million and Telus acquired 30 for C$11 billion.
 29 that the central bank will trim its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, cutting the pace of stimulus for a second straight meeting because of an improving economy.
 Federal Reserve tapers its asset purchases, and Brazil’s central bank is raising interest rates, which may impair investment.
 She helped lead last year’s $1 billion purchase of Harry Winston to expand in bejeweled watches for women.
 Angel, a professor of finance at Georgetown University and former board member on exchanges operated by Direct Edge Holdings LLC, which was purchased this month by Bats Global Markets Inc.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan unexpectedly raised the benchmark repurchase rate to 8 percent from 775 percent on Jan.
 The utilities generated or purchased 8534 billion kilowatt-hours of electricity in January, 07 percent less than a year earlier as warmer temperatures reduced heating demand, the FEPC said.
 The following table shows Japanese utilities’ consumption and purchases of fuel oil, crude, LNG and coal in January.
 Exchange Critic Sprecher, 58, has emerged since ICE’s purchase of NYSE Euronext as a critic of the current system for trading stocks, a landscape dominated by automated traders who supplanted human market-makers after a decade of technology advances and changes in laws.
 In a speech before the purchase closed in November, Sprecher said US.
 The purchase of Macquarie Generation depends on approval by the Australian Competition & Consumer Commission, the Sydney-based company said today in a statement.
 The government expects to complete the deal by mid-April, should the competition regulator approve the purchase, he said.
 shale portfolio, in the Canadian heavy-crude producer’s biggest purchase.
 The acquisition, which will allow Baytex to add output from the Eagle Ford shale formation in Texas, follows purchases by the producer in North Dakota’s Bakken and Three Forks shale formations.
 The purchase may signal an imminent rise in deals in the Canadian oil and natural gas industry as company valuations are low and there’s a need to replace production, said David Neuhauser, a portfolio manager at Livermore Partners Inc.
 Yahoo has purchased a series of startups as CEO Marissa Mayer attempts to turn the Internet company around.
 “In difficult times, people go back and trust brands that have quality and heritage and you feel safe making the purchase,” Marie Driscoll, founder of Driscoll Advisors, a New York-based retail consulting firm, said in a telephone interview.
 The trading house had annual pretax profit of $371 million in the five years before the purchase from Citigroup, Stephen Chazen, Occidental’s then-chief financial officer, said at the time.
 “It’s a distraction,” said Gheit, who opposed the purchase from its inception.
 is nearing an agreement to purchase Glencore Xstrata Plc’s Las Bambas copper project in Peru for more than $5 billion, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 A deal valued at $5 billion would be almost the largest mining-related acquisition by a Chinese buyer, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, second only to the $12 billion purchase of a stake in Rio Tinto Group completed by Chinalco in partnership with Alcoa Inc.
 27, the biggest decline in two weeks, as purchases of new US.
 Several Fed officials also said that in the absence of any significant change to the economic outlook, there should be a presumption that the pace of monthly bond purchases will be reduced at each meeting, the minutes showed.
 Today’s data mark the debut of the PPI after its first major overhaul since 1978, which more than doubles its reach of the economy by including prices received for goods, services, government purchases, exports, and construction.
 Prices received from government purchases and exported goods represent 11 percent, and construction is 2 percent.
 The Fed at its last meeting in January voted to trim its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion.
 “The economy is in good shape to grow and sustain overall heavy asset purchases including business jets” The pace of sales may be affected by currency volatility in Turkey and other emerging markets.
 currency, with Lambarth calling it a “challenge” The speed of completing plane purchases in countries hit by currency fluctuations may slow, Tom Perry, vice president for sales in Europe, the Middle East and Africa for Cessna.
 to the Balkans, the carrier agreed to acquire Warsaw-based landline provider GTS Central Europe in November and has offered to purchase an additional 10 percent stake in Hellenic Telecommunications Organization SA from the Greek government, people familiar with the talks said last month.
 Integrated Network The purchase gives T-Mobile Czech Republic an enterprise value equivalent to about five times its earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, according to Deutsche Telekom spokesman Andreas Leigers, who cited projections for the unit’s fourth-quarter earnings.
 “The purchase of the remaining shares is a logical step to optimize our portfolio and helps our development into the leading pan-European telecommunications provider,” Nemat said in the statement.
 economy can withstand reduced monthly bond purchases.
 Asian Demand Gold fell 14 percent in the two days through April 15, the biggest such drop in three decades, spurring purchases of bracelets and coins around the world, including in the largest economy after the US.
 Liu estimates that China’s demand topped 1,400 tons in 2013 as the association’s data probably does not include government purchases and buying by financial institutions.
 With about two-thirds of the cars delivered in India being sold on loans, higher borrowing costs can delay purchase decisions.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- German home prices rose by the most in at least 10 years in 2013 as low interest rates made it cheaper to finance purchases and prompted investors to switch from bond markets to real estate.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo Bimbo SAB’s latest acquisition to expand in North America is heightening analysts’ concern that the world’s biggest bread maker’s debt is at a high level at a time profit is still being pinched by recent purchases.
 The Canada Bread purchase comes at an “inopportune time” given the company’s high financial leverage and capital expenditures, Citigroup Inc.
 At the time of the Sara Lee purchase in October 2011, Bimbo’s quarterly net income was a record-high $167 million.
 “Under any metric, this acquisition is completely manageable and reasonable for the financial strategy of Bimbo” Bimbo’s purchase of Canada Bread is its biggest since acquiring George Weston’s fresh bread and baked goods business for $25 billion in 2009 to expand in the US.
 Bimbo’s shares have risen 29 percent since the Sara Lee purchase was announced on Oct.
 “And this is an aggressive kind of decision” Moody’s lowered its outlook on Bimbo yesterday to negative from stable on the Canada Bread purchase.
 The purchase will boost L’Oreal’s per-share earnings, while sharpening Nestle’s focus on nutrition and health products.
 A Nestle spokesman declined to comment on whether the company had imminent plans to make purchases.
 L’Oreal is paying 12448 euros a share and all the stock purchased will be canceled.
 She also said financial-market turmoil doesn’t pose a major risk to the outlook for the world’s largest economy and repeated the Fed’s statement that asset purchases aren’t on a “pre-set course” “If the market’s interpretation is that Yellen will at least not step on the accelerator for the tapering program, that’s certainly encouraging for emerging markets,” Derrick Irwin, a money manager of the Wells Fargo Advantage Emerging Markets Equity Fund in Boston, said by phone.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Etihad Airways PJSC said it will decide within 30 days whether to buy a stake in ailing Italian airline Alitalia SpA as the Abu Dhabi flag carrier continues its streak of purchases to funnel traffic through the Middle East.
 IBM’s earnings have benefited from a tax strategy that sends profits through a Dutch subsidiary, leading to its lowest tax rate in two decades, and Sacconaghi said he expects the company to boost per-share earnings this year by laying off 13,000 or more workers and spending at least $15 billion to repurchase stock.
 Given IBM’s weak stock price and desire to meet its earnings-per-share target next year, it will probably “continue to aggressively repurchase its shares -- possibly funded by more debt,” wrote Zhao, who said she prefers bonds of Oracle Corp.
 Treasuries declined and the greenback strengthened this week as minutes of the Fed’s January meeting showed policy makers remain intent on cutting asset purchases in the absence of an “appreciable change” in the economic outlook.
 El Paso Electric will purchase the power generated for 30 years, Juwi said, without providing financial terms.
 The company repurchased $225 million of stock in the last three months of 2013, bringing the full-year figure to $633 million including warrants.
 RFR, founded by Rosen and partner Michael Fuchs in 1991, purchased the Seagram Building for $375 million in 2000.
 The South African Reserve Bank unexpectedly lifted its benchmark repurchase rate 50 basis points to 55 percent on Jan.
 One of the biggest deals was done by AXA SA’s real estate arm, which achieved a net yield of 95 percent on its purchase of 13 properties for 172 million euros from the Catalonia regional government in a sale-and-leaseback deal.
 “Nothing in the Second Amendment guarantees the right to purchase whatever kind of handgun one desires from whomever he or she desires,” Harris said.
 The shift to loans comes after foreclosure starts dropped to the lowest level since 2006 and house prices jumped in Atlanta, Phoenix and other markets where investors have made the most purchases.
 Invitation Homes “has not and will not purchase NPL’s,” Blackstone spokeswoman Christine Anderson said.
 George Soros’s Soros Fund Management LLC trimmed its stake after the stock climbed by at least 60 percent from when the billionaire’s family office purchased the shares last year.
 The Covington, Kentucky-based company is focusing on expanding in additives used in cosmetics and pharmaceuticals after its $32 billion purchase of International Specialty Products Inc.
 Critics said the purchase would bloat Exxon with additional gas reserves at a time when a glut of domestic supply from shale fields was collapsing the profitability of pumping the fuel.
 Fifty-six percent of owners who experience no problems with their vehicle stick with the same brand on their next purchase, the researcher said.
 “Chaebols are franchising bakeries and chicken shops as they seek new areas of growth” As Park seeks extra money to help fund her election promises, investigators are trying to counter tax-avoidance methods such as bank accounts set up under other people’s names and the purchase of gold bars to hide wealth, the tax agency said.
 It will instead emphasize buyers’ track record in making purchases at previous sales events, the Anglo American Plc unit said in e-mailed comments this week.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve Bank of New York said risks of rapid asset sales in the repurchase agreement market aren’t being adequately curbed, and regulators may need to step in to shore up such wholesale funding.
 Since the 2008 financial crisis, the central bank has tried to strengthen the tri-party repurchase agreement market, which nearly collapsed amid the demise of Bear Stearns Cos.
 Dealers agree to repurchase the securities at a later date, and cash is sent back to the lender, typically a money-market mutual fund.
 The fund last year also purchased shares in Distell, South Africa’s biggest producer of wine and spirits, she said.
 Internal discussions about that possibility wouldn’t even begin to happen at Gilead until next year, as the company spends 2014 paying off debt from its $11 billion purchase of Pharmasset Inc, Milligan said.
 The insurer’s board approved last month the repurchase of as much as $150 million in shares as Chief Executive Officer Barry Zyskind sought to regain Wall Street’s confidence.
 Overseas purchases of crude increased about 12 percent from a year ago to 2815 million metric tons, according to data on the website of the General Administration of Customs today.
 “So although so far it’s just one robust number, if exports and domestic demand continue trending upwards, it will be good for companies and the whole economy and eventually the markets” The central bank has tried to weaken the shekel by stepping up its purchase of foreign currency reserves.
 The stabilization of the dollar-shekel rate in recent weeks makes it probable the bank will pare its currency purchases this month and hold the key rate, said Tal Zohar Avda, chief executive officer of the Tel Aviv branch of FXCM Inc.
 11 comment that she intends to maintain the policy of gradually reducing bond purchases, also support this view, Avda said.
 12, urged the government to rein in housing costs by limiting loan-to-value ratios on mortgages and raising the property purchase tax for secondary homes.
 The company generates revenue when users purchase virtual items, such as extra lives or additional game content, for about $1 apiece, according to the filing.
 stocks advanced for a fifth day, their longest streak of gains this year, as Federal Reserve Chairman Janet Yellen signaled that she will continue to taper the bank’s asset-purchase program at future meetings.
 economy, said that the Federal Open Market Committee will probably continue to slow its asset-purchase program this year.
 “The committee will likely reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps,” she said in prepared comments.
 “That said, purchases are not on a pre-set course” Retail Sales In the UK, a British Retail Consortium report showed that same-store retail sales increased 39 percent in January from a year earlier.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Business-jet shipments worldwide rose last year for the first time since 2008 as corporate purchases of larger planes aided an industry that saw deliveries tumble by almost half during the recession.
 Treasuries erased weekly losses fueled by minutes of the Federal Reserve’s last meeting that showed the central bank will continue to cut bond purchases, given policy makers’ confidence in the economic recovery.
 Home purchases decreased 51 percent to a 462 million annual rate last month, figures from the National Association of Realtors showed today in Washington.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries fell amid bets the Federal Reserve will push on with reductions to its bond-purchase program, viewing weak economic data this year as reflecting harsh weather rather than a faltering recovery.
 Bernanke, scaling back bond-buying under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy in “measured steps” The central bank has cut its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt to $65 billion, from $85 billion last year, citing economic improvement.
 Outerwall, under pressure from activist investor Jana Partners LLC to generate more value for shareholders, has said it will return 75 percent to 100 percent of annual free cash flow to investors, which in the near term would be in the form of share repurchases.
 That would come on top of the $195 million in stock repurchased last year.
 Hungary’s largest mobile services company advanced 65 percent this month as Deutsche Telekom’s 828 million euro ($11 billion) purchase of its residual ownership in the Czech unit spurred bets of a similar decision at the Hungarian subsidiary.
 18 decision to cut its purchases of Treasuries and mortgage securities to $75 billion a month from $85 billion, which did more to temper the appeal of high-risk assets than reduce demand for bonds.
 29 they will taper purchases to $65 billion.
 29 to cut its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt to $65 billion from $75 billion in its second $10-billion reduction in as many meetings.
 The purchases designed to cap long-term borrowing costs and fuel growth.
 Internal Discussion “The threshold for stopping the taper is higher than in the past, and the Fed is intent on unwinding the asset purchase program,” said Larry Milstein, managing director in New York of government-debt trading at RW.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Itau Unibanco Holding SA, Latin America’s largest bank by market value, said Brazil’s tax agency confirmed a decision to levy charges of 187 billion reais ($78 billion) on the purchase of Unibanco in 2008.
 economy can withstand reduced monthly bond purchases.
 Alibaba, based in Hangzhou, China, already owns 283 percent of AutoNavi’s shares and intends to pay for the potential purchase with cash on hand, according to a statement today.
 CGI made its biggest-ever purchase in 2012, paying C$27 billion for London-based Logica Plc, which was then northern Europe’s second-largest information technology company.
 “And Starwood didn’t mention buyback activity in the first quarter to date, so we presume it hasn’t purchased stock so far this year either,” Greff wrote in a note to investors after results were released.
 The purchase also carries a $2 billion breakup fee.
 capital sold before completion were purchased by southeast Asian buyers, Land Securities Group Plc said last year.
 Blackstone, the world’s biggest manager of alternative assets, struck the agreement with Senator, its first such investment, as it seeks to raise $3 billion for similar purchases.
 Fund Competition Blackstone, which last year hired Anthony Maniscalco to help purchase positions in hedge funds, competes with firms such as Affiliated Managers Group Inc, sovereign-wealth fund Dubai International Capital LLC and Neuberger Berman Group LLC Neuberger in June bought a minority stake in New York fund Capstone Investment Advisors LLC.
 Goldman Sachs’s investments in London-based Winton Capital Management LLC and Capula Investment Management LLP paid off, with assets at least tripling since the New York bank made its purchases.
 Level Global Investors LP closed a year after Petershill’s purchase, following a 2010 Federal Bureau of Investigation raid tied to the US.
 The purchase of the vineyard, a neighbor of top-ranked Sauternes grower Chateau d’Yquem, comes 30 years after GDF Suez acquired the property, investing since then in technical improvements to the winery and the restoration of the chateau.
 He signed legislation mandating background checks on firearm purchases and a ban on assault weapons.
 Not every background check leads to a gun sale, and a single background check may be used for multiple purchases.
 Starr teamed up with Partners Group AG of Switzerland to purchase New York-based MultiPlan from BC Partners Holdings Ltd.
 The purchase price is about $44 billion, according to three people with knowledge of the transaction who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 The two private equity firms purchased MultiPlan for about 25 billion euros ($34 billion) in 2010, two of the people said.
 Rich Tauberman, a spokesman for Starr, and Silver Lake spokeswoman Gemma Hart declined to comment on the purchase price.
 The hotel operator, based in Horley, England, will purchase the 34-story tower from funds affiliated with Apollo Global Management LLC and Chartres Lodging Group, Millennium & Copthorne said today in a statement.
 Europe’s second-largest maker of car parts expects the purchase of Fairlawn, Ohio-based Veyance to boost profit of its ContiTech unit immediately upon completion, Hanover, Germany-based Continental said today in a statement.
 The Fed slowed its debt purchases under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy to $65 billion over the past two months, from 2013’s $85 billion, sticking to its plan for a gradual withdrawal as the economy progresses.
 Policy makers reduced the bank’s monthly asset purchases to $65 billion at the gathering, citing improvements in the labor market and economic growth.
 The deal consists of 30 new orders and swapping an existing purchase of eight 737 NG jets for the upgraded Max model, said the people, who asked not to be identified as discussions are private.
 The company didn’t specify how much stock-repurchase authority was left on a $75 billion buyback announced in February 2013.
 3M’s move built on a 35 percent dividend increase announced in December, when the company said it would spend as much as $10 billion on acquisitions through 2017 and repurchase as much as $22 billion of shares.
 Securities and Exchange Commission that it purchased 23 million shares of Boise, Idaho-based Micron, a maker of memory chips, in the third quarter.
 The dynamic is beneficial for investors as higher rates reduce how many consumers can benefit by refinancing, boosting the share of purchase loans in pools backing non-agency bonds, Moody’s said.
 The average share of purchase loans in deals by Redwood Trust Inc, the most active issuer since the market restarted in 2010, rose to 54 percent in the second half of 2013, from 26 percent in the previous six months, according to the report.
 Credit Quality While purchase mortgages are generally given to borrowers with higher credit scores, that doesn’t fully explain their better historical performance, Moody’s said.
 Lenders also “have typically subjected purchase obligors to more stringent credit reviews and property valuations since purchase borrowers have no history of residing in the home,” the firm said in its report.
 One type of purchase mortgages guaranteed by Freddie Mac in 2005 carried a five-year default probability of 17 percent, compared with 27 percent for similar refinance loans not used to extract cash from home equity, according to Moody’s.
 The industry will boost rhodium purchases by 45 percent this year, according to Deutsche Bank.
 An ounce of rhodium purchases 146 ounces of palladium, up from 121 in December that was the lowest since May 2000.
 BNP Paribas SA was among lenders that provided 197 billion euros of loans to finance Wendel’s purchase of Materis in 2006, Bloomberg data show.
 The company used “available liquidity” to fund the purchase of Pershing Square’s shares, according to General Growth’s Feb.
 Bank’s purchase of Eddie Bauer is based on an enterprise value of $825 million, including $564 million in cash, the Hampstead, Maryland-based company said today in a statement.
 The purchase will probably add to Jos.
 Bank said the purchase price represents a multiple of 95 times 2013 estimated adjusted Ebitda, including $25 million of potential synergies.
 The total value of the stock purchase will be as much as $300 million.
 Google is writing bigger checks and last month purchased digital thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 Coca-Cola’s $125 billion purchase of the Green Mountain stake shored up confidence in the market for home soda machines, according to Anton Brenner, an analyst at Roth Capital Partners LLC, wrote in a Feb.
 Much of that stemmed from mortgage-related liabilities they inherited when Bank of America bought Countrywide Financial Corp, and JPMorgan purchased Bear Stearns Cos.
 Another cautionary tale arose in August 2012, as regulators began reviewing M&T’s proposed $37 billion purchase of Hudson City, now the biggest pending US.
 That includes minority purchases, asset sales and joint ventures in which dollar figures were released.
 13 interview, referring generally to purchases by regional banks.
 In November, Take-Two said it repurchased all shares held by activist investor Carl Icahn, ending his four-year involvement with the company.
 The seven-day repurchase rate jumped to a record 1077 percent on June 20 and averaged 409 percent last year, from 350 percent in 2012.
 Deutsche Boerse is setting its sights on Asia after the European Commission blocked its purchase of NYSE Euronext, owner of the New York Stock Exchange and London’s Liffe futures market, in 2012.
 ICE won an Asian trading and clearing license for derivatives with the purchase of Singapore Mercantile Exchange Pte.
 “You have to keep monitoring the appetite for the stock to see where it ends up pricing” Bancolombia closed its $22 billion deal for HSBC Holdings Plc’s Panama unit in October after completing the $217 million purchase of a stake in Guatemala’s Grupo Agromercantil Holding earlier in the month.
 labor market is strong enough that the Fed decided to taper purchases of Treasuries and mortgage securities to $65 billion from $75 billion this month, it said on Jan.
 The announcements completed a leadership transition, with Yellen becoming top policy maker as the Fed tries to wean financial markets off the bond-purchase program, which has pushed up central-bank assets to $41 trillion.
 The Fed reduced its monthly bond purchases to $65 billion from $85 billion during its last two meetings.
 It also wrote down 70 percent of the value of its A$39 billion ($35 billion) purchase of coal producer Riversdale Mining Ltd.
 Doug Ritchie, Rio’s head of strategy who led the purchase of the Mozambique coal company, stepped down at the same time as Albanese.
 The company will purchase as many as 95 million shares, or 74 percent of its outstanding stock, at 12,025 yen apiece from interested investors today, Kyoto, Japan-based Nintendo said in a statement after yesterday’s market close.
 Greenhill, will cross the billion-dollar mark later this year in terms of dividends and share repurchases since going public in 2004, he said.
 “We are focused on strengthening the squad,” Woodward said during a teleconference following the earnings announcement, adding that the club is “moving in the market in a way that perhaps we haven’t seen in recent years” The profit figure was adjusted for factors related to the club’s initial public offering in 2012, the repurchase of senior secured notes and other items, the company said today in a statement.
 SoftBank led a $153 billion bid for a majority stake in Finland-based Supercell Oy, a purchase aimed at strengthening content with games including “Clash of Clans” and “Hay Day” The also bought 57 percent of Miami-based handset distributor Brightstar for $126 billion, a transaction meant to boost SoftBank’s procurement power and improve its competitiveness both in the US.
 Eighty-nine percent of customers who complained to a company and were satisfied with the response were likely to make another purchase from the business, according to 2013 survey by TARP Worldwide, an Arlington, Virginia-based consulting firm.
 The Federal Reserve studies employment data to determine the timing and pace of reductions in bond purchases meant to boost the economy.
 Faults in the design or manufacture of one type of prisoner transport van existed when Serco purchased the vehicles in August 2011 but were not identified before the escape, the company said.
 have led it to cut reported 2010 revenue at the software maker’s largest unit by 54 percent, adding fuel to a legal dispute over its purchase of Autonomy.
 The computer maker, which bought Autonomy for $111 billion in 2011 and later took an $88 billion writedown on the purchase, also said it has shared information from its investigation with regulators in the US.
 Two purchases last month will hurt profit by $20 million this quarter, Groupon said yesterday after the markets closed.
 Last month, Groupon completed its purchase of South Korean e-commerce marketplace Ticket Monster Inc.
 The forecast showing the impact of the two purchases put a damper on Groupon’s fourth-quarter results, which exceeded analysts’ estimates with stronger mobile sales.
 The share repurchase plan is twice the size of the last last buyback program, which was announced in August 2012.
 5-6 meeting released today showed the nine-member Monetary Policy Committee agreed unanimously to keep the Official Bank Rate at an all-time low 05 percent and the asset purchase target at 375 billion pounds.
 “That’s my hope” ‘Shady Partner’ According to Peter Kurrild-Klitgaard, a professor of political science at the University of Copenhagen, popular opposition to Goldman’s Dong purchase was in part based on misunderstanding.
 The insurer approved the repurchase of as much as $25 billion in stock in the next 18 months, Northbrook, Illinois-based Allstate said yesterday in a statement.
 The acquisition, which will allow the oil and natural gas producer to add output from the Eagle Ford shale formation in Texas, follows its purchases in North Dakota’s Bakken and Three Forks shale formations.
 It recognized refining losses as the market in Europe soured and a goodwill expense was incurred from its purchase of Italy’s ISAB refinery.
 Emerging-market currencies had their worst start to a year since 2008 following a rout in Turkey’s lira and a devaluation in Argentina’s peso as the Federal Reserve pressed ahead with a plan to slow the pace of its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion.
 Russo is joining with two other attorneys from Herrick, including partner Gina Mavica, who represents lenders, borrowers, sellers, purchasers and investors in acquisitions, dispositions and financings.
 Yellen delivered her first public remarks as Fed chief as policy makers pursue plans to gradually scale back the unprecedented bond-purchase program she helped put in place.
 She repeated the Fed’s outlook for further reductions in “measured steps” and that asset purchases aren’t on a “pre-set course” The Federal Open Market Committee said in January it will cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, citing labor-market indicators that “were mixed but on balance showed further improvement” It bought $85 billion a month last year.
 The Micex Index advanced an average 77 percent during the Fed’s first two rounds of debt purchases, and fell 06 percent in periods of no stimulus, the biggest difference of 46 emerging and developed markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 The Micex Index advanced an average 77 percent during the Fed’s first two rounds of debt purchases, and fell 06 percent in periods of no stimulus, the biggest difference of 46 emerging and developed markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 He said he is trying to purchase residential real estate in Miami right now.
 The firm has also bought office properties in Pittsburgh and Boston, multifamily residences in Texas and some industrial buildings for clients, and is looking for more opportunities this year in real estate purchases or lending, he said.
 Hewlett-Packard this month said accounting errors at Autonomy have led it to cut reported 2010 revenue at the software maker’s largest unit by 54 percent, adding fuel to the legal dispute over its purchase of Autonomy.
 Equities erased gains that sent the S&P 500 up as much as 04 percent today as Dallas Fed President Richard Fisher said it’s hard to argue that further expansion of central bank balance sheet has had “much efficacy” “This is why I’ve been such a strong proponent of dialing back our large-scale asset purchases and will continue advocating that we do so,” Fisher said in text of speech in Austin, Texas.
 The firm is committing more than $1 billion of equity to its $415 billion buyout of Johnson & Johnson’s blood diagnostics unit, just under $1 billion to its $32 billion acquisition of Illinois Tool Works Inc’s industrial-packaging business and $400 million to its purchase of a minority stake in hair-products maker Vogue International, he said on the call.
 The legislation also funds consumer purchases at Kroger Co.
 The Comcast purchase values each Time Warner Cable share at $15882, or 17 percent more than its closing price yesterday.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, drew from the ranks of Google Inc.
 The proposed purchase will be backed by 12 billion euros of debt, including 920 million euros of three- and five-year term loans, two people familiar with the transaction said.
 The Fed slowed its monthly debt purchases to $65 billion over the past two months from 2013’s $85 billion, sticking to its plan for a gradual withdrawal as the economy progresses.
 29 it will continue to pare monthly bond purchases, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 stocks and corporate bonds, while China and Japan reduced holdings of Treasuries in the month the Fed decided to trim monthly asset purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion.
 It was the most active buyer of drug companies over the past three years, making $144 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “If you can’t do a large amount of R&D, there’s only one way to grow and that’s through M&A” New Balance With a purchase of Forest, Actavis will add the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda and blood-pressure pill Bystolic to its product lineup.
 Our board felt this was in the best interest of our shareholders” Investors Favorable The purchase fits with Actavis’s desire to expand in branded pharmaceuticals and become less focused on generics, said David Maris, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets in New York.
 Still, Maris said he wasn’t convinced the purchase makes strategic sense because Actavis’s financial outlook is already solid and overseeing the integration will be difficult, Maris said.
 Last year, it purchased Warner Chilcott Plc for $92 billion including net debt in a deal that enabled the company to expand in women’s health and urology.
 That purchase gave the company an Irish corporate domicile that lowered its tax rate to 17 percent from 37 percent.
 17 amid weaker Chinese economic data, reduced Federal Reserve bond purchases and a drop in emerging-market currencies.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Shoppers may soon be able to make purchases using Bitcoins in an unlikely place: the thrift store.
 The greenback climbed versus all 31 major peers except the yen as the Federal Reserve scaled back monthly bond purchases a second time, citing labor-market improvements.
 The central bank had been forecast to continue reducing purchases by $10 billion at this meeting and each one following to end the stimulus program this year, according to analysts in a Jan.
 Alibaba, formed by billionaire Jack Ma in 1999, owns 283 percent of AutoNavi’s shares and intends to pay for the potential purchase with cash on hand.
 The purchase values each Time Warner Cable share at $15882, or 17 percent more than its closing price Feb.
 “It would’ve been a huge headache if it fell apart” For Bank of America, the settlement is part of Chief Executive Officer Brian Moynihan’s efforts to resolve liabilities tied to faulty mortgages that have cost the company at least $50 billion since the financial crisis, most inherited from its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 Triaxx funds lawyers argued that the trustee failed to investigate about $31 billion in modified mortgage repurchase claims.
 There’s no evidence to suggest that the language in the agreements doesn’t require the repurchase of modified loans, and the trustee could have hired an expert to examine the provisions that address the buyback of such loans, the judge said.
 Redmond, Washington-based Microsoft, the world’s largest software maker, is aiming to complete its purchase of Nokia’s handset unit this quarter.
 and funds purchases at Kroger Co.
 The purchase marked Ambani’s return to the telecommunications industry after he handed over a phone business to his younger brother Anil Ambani in 2005, when they split the group founded by their father.
 He was closely involved with Reliance’s first phone venture that started in December 2002 and the purchase of undersea fiber-optic cable operator Flag Telecom Group Ltd.
 The Micex Index advanced an average 77 percent during the Fed’s first two rounds of debt purchases, and fell 06 percent in periods of no stimulus, the biggest difference of 46 emerging and developed markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 on its planned purchase of Israel’s Tnuva Food Industries Ltd, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 The auction cuts mean utilities will have to purchase about 14 billion tons of allowances more than governments plan to sell through 2018, equivalent to 75 percent of the region’s annual supply, said New Energy.
 He said he’s limited his recent investments in the country to the purchase of shares in a bank.
 A pickup in job and wage growth following a decline in dismissals would provide an added spark for consumers whose purchases account for almost 70 percent of the economy.
 Viking bought about 4 million shares of Calgary-based Canadian Pacific, valued at $613 million, making it the fund’s largest new purchase after Walgreen.
 The purchase of the stake, valued at about 75 million euros ($103 million), confirms Suez Environnement’s “commitment to investing in Italy,” it said.
 The purchase is part of Suez Environnement’s strategy to build a “third pillar” in the European water industry after France and Spain, it said today.
 And while a T-Mobile purchase would let Son unite the third- and fourth-largest US.
 SoftBank has entered into direct talks with T-Mobile owner Deutsche Telekom AG about resolving obstacles to a potential purchase, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 Moody’s Investors Service and Standard & Poor’s cut SoftBank to junk in July after the Sprint purchase.
 Today’s move is part of a redesign that makes more space for “featured listing” advertisements purchased by developers and brokers.
 Shopping Spree Volatility is yet to ripple out to Asia’s loan market as companies seek growth via both organic expansion and foreign purchases, said Sodhi.
 30, shortly after it unveiled its plan to purchase International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business for $23 billion on Jan.
 Cnooc inked a $6 billion bridge loan last February as part of its purchase of Canadian oil-sand operator Nexen Inc, and a $3 billion two-part loan in September, the data show.
 central bank said in December it would start reducing the monthly pace of asset purchases, citing progress toward its goal of full employment.
 Partners Stewart Baker, a former senior official at Homeland Security, and Stephen Heifetz, who served in the Justice Department, Homeland Security and the CIA, are advising China’s Lenovo on its purchase of Motorola Mobility.
 Lenovo’s Experience Lenovo’s effort to win approval for the two deals will benefit from the fact that it previously went through a CFIUS review with its purchase of IBM’s personal-computer business, said Stephen Paul Mahinka, a lawyer at Morgan, Lewis & Bockius LLP.
 Huawei in 2011 unwound the purchase of patents from a computer-services company, 3Leaf Systems Inc, after US.
 Lenovo’s purchase of IBM’s PC business has already been vetted by US.
 To improve its results, the company has tried to keep a lid on expenses and is seeking online acquisitions, such as its purchase of digital-news startup Storyful last year.
 Tepco also cut staff and deferred repair work to keep its expenses from ballooning due to the increased fossil fuel purchases from abroad amid a depreciating Japanese currency, the utility said.
 These include slashing fuel costs by 650 billion yen a year and setting up a joint venture with other utilities to purchase as much as 40 million metric tons of liquefied natural gas a year.
 Last year the company invested $150 million, including the purchase of Gtel Comunicaciones SAPI, a smaller Mexican company with a similar business model, and the construction of the 780 million-peso ($59 million) data center in Queretaro.
 Alestra and Axtel have met several times to discuss a purchase, and while Alestra remains interested, it has no imminent plans to buy the company, said the person with knowledge of the negotiations.
 Alestra’s interest grew after Axtel’s 2006 purchase of Avantel SA, a long-distance carrier with an extensive network, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the information is confidential.
Venezuela Oil Minister Rafael Ramirez said negotiations to finalize Pluspetrol ResourcesCorp’s purchase of an 80 percent stake in Harvest NaturalResources Inc’s Petrodelta are moving forward.
 16 that it hadagreed to sell the Petrodelta stake to Argentina’s Pluspetrolfor $400 million in cash, with the purchaser acquiring the stakein two transactions.
 Bank of America’s “force-placed insurance policies cost substantially more than comparable policies that could be purchased on the open market,” plaintiffs said in a complaint filed in July 2012.
 4 as investors speculated the Federal Reserve may delay a third cut to its bond purchases.
 'They never made that money back'" Citing additional research, Lowrey noted, “For the first time in modern memory, a whole generation might not prove wealthier than the one that preceded it" In April, Sarah Ayres of the liberal Center for American Progress attached numbers to the phenomenon: “We estimate that the nearly 1 million young Americans who experienced long-term unemployment during the worst of the recession will lose more than $20 billion in earnings over the next 10 years” But as Weissmann and Derek Thompson noted in the Atlantic in August 2012, while the recession is partly to blame for a decrease in home and car purchases, “It’s highly possible that a perfect storm of economic and demographic factors -- from high gas prices, to re-­urbanization, to stagnating wages, to new technologies enabling a different kind of consumption -- has fundamentally changed the game for Millennials” A lack of wealth -- combined with cultural change and technological advancements -- is bound to affect life-courses and may well narrow, or re-route, the options of many.
 The Fed this week said it will reduce purchases by another $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to a plan for a gradual withdrawal from its unprecedented monetary easing.
 While analysts and investors predict rates on developed-market bonds will rise as the Federal Reserve pares asset purchases, some say demand from pension funds will limit the increase.
 Federal Open Market Committee officials have twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, lowering bond buying to $65 billion in February from $85 billion last year.
 The buyer is a Beijing advertising company, according to a Hong Kong stock exchange filing from Birmingham yesterday, which gave the purchaser’s name in only Chinese.
 television market by Nielsen, is also relatively affordable for advertising purchases compared with other places.
 DB Secondary Opportunities Fund III LP, which the firm is raising less than a year after completing gathering money for its predecessor, will purchase stakes at a discount in funds that have invested a substantial amount of capital, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 in its purchase of Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility phone unit for $291 billion.
 and a senior Nabisco executive in the book “Barbarians,” by Bryan Burrough and John Helyar, which described the $30 billion purchase of RJR Nabisco in 1988, detailing the egos and back-room dealings that went on at the time.
 ConAgra, InBev Effron worked on ConAgra Foods Inc’s purchase of Ralcorp Holdings for $5 billion, and advised HJ.
 Sumitomo Mitsui is in talks with operators of homes for the elderly after it established in October a company that will purchase the properties, said Nobuaki Oishi, senior vice president of financial solutions at the Tokyo-based bank.
 Sherwin purchased only the US.
 Puma made three acquisitions in the country last year including a deal to become the nation’s largest independent fuel retailer with the purchase of Ausfuel.
 That’s been cushioned by higher profits from backing mortgages used to purchase homes, he said.
 Higher Margins “The purchase market is doing fine,” McInerney said.
 “And we do earn significantly higher margins on new purchase mortgages than we do on refinancing” Shares of Radian and Richmond, Virginia-based Genworth more than doubled last year as investors bet on a housing recovery.
 Imports rose 03 percent to $230 billion in December, reflecting increasing purchases of crude oil and consumer goods such as mobile phones.
 In 2012, the government chose Dassault Aviation SA to supply at least 126 Rafale combat planes after initiating the purchase plan about five years earlier.
 Norms for mandatory local purchases by overseas suppliers were also relaxed, according to the Ministry of Defense.
 The company used “available liquidity” to fund the purchase of Pershing Square’s shares, according to yesterday’s statement.
 The offer requires no contract, and phones must be purchased at full price either up front or in installments.
 Ministry of Defence has reduced by 65 percent a gap between the 164 billion pounds ($272 billion) planned for equipment purchases over 10 years and available funds, though a risk of cost overruns remains, the National Audit Office said.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Gol Linhas Aereas Inteligentes SA, Brazil’s second-biggest air carrier by market share, advanced to a four-week high after Air France-KLM agreed to purchase a stake in the company.
 Tapering Hungary’s currency plunged as the Federal Reserve continued trimming its bond purchases, triggering an investor retreat from emerging markets.
 A decision on the purchase may be taken by the end of first half of this year, the person said.
 new-home purchases jumped 16 percent in the period, the most in five years, while the S&P/Case-Shiller index of property prices in 20 American cities climbed 14 percent in November from a year earlier.
 Benchmark 10-year yields reached the least in 12 weeks as growth slowed in China and Russia and as central banks in India, Turkey and South Africa sought to stem capital outflows, as the Federal Reserve cut bond purchases.
 29 that it will cut its purchases of Treasury and mortgage debt to $65 billion a month starting in February from $75 billion.
 Wider moves are most evident when shares are posting the biggest retreats, an effect that may reflect purchases of volatility futures by traders who had previously sold them short, according to Maneesh S.
 and Saudi Arabia agreed on pricing terms in the so-called Salam contract to purchase 72 Typhoon jets, padding earnings.
 and Saudi Arabia are in talks about a potential follow-on purchase of Typhoon aircraft.
 Malaysian Lease BAE said it will submit a proposal next month to Malaysia for the lease of Typhoons with a purchase options in a program also contested by other planemakers.
 also have contracts to purchase gas from Cheniere.
 economy can withstand reduced monthly bond purchases.
 Vodafone has contacted Madrid-based ONO’s main shareholders about a possible purchase, said the people, asking not to be named because the matter is private.
 ONO is one of Europe’s few remaining major cable assets following Vodafone’s acquisition of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG and Liberty Global Plc’s purchase of Virgin Media Inc.
 “There seems to be a hyper-sensitivity to any issue that might be viewed as contentious, such as fair lending or hot-button issues such as bank secrecy” Investors Bancorp Inc, based in Short Hills, New Jersey, completed its purchase of Roma Financial Corp.
 The purchase price for Canada Bread Co.
 “We expect negative reactions for Bimbo due to this leveraged purchased, especially given the moment of the market and the conditions that are still hindering their last acquisitions in the US,” Gaspar Quijano, senior analyst at Vector Casa de Bolsa SA, said today in a research report.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Pablo Salame, co-head of Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s trading division, said the surprise of 2013 was that Federal Reserve tapering of bond purchases didn’t cause the collapse of any market participants.
 Signs the Fed could curtail its $85 billion of monthly purchases helped push the yield on 10-year Treasuries from 163 percent in May to about 3 percent in September.
 Carry trades, in which investors buy long-dated bonds and finance those purchases with short-term borrowing, are probably increasing with a steeper yield curve, he said.
 Shoppers may pick up the pace of purchases after the weather improves, other figures today indicated.
 More clarity may not come before March 19, when Fed policy makers decide whether to continue scaling back their unprecedented bond-purchase program.
 29 it would further trim its monthly purchases amid optimism that US.
 11 testimony at the House Financial Service Committee, affirmed the central bank’s strategy of paring purchases in “measured steps” Fed officials have to be careful not to jump to conclusions in interpreting recent weak jobs reports, Yellen said.
 Ethiopian Air is Africa’s second-largest carrier and has embarked on a modernization under Chief Executive Officer Tewolde GebreMariam, including the purchase of Boeing 787 Dreamliners and the order of 14 A350s, as well as a more extensive network that stretches as far as China.
 completed the $12 billion purchase of Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s plane-leasing unit.
 Other Sports “This is a very esoteric sport, not an event your average weekend jock follows closely, or bases their equipment purchases upon,” Dorfman said in an e-mail interview.
 Canadian Natural will purchase the assets from Devon Energy in a deal worth C$313 billion ($286 billion).
 The purchase will add production near Canadian Natural’s fields in western Canada, the company said today in a statement.
 “Almost every company in the universe is telling us that” Stock Buybacks To keep investors happy, Coca-Cola should return more cash to shareholders by way of share repurchases and higher dividends, Russo said.
 He expects the company to repurchase between $25 billion and $3 billion of its stock this year, less than the $35 billion worth bought back in 2013.
 While Boeing and Airbus Group NV have amassed record order books, investors and analysts are paying closer attention to large purchases planned by upstart carriers and questioning whether the aerospace market is headed for a correction after four years of growth.
 Asian Orders While the large volume of orders headed for Asia may test that prowess, so far there are no signs that airlines have overindulged on new jet purchases, said Steve Rimmer, chief executive officer of Guggenheim Aviation Partners LLC, at the Pacific Northwest Aerospace Alliance conference yesterday in Lynnwood, Washington.
 Since 2007, central bank assets around the world have almost doubled to $205 trillion under asset-purchase programs designed to boost growth and prices, according to a June report from the Bank for International Settlements.
 Living Expenses While countries that issued linkers benefited by lowering their debt costs, investors in the bonds suffered unprecedented losses last year as price pressures from central bank stimulus dissipated, signs of disinflation emerged and the Fed moved to curtail its bond purchases.
 Fertilizer buyers were delaying purchases because of concern that prices would continue to decline, Prokopanko said in September.
 “Disruptions in the credit markets could affect future refinancing” Issuance this year will be led by mergers and acquisitions and dividends and share repurchases, compared with the predominance of refinancing-based offerings last year, according to Moody’s.
 investors would rather have a buyback than a dividend” No decisions have been reached on the amount of a stock-repurchase plan, and a buyback wouldn’t necessarily rule out a dividend boost, Harrison said.
 A 3 percent repurchase program would cost about C$904 million, based on yesterday’s closing price and 1755 million shares outstanding, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Fed Stimulus The Fed has already decided to slow the pace of its asset-purchase program twice, reducing its monthly buying of bonds to $65 billion from $85 billion.
 Bernanke, policy makers reduced the bank’s monthly asset purchases to $65 billion, citing the improved outlook for the labor market.
 The carrier also has an option to purchase 50 other planes, which may extend the deal’s value to $588 billion.
 “We’re in a situation where the national figures for house prices are substantially influenced by the south east, London” The EY Item Club said this month that London’s housing market is beginning to show “bubble-like conditions” The Institute for Fiscal Studies says the government’s Help to Buy program to aid first-time purchasers get on the property ladder risks driving prices higher.
 ICE Chief Executive Officer Sprecher won an Asian trading and clearing license for derivatives with the purchase of Singapore Mercantile Exchange Pte.
 That includes $131 million of costs related to the NYSE Euronext purchase and a $190 million charge on the devaluation of the Brazilian real related to its investment in Rio de Janeiro-based Cetip SA.
 Sprecher completed the purchase of NYSE Euronext on Nov.
 The $150 million purchase of Singapore Mercantile Exchange closed Feb.
 It gained access to Europe through its 2012 purchase of the London Metal Exchange.
 Bernanke -- policy makers reduced the bank’s monthly asset purchases to $65 billion, citing the improved outlook for the labor market.
 The drop in retail sales amid inclement weather came as the Federal Reserve plans to keep reducing bond purchases.
 Bidder Participation Indirect bidders, a category of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 453 percent of the bonds at the offering, versus 444 percent at the January sale and an average at the past 10 offerings of 396 percent.
 Fed Purchases The central bank cut its purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt to $65 billion a month from $85 billion last year, citing economic improvement.
 The products are becoming more popular as the Fed keeps its short-term benchmark rate no higher than 025 percent while trimming purchases of longer-maturity securities.
 The Fed in December announced a $10 billion reduction in its monthly asset purchases, followed by a cut of the same size in January, to $65 billion.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury 10-year notes headed for their first weekly decline this year on speculation a jobs report today will encourage the Federal Reserve to keep reducing its bond purchases.
 ‘Foregone Conclusion’ The Federal Open Market Committee cut purchases of Treasury and mortgage debt in January and again in February to $65 billion a month from $85 billion, citing an improving outlook for the labor market.
 “We’ve got an FOMC board that’s more hawkish than it has been under the Bernanke administration” The Fed will end its asset-purchase program by the third quarter, when 10-year Treasury yields will approach 325 percent, according to Loh.
 19 after minutes from the Fed’s last policy meeting showed “several” policy makers agreed that, in “the absence of an appreciable change in the economic outlook, there should be a clear presumption in favor of continuing to reduce the pace” of the Fed’s bond purchases.
 The Facebook acquisition was the latest major deal this year, with Comcast Corp’s $452 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 While Nordea always keeps its “eyes open” in its existing markets, “it is unlikely” the bank will make any purchases in Denmark, Clausen said.
 The bank had 141 percent at the end of December, leaving it with about 900 million kroner ($165 million) in cash for purchases, Nyby said.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries dropped for a second day amid bets that weaker-than-forecast economic data this week resulted from harsh winter weather and won’t keep the Federal Reserve from reducing bond purchases further.
 Minutes of the session released yesterday said several officials favored cutting purchases by $10 billion at each meeting.
 The Fed purchased $266 billion in Treasuries today maturing from February 2022 to November 2023.
 Policy makers reiterated last month they expect “a highly accommodative stance of monetary policy will remain appropriate for a considerable time after the asset purchase program ends and the economic recovery strengthens” Unemployment Claims Jobless claims declined to 336,000 in the week ended Feb.
 In December, for example, Italy passed a measure that requires Italian companies to purchase their Internet ads from local companies.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Seven hedge funds sued Wolfgang Porsche and Ferdinand Piech, members of Porsche Automobil Holding SE’s supervisory board, seeking 18 billion euros ($24 billion) of compensation over the aborted purchase of Volkswagen AG in 2008.
 Retail sales in the same month declined for the first time in 10 months on a drop in purchases from auto parts to furniture and appliances.
 6 that it had agreed “to put an indefinite hold” on its plans to purchase servicing rights on $39 billion of loans without government backing from Wells Fargo & Co.
 Barclays Plc and Morgan Stanley managed its bond sale, which was expected to offer cash for the company to finance or refinance purchases or originations of servicing rights, the person said.
 It “likely will be appropriate” to hold the target rate near zero “well past the time that the unemployment rate declines below 65 percent, especially if projected inflation continues to run below the committee’s 2 percent longer-run goal,” the Fed said in a statement after the January meeting, while deciding to trim monthly bond purchases to $65 billion from $75 billion.
 Through the accesses from London on October 23, 2012, 20,000 shares of Titanium were purchased for the Individual A Account.
 In the US, a National Association of Realtors report showed that purchases of previously owned homes fell 51 percent in January to a 462 million annual pace.
 merchants typically pay fees totaling about 2 percent of the purchase price for credit-card transactions.
 in December, adding to several other purchases in the industry last year, and bought DeepMind Technologies Ltd, a London-based artificial intelligence developer, in January.
 The Micex Index advanced an average 77 percent during the Fed’s first two rounds of debt purchases, and fell 06 percent in periods of no stimulus, the biggest difference of 46 emerging and developed markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 Equities retreated after China’s central bank sold repurchase contracts for the first time since June as money-market rates sank to the lowest levels in at least three months.
 Lower crop prices will make farmland less attractive to investors and discourage farmers from seeking financing, which may hurt purchases throughout rural areas, Nathan Kauffman, an economist with the Kansas City Fed, said in an interview last week.
 The purchase is the western extension of the Roughrider project that Rio Tinto gained from its takeover of Hathor Exploration Ltd.
 Utilities first need to sign new purchase contracts, which may send uranium to $70 a pound, he said.
 “I’m committed to this league, and I’ve been committed to this sport for many years” Beckham had a clause in his 2007 player contract with the Los Angeles Galaxy that allowed him to purchase an expansion team for a reduced price of $25 million, according to the Miami Herald.
 The New York City Football Club, by comparison, which will join the league next year, was purchased for a $100 million expansion fee.
 Bernanke said the central bank would scale back its asset purchases if US.
 The Asian country is testing direct subsidies to growers that will erode state purchases, with prices headed to the mid-70 cents in the second half of 2014, Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Samuel Valette, a Sotheby’s senior international specialist, purchased it for a client.
 Stocks sank as data showed home purchases tumbled last year to a four-year low and retail sales dropped, while manufacturing growth weakened in China, Singapore’s biggest export market.
 Stagnant land prices will cut farmer purchases of equipment and production material, and farmers will need to guard against borrowing beyond their means, Henderson said.
 The Fed has already decided to slow the pace of its asset-purchase program twice, reducing its monthly buying of bonds to $65 billion from $85 billion in 2013.
 Siam Commercial Bank Pcl, the nation’s biggest lender by market value, denied a rumor “circulated online and on social networks” that it was considering providing the government with a credit facility to help finance rice purchases.
 Concern that state-run lenders would be asked to help finance rice purchases prompted customers of the Government Savings Bank to pull 20 billion baht ($616 million) from accounts Feb.
 purchased software-maker i2 Ltd.
 Bank has signed nondisclosure agreements related to purchases of other companies.
 Net income increased 36 percent to 114 billion rubles, driven by online advertising and virtual purchases.
 Wheeler’s proposal will go beyond Sinclair’s attempts to add sharing arrangements as part of a $985 million purchase of Allbritton family stations, the people said.
 ‘Uninformed Views’ In Sinclair’s Allbritton deal, station combinations proposed in the market areas of Charleston, South Carolina; Harrisburg, Pennsylvania and Birmingham, Alabama, would violate FCC rules, Barbara Kreisman, chief of the video division of the agency’s media bureau that vets station purchases, said in letters to Sinclair’s attorney.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury 10-year note yields rose from the lowest level in more than a week as minutes of the Federal Reserve’s last meeting signaled little likelihood of a pause in the central bank’s reduction of bond purchases.
 The central bank decided at the session to reduce purchases to $65 billion a month, from $75 billion, in the second straight $10 billion cut.
 Taper Outlook As long as the outlook “remains solid” and “does not deviate dramatically,” the Fed’s tapering of bond purchases should continue over the rest of year and end in the fourth quarter, said Lockhart of the Atlanta Fed.
 The purchases were designed to cap long-term borrowing costs and fuel economic growth.
 It has resorted to purchases and partnerships, winning an auction for Brazil’s Libra field in October and buying a stake in gas discoveries in Papua New Guinea in December.
 Including customers Sprint acquired in its purchase of US.
 Possible buyers, including an unnamed hotel chain, are in talks to purchase parcels that should start generating cash in three to six months, Karahan said.
 ADM, Bunge Bunge Ltd, which purchased a port terminal in the country in 2011, didn’t respond to voicemails and e-mails requesting comment on their Ukrainian operations.
 Yields on the benchmark securities reached a two-week high as Fed Chairman Janet Yellen said only a “notable change” in economic prospects would prompt a slowing in the pace of purchase reductions.
 “Unless something changes in a meaningful way, they’re probably going to taper $10 billion a meeting and be done with it, and then the conversation moves to the first rate hike” The central bank cut its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt to $65 billion on Jan.
 To do this, they "expect to purchase the common shares over a five trading day period immediately following the pricing of the Convertible Notes" I have created a diagram-like object that sort of works if you don't think too hard about it: Can you guess what I used to draw this? I'll give you a hint: Never use it to draw things.
 Unlike a lot of theorized share purchase transactions -- Carl Icahn doing a tender offer, for instance, or William Stiritz doing a leveraged buyout, or even just Herbalife buying back a whole lot of shares on the open market -- this transaction doesn't actually reduce the number of shares that are physically outstanding11 And while those sorts of transactions would make stock borrow more expensive and squeeze short sellers, this one won't.
 Lawyers worry about share repurchase transactions where the issuer goes bankrupt: If BofA Merrill has $145 million of Herbalife's money (1/4 of this deal) and owes Herbalife 23 million shares, and Herbalife goes bankrupt and those shares become worth $0, will a court just say "okay, hand over the worthless shares"? Or will it find some way to conclude that Herbalife was insolvent at the time of repurchase and demand the $145 million back? The fact that these underwriters are doing the share repurchase is a vote of confidence in Herbalife's financial viability.
 The thing in the text that is most likely to be wrong is that the forward repurchase could be for as much as for the full 12 million shares.
 According to yesterday’s filing, Discovery CEO David Zaslav has the exclusive right to negotiate to purchase Malone’s 59 million Class B shares if he determines to sell them, as long as he is employed by Discovery Communications.
 The purchase is “speculative,” given that Amedeo hasn’t yet lined up any airlines to take the planes, Lapidus said.
 Profit excluding purchases and divestitures was 62 cents a share, CH.
 28-29 meeting at which the Federal Open Market Committee announced a $10 billion reduction in monthly bond purchases to $65 billion, citing improvement in the labor market and a pickup in growth.
 3, reiterated her support for taking “measured steps” in tapering Fed purchases in Feb.
 Companies need to report to the regulator when liquid assets drop below 5 percent of total assets, or interbank borrowing and bond repurchases surpass a combined 20 percent of their assets, the CIRC said.
 That would come on top of the $195 million in stock repurchased last year and represents about 22 percent of the total outstanding shares, based on the company’s current market value of $162 billion.
 The company, under pressure from activist investor Jana Partners LLC to generate more value for shareholders, has said it will return 75 percent to 100 percent of annual free cash flow to investors which in the near term would be in the form of share repurchases.
 agreed to purchase operations including two Georgia sawmills for $180 million from Ilim Timber Continental SA to expand in the US.
 International Forecast Products, the Vancouver-based company known as Interfor, said its annual capacity to produce lumber will increase by about 20 percent with the purchase of Tolleson Ilim Lumber Co.
 The unit expects to purchase assets from money managers or financial institutions to bolster its strategy, described in the filing as a “favorable alternative to passive index investing” Avenue is joining a growing number of debt investors that are seeking to diversify into other asset classes amid signs that the three-decade rally in bonds may be ending and as distressed opportunities in the US.
 Fadell, who oversaw development of Apple’s iPod, was a star attraction in Google’s $32 billion purchase of home-management startup Nest.
 The UBS real estate index comprises six sub-indicators tracking the relationships between purchase and rental prices, house prices and household income, house prices and inflation, mortgage debt and income, construction and GDP, and the proportion of credit applications by UBS clients for residential property not intended for owner occupancy.
 A firm owned by Guggenheim Partners LLC shareholders completed the purchase in August after agreeing to set up a trust account with $200 million to replenish capital if it fell below required levels.
 It’s as though it’s acceptable to miss deadlines” Unused Energy Consumers still have to pay for the unused energy even if wind farms remain unplugged because government contracts with developers guarantee minimum purchases.
 The company repurchased 10 million shares as of Feb.
 “But more than sparking a flurry of deals, I think this policy opens the door to spectrum trading as a more cost-efficient alternative” The rules allow carriers of third-generation, or 3G, spectrum, auctioned by the government in 2010, to exceed the 50 percent cap if the additional airwaves are acquired through trading or an outright purchase.
 Volkswagen has accumulated a 75 percent stake in MAN since 2006, when it first purchased a holding to thwart the German truckmaker’s effort to take over Scania.
 The amount spent in the first quarter is almost the same as the company spent on repurchases in 2013, CBS said.
 The figures don’t include purchases by other nations that are partners for the F-35.
 17 amid weaker Chinese economic data, reduced Federal Reserve bond purchases and a drop in emerging-market currencies.
 The French company acquired the business in 2007 with its 123 billion-euro purchase of Royal Numico NV.
 Metals Warehouses The trading company will try to reach an agreement with JPMorgan on the purchase of its physical commodities unit by the end of the month, one person said.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, climbed as much as 23 percent as analysts recommended buying the stock after the firm forecast a jump in small businesses that accept its products.
 Earlier this month, Lawksy indefinitely blocked Ocwen Financial Corp’s purchase of mortgage-servicing rights on about $39 billion in loans from Wells Fargo & Co.
 28 while unexpectedly raising the repurchase rate to 8 percent from 775 percent, the third increase since September.
 Mortgage banks’ repurchase agreements with the central bank more than doubled to exceed 200 billion kroner ($36 billion) in 2008 after lenders struggled to sell their bonds on the market, according to a government-commissioned study published in September.
 According to LightSquared, Ergen knew the company’s credit agreement barred competitors such as Dish from owning the debt and he blocked attempts to reveal who was behind the purchases.
 “It seems to me that whole body of law hasn’t been developed” A trial of LightSquared’s lawsuit may result in the company getting any profit Ergen’s fund made from the debt purchases, which would help in a standalone restructuring, a company lawyer said.
 Bafin, the Bonn-based watchdog, has no objections to the purchase, Brussels-based RHJ said in a regulatory statement today.
 The company will provide more information on the purchase, the performance of the business and cost savings when it announces full-year results on March 27, it said.
 SoftBank led a $153 billion bid for a majority stake in Finland-based Supercell Oy, a purchase aimed at strengthening content with games including “Clash of Clans” and “Hay Day” The also bought 57 percent of Miami-based handset distributor Brightstar for $126 billion, a transaction meant to boost SoftBank’s procurement power and improve its competitiveness both in the US.
 In 2007, Santander sold through its branches 7 billion euros of bonds that would mandatorily convert into its own stock to fund its purchase of ABN Amro NV’s Brazilian unit.
 RFR, founded by Rosen and partner Michael Fuchs in 1991, purchased the Seagram Building for $375 million in 2000.
 Dozens of relatives and family members packed the courtroom for yesterday’s proceedings Smith said Litvak’s customers used computer models to determine the best prices for the bonds they purchased and didn’t care about sales tactics.
 The purchase added Cow & Gate and other baby-food brands, as well as a division that makes foods for people with diets restricted by illness.
 “We look forward to the acquisition of the company and a path forward for the Delaware plant” China’s Promise Investors see hope for electric cars through Tesla’s success and China’s subsidies for electric-vehicle purchases.
 Meanwhile, the rise may boost purchases among the chain’s core shoppers, many of whom could see their earnings climb, he said.
 Even so, the debate about raising the minimum wage goes beyond the immediate lift it would provide to purchases, according to Joshua Shapiro, chief US.
 Huai River Investment Ltd, a wholly owned unit of Tencent, purchased new shares in Dianping Holdings Ltd, the Shenzhen, China-based company said yesterday, without specifying the value of the transaction.
 The Newbury, England-based business has argued it didn’t owe taxes on the purchase of Hutchison Whampoa’s local unit because the deal took place between two overseas companies, and the target asset was registered in the Cayman Islands.
 Microsoft is aiming to complete its 544 billion-euro ($74 billion) purchase of Nokia’s handset unit this quarter.
 Canada’s government will also shift funding for major defense purchases into the future, adding to other measures taken to reduce government operating budgets.
 Nestle, whose number of seats on L’Oreal’s board will drop to two from three, said it intends to use proceeds for a share-repurchase program.
 Some of the largest Spanish real estate deals have been done by New York-based Blackstone Group LP, which in July agreed to purchase 18 apartment blocks from the city of Madrid for 1255 million euros ($171 million).
 A week later, Hixon had a two-minute phone call with his father and purchased more shares, they said.
 said a potential purchase of Merck & Co’s consumer-health unit would strengthen the company’s portfolio.
 The purchase is valued at $850 million when taking into account cash acquired, including net cash proceeds of $170 million from the sale of ATMI’s LifeSciences business, Entegris said.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Business Wire, the distributor of press releases owned by Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, will stop letting high-speed trading firms purchase direct access to its service.
 to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases and a proxy-advisory firm criticized his efforts as micromanagement.
 The iPhone maker bought $14 billion of its own shares after reporting earnings last month, bringing its repurchases to more than $40 billion in the past year -- approaching Icahn’s demand that Apple repurchase $50 billion in shares in fiscal 2014.
 “We see no reason to persist with our nonbinding proposal, especially when the company is already so close to fulfilling our requested repurchase target,” Icahn said in a letter to Apple shareholders today.
 “We are pleased that Tim and the board have exhibited the ‘opportunistic’ and ‘aggressive’ approach to share repurchases that we hoped to instill with our proposal” ISS Recommendation Yesterday, proxy adviser Institutional Shareholder Services Inc.
 7, Icahn urged Apple CEO Cook to continue with the repurchases.
 central bank will trim its monthly bond purchases by a further $10 billion to $65 billion, cutting the pace of stimulus for a second straight meeting.
 The government is expected to sign long-term power-purchase agreements with the winning developers in the first week of April, Bridge to India Energy Pvt, a New Delhi-based solar consultancy, said in a note to clients.
 Birmingham International said Yeung has no disagreement with the board, which is “profoundly indebted” to him for his “foresight, aspiration and clairvoyance” in guiding the company through projects including the purchase of Birmingham City, according to the statement.
 Californians bought 171 million new autos last year, 11 percent of the 156 million purchased nationwide.
 approval in December for Sovaldi, the treatment for hepatitis C it acquired in its $11 billion purchase of Pharmasset Inc.
 Southwest agreed to purchase a bundle of Reagan slots that included rights for 27 daily round trips and the unwanted Sunday pair, which “we did not pay for,” Eichinger said.
 Nautilus Minerals plunged 10 percent to 225 Canadian cents after terminating its agreement with Papua New Guinea as the country has not completed purchase of its 30 percent stake in the offshore Solwara 1 project.
 soybeans, especially from China, the world’s largest importer, which boosted purchases by 32 percent since Sept.
 Verso was purchased by Apollo Global Management LLC for $16 billion in a leveraged buyout in 2006 and had $127 billion of total debt at the end of September, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The company’s $2 billion purchase of Chilean pension provider AFP Provida SA will add about $200 million to operating profit this year, MetLife said in December.
 The purchase added Cow & Gate and other baby-food brands, as well as a division that makes foods for people with diets restricted by illness.
 In September, Apollo’s European Principal Finance Fund II agreed to purchase EVO Banco, an 80-branch retail bank in Spain from NCG Banco SA, and this year it completed the purchase of Madrid-based Banco Santander SA’s non-performing real-estate loans and assets unit.
 Its purchase of Gulf Stream Asset Management, a Charlotte, North Carolina-based manager of collateralized loan obligations in 2011 added $3 billion of assets.
 The purchase brought Athene’s assets to $60 billion and Apollo will be steering a portion into its debt funds, according to a statement at the time.
 “The outlook for Athene to continue its growth is no longer nearly as robust” as before the Fed said it would taper its monthly bond purchases, sparking a rise in long-term interest rates, he said.
 Market Disruption “Removing T-Mobile from the market would substantially reduce the likelihood of market disruption by a maverick,” Sprint said in a 2011 filing asking the FCC to block AT&T’s proposed purchase of T-Mobile.
 It didn’t disclose how much it paid for the Exxon and Paloma purchases.
 Charlie Rexford, a spokesman for American Energy, confirmed today it was the purchaser.
 “This was the result of a strategy that has served us very well, not just last year, but for the past five years” Stock Buybacks The company added $5 billion to its stock repurchase fund, the most since 2007, after budgeting $4 billion a year for buybacks since 2011.
 The company repurchased $39 billion in shares in the 13 months through Jan.
 3 and is leading a gradual tapering of monthly bond purchases that have pushed the central bank’s balance sheet to $41 trillion.
 Mester, 55, may be especially concerned about long-run price stability, given that she served as top policy adviser to Philadelphia Fed President Charles Plosser, an opponent of bond purchases by the Fed, said Bob Eisenbeis, a former director of research at the Atlanta Fed.
 Meanwhile Felix Salmon and Matt Yglesias have thoughts about what the purchase of WhatsApp says about Facebook's governance.
 In December, customers purchased 908,000 Xbox Ones, beating out the PS4, Microsoft said in a Jan.
 Fed’s Lifeline Coupled with the bailout package of almost $1 trillion mostly from the European Union and unprecedented bond purchases by the European Central Bank, the swap lines showed the Fed’s willingness to step up as the world’s lender of last resort for dollars.
 The purchase of Apache assets in the Neuquen, Rio Negro and Tierra del Fuego provinces, is the largest by YPF since President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner seized a 51 percent stake from Spain’s Repsol SA in April 2012.
 The purchase will make YPF Argentina’s main gas producer and help reduce imports, Argentine Cabinet Chief Jorge Capitanich told reporters in Buenos Aires today.
(Corrects purchase price of home in 16th paragraph of story published Feb.
 “We’ve got a lot more room to appreciate here” Investor Purchases In Chicago, investors accounted for about 20 percent of purchases in the first half of last year, according to Geoff Smith, executive director of the Institute for Housing Studies at DePaul University in Chicago.
 Investor purchases play “a real role” in boosting the market, said Jim McClelland Jr, a partner and chief operating officer at MACK Cos, which owns about 1,100 rental units in the Chicago area, mainly in the south suburbs, 95 percent of which are single-family homes.
 Alexander Molyneux was appointed to succeed Neo as Blumont chairman pending the purchase of a stake in the company announced in October.
 While declining to comment on potential takeovers, he said his firm plans to tap its “operational expertise” after making purchases.
 “We expect there will be other special servicers that will take similar action to take advantage of investor demand, coupled with rising property valuations” Blackstone Purchases Blackstone yesterday completed two purchases totaling about $315 million of the third-and fourth-largest assets from the sale.
 The Los Angeles-based investor is set to take ownership later this year, according to a person briefed on the purchase, who asked not to be named because the transaction hasn’t been completed.
 Spreading Recovery Individually, the purchases from the CWCapital auction provide glimpses of the recoveries in cities beyond primary markets such as New York and San Francisco, where the rebound in real estate values has been the strongest.
 Starwood’s purchases in the auction include two office properties and one adjoining retail site in Orange, California.
 economy can withstand reduced monthly bond purchases.
 The deal “will put CNO in a better position to bolster its already robust share repurchase program” CNO announced in December it would buy back as much as $300 million in securities.
 Household purchases rose 32 percent at an annualized rate last quarter, the fastest pace in three years, a Commerce Department report showed last month.
 The country purchased 1077 million tons in 2012 and 1012 million in 2011, customs figures show.
 The utility will nearly double North American purchases of the fuel to 5 percent of its total, he said.
 Swellfun reassigned a sales team formerly catering mostly to state and state-related entities to focus on online purchases and selling to retail outlets such as Wal-Mart Stores Inc’s hypermarkets, Rice said.
 29 it will cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, paring a record stimulus plan that had fueled capital inflows into higher-yielding emerging markets.
 29 it will pare its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion from February, following a similar reduction in January.
 Fed Tapering “People are turning cautious because of the Fed’s resolve to continue to cut bond purchases,” said Saktiandi Supaat, head of foreign-exchange research at Malayan Banking Bhd.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Moody’s Corp, owner of the second-largest credit-ratings company, is seeking to purchase a majority stake in Indian grader ICRA Ltd, expanding its existing 285 percent position.
 credit grader, which first purchased a stake in ICRA in 1998, is making the offer on the condition it acquires enough to boost its ownership to more than 50 percent, it said in the statement.
 Investor purchases accounted for about one in five home sales last year, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 gained 47 percent as Carl Icahn backed away from his push to increase share repurchases at the iPhone maker.
 Activist investor Icahn dropped his campaign urging the company to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after Apple stepped up repurchases and a proxy-advisory firm criticized his efforts as micromanagement.
 Investors like AIG gain if the death benefit exceeds the purchase price and cost of maintaining a policy.
 Buffett, 83, purchased shares in the Post for about $11 million in 1973.
 Actavis was the most active buyer of drug companies over the past three years, making $144 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Last year, it purchased Warner Chilcott Plc for $92 billion including net debt in a deal that enabled the company to expand in women’s health and urology.
 That purchase gave the company an Irish corporate domicile that lowered its tax rate to 17 percent from 37 percent.
 With a purchase of Forest, Actavis would add the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda and blood-pressure pill Bystolic to its product lineup.
 The purchase fits with Actavis’s desire to expand in branded pharmaceuticals and become less focused on generics, said David Maris, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets in New York.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- China’s central bank sold repurchase contracts for the first time since June, draining funds from the banking system as money-market rates sink to the lowest levels in at least three months.
 The People’s Bank of China conducted 48 billion yuan ($79 billion) of 14-day repurchase contracts at 38 percent today, according to a statement posted on its website.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of funding availability in the banking system, fell eight basis points to 376 percent as of 5:02 pm.
 central bank has reduced its purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt to $65 billion a month, from $85 billion last year.
 The billionaire Icahn said in December he would seek a vote to push Apple to repurchase more stock and unlock cash held by the Cupertino.
 “The board’s latitude should not be constricted by a shareholder resolution that would micromanage the company’s capital allocation” The Wall Street Journal last week published an interview with Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook in which he outlined the most recent share repurchase.
 The Federal Open Market Committee has twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, cutting bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion.
 The government announced in September it would gradually decrease subsidies as it renewed its current program, which provides as much as 60,000 yuan ($9,900) toward the purchase of an all-electric passenger vehicle and as much as 500,000 yuan for an electric bus.
 Small details like that make a difference” The fight for survival by Laulhere -- rescued in a purchase by French military-garment maker Cargo-Promodis with a 500,000 euro ($686,000) injection in late 2012 -- tells the tale of President Francois Hollande’s competitiveness challenge.
 That growth came at a price, as expenses to purchase smartphones rose at about four times the rate of total costs, the company said.
 Cost reductions and additional sales will boost Smith & Nephew’s annual profit by about $85 million in the third full year after the purchase is complete, said the company, which also makes sports-medicine surgical equipment as well as artificial hips and knees.
 The purchase values ArthroCare at 157 times adjusted 2012 earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and amortization, Smith & Nephew said.
 11 amid speculation that a government report would show that nationwide crude supplies rose and as Federal Reserve Chairman Janet Yellen said she expected the Fed to continue curbing asset purchases.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Jorge Lischetti applied to purchase dollars from the government the day Argentina eased controls.
 Argentines like Lischetti, a 24-year-old legal adviser, are contributing to a drop in the country’s international reserves by refusing to deposit the dollars they purchase in local banks.
 Argentines have applied to buy and take home $223 million since President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner opened up dollar purchases Jan.
 Reserves have fallen $11 billion since the easing of controls, with dollar purchases for savings representing 20 percent of that total.
 Wealthiest 20% The tax agency has received 480,644 requests to buy foreign currency since the government allowed the wealthiest Argentines to purchase dollars for savings at the official exchange rate for the first time in 18 months.
 Currency Arbitrage The loosening of currency controls after Fernandez banned most dollar purchases in October 2011 also means Argentines are able to turn a quick 30 percent profit in pesos by trading the dollars in the illegal currency market, according to Olaiz.
 “Given the compounding nature of total returns, you can very quickly trail your benchmark by a significant amount in those instances” The speculative ratings may limit buyers for Puerto Rico because some funds require managers to purchase investment-grade obligations.
 “It’s not so much about who holds the bonds now -- the question for Puerto Rico is who’s going to provide liquidity and capital to purchase the bonds in the near future” Puerto Rico Governor Alejandro Garcia Padilla and lawmakers are working on a bill authorizing as much as $35 billion of general-obligation debt, Representative Rafael “Tatito” Hernandez said last week.
 “The government’s choice simultaneously to allege that Raj ‘caused’ these purchases and that Rengan caused them, too, appears to be strategic,” Rajaratnam’s lawyers said in the filing in Manhattan federal court.
 It recognized refining losses as the market in Europe soured and a goodwill expense after its purchase of the ISAB refinery in Italy.
 The firm was accused of enabling Latin American drug cartels to launder money by neglecting to monitor more than $670 billion in wire transfers and more than $94 billion of dollar purchases from a Mexican subsidiary.
 Federal Reserve’s decision to scale back asset purchases and China’s pledge to rein in leverage and give market forces a more decisive role in allocating resources.
 It will hold 95 percent of Houston, Texas-based ERG after the purchase.
 The purchase will accelerate Mallinckrodt’s growth in specialty pharmaceuticals and will increase the company’s presence in hospitals, Chief Executive Officer Mark Trudeau said today on a conference call.
 There’s enough credit available in China to support growth” Draining Liquidity China’s central bank sold repurchase contracts this week for the first time since June, draining funds from the banking system.
 plans two purchases in 2014 totaling at least C$1 billion ($898 million) as the Canadian lessor seeks to expand its North American railcar unit and enter the US.
 28-29 meeting tomorrow, giving investors details on central bank policy makers’ decision to trim bond purchases by $10 billion for a second time.
 The People’s Bank of China sold repurchase contracts for the first time since June, draining funds from the banking system.
 The German carrier agreed to acquire Warsaw-based landline provider GTS Central Europe in November and offered to purchase another 10 percent stake in Hellenic Telecommunications Organization SA from Greece, people familiar with the talks said last month.
 The deal in the Czech Republic may “fuel some investors’ fantasy” that there could be further purchases of regional telecommunications companies, analysts led by Andras Somi at KBC Groep NV’s Hungarian brokerage said in an e-mail today.
 life insurer Friends Provident Plc, which distributed its 52 percent stake in F&C to shareholders; and the purchase of Thames River Capital in 2010.
 The purchases tend to debase the currency.
 Alan Hely, a spokesman, confirmed the repurchases in an e-mailed statement.
 Billionaire activist investor Carl Icahn, who has been pressuring the company to boost buybacks, last month called for a $50 billion repurchase in fiscal 2014.
 With those latest repurchases, the Cupertino, California-based company has bought back more than $40 billion of its shares over the past 12 months, Cook said.
 These include incentives for employees to purchase shares; reduced taxes on stock options to keep more executives in Quebec; and modified taxes imposed on shareholders after death.
 The explorer of the precious metal will purchase the Marigold mine in Nevada for $275 million.
 TSYS linked fraudulent card usage back to what’s called “a common point of purchase” -- in this case, Neiman Marcus stores.
 attorney Preet Bharara gloats: “As the jury unanimously found, Mathew Martoma cultivated and purchased the confidence of doctors with secret knowledge of an experimental Alzheimer's drug, and used it to engage in illegal insider trading.
 The purchase, which covers more than 600,000 acres in the Mississippian Lime play, is expected to close in March, the companies said today.
 labor market is strong enough that the Fed plans to reduce purchases of Treasuries and mortgage securities to $65 billion from $75 billion this month, it said on Jan.
 Any softness will be taken down with the weather-related justification and only when we are in warmer times will the Fed look at this data” Federal Open Market Committee officials have twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, lowering bond buying to $65 billion in February from $85 billion last year.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- India has put off a final agreement to buy 126 Rafale combat planes worth more than $11 billion from Dassault Aviation SA to the next fiscal year as the government has almost exhausted its annual defense budget for purchases.
 In 2012, the government chose Dassault to supply at least 126 Rafale combat planes after initiating the purchase plan about five years earlier.
 The insurer repurchased $250 million of shares in the fourth quarter.
 Prudential purchased Hartford Financial Services Group Inc’s individual-life business for $615 million in a reinsurance deal completed in January of last year, adding about 700,000 policies.
 is the biggest importer of car parts from Japan, with 21 billion yen of purchases in 2013, according to figures from Japan Customs.
 Eight-Year Low Shares of Petrobras, the most indebted oil company, slumped to the lowest in more than eight years last week as refining losses mount on government’s demands to keep gasoline prices below purchase costs at a time the Rio-based company’s oil output misses estimates.
 Nestle halted purchases, renegotiated a contract with its supplier then resumed buying the palm oil after adjustments were made.
 Wind farms and industrial-scale solar plants typically have decades-long deals, known as power-purchase agreements, to sell electricity to utilities.
 “At some point they may be 5 or 6 percent because the market perception of that risk is going to come down to reality, and realize that it’s not really a 10 percent risk -- it’s more like a 5 percent risk” The power-purchase deals that anchor the investments are as reliable as the buyers’ credit, said Ravi Gupta, a senior member of KKR’s infrastructure team.
 The private equity firm announced last February the purchase of three solar projects in Canada, and in 2011 it invested in four other California solar plants.
 Fraud Losses Such purchases would indicate an increase in spending by US.
 Holders of such cards typically enter passwords when making a purchase, adding an extra layer of security.
 Those purchases may be approved now that retailers’ executives and board members are getting involved in overseeing the efforts to protect their companies from breaches.
 The purchase of International Business Machines Corp’s low-end x86 server unit delivers corporate clients, while the following deal for Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility was criticized for adding an unprofitable business with shrinking sales.
 “It will take some time before Lenovo turns the business profitable” ‘Potential Uncertainty’ The purchase of Motorola Mobility is “a necessary evil” to help Lenovo boost its US.
 security reviews that could slow or even scuttle the purchases as growing Chinese investment in the US.
 Amazon’s $775 million purchase of Kiva Systems Inc.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability in China, in December climbed to the highest since a record liquidity squeeze in June.
 Ashland’s also trying to sell its synthetic rubber unit to focus on additives used in cosmetics and pharmaceuticals that came with the $32 billion purchase of International Specialty Products Inc.
 The Anglo American unit said earlier this month that it will put greater emphasis on buyers’ track records in making purchases at previous sales events known as sights.
 At the time of its purchase by IntercontinentalExchange Group Inc.
 The Fed in January reduced the monthly pace of asset purchases by $10 billion, citing progress toward its goal of full employment.
 Carlyle agreed to purchase Illinois Tool’s industrial packaging business for $32 billion, expecting to complete the buyout in the middle of this year, according to the statement.
 From 2016, suppliers without enough capacity to meet the highest peak in demand from their customers must purchase certificates from generators guaranteeing backup supply, according to Commission de Regulation de l’Energie, the Paris-based regulator.
 On May 18, the country will vote whether to buy 22 Saab AB Gripen jets in a purchase valued at 31 billion Swiss francs ($347 billion).
 Opponents of the deal collected the required 50,000 signatures to force a national vote on the purchase.
 Sixty-three percent of Swiss oppose the purchase of the Gripen and 60 percent say Switzerland doesn’t need any new combat planes, according to a September poll by Isopublic.
 The move is part of an ongoing cost-reduction plan and isn’t related to the pending $130 billion purchase of Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless, Pica said.
 The result was a deal for Forest that was three times bigger than any Bisaro had ever done at Actavis, a company that has completed $146 billion in purchases with six deals over three years.
 Last year, the Actavis purchased Warner Chilcott Plc, a pharmaceutical company, for $92 billion including net debt in a deal that allowed it to expand in women’s health and urology.
 That purchase gave the company an Irish corporate domicile that lowered its tax rate to 17 percent from 37 percent.
 While many traders who purchased Jos.
 Traders who purchased Medco when the spread was its widest made a more than 40 percent return when the transaction closed, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 At that price, a deal would be the biggest purchase of a UK.
 Kapnick refused to include claims Bank of America was required to repurchase modified loans, saying the trustee, Bank of New York Mellon Corp, failed to properly evaluate them.
 The settlement is part of Bank of America’s push to resolve liabilities tied to faulty mortgages that have cost it at least $50 billion since the financial crisis, most inherited with its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 Triaxx funds lawyers argued that the trustee failed to investigate about $31 billion in modified mortgage repurchase claims.
 Kapnick refused to include claims Bank of America was required to repurchase modified loans, saying the trustee, Bank of New York Mellon Corp, failed to properly evaluate them.
 is part of Bank of America’s push to resolve liabilities tied to faulty mortgages that have cost it at least $50 billion since the financial crisis, most inherited with its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 Triaxx funds lawyers argued that the trustee failed to investigate about $31 billion in modified mortgage repurchase claims.
 The Fed trimmed its monthly debt buying this year to $65 billion from $85 billion and has pledged to gradually reduce the purchases as the job market improves.
 The buyback announced today adds to about $400 million left under a $1 billion repurchase authorized last year.
 The F-35 program is “going to continue to grow and become a larger element of our portfolio” if the Pentagon and international partners stick with their planned purchases, she said.
 Colak's broker required him to rectify that by borrowing (or buying) and delivering the stock, but instead there'd be a whole 'nother flurry of option writing and they'd never deliver the stock, leaving Colak, as they say, "naked short": He'd sold the stock without arranging to borrow it first2 Here is a fun statistic: Respondents sold approximately $800 million worth of call options and purchased at least $12 billion worth of common stock in over 20 issuers.
 The excess proceeds, which were derived from the underlying securities being hard-to-borrow, should have been offset by the cost of instituting and maintaining the associated short position that resulted from writing deep-in-the-money calls, for example, by effecting bona fide transactions to purchase, or borrow, the shares for delivery by settlement date.
 BAE, which is leaning on exports to drive growth, suffered setbacks abroad last year after talks with the United Arab Emirates over the purchase of Typhoon jets ended and Poland opted for a rival jet trainer.
 BAE, which began a 1 billion pound ($17 billion) share repurchase program a year ago, said at the time its full completion was contingent on concluding the so-called Salam pact with Saudi Arabia.
 “It also allows the Kingdom of Saudia Arabia to move on to other potential agreements” The two governments had originally signed a document in 2005 whereby provision for the purchase of the aircraft should be in line with economic conditions at the time.
 Kuwait, Qatar and Bahrain are among the countries considering Typhoon purchases.
 airlines’ regional-jet purchases last year, got a boost from Asia as Indian startup carrier Air Costa placed a $29 billion order for 50 planes.
 Hanlong’s overseas purchase of public companies began in 2009.
 Committee Conclusions A review committee composed of three board members looking into investors’ allegations concluded that Leo Apotheker, when he was chief executive officer, and some professionals hired by the company were negligent in connection with the Autonomy purchase and Autonomy employees defrauded the company, according to a Feb.
 30 said T-Mobile has “spearheaded increased competition” that is “driving enormous benefits in the direction of the American consumer” The Justice Department sued in 2011 to keep AT&T from swallowing T-Mobile, saying in a court filing a purchase by the second-biggest US.
 The Federal Open Market Committee has twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, cutting bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion.
 economy can withstand reduced monthly bond purchases.
 Bernanke, policy makers reduced the bank’s monthly asset purchases by $10 billion to $65 billion, citing the improved outlook for the labor market.
 “The management received information in August 2013 alleging that in 2008 there was misappropriation in the purchase of some IT hardware and some IT personnel had access to KSE’s IT system during that period,” according to a statement issued by the exchange dated Feb.
 is in exclusive talks with the majority shareholders of Wing Hang Bank until March 3 to purchase the lender.
 Australia last year blocked Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s takeover of GrainCorp Ltd, eastern Australia’s largest grain handler after approving Saputo Inc’s purchase of the country’s oldest dairy processor.
 Investors who purchased the inverse-volatility fund at that day’s closing price of $1848 made 86 percent on their investment by the end of the year.
 “We’ll need another round of economic readings between now and March for investors to gain back some confidence” Options traders have increased purchases of contracts that bet on declines in volatility.
 777X Buyers Boasting new engines and other upgrades, the jet is being purchased by BA’s alliance partners Qatar Airways Ltd.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Ocwen Financial Corp, the mortgage servicer whose planned purchase of contracts from Wells Fargo & Co.
 6 that it had agreed “to put an indefinite hold” on its plans to purchase servicing rights on $39 billion of loans without government backing from Wells Fargo.
 Barclays Plc and Morgan Stanley are managing its bond sale, which is expected to be completed next week and offer cash for the company to finance or refinance purchases or originations of servicing rights, the person said.
 They include previous purchases, the time of the day the customer buys goods, the frequency of purchases and even how shoppers type their names.
 The company says that only 33 out of 100 people who proceed to checkout on a desktop actually make the purchase, meaning that almost 70 percent of customers disappear during the payment process.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Broker Alon Chadad’s client purchased a $143 million apartment on Manhattan’s Central Park South, then spent nine months seeking approval for plans to overhaul it.
 Sellers have taken notice of a handful of record-shattering deals, triggered by an $88 million purchase at 15 Central Park West, and demand for trophy homes by international investors seeking havens for their cash.
 The 6,744-square-foot, four-bedroom condo -- featuring a wraparound terrace, two wood-burning fireplaces and a library -- was purchased for the daughter of Russian billionaire Dmitry Rybolovlev.
 Bill Ackman, founder of New York hedge-fund firm Pershing Square Capital Management LP, is part of an investor group that agreed to purchase one of the apartments, a duplex spanning the 75th and 76th floors of the 90-story skyscraper.
 It’s the largest available home at 15 Central Park West, where original buyers in 2007 and 2008 saw the value of their investments double on average in 2012, the year Weill and his wife sold their condo at twice their $437 million purchase price.
 27, a week after minutes from the central bank’s last meeting showed policy makers are unlikely to slow a reduction in bond purchases used to support growth.
 19 it will continue to cut bond purchases.
 The RBI has raised its benchmark repurchase rate three times since mid-September to rein in consumer-price inflation that averaged 10 percent in 2013.
 economic recovery can withstand reduced monthly bond purchases.
I've had so much fun talking about convertible-financed share repurchases the last few days that I'm going to move on to talk about share-financed share repurchases, which are my even more favorite trades.
 The nice thing about a convertible-financed share repurchase is the efficient linkage of the convertible and the share repurchase (which you buy instantly and efficiently from the hedge funds who buy the convertible).
 The nice thing about a share-financed share repurchase is that it makes no sense at all.
 That's not to criticize the share-financed share repurchase that Green Mountain announced yesterday: Coca-Cola Co.
 Here's the share repurchase: GMCR intends to execute a meaningful share repurchase program to reduce dilution from the transaction.
 This will be executed under the Company’s existing $11 billion share repurchase authorization.
 That announcement goes on to say that "GMCR intends to use a portion of the proceeds from the new equity issuance to fund anticipated capital expenditures for its Keurig Cold™ beverage system over the next several years," though it doesn't give a breakdown of capex versus share repurchase.
 Since it's benefiting from the broader transaction, it makes sense for it to take a big loss on buying Coke's shares for it4 Every so often, the share-financed share repurchase can make sense.
 Greybull will purchase the UK.
 Deals Cravath, Debevoise, Squire Sanders on Ashland Deal In its $18 billion purchase of Ashland Inc’s water-technologies unit, Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC turned to outside counsel Debevoise & Plimpton LLP.
 His successor Kurt Bock has shown less appetite for larger purchases, instead adding technologies in smaller deals.
 Federal Reserve said it would reduce the amount of bonds it purchases each month, sapping demand for assets from developing countries.
 The central bank’s restrictions include a monthly cap on individuals’ non-trade foreign-currency purchases, a ban on purchases for investments abroad and early debt repayments; and a waiting period to sell the hryvnia.
 The holding was comprised of 41,575 shares and call options to purchase another 298 million shares, according to a Schedule 13D filed with the US.
 The SEC filing didn’t provide the terms of the options, such as the price at which they could be exercised to purchase Barnes & Noble shares, or the date of expiration for the contracts.
 David Jones said in November its Internet store offers more than 100,000 product lines and the average online purchase is three times bigger than a typical sale inside a store.
 19 that it authorized the repurchase of as much as $25 billion in shares, the company’s biggest buyback plan since 2006.
 AstraZeneca is pursuing purchases and licensing deals to buffer the decline in sales of products including heartburn pill Nexium and cholesterol treatment Crestor as their patents expire over the next three years.
 14 that revenue in 2017 will be similar to last year’s sales following the purchase of Bristol-Myers Squibb Co’s stake in their diabetes-treatment venture for as much as $43 billion.
 That’s a trend that’s happening in a lot of cities” Texas Malls Across Canada, cities have grown up around the retail space that RioCan purchased two decades ago.
 The Micex Index advanced an average 77 percent during the Fed’s first two rounds of debt purchases, and fell 06 percent in periods of no stimulus, the biggest difference of 46 emerging and developed markets tracked by Bloomberg.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s opposition lawmakers plan to start an inquiry into allegations of irregularities in an oil refinery purchase by state-run Petroleo Brasileiro SA.
 President Dilma Rousseff said yesterday that the Petrobras board that she headed in 2006 approved the $370 million purchase of a 50 percent stake in Pasadena Refining System Inc.
 cable company, needs approval from the FCC and antitrust officials at the Justice Department for its proposed purchase of New York-based Time Warner Cable, the No.
 economy was strong enough to withstand measured reductions to the central bank’s monthly bond purchases.
 British American Tobacco Plc -- which owns 42 percent of Reynolds and can raise its stake after July -- could help finance a purchase of Lorillard, Exane BNP Paribas said.
 distribution, including a platform for e-cigarette development, something we argue Japan Tobacco and all the majors need” After reducing debt from its 2007 purchase of Gallaher Group Plc, Japan Tobacco is in “better shape for making another acquisition,” said Mikihiko Yamato, deputy head of research at JI Asia in Tokyo.
 At least 10 cities have moved to cool the housing market since November, including raising the minimum down payment on purchases.
 Last month the company completed the purchase of Cole Real Estate Investments Inc.
 The company moved to strengthen its supply chain and products through stake purchases in raw-milk producer China Modern Dairy Holdings Ltd.
 Mengniu agreed to buy about 27 percent of Modern Dairy in May for HK$318 billion ($410 million), giving it preferential purchase rights to Modern Dairy’s milk supply.
 A month later, Mengniu offered to purchase 75 percent of baby formula maker Yashili International Holdings Ltd.
 “If a customer is already looking for another car, dealers can provide an additional cash allowance for the purchase or lease of a new vehicle” Parts to fix the vehicles should begin arriving in dealerships April 7 with enough parts to fix all of the vehicles in place no later than October, GM has said.
 British American Tobacco Plc -- which owns 42 percent of Reynolds and can raise its stake after July -- could help finance a purchase of Lorillard, Exane BNP Paribas said.
 distribution, including a platform for e-cigarette development, something we argue Japan Tobacco and all the majors need” After reducing debt from its 2007 purchase of Gallaher Group Plc, Japan Tobacco is in “better shape for making another acquisition,” said Mikihiko Yamato, deputy head of research at JI Asia in Tokyo.
 The proceeds of the dollar bond sale will be used to purchase a portion of the 925 percent notes due 2020 and 9 percent bonds due 2018.
 At the time ofpurchase, it agreed to buy a third-generation operating licenseand frequencies from Takilant for $30 million, as well as theGibraltar-based company’s 26 percent stake in Ucell, as a“prerequisite” for entering the market, according toTeliaSonera’s website.
 “Thetransaction will result in approximately doubling the debtload” Ownership Change The $600 million of 2031 notes and $150 million of 745percent bonds due in September 2027 lack provisions thattypically require securities to be repurchased at 101 cents onthe dollar after a change of ownership.
 “The longer bonds will behurt the worst” Only three of about 25 private-equity purchases of morethan $1 billion announced in the last year involved bonds thatlacked change-of-control covenants, according to data compiledby Bloomberg.
 subscription-streaming music service since July 2012, letting users purchase and download from a catalog of 19 million tracks.
 The new notes are graded B2 by Moody’s Investors Service, which today changed its outlook on KB Home to “positive” from “stable” KB Home, which mostly focuses on first-time home buyers, issued the debt as data showed purchases of previously-owned homes in the US.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of funding availability in the interbank market, climbed 96 basis points, the most since Jan.
 Foreigners bought a net $212 million of shares on March 6, the biggest single day purchase this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Treasuries after Yellen said she saw a period of “around six months” between the end of the Fed’s bond purchases and the first US.
 “Valero has plenty of cash, the stock is performing well, so if they need it, why not do it?” After the purchase, Valero’s ethanol-processing capacity will rise to 13 billion gallons a year.
 KKR agreed in February to purchase the Lawrenceville, Georgia-based company from buyout firm Berkshire Partners LLC, and the transaction is expected to close this month.
 Graham is also the author of “The Intelligent Investor,” a book whose purchase in 1949 was the “best” investment Buffett ever made, the billionaire wrote in Berkshire’s annual report released on March 1.
 Its biggest transactions include the $745 billion purchase of a majority of Chrysler in 2007.
 “There’s a chance things may take a turn for the worse, resulting in an increase in cases of corporate distress” The performance of China’s economy, the Crimean crisis and the reaction to cuts in the Fed’s bond-purchase program are factors adding to the unease, Sim said.
 Executives from the two banks met recently to discuss the possible purchase of RBS Citizens Financial Group Inc, the newspaper reported, citing people familiar with the talks.
 “I would suggest that before we make our employer mandate and participation issues final, we listen to the concerns of CEOs from a variety of corporations who purchase not provide health care” Among the suggested companies: Bank of America Corp, PepsiCo Inc, Xerox Corp, Apple Inc, Alcoa Inc, Caterpillar Inc, and Federal Express Corp.
 Household purchases, which account for almost 70 percent of the economy, climbed 03 percent, the Commerce Department said.
 Consumer Purchases Consumer purchases increased 02 percent last month after adjusting spending for inflation, also the best performance since November, the Commerce Department reported.
 GameStop’s stock repurchases, debt buybacks and dividend payments have totaled more than $21 billion since 2010, according to the company.
 “Asia is of growing importance for our funding needs as there’s liquidity available and investors seeking return” Minerva is offering a rebate for private banks buying into its deal, with investments of more than $5 million receiving a discount of 50 cents for every $100 of notes purchased.
 L’Oreal’s agreement to purchase 8 percent of Nestle’s stake in February for 6 billion euros ($82 billion) won the support of Nestle’s biggest owners in part because it freed money to return to shareholders, a person familiar with the matter said last month.
 13 that Nestle will use the cash proceeds to start a stock-repurchase program.
 One Equity’s purchase “was financed with a capital structure aligned with a specific set of assumptions that are no longer relevant” MModal has struggled to make payments on the debt as software and other products supplant its transcription business, which converts health-care providers’ dictation to text and generates more than 80 percent of revenue.
 The company boosted its airwaves -- the frequencies that let devices make calls and download data -- by closing a $12 billion purchase of Leap Wireless International Inc.
 Crane outlined plans to accelerate NRG’s shift into a more distributed generation model and the purchase of companies such as Roof Diagnostics.
 Vintage also sees a deal as a way to expand Buddy’s Home Furnishings, a rent-to-own chain of 170 stores that the firm purchased in 2012, Kahn said.
 New-home purchases dropped in February to the lowest level in five months, Commerce Department data showed this week.
 Policy makers cut monthly bond purchases to $55 billion last week, from $85 billion last year.
 While the nation’s copper imports reached an all-time high in January, the higher purchases probably reflected over-ordering and more metal being used for financing deals, rather than increased industrial demand, Goldman Sachs said Feb.
 Buying Masterpiece John Baldessari’s “Commissioned Painting: A Painting by Edgar Transue,” purchased in 2001, may bring $2 million to $3 million.
 Icahn dropped his campaign last month after the Cupertino, California-based company stepped up repurchases and a proxy advisory firm criticized the investor’s efforts as micromanagement.
 31 under a $1 billion share repurchase program authorized in June.
 The Fed started trimming in December its monthly debt purchase that boosted higher-yielding assets globally.
 Gazprom may purchase fuel from its Russian rivals at prices agreed by both sides, something the state doesn’t control under current legislation, the Energy Ministry’s press service said in an e-mailed comment.
 Long-haul passengers are attractive to airports because they tend to arrive earlier at the terminal, taking more time there and spending more on retail, food and beverage purchases for use or consumption during their trip, according to an Airport Cooperative Research Program report published in 2012.
 shareholder sued to block Signet Jewelers Ltd’s $14 billion purchase of the company, arguing the deal undervalues the smaller retail jewelry chain.
 The purchase marks the biggest yet for Hamilton, Bermuda-based Signet, operator of the Kay and Jared brands.
 It also joined a group of investors to purchase three British power networks for $9 billion in 2010, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 While the central bank is slowing monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt, it will likely keep overnight borrowing rates at about zero through at least mid-2015, economists surveyed by Bloomberg predict.
 About $80 billion has been erased from the value of the index this week as Facebook shareholders showed their displeasure over the purchase of Oculus VR Inc.
 They’ve pumped up the puts because the downside pressure has been higher” Stock Valuations Stocks rebounded today as data showed household purchases rose the most in three months.
 McDonald, who used $70,000 of his eating-contest prizes since 2012 to open Bear’s Smokehouse BBQ last June in Windsor, Connecticut, plans to raise menu prices 10 percent to limit the profit squeeze on 5,000 pounds (227 metric tons) of weekly meat purchases.
 The Kospi index of shares rose as overseas funds net purchased local equities for the first time in two weeks.
 They purchased $20 billion in 2013.
 Most of the original purchasers were hedge funds, and trading in the securities that afternoon exceeded $5 billion.
 Sale documents stipulate a $100,000 floor for purchases that also applies to trading after the bonds price, said two people with knowledge of the sale who requested anonymity without authorization to speak publicly.
 “These are intended for institutional purchasers, or at least for people that can afford the risk by making it a minimum denomination of $100,000,” said Martha Haines, who led the Securities and Exchange Commission’s Municipal Securities office from 2001 to 2011.
 ‘‘An issuer may feel that due to the risk of default, lack of publicly disseminated disclosure or other concerns, that the securities may not be appropriate for those retail investors who would likely purchase amounts below the minimum denomination,’’ Lynnette Kelly, MSRB’s executive director, said in an e-mailed statement.
 KME buys 80 percent of its cathodes, a form of refined metal, on an annual basis and purchases the rest on the spot market.
 “In China, there are mail-order services that can replicate a person’s print or iris and courier it back to the purchaser in 48 hours.
 Frutarom in February bought Florida-based Citrasource for $75 million, its first purchase this year.
 The purchases were mainly made in emerging markets and the US, which account for 46 percent and 11 percent of sales respectively.
 Fed Meeting The Federal Open Market Committee will announce a $10 billion cut to its monthly bond purchases tomorrow, continuing reductions at that pace until ending the program at its Oct.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- India’s rupee rose to a one-week high on speculation easing inflation will spur overseas purchases of the nation’s assets even as the US.
 Federal Open Market Committee will further scale back its bond-buying program when its meeting concludes tomorrow, reducing purchases by $10 billion to $55 billion, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg on March 14-17.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan raised the benchmark repurchase rate in January to 8 percent, the third increase since September.
 The purchase hasn’t been completed yet, pending regulatory and antitrust approvals in Ukraine.
 “Financing for various purchases including cars, homes and consumer goods has become more socially acceptable than say a generation ago when even big-ticket items were cash sales” Riyad Capital last week raised its 12-month share price target for banks including Bank AlJazira, Saudi Hollandi, Banque Saudi Fransi, Saudi British Bank, Arab National Bank and Samba.
 While a purchase wouldn’t be cheap, European electrical-equipment distributors Rexel SA and Sonepar could be attracted to Anixter for its communications cable business, Stifel said.
 A purchase of Anixter wouldn’t come cheap after the run-up in the stock, and the company isn’t in a position where it needs a buyer, said Stifel’s Dilts.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury 10-year notes declined, after posting the biggest gain in two months last week, before the Federal Reserve begins a meeting that analysts said will see policy makers further scale back bond-purchase stimulus.
 The Fed is forecast on March 19 to cut monthly purchases under its quantitative-easing strategy to $55 billion while providing guidance on the outlook for interest-rate increases.
 The central bank in January reduced monthly bond purchases to $65 billion, citing labor-market indicators that “were mixed but on balance showed further improvement” ‘Taper Down’ The Fed left unchanged its statement that it will probably hold its target interest rate near zero “well past the time” that unemployment falls below 65 percent.
 provided bridge-loan commitments to Actavis for the purchase, according to the Feb.
 “The big debate right now is, post-Alibaba, what do they do with this cash and can the core business actually start growing again?” While much of the Alibaba proceeds will probably be used to repurchase shares, there will still be plenty left over to continue making acquisitions, Peck of Suntrust said.
 rose at a slower pace in January as Americans cut back on their credit-card purchases.
 Rising equity and property values has generated record household wealth, putting Americans in a position to take advantage of cheaper borrowing costs for purchases of big-ticket goods such as cars.
 Revolving Debt The Fed’s figures showed revolving debt, which includes credit-card purchases, fell by $2256 million in January, after a $31 billion gain a month earlier.
 Non-revolving credit, such as that for college loans and the purchase of vehicles and mobile homes, climbed by $139 billion, after a $128 billion increase the month before.
 Job Growth Faster job growth, and the wage gains that go along with it, may make consumers more comfortable using their credit cards for purchases.
 Yields on Treasury securities climbed today as the data probably means Fed policy makers will keep trimming monthly bond purchases aimed at spurring growth.
 We could see a potential slowing of upward momentum over the next few days” Fed Meeting Fed officials today end a two-day policy meeting at which they will decide whether to slow the central bank’s monthly asset-purchase program.
 The company, based in the capital Accra, will borrow 400 million cedis ($156 million) from the government regulator to purchase beans, Joseph Osei Manu, deputy managing director in charge of finance, said yesterday.
 “Cocoa Board itself is getting less from the market,” Manu said, referring to the $12 billion Cocobod borrowed to fund cocoa purchases.
 The company is arranging a $75 million facility from a foreign-based lender for cocoa purchases in the year that starts in October, Manu said.
 The company raised its target for cocoa purchases this year to 315,000 metric tons from 270,000 tons, said Manu.
 “Chinese developers are extremely exposed to the easy credit that is used to finance purchases and investment,” said Patrick Chovanec, the New York-based chief strategist at Silvercrest Asset Management Group LLC, which oversees $141 billion in asset, by phone.
 The Madoff and Stanford cases are similar in that customers’ money wasn’t used to purchase securities.
 Lehman Repo Customers Don’t Have Customer Claims Creditors holding repurchase agreements with the brokerage subsidiary of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 With nothing other than general unsecured claims, parties to repurchase agreement may never receive anything.
 From Lehman’s point of view, the transactions were so-called reverse repos, with the creditors delivering securities to Lehman under an agreement where they were obligated to repurchase the securities at a later date at a specified price.
 Lehman was allowed to use the securities for its own purposes until the repurchase date.
 If the repo were viewed as a purchase and sale of securities, she said, it was even less like a customer claim with an underlying fiduciary duty.
 If there were no other offer and he withdrew, LightSquared could have been forced to liquidate where he or Dish might have purchased the frequency spectrum at a lower price.
 Several banks are vying to provide the loans, which would likely fund about half of the purchase price, said one of the people.
 Kennelly said in the interview that the beefed-up stock-repurchase program is unrelated to Elliott’s activism.
 The Reserve Bank of India will keep its main repurchase rate unchanged at 8 percent at an April 1 review, according to 29 of 31 economists in a Bloomberg survey.
 “If successfully completed, it would turn Citic Pacific into the largest listed conglomerate in China with a broader range of businesses” Citic Pacific will pay for the assets purchase with cash and new stock, which will reduce a public float that currently stands at 36 percent, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 At $36 billion, the deal would top China Mobile Ltd’s $32 billion purchase of seven wireless networks from its parent to be the largest such asset injection into a Hong Kong-listed unit by a Chinese company, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The Fed said yesterday it will reduce the monthly pace of bond purchases by $10 billion.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 126 percent.
 The acquisition gives Centrica and its partners access to the biggest dual-fuel supply business in Ireland, including about 650,000 residential gas and electricity accounts, and adds to its purchase of shale assets in northern England’s Bowland basin and stakes in gas fields from Canada’s Suncor Energy Inc.
 The Baltimore-based money manager will pay an initial purchase price of $11 million for New York-based QS Investors, and then an additional maximum of $30 million if certain net revenue targets are met during the second and fourth years following the acquisition, according to a regulatory filing today.
 Margin Calls “It is believed most of the inventory purchases are unhedged,” Evan Lucas, a market strategist at IG Ltd, said in a note received today, referring to holdings in China.
 Purchases totaled a net C$109 billion, including C$284 billion in stock purchases.
 Allianz initially announced the purchase agreement in a statement yesterday Unipol has to sell divisions or companies that generate 17 billion euros of gross premiums to comply with antitrust requests after it won control of Fondiaria-SAI SpA.
 When a reader prints an offer or clicks through to make a purchase, Paine gets 30 cents to $25 from a Web-coupon purveyor.
 The cost of the fixed payment to receive the floating seven-day repurchase rate for one year fell 35 basis points, or 035 percentage point, this week and three basis points today to 406 percent as of 4:36 pm.
 Saying that the Federal Reserve’s plans to keep interest rates low were more important than the central bank’s decision to taper its bond purchases, Gross said that Pimco Unconstrained and other funds run by the firm would bet on the shorter-term debt, while pulling back from 5-, 10- and 30-year exposures.
 Bullish Bet Under Dialynas, Pimco Unconstrained had purchased credit-default swaps on corporate bonds as well as indexes that track such debt, positioning the fund to profit should the spread, or difference in yield, between corporate debt and Treasuries widen.
 Gross had taken the opposite tack at Pimco Total Return, reducing the amount of protection it purchased on corporate bonds while issuing such insurance for other investors, essentially a bullish bet.
 During the fourth quarter, Pimco Unconstrained divested almost all of the credit-default swaps it had purchased, including insurance on corporate bonds with a face value of $31 billion and another $44 billion of protection tied to high yield and investment-grade indexes.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, paid Chief Executive Officer Kenneth Chenault $244 million for 2013, an 11 percent increase over the previous year as the firm’s stock and profit soared.
 The Treasury said in December it plans to give taxpayers the opportunity to purchase Lloyds shares “when the time is right” after a sale to money managers.
 Holland said the company will accelerate its acquisition rate this year, spending more cash on more targets, and will announce a purchase “very soon” “We expect the spend on acquisitions to be far in excess of what we spent in 2013,” Holland said.
 It wasn’t a change of policy that only 50 million euros ($70 million) were spent on purchases last year, just that a number of transactions were complex and rolled into 2014, he said.
 The Rockwood unit purchase was Altana’s second-biggest and will boost revenue by a “high single-digit” percentage this year, the CEO said.
 Even after the Rockwood purchase, net debt comes to less than annual earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and amortization.
 The card issuer, already the biggest by purchases, is seeking new kinds of customers including US.
 The DAX is still not too far from a record, and I think this level is warranted” The Federal Open Market Committee concludes its first meeting today under Chair Janet Yellen, who has said she will probably continue to reduce monthly bond purchases as long as the US.
 Clients are trading less as the Federal Reserve slows its monthly asset purchases and leaves bond investors preparing for rising interest rates.
 Overseas funds bought a net $228 million of Indian shares on March 14, extending this year’s purchases to $16 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 retail sales probably rose in February from a month earlier, according to a Bloomberg survey, a sign that consumer spending is stabilizing after winter storms reduced purchases by the most since June 2012.
 The Bank of Thailand cut its one-day bond repurchase rate by a quarter of a percentage point to 2 percent, with monetary policy committee members voting four-to-three in favor, it said in Bangkok today.
 CEC, which was purchased last month by the private-equity firm Apollo Global Management, has begun an internal and external search for a replacement.
 Netanyahu told the 14,000 delegates at the Aipac conference that efforts to boycott Israeli products will fail because the “world wants Israeli technology,” citing the purchase of Israeli startups by Google Inc, Apple and Facebook Inc.
 “The company is seeing double-digit growth in purchases from existing customers and acquiring new customers at a rapid clip,” Mark Miller, an analyst at William Blair & Co, said in a note last week.
 King generates revenue when users purchase virtual items, such as extra lives or additional game content, for about $1 apiece.
 The A$4355 million purchase is the latest in a number of transactions among Australia’s property trusts.
 “Even farmers who purchased import vehicles on foreign currency installments are selling them in the second-hand market to buy local brands” Turkey’s lira declined 19 percent in the past year, the second-worst performance after the Argentine peso among 24 emerging market peers tracked by Bloomberg.
 The company sold 16 percent of the 53,803 tractors purchased in Turkey last year.
 Kroton proposed in April an all-stock deal valued at $21 billion to purchase Anhanguera and form the world’s biggest education company.
 NorthStar will contribute about 92 percent of the $430 million in equity for the purchase, with NorthStar and Formation jointly taking over financing for the rest of the transaction price, according to the statement.
 “We are enthusiastic that this will be the first of many compelling transactions that we can complete with our partners at Formation Capital” The purchase includes 43 private-pay senior housing buildings and 37 nursing homes, according to the statement.
 In 2007, Santander sold through its branches 7 billion euros of bonds that would mandatorily convert into its own stock to fund its purchase of ABN Amro NV’s Brazilian unit.
 Thales is considering a purchase of Amper’s 51 percent stake in Amper Programas, said the people, asking not to be identified because the deliberations are private.
 Amper Programas has been hurt by the loss of its main contract, after Emiraje Systems said last year that the United Arab Emirates army would cancel a contract to purchase a military system.
 Contract Pressures Long-term purchase contracts may come under pressure if a spot market for the liquefied fuel is developed that gives buyers access to cheaper gas not linked to oil prices, Ruehl said.
 In 1973, he purchased shares in Graham, then known as Washington Post Co, for about $11 million and later became a confidant of longtime Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Katharine Graham, who died in 2001.
 1973: Buffett purchases Washington Post Co.
 “We view the key driver as cost synergies” Standard Life also said integrating Ignis will save more than 50 million pounds annually by the third year after the purchase.
 “The reduction in gearing will accelerate our access to wider debt capital markets and strengthens our position as an acquirer of closed life funds” The purchase of Ignis is subject to regulatory approval and is due to be completed in the first half of 2014.
 in Chicago last October in the Seoul-based postal system’s largest overseas real estate purchase.
 The whole point of the core strategy is it’s the portion of real estate that’s not going to keep them up at night” Blackstone made its first core real estate purchase in December, buying a 29 percent stake in Edens, a South Carolina-based shopping-center landlord, for $718 million.
 The French lender recommends investors purchase options to buy the dollar and sell the rupee as a hedge against election-outcome risks.
 Europe depends on purchases from abroad for more than a half of its energy consumption and governments in the bloc are divided over exploration for shale gas, which has brought the US.
 The company lined up a $900 million one-year bridge loan to fund the purchase, three people familiar with the matter said last month.
 Petronas’s plans to sell another 15 percent stake in the project to another Asian LNG purchaser will be announced by the end of this month, Shamsul said March 4.
 Neither Singapore nor Malaysia can “unilaterally change” the purchase price because of existing agreements, Singapore’s Shanmugam said today in Parliament.
 The currency derivatives allow the purchase of US.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s top finance official is being roped into a growing scandal over Petroleo Brasileiro SA’s $119 billion purchase of a Texas plant, the latest in a string of troubles plaguing the company’s money-losing refining unit.
 Finance Minister and Petrobras Chairman Guido Mantega is being called upon to testify before a lower-house commission on the 2006 purchase of the Pasadena refinery from Astra Oil Trading NV, which bought the plant a year before for $425 million.
 President Dilma Rousseff, then Petrobras’ chairwoman, said directors approved the $370 million purchase of a 50 percent stake without knowledge of a clause that later forced it to buy the rest as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 The presidential palace referred questions to Rousseff’s March 19 statement on the refinery purchase, declining to comment on the political impact of the case.
 The state-run company, which is collaborating with government agencies in the matter, created its own committee to investigate the purchase and has 45 days to deliver findings to the board, Petrobras said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Paulo newspaper published minutes of the 2006 meeting in which the Rousseff-led board approved the purchase from Astra.
 government debt in February as turmoil in Ukraine fueled haven demand and investors bet the Federal Reserve will conclude bond purchases this year.
 Fed Purchases The Fed has reduced monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage bonds this year to $65 billion, from $85 billion in 2013.
 The purchase of the 737 Max 8s, which will be equipped with the Leap-X engine from General Electric Co’s CFM International venture with Safran SA, are part of Comair’s effort to cut jet-fuel usage while adding destinations to a route network serving southern Africa and Indian Ocean islands.
 Investec Financing The new purchase adds to an eight-plane order for the 737-800 model that Comair placed with Boeing in 2011, with the remaining four to be delivered by 2016.
 Investec Aviation Finance acted as financier for the 737-800 purchase.
 It completed a $59 billion purchase of Canada’s Viterra in 2012.
 Federal Reserve pared its bond-purchase program, reducing appetite for riskier emerging-market assets, while the crisis in Ukraine deepened.
 Bank of Japan Governor Haruhiko Kuroda today said there’s momentum spurring the yen carry trade, referring to a strategy of borrowing in a low-rate market to fund purchases of higher-yielding assets.
 The purchase price could be more than $20 billion, the FT said, citing unidentified people familiar with the situation.
 It was Ulrich Hartmann, head of Veba’s corporate board office and right-hand man of then-Chief Executive Officer Rudolf von Bennigsen-Foerder, who pushed for the purchase from art dealer Alfred Schmela.
 Singapore began introducing property curbs four years ago with some of the strictest measures implemented in 2013, including a cap on debt at 60 percent of a borrower’s income, higher stamp duties on home purchases and an increase in real estate taxes.
 The venture between Rostec and ICT Group may invest about $1 billion in rare-earth projects, including building a processing facility for the 82,000 metric tons of monazite concentrate that ICT purchased from stockpiles, Nesis said in October.
 interest rates could increase six months after the central bank’s monthly bond purchases come to an end.
 He “sees more opportunity in his stock purchases than he does in his cash and bond holdings” Buffett has said low yields mean that insurers and other bond investors are holding “wasting assets” To counter that, he struck private deals for higher-paying securities and added equities.
 stocks climbed after a two-day slide, as consumer shares rebounded amid data showing household purchases rose the most in three months.
 Abe’s Policies In the Tokyo metropolitan area, the average purchase price for new apartments rose 27 percent to 417 million yen in 2013 from a year earlier.
 (KCG) to 20 percent as the investment bankpurchased an additional 6 million shares in the market maker ithelped rescue in 2012.
 Private equity firms, hedge funds and real estate investment trusts have purchased as many as 200,000 houses during the past two years.
 In December, the unit completed its purchase of NV Energy Inc, the largest electricity provider in Nevada.
 On March 3 MMI completed its 16 billion rand purchase of Alexander Forbes Ltd’s Guardrisk in South Africa.
 The overnight repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank liquidity, rose 57 basis points to 346 percent in Shanghai, the highest since March 4, according to a weighted average from the National Interbank Funding Center.
 While Coca-Cola’s decision to purchase a 10 percent stake in Waterbury, Vermont-based Keurig Green Mountain spurred speculation rival Pepsi would partner with SodaStream to counter the threat, Pepsi has already invested in a company producing a rival machine, according to a March 10 report by Ali Dibadj, a New York-based analyst at Sanford C.
 The loss exceeds the 106 billion-euro loss UniCredit posted in the third quarter of 2011, when Ghizzoni took an 87 billion-euro impairment charge that included goodwill writedowns on its investment bank, the purchase of Germany’s HVB Group and businesses in Ukraine and Kazakhstan.
 The company agreed to sell its Las Bambas copper mine in Peru as part of a deal to win Chinese regulatory authorization for the Xstrata purchase.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen, easing investor concern that interest rates may rise earlier than previously forecast, said the world’s biggest economy will need Fed stimulus for “some time” Yellen said today the Fed hasn’t done enough to combat unemployment even after holding interest rates near zero for more than five years and pumping up its balance sheet to $423 trillion with bond purchases.
 Share prices fell on March 19, when she said in a press conference that the Fed might start raising the benchmark interest rate above zero about six months after ending its bond purchase program.
 Slower Pace While policy makers have slowed the pace of their monthly asset purchases over the past three gatherings to $55 billion from $85 billion, Yellen said the central bank’s “commitment is strong” to helping sustain progress in the job market.
 “Recent steps by the Fed to reduce the rate of new securities purchases are not a lessening of this commitment, only a judgment that recent progress in the labor market means our aid for the recovery need not grow as quickly,” she said.
 The suit contends that when the company sold 128 million shares in December 2005, it misled purchasers by saying it was operating within the law.
 The purchase expands Thales’ avionics business.
 You don’t need to own the company” JetBlue purchased LiveTV in September 2002 for $41 million in cash and the retirement of $39 million in LiveTV debt.
 Gross’s $236 billion Pimco Total Return Fund suffered withdrawals starting in May as investors fled bonds in anticipation of the end of the Federal Reserve’s unprecedented asset purchases.
 Lee said South Korea’s security industry is “under-penetrated” Carlyle’s purchase follows investments of more than $920 million of equity in 17 transactions in South Korea as of Dec.
 Porsche reiterated that it plans purchases “along the automotive value chain” Areas of interest include drivetrains, material and safety technology, as well as sustainability, Winterkorn said.
 Both companies took advantage of the fall in prices with stock repurchases.
 BOJ bond purchases have helped drag down the nation’s benchmark 10-year yield to 064 percent, the lowest in the world, while the yen rose 02 percent to 10260 per dollar at 3:34 pm.
 Mitsubishi UFJ completed in December the purchase of a $5 billion stake in Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya Pcl, while Sumitomo Mitsui agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion in May.
 projects that were shunned by buyers at the start of last year are now being sold and the investors are receiving multiple offers from lenders to finance the purchases, he said.
 The lender also benefited from contributions from its C$31 billion purchase of an online banking platform from ING Groep NV in November 2012, which added about 18 million customers and bolstered loans.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 326 percent of the notes, the most on record going back to 2009 and compared with an average of 195 percent at the past 10.
 The central bank imposed limits on foreign-currency purchases last month, before Yanukovych’s ouster, after interventions failed to alleviate pressure on the hryvnia.
 Ukraine needs $62 billion in the second quarter to service its foreign-currency denominated debt, repay gas arrears and purchase gas, according to Bilan at Dragon Capital.
 The transaction will result in costs of about $35 million to Legg Mason, which didn’t disclose the terms of the purchase.
 Campagna Leads A year ago, Legg Mason made its first major purchase since 2005 with fund-of-hedge-funds business Fauchier Partners, which contributed about $5 billion in assets to its Permal unit.
 The purchase of QS investors is expected to close in the quarter ended June 30, or the first fiscal quarter for 2015, according to the statement.
 if a change in regulation discourages purchases of annuities.
 Prime Minister Abe’s stimulus policies backed by the Bank of Japan’s about 7 trillion yen in monthly bond purchases aimed at spurring economic growth and defeating inflation have lowered borrowing costs for Japanese companies to the least since August 2007, Bank of America Merrill Lynch index data show.
 The unit has shareholder equity of 225 billion yuan ($36 billion), and Citic Pacific will pay for the purchase in cash and new shares, with the terms still being negotiated.
 At $36 billion, the deal would top China Mobile Ltd’s $32 billion purchase of seven wireless networks from its parent to be the largest such asset injection into a Hong Kong-listed unit by a Chinese company, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Treasury Secretary Lawrence Summers said increased government spending offered greater reward than Federal Reserve bond purchases as authorities seek to boost growth in the world’s No.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said last week in testimony to the Senate Banking Committee that the central bank intends to reduce asset purchases at a “measured” pace and that the bond-buying program is likely to end in the fall.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Ghana will introduce devices that will triple the number of people who can use debit cards to pay for purchases, to draw more business through banks in West Africa’s second-largest economy.
 can be used to withdraw money from any ATM and pay for purchases through about 400 devices at mostly hotels and restaurants.
 About 800,000 people have e-zwich smart cards that can be filled with cash to make purchases.
 “We expect the use of cards for purchases to catch up with customers as more of the point of sale devices are deployed,” Edward Blankson-Mills, cluster head of personal banking at Access Bank Ghana Ltd, said by phone today.
 The Fed reduced its monthly bond purchases to $65 billion from $85 billion during its last two meetings, citing signs the labor market is recovering.
 The debt-purchase program is designed to cap long-term borrowing costs and encourage growth.
 Bidder Participation Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 299 percent of the notes, compared with 42 percent last month that was the most since August 2011.
 The jobs report last week bolstered speculation the Fed will continue to trim bond purchases.
 Last month, Carl Icahn dropped his campaign urging Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 Last year’s $29 billion purchase of Xstrata added coal, nickel, zinc and copper mines to Glencore’s trading empire.
 The Judiciary Committee is discussing several options, including proposals that would tax purchases based on the location of the seller, not the buyer.
 economy was strong enough to withstand measured reductions to the central bank’s monthly bond purchases.
 Major central banks have set loose monetary policy since the 2008 financial crisis to avoid a prolonged period of falling prices known as deflation, which can make it harder to repay debts and encourage people to delay purchases as they wait for ever-bigger discounts.
 Bank of America’s settlement is part of its push to resolve liabilities tied to faulty mortgages, mostly inherited with its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp, that have cost it at least $50 billion since the financial crisis.
 As part of the accession agreements, those purchases were reduced to 13 million tons, limiting the amount available for refiners.
 That left about 35 million tons of demand to be met by duty-free imports from a group of least-developed countries and nations in the African, Caribbean and Pacific group of states and some other purchases at reduced duty.
 The property, which Salesforce purchased in 2010 for $278 million with intentions to build a new headquarters, has been sitting undeveloped after the company instead opted to lease space at towers in the city.
 A capitalization rate is derived by dividing a property’s net operating income by its purchase price, so it falls as values rise.
 The property was to be the site of an urban campus of almost 2 million square feet (186,000 square meters) of offices, Salesforce Chief Executive Officer Marc Benioff said in a November 2010 statement announcing the land purchase from Alexandria Real Estate Equities Inc, a real estate investment trust focused on biotechnology offices.
 Chief Executive Officer Jim Belardi built Athene by acquiring insurers, most recently completing the purchase of Aviva Plc’s US.
 MetLife said in its annual filing that being deemed systemically important could limit the company’s ability to pay dividends or repurchase shares.
 Actavis Plc agreed to purchase Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Actavis’ purchase was a “gift” for the Israeli drugmaker, he said.
 It purchased the 42-story facility in 2009 after the collapse of previous owner Washington Mutual Inc, which had its headquarters there.
 economy was strong enough to withstand measured reductions to the central bank’s monthly bond purchases.
 The purchase would have marked a rare three-way collaboration between state-owned Gulf energy firms in a region where investment decisions are often based on political aspirations.
 The biggest purchase was StreetEasy, which had about 30 employees at the time of the deal.
 The Fed trimmed its monthly bond-purchase program by $10 billion to $55 billion yesterday.
 There just hasn’t been a lot of meaningful profit yet” The acquisition is one of the biggest for Disney, the world’s largest entertainment company, since the $4 billion purchase of Lucasfilm Ltd.
 Compliance Action Tokyo Star Sale Delayed by Taiwan on Breaches at Buyer CTBC Taiwan is delaying approval of CTBC Financial Holding Co’s planned 52 billion-yen ($505 million) purchase of Japan’s Tokyo Star Bank Ltd.
 Investments in new production sites or the extension of existing ones as well as purchases of stakes in existing companies rose 88 percent from a year ago to 158 billion euros, it said.
 Honeywell spent $22 billion on purchases in North America, $21 billion in Europe and just less than $350 million in the Asia-Pacific region, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The decision to exit Hornbach follows last year’s purchase of 15 Bricostore outlets in Romania and preparations to take the Screwfix brand to Germany this year, bringing it into direct competition with the German company for the first time.
 Shares rallied in the final session as retailers gained on data showing household purchases increased in February.
 The purchase of Ono gives Vodafone 19 million customers in Spain.
 Nestle’s frozen foods use “the same quality ingredients our consumers purchase when cooking from scratch,” said Nestle spokeswoman Roz O’Hearn.
 The Bank of England maintained its rate at an all-time low of 05 percent and its bond-purchase plan at 375 billion pounds.
 The bulk of the $35 billion purchase price represents JPMorgan’s physical commodity inventory, including crude oil and base metals.
 The trading firm has begun discussions with bankers regarding potential new credit lines or lending facilities and doesn’t plan on issuing a bond or tapping the public capital markets to fund the purchase, the person said.
 The Reserve Bank of India will keep the repurchase rate at 8 percent, according to 24 of 25 economists in a Bloomberg News survey.
 Citigroup lowered the Dutch telecommunications operator to neutral from buy, meaning it no longer recommends investors purchase the stock.
 “We are in discussions with a potential buyer and if we can get the right price we will go ahead and sell it” A group led by China Minmetals is nearing an agreement to purchase Las Bambas for more than $5 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 The discount rate will be cut to 45 percent from 5 percent, and the repurchase rate will be lowered to 5 percent from 55 percent, the central bank’s monetary policy head Nguyen Thi Hong said at a briefing in Hanoi today.
 The central bank last cut the refinancing rate in May 2013 and the repurchase rate in July after devaluing the currency to help boost exports.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Alsea SAB will push back a planned stock offering to help fund its purchase of the Vips restaurant chain after the Mexican government placed conditions on the takeover, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Alsea is working to complete the purchase of Vips for 82 billion pesos in a deal agreed upon last year.
 The loan will be subtracted from the purchase price.
 agreed to pay $33 million to settle allegations that it conspired with other makers of picture tubes used in televisions and computers to fix prices and overcharge buyers, lawyers for purchasers of the products said.
 Thousands of direct purchasers of the picture tubes would be eligible for settlement funds under the accord.
 Rolls-Royce, Europe’s largest maker of commercial jet engines, said it has ample liquidity to fund the purchase using existing cash and borrowing facilities.
 The purchase price of $39 a share for EPL stockholders represents a 34 percent premium over the company’s closing price yesterday, according to a statement today.
 The media company, which recently purchased wireless spectrum for C$233 million in a government auction and may become Canada’s fourth national mobile phone carrier, is scheduled to report fourth-quarter earnings tomorrow.
 The shipping company, which owns 33 tankers for carrying refined fuels, planned to use the proceeds of the IPO to contribute to the purchase of 10 new ships, according to its prospectus.
 lost 3 percent as gold tumbled the most in six weeks after the Fed’s decision to reduce asset purchases.
 “Being reminded that the Fed will eventually raise rates is getting traders’ attention” By keeping its benchmark interest-rate target near zero and conducting three rounds of asset purchases, the Fed has helped push the S&P 500 up as much as 178 percent from a 12-year low as US.
 The central bank said it would trim its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion, to $55 billion.
 Benchmark indexes extended losses as Yellen said the quantitative easing program would end this fall if the Fed continues to taper purchases in measured steps.
 Moonves will “see what else is available in the content space” for purchase by CBS in addition to retiring stock.
 ESPN, the sports cable network controlled by Walt Disney Co, acquired Silver’s site in July, joining other media companies investing in online content, including NBC Universal’s backing of technology blog Re/code last year and Time Warner Inc’s purchase of the sports site Bleacher Report in 2012.
 Warburg rejected RBC’s offer to provide some of the purchase financing.
 in a $211 billion purchase by rival Kinder Morgan Inc.
 Mollenkopf ultimately concluded that Qualcomm’s prospects warranted a home purchase.
 KPN has noted the purchase, said Stefan Simons, a spokesman who declined to comment further.
 He also used the cash element of his bonus to purchase 23,503 shares in the company.
 The purchase gives Vodafone 19 million customers in Spain, complementing its mobile service and helping it challenge Telefonica SA and Orange SA.
 Melrose will be looking for its next purchase at an international manufacturing engineering business, most probably based in the US.
 “Key will be the next purchase which does not appear to be on the cards just yet” Numis cut its rating to sell from hold “purely short-term on valuation grounds,” he said.
 That will herald a necessity for companies to adapt the way they sell, she said, adding that “the whole retail environment we see today could start to change” While creating a website and putting in place systems to package and deliver purchases may have been costly to set up, it could be less expensive than the price of buying space to promote brands in a supermarket, Blackholly said.
 Atlas, which announced the Edwards purchase in August, already said that Edwards shareholders may get as much as $1050 a share depending on financial results.
 The deal was one of several acquisitions last year, including Shandong Rock Drilling Tools Co, and Leten said he’s planning more purchases to expand into new markets.
 While many investments made by peers such as Terra Firma Capital Partners Ltd’s 45 billion-pound purchase of music group EMI and Apax Partners LLP’s 275 million-pound purchase of Incisive Media Ltd.
 won final federal regulatory clearance for its $12 billion purchase of Leap Wireless International Inc, adding customers and spectrum to the second-largest US.
 Interest in mergers continues, with Japanese billionaire Masayoshi Son, chairman of Tokyo-based SoftBank Corp, considering a purchase of fourth-largest US.
 Caterpillar and its Swiss subsidiary entered into an agreement that let the Swiss company purchase parts from third-party suppliers and sell them to dealers outside the US, removing Caterpillar itself from the “legal title chain” of the transactions.
 The pension challenge, inherited through the $17 billion purchase of Imperical Chemical Industries Plc in 2008, has absorbed Nichols’ time in his final months in charge.
 The Federal Reserve is forecast to cut its monthly bond purchases to $55 billion at its March 18-19 meeting.
 The central bank in January reduced monthly bond purchases to $65 billion, citing labor-market indicators that “were mixed but on balance showed further improvement” Data continued mixed this week, with producer prices in the US.
 are set for a fee bonanza with both banks playing roles on the sale of Vivendi SA’s French wireless unit, and Vodafone Group Plc’s purchase of a Spanish cable company.
 If completed, the SFR purchase will be the second-largest globally this year, and the two transactions could generate as much as $173 million in advisory fees for Morgan Stanley, JP Morgan and other banks, according to estimates from New York-based research firm Freeman & Co.
 Deals in technology, media and telecommunications continue to drive overall activity, with five of the top 10 being in that space, including the proposed SFR purchase, the data show.
 by purchases, reduced its travel services staff last year as consumers and businesses relied more on digital technology for bookings.
 unit followed with its own filing today, saying it approved the repurchase of as much as $300 million in stock.
 The narrower shortfall last quarter was driven by a decline in the trade deficit as merchandise exports picked up and imports moderated, particularly gold purchases, the RBI said.
 The proceeds of the dollar bond sale will be used to purchase a portion of the 925 percent notes due 2020 and 9 percent bonds due 2018.
 Playing Offense Reaction to the $2 billion purchase of Oculus VR Inc, which makes virtual-reality goggles, centers on the theme that Facebook has turned to offense.
 Twitter has been more conservative with its checkbook: a $36 million purchase of 900 patents from International Business Machines Corp.
 “Perhaps Oculus accomplishes this sooner and allows them to bring something to market faster than they could have otherwise” While the deal for Oculus is a “long shot with an eye-popping valuation,” according to Cantor Fitzgerald, analysts led by Youssef Squali “we remain impressed with management’s intense focus on trying to position Facebook for the next computing platform” Here’s something else that’s eye-popping about Facebook’s purchase of Oculus: though analysts from big banks may be itching for catalysts to prove their bullishness right, you can’t accuse any of a conflict of interest in sizing up this acquisition.
 12 said it would purchase an 833 percent stake in FC Bayern for 110 million euros to equal holdings by Adidas and Audi, which are all based in the club’s home state of Bavaria.
 Bank of England Governor Mark Carney said the institution will not sell all of the 375 billion pounds ($622 billion) of gilts it bought under its asset-purchase plan.
 sold 3 billion pounds of new securities due in 2024 this week, while the Bank of England reinvested 405 billion pounds of funds related to their asset-purchase program.
 Phillips 66 purchased 204 million barrels at an average price of $10023 a barrel.
 Exxon purchased 500,000 barrels for $9768.
 MissPERS filed its own suit after a judge said Wyoming couldn’t press claims over certificates that state hadn’t purchased.
 The data-storage business -- which Symantec entered in 2005 with its purchase of Veritas Software Corp.
 The central bank also maintained its limit for asset purchases at 375 billion pounds.
 Commodities traders including Glencore Xstrata Plc and Vitol SA use credit lines for day-to-day trading, regularly drawing and repaying the loans over short periods to finance the purchase and delivery of assets.
 Intu will purchase a mall in the English city of Derby and the Sprucefield retail park in Northern Ireland, as well as a 50 percent stake in the Westfield Merry Hill center near Birmingham, the London-based company said in a statement today.
 Underwriters have the option to purchase an additional 398 million shares, ING US.
 The company’s purchase of airwaves positioned it to expand beyond its home of Quebec and compete nationally with BCE Inc, Telus Corp.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Emirates, the world’s biggest airline by international passenger traffic, is seeking to raise about $2 billion from four loans to fund the purchase of planes, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 by reducing its debt purchases.
 RBS Recommendation In the US, signs of stronger growth prompted Fed policy makers to trim monthly bond purchases by $10 billion at each of its past two meetings, curbing demand for Treasuries.
 In February, the company said it had more than $22 billion remaining under its repurchase authorization.
 The separate stocks will allow shareholders to split into two groups: “those who covet Liberty-led cable consolidation, and those who prefer Sirius-fueled levered equity share repurchases,” Barton Crockett, an analyst at FBR & Co, wrote in a report today.
 The purchase comes as stock markets in much of Europe bounce back from the slump following the financial crisis triggered in 2008 by the collapse of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 The pickup in shipments from mid-year will help overseas purchases over 2014 match the 825 metric tons imported in 2013, Kalyanaraman, chairman of the Thrissur-India based Kalyan Jewellers Ltd, said in an interview.
 She’s seeking to proceed on behalf of anyone who made a debit or credit-card purchase at the store from July 16 to Oct.
 Most of the original purchasers were hedge funds, and first-day trading in the bonds exceeded $5 billion.
 Sale documents stipulate a $100,000 floor for purchases that also applies to trading after the securities price, said two people with knowledge of the sale who requested anonymity without authorization to speak publicly.
 “These are intended for institutional purchasers, or at least for people that can afford the risk by making it a minimum denomination of $100,000,” said Martha Haines, who led the Securities and Exchange Commission’s Municipal Securities office from 2001 to 2011.
 ‘‘An issuer may feel that due to the risk of default, lack of publicly disseminated disclosure or other concerns, that the securities may not be appropriate for those retail investors who would likely purchase amounts below the minimum denomination,’’ Lynnette Kelly, MSRB’s executive director, said in an e-mailed statement.
 He used $360,000 in cash and a loan to purchase the $880,000 home in Los Angeles in August.
 Hebner financed the purchase of his five-bedroom, four-bath home and a $265,000 renovation with a loan from Los Angeles-based Arixa that covered three-fourths of his costs.
 homes within six months of purchase last year, up 20 percent from 2012 and 134 percent from 2011, according to property-data firm RealtyTrac.
 They cover as much as 90 percent of purchase costs and 80 percent of renovation expenses, said Robert Wasmund, a senior managing director at the Los Angeles-based firm.
 Most of the financing goes to small investors, including those who purchase bank-owned foreclosures sold at auctions Genesis conducts for Bank of America Corp.
 While Dwell originates bridge loans for purchase and improvements, its focus is five- and 10-year debt for landlords because rentals provide a more reliable revenue stream than flipping, said Gregor Watson, co-founder of San Francisco-based Dwell.
 Flippers averaged a 31 percent gross price increase per home, based on average purchase price of $189,472, the firm said.
 American depositary receipts of Youku gained 33 percent to $2867 after NetEase said on its website that Tencent will pay at least $300 million in cash to purchase shares of the Beijing-based company, citing three unidentified people familiar with the discussions.
 The unit’s Obamacare work can be traced back to UnitedHealth’s 2012 purchase of Quality Software Services Inc, a Maryland-based technology company that had an open-ended contract for technological services with the US.
 Baidu Inc, owner of China’s biggest search engine, purchased a 59 percent stake in Renren’s Nuomicom in August, about a month after announcing it will acquire 91 Wireless Websoft Ltd.
 The purchase gives Newbury, England-based Vodafone 19 million customers in Spain, complementing its mobile service and helping it challenge Telefonica SA and Orange SA.
 The Fed Open Market Committee will further scale back its bond-buying program at its two-day meeting that ends today, reducing purchases for the third time by $10 billion to a $55 billion monthly rate, according to the median estimate of 54 economists surveyed by Bloomberg from March 14-17.
 The group, whose other members weren’t identified, will focus on security issues that address in-store and online purchases.
 Networks are also pushing retailers to use “tokenization,” where some account information is replaced with a digital ID for online and mobile purchases.
 Hindustan Petroleum Corp, India’s third-largest state refiner, is seeking to at least double the interest-free credit period for crude purchases from Saudi Arabia and Kuwait to 60 days, BK.
 “Countries like Saudi Arabia and Kuwait are as much concerned about competition from Iran as from the US” Credit Terms Indian Oil Corp, the nation’s biggest refiner, is in talks with some Middle East suppliers, including Saudi Arabia and Kuwait, to increase the credit period for crude purchases to 60 days, its Finance Director PK.
 That might force them to increase the amount of their own money used for purchases, potentially hurting returns.
 The broadly syndicated market is being driven by the influx of cash from these investors, which are forced to purchase assets, and the increased investor appetite allows deals to be marketed more aggressively, with higher leverage and fewer covenants, he said.
 The central bank imposed limits on foreign-currency purchases last month, before Yanukovych’s ouster, after interventions failed to alleviate pressure on the hryvnia.
 Ukraine needs $62 billion in the second quarter to service its foreign-currency denominated debt, repay gas arrears and purchase gas, according to Bilan at Dragon Capital.
 It reduced the repurchase rate to 5 percent from 55 percent.
 18 it would trim its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, before cutting by another $10 billion in January.
 The purchases are designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and spur economic growth.
 Foreigners are slowing their purchases of US.
 Fed Purchases With the Fed moving to end its own debt purchases this year, the willingness of US.
 debt purchases last year, increasing their holdings by $2282 billion, or 41 percent, the least in seven years.
 ‘Real Problem’ The Fed has cut purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed debt by $10 billion at each of its past three meeting this year and economists in a Bloomberg survey forecast the bank will end its monetary stimulus by year-end.
 Even though foreigners have slowed their purchases of US.
 In advanced nations, the impact of the Fed’s asset purchases was less strong, said the report by ECB economists Marco Lo Duca, Giulio Nicoletti and Ariadna Vidal Martinez.
 Economists say the Federal Open Market Committee will cut monthly bond purchases to $55 billion and end its 65 percent jobless-rate threshold for borrowing cost increases, according to Bloomberg surveys.
 Policy makers will cut monthly bond purchases to $55 billion from $65 billion, according to the median estimate of economists.
 Spain’s bonds were also supported as HSBC Holdings Plc recommended investors purchase the nation’s 10-year securities at an auction tomorrow.
 Vagit Alekperov, chief executive officer at oil producer OAO Lukoil and Russia’s 11th-wealthiest man, has stepped up his purchases of the stock, buying $147 million in the first quarter, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Lukoil Purchases Alekperov’s purchases of Lukoil stocks in the current quarter compares with a total of $93 million in the same period last year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 He said in an interview that upon learning of Judge’s death, he sent a note to colleagues saying that “he was our leader, our mentor and our friend, and without him we would not be here today” Today’s AT&T Inc, based in Dallas, resulted from the 2005 purchase of AT&T by SBC Communications Inc.
 Qatar Air“will not be rushed into taking investments in airlines in bitsand pieces,” said, adding of Etihad’s purchases that: “Eachairline in our region has a different strategy” Qatar Airways has never considered taking stakes in Indiancarriers such as budget operator SpiceJet Ltd.
 LightSquared also alleged in a lawsuit that the debt purchases were improper because Ergen concealed that he was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish.
 “Dish would purchase spectrum it felt was strategically important to it, and at the right price,” Ergen said.
 About $1 billion will be repurchased by the end of March, Liveris said today.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Taiwan is delaying approval of CTBC Financial Holding Co’s planned 52 billion-yen ($505 million) purchase of Japan’s Tokyo Star Bank Ltd.
 CTBC Financial in October announced proposed purchases of Taiwan Life Insurance Co.
 WPP Acquisitions The fund currently owns a stake in Caixin Media Co, and was part of a group which purchased Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc’s minority stake in Star China TV in January.
 approved a plan to repurchase as many as 100 million shares over three years, an option it has said it’s unlikely to use.
 The company probably won’t repurchase stock for the next two to three years, Chief Financial Officer Fran Shammo said last month.
 With construction lending tight and memories fresh of speculators who walked away when mortgage financing dried up, builders are funding projects with cash commitments from buyers of as much as 60 percent of the purchase price.
 “When the music stops, everything will be real and paid for” Rilea broke ground on the British-themed project in January after 60 percent of the apartments had been sold to buyers who agreed to put down half of the purchase price.
 Within a month of starting sales, more than 70 percent of the units were under contract to buyers who put down half of the $250,000-plus purchase price, Carlos Melo said.
 Those loans almost always require purchasers to have 50 percent equity in the deal, he said.
 On Sunny Isles Beach, a buyer interested in the Mansions at Acqualina’s Palazzo D’Oro penthouse would have to put down half of the purchase price, listed at $55 million, said Michael Goldstein, who oversees sales and marketing for the project, built by local developers Jules and Edmond Trump.
 That dual-tower complex holds New York’s price record for a completed apartment purchase, at $88 million.
 18 it would trim its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, before cutting by another $10 billion in January.
 The purchases are designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and spur economic growth.
 The mobile app, Pounce, lets shoppers make purchases by using their phones to scan images in print advertisements.
 Regulations implemented this year, which ban or restrict the purchase of some items by credit card, have succeeded in curtailing such lending.
 Caterpillar’s sales fell 16 percent in 2013 as mining customers reduced purchases of shovels and trucks used to dig up and haul coal, iron ore and copper.
 The shares reached a record 4729 pesos last week and have jumped 12 percent since March 14, when Credit Suisse called the Vips purchase a “strategic milestone” that will bring cost savings through greater scale.
 The $27 billion cosmetics giant is on the verge of its longest stretch without a purchase in at least 19 years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The company has expanded by buying smaller names instead of developing its own lines, including the purchases of closely held Smashbox four years ago and Aveda Corp.
 The repurchase can take place from today until April 14, CSN said.
 The following five- to 10-year transitional phase will see the Nigerian Bulk Electricity Trading Plc, which acts as a clearing house for power-generating and distribution companies, guarantee all purchases.
 Tiffany’s board also authorized the repurchase of $300 million in shares.
 Hungarians held 175 trillion forint ($77 billion) of mortgages at the end of January and an additional 16 trillion forint in foreign-currency home-equity loans, which can be used for purchases other than housing, according to central bank data.
 The company said this week that an affiliate, Caesars Growth Partners, is seeking to raise $2 billion in debt to finance a deal to purchase four casinos from Caesars Entertainment Operating Co, the company’s most-heavily indebted unit.
 The purchase included corporate non-performing loans with an outstanding principal balance of about 726 million reais and distressed assets totaling roughly 854 million reais originated by Lehman’s fixed-income desk.
 They are also pushing retailers to use “tokenization,” where some account information is replaced with a digital ID for online and mobile purchases.
 The People’s Bank of China sold 20 billion yuan ($32 billion) of 28-day repurchase agreements at a yield of 4 percent and 32 billion yuan of 14-day repos at 38 percent, according to a statement on its website today.
 last year for about $350 million in a deal that added real-time bidding to the microblogging service’s ad platform, people with knowledge of the purchase said in September.
 economy would end this fall should the central bank, which reduced monthly bond purchases by another $10 billion to $55 billion, continue to taper in measured steps.
 There will be “considerable time” between the end of the asset purchases and the first rate increase, meaning “six months or that type of thing,” she said.
 The hedge fund said in a November filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it purchased 23 million shares of Boise, Idaho-based Micron, a maker of memory chips, in the third quarter.
 interest rates may start to rise “around six months” after the Federal Reserve halts bond purchases introduced to stimulate growth, Chair Janet Yellen said yesterday.
 The Tempe, Arizona, based company expects to begin production this year on a product for rooftops through its TetraSun unit, purchased in April.
 airspace needs some level of FAA approval” Wolf, ESPN Even before the ruling, the FAA was struggling to police the commercial use of drones that anyone can purchase online or at hobby shops.
 “They have good brands, they’re very well-known but that would be a very large purchase price,” Scott Rostan, founder of New York-based Training The Street, which teaches new hires at investment banks how to structure mergers and acquisitions, said in a phone interview.
 The company also expects to begin making polysilicon panels by the end of this year through the TetraSun unit it purchased in April.
 “The companies that are taking share are the companies that have some mobile, digital platform -- Papa John’s, Domino’s, Starbucks, Dunkin’” Loyalty Program Starbucks’s loyalty program entices diners by offering free beverages, food and refills in return for points they’ve accumulated from purchases.
 While the failed bid included an agreement to have rival Iliad SA buy parts of Bouygues’s phone business to preempt antitrust concerns, Iliad is open to discussing a purchase of the entire Bouygues Telecom unit, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The closing of Numericable’s SFR purchase is also likely to play a role in decisions about Bouygues Telecom.
 Diageo, the world’s biggest distiller, acquired Whyte & Mackay last year when it purchased control of its Indian parent, United Spirits Ltd.
 Including debt of $968 million, the purchase would be valued at $26 billion, or 105 times estimated earnings, slightly above other recent TV deals, according to Paul Sweeney, a Bloomberg Industries analyst.
 “They’ve got good TV stations and a growing digital business” Tribune acquired Local TV Holdings LLC’s 19 TV stations for $273 billion in December, the same month Gannett closed its $15 billion purchase of Belo Corp.
 MF Global said that PwC incorrectly told MF Global it could account for debt investments made through “repurchase-to-maturity” transactions as sales, allowing the firm to immediately book the revenue rather than record it on the books as secured financings.
 Energy Future was purchased in 2007 in the largest leveraged buyout in history, and ran into trouble as natural gas prices tumbled.
 KKR agreed to take a 499 percent stake in Avincis -- then known as World Helicopters -- in 2010, leaving the majority holding with Investindustrial, which took control of the business in 2005 via the purchase of Spain-based Grupo Inaer.
 Services Spending Adjusting the data for inflation, which generates the figures used to calculate gross domestic product, purchases rose 03 percent after decreasing 01 percent in December.
 Household purchases toward the end of last year were less robust than previously estimated, revised Commerce Department data issued on Feb.
 Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen last week said the central bank is likely to keep trimming asset purchases, even as it monitors recent reports to “try to get a firmer handle on exactly how much of that set of soft data can be explained by weather and what portion, if any, is due to softer outlook” Policy makers anticipate that “economic activity and employment will expand at a moderate pace this year,” she said to the Senate Banking Committee on Feb.
 The Fed flunked Citigroup and four other banks on March 26, blocking the company’s plan to quintuple its quarterly dividend to 5 cents a share and repurchase as much as $64 billion of its stock.
 after American Water Works Co, purchased the Penn Township wastewater system in Chester County.
 Matt Carter, Sprint’s president of enterprise solutions, oversees about 130 of these wholesale phone-service customers that purchase capacity on Sprint’s network.
 The seven-day repurchase rate fixing snapped an 11-day gain, the longest rising streak since October 2007.
 dollar-denominated costs, debt and equipment purchases, all of which increase with the depreciation of the Canadian dollar,” Bill Wolfe, an analyst at Moody’s, said in a statement from the ratings company.
 The purchase is the biggest by Temasek, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, and gives the Singapore state-owned investment company a stake in a business with more than 10,000 stores worldwide.
 Dealers have sought to block Tesla’s operations in New Jersey, New York, Ohio and other states, saying that laws requiring people to purchase from their franchises encourage price competition and give customers an advocate.
 The British engineering firm was purchased 14 years later for about $45 billion by Onex and Canada Pension.
 Consumer purchases, which account for almost 70 percent of the economy, advanced at a 33 percent in the fourth quarter, the most since the last three months of 2010 and surpassing the 26 percent gain previously reported, according to today’s Commerce Department report.
 The purchase equaled about 2,700 percent of the average daily volume traded for the bond in the previous four months, according to the FCA.
 Policy makers, who will next gather March 18-19, have indicated they plan to taper purchases by $10 billion at each meeting absent a weakening in the economy.
 Bond purchases have pushed up the Fed’s balance sheet to a record $417 trillion.
 Car sales in Europe have gained for at least five consecutive months as the improving economy, which has expanded for three straight quarters after a record-long recession, spurs consumers to purchase new vehicles.
 The purchase made Rosneft the world’s largest traded oil producer by volume.
 Attorney’s Office in Manhattan related to National City Bank, the Cleveland-based subprime home lender PNC purchased in 2008.
 The government-backed curbs limit credit card repayments to nine months and ban installment purchases of mobile phones, jewelry, food and gasoline purchases to narrow the current account deficit, one of the Turkish economy’s main vulnerabilities.
 Contracts to purchase existing homes rose less than forecast in January, climbing 01 percent after a 58 percent decline the previous month, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 SMA’s 2012 purchase of a majority stake in China’s Jiangsu Zeversolar will help it win access to the Asian country’s market, Urbon said last year.
 “The question is how long it will last” The ruble rally may come under pressure if the Finance Ministry returns with purchases of foreign currency for the Reserve Fund as the ruble strengthens beyond 36 per dollar, Maxim Korovin and Anton Nikitin, analysts at ZAO VTB Capital in Moscow, said in an e-mailed note.
 Scrapped Auction The Finance Ministry suspended its purchases on March 4 after spending only 38 billion rubles out of 212 billion rubles planned, saying it didn’t see economic sense in buying above the level of 36 rubles per dollar.
 Asian importers typically purchase fewer spot shipments in April and May on decreasing heating and power demand during spring in the northern hemisphere.
 With construction lending tight and memories fresh of speculators who walked away when mortgage financing dried up, builders are funding projects with cash commitments from buyers of as much as 60 percent of the purchase price.
 “When the music stops, everything will be real and paid for” Rilea broke ground on the British-themed project in January after 60 percent of the apartments had been sold to buyers who agreed to put down half of the purchase price.
 Within a month of starting sales, more than 70 percent of the units were under contract to buyers who put down half of the $250,000-plus purchase price, Carlos Melo said.
 Those loans almost always require purchasers to have 50 percent equity in the deal, he said.
 On Sunny Isles Beach, a buyer interested in the Mansions at Acqualina’s Palazzo D’Oro penthouse would have to put down half of the purchase price, listed at $55 million, said Michael Goldstein, who oversees sales and marketing for the project, built by local developers Jules and Edmond Trump.
 That dual-tower complex holds New York’s price record for a completed apartment purchase, at $88 million.
 A key indicator is net new money from investors -- or fund purchases minus redemptions.
 Blackstone Group LP purchased SeaWorld from Anheuser-Busch Cos.
 Existing customers of KT and LG Uplus can purchase the device under certain conditions, the companies said.
 Yields on Treasury securities jumped as the report probably also means Federal Reserve policy makers will continue to trim monthly bond purchases aimed at spurring growth.
 equities this month entered its sixth year, with the S&P 500 surging as much as 178 percent from its 2009 low, as three rounds of bond purchases from the Fed helped fuel economic growth in the past 11 quarters.
 “Baseball is a sport that demands a lot from its consumers and a reminder that baseball is in the marketplace every single day in the places where people shop is a critical element and a great benefit to us” Church & Dwight has purchased the right to use MLB logos across both household products brands on packaging, websites and signs.
 Industry reports this week showed the UK’s services and manufacturing industries expanded more in February than economists forecast, and mortgage approvals for home purchases jumped in January to the most since November 2007.
 The Bank of England yesterday kept interest rates at a record low and held its bond-purchase stimulus program at 375 billion pounds.
 Analysts also forecast no change in the central bank’s asset-purchase target.
 The purchase will give NRG coal-burning power plants in the Midwest that may boost revenue if natural gas prices rebound, Travis Miller, an analyst for Morningstar Inc, said last year.
 economy was strong enough to withstand measured reductions to the central bank’s monthly bond purchases.
 The peso has weakened more than 8 percent since May 22, when the Fed signaled it would trim its monthly bond purchases as the economy improves.
 The ruble has depreciated 97 percent against the dollar this year, the second-worst performance among 24 emerging-market peers tracked by Bloomberg after Argentina’s peso, amid the Ukraine tensions and as the Federal Reserve scales back its asset-purchase program.
 They purchased $20 billion last year.
 Moynihan’s firm didn’t ask for a dividend increase in 2012 and got a $5 billion share repurchase program approved last year.
 The company’s loyalty program entices diners with free beverages, food and refills after earning and accumulating points from purchases.
 Lenders granted 70,309 loans for house purchase, compared with a downwardly revised 76,753 in January, the Bank of England said in London today.
 Shrinking Profits America Movil’s margins in Mexico have already been shrinking as the company sells smartphones at a discount to lure long-term subscribers, even as expenses rise to purchase the phones.
 The slide in Buffett’s newspapers represents the first full yearly comparison of his newspaper empire, which has been expanding since late 2011 with the $200 million purchase of his hometown daily, the Omaha World-Herald.
 The 38-year-old hedge fund partner was the mastermind of Perry Capital LLC’s 2010 purchase of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac preferred shares at 2 cents on the dollar.
 In February, Fortress said it repurchased a 12 percent interest from Nomura for $3634 million.
 It plans to use proceeds of the sale to boost its stake in Germany’s Team Internet AG to 70 percent and purchase the outstanding 20 percent of its Mexican subsidiary, it said.
 at the beginning of last year, opening up the North American market, and purchased Tel Aviv-based Adquant’s social advertising agency in October.
 Like its peers, American Eagle is struggling as teens and parents pull back on apparel purchases with no major fashion trend to drive purchases.
 A persistent slowing in the costs of goods and services raises the risk that economies slip into a reinforcing deflationary spiral of falling prices as consumers and businesses put off purchases and investment.
 Last weekend alone, he posted about alleged bribes to bank executives, domestic spying and the purchase with loaned money of a cargo ship named “Pretty” To contact the reporter on this story: Mehul Srivastava in London at msrivastava6@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Andrew J.
 Canadian Natural is counting on last month’s $286 billion purchase of mainly gas assets from Devon Energy Corp.
 This month, it purchased a Polish freelancing marketplace for a dollar sum in the “low six digits,” Barrie said.
 No one I talk to wants to take a chance adding bonds to the portfolio” Clients are trading less as the Federal Reserve slows its monthly asset purchases and leaves bond investors preparing for rising interest rates.
 That adds to Leucadia’s purchase last year of common stock that jumped more than 50 percent in value to $244 million by yesterday’s close.
 is seeking to cut spot purchases of LNG as the world’s biggest commercial buyer of the fuel seeks to shield itself from a potential supply squeeze amid the country’s power shortages.
 The Seongnam, South Korea-based company will also reduce spot purchases to about 5 percent of its total imports by 2020, he said.
 “It’s too risky to rely on spot purchases in times of urgent disruptions to the country’s energy mix” Kogas distributes gas to utilities in South Korea, where power consumption is almost twice the average of nations in the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development relative to the size of its economy.
 “When it’s liquefied and transported to Korea, the cost of shale gas may not be too appealing” Gas from unconventional sources such as shale formations may account for 10 million tons of Kogas’ purchases by 2020 if demand reaches its maximum projected level of 50 million tons, Jang said.
 ANA’s 70-plane purchase yesterday tilted toward Boeing, with the US.
 The purchase of those models, the newest offerings from the planemaker’s single-aisle jet family, is ANA’s first from Airbus since ordering A320s in the 1990s.
 Boeing has long dominated sales of single- and twin-aisle planes in Japan, adding urgency to its pursuit of the ANA order after Japan Airlines Co’s first-ever Airbus purchase in 2013.
 He cited the gap between the two measurements as a reason to buy back the company’s stock if it trades for less than 120 percent of book value, and said he’d be “aggressive” with repurchases.
 “If you have an industry with pretty high overcapacity and if you have companies that have too much debt, at some point they should be allowed to default” India’s BSE Sensex Index jumped 38 percent, its best weekly gain since April 2013, after data showed overseas funds extended purchases of local shares ahead of general elections that start next month.
 The purchase is set to be announced on March 26 when a Chinese state delegation visits Europe, said the people, who asked not to be identified because details are still being negotiated.
 Though Chinese airlines often disclose their own purchases, many aren’t firmed up until the government itself signs off.
 The Pentagon purchases launch services from United Launch Alliance, including the Atlas and Boeing Delta models that use different engines.
 The purchase will accelerate DBS’s growth by increasing its high-net-worth assets under management by more than 20 percent, the bank said.
 DBS is hoping to retain Societe Generale clients with a combined $10 billion of assets with the purchase, Tan Su Shan, the lender’s head of consumer banking and wealth management, told reporters in Singapore today.
 Critical Factors The price of DBS’s purchase as a percentage of the Societe Generale unit’s assets compares with an industry average for a similar wealth-management business of 147 percent, according to Scorpio’s Dovey.
 “These three factors are critical to clients” When Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, DBS’s Singaporean rival, purchased ING Groep NV’s Asian private-banking business in 2009 for $146 billion, it paid 58 percent of the target’s assets under management, Jim Antos, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Mizuho Securities Asia Ltd, wrote in a report today.
 No Extensions Government agencies that don’t make such minimum purchases usually extend contracts rather than cancel them, said Rob Burton, a partner at the law firm Venable LLP and deputy administrator of the Office of Federal Procurement Policy under President George W.
 As part of the complex, two-part transaction, Chairman Samin Tan has purchased the Bakries’ stake in ARMS, increasing his holding to 476 percent.
 Potential offerings may also be getting postponed as companies and investors gauge the impact the Fed’s tapering of bond purchases would have on global currencies and equities.
 Foreign investors bought $440 million more Indian stocks than they sold this year through March 3, compared with a net purchase of $84 billion in the same period in 2013, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 ‘Bad Image’ The Bakrie family, a palm oil-to-property empire founded in Sumatra in 1942, rose from collapse in the 1998 Asian financial crisis with the purchase of coal mines from BHP Billiton Ltd, Rio Tinto Plc and BP Plc.
 In announcing the purchase, Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg touted virtual reality as the next big computing platform after mobile.
 Not all virtual-reality creators are as optimistic about Facebook’s purchase of Oculus, which only recently began selling an updated version of the Rift headset to developers for $350.
 External Growth The CEO ruled out acquisitions in Italy, saying he may consider some purchases abroad.
 “A drop in net fossil fuel demand may put pressure on California oil refiners’ margins in the coming seven years” Fuel demand in California has already dropped by more than 3 billion gallons a year since 2002 as consumers drove fewer miles and purchased more efficient vehicles, BNEF said.
 ‘Continue Tapering’ The better-than-forecast jobs report last week bolstered speculation the Federal Reserve will continue to trim the monthly bond purchases it makes under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy, designed to support the economy and keep borrowing costs low.
 Indirect bidders, the investor class that includes central banks outside the US, purchased 42 percent of the securities.
 ETF Flows Policy makers have reduced the monthly debt purchases by $10 billion a month in January and February, to $65 billion.
 A separate report showed that purchases of new homes in the US.
 Exchange-traded funds that focus on lower-rated munis purchased the debt.
 As part of the new purchase agreement, Tiger Air canceled existing orders for nine A320s as the new model, powered by Pratt & Whitney engines, will help the company save about S$40 million ($31 million) a year on fuel.
 Purchase Option Telefonica said in a statement today it had taken no decision regarding the purchase option expiring March 12.
 During Hollande’s visit to China in April, Beijing announced the purchase of 60 Airbus planes.
 Treasuries, which seemed like a no-brainer after the Federal Reserve began tapering its bond purchase in December, also proved ill-advised in the first quarter.
 The yen plunged 11 percent against the dollar in the period and declined 17 percent versus the euro amid Prime Minister Abe’s stimulus policies backed by about 7 trillion yen in monthly bond purchases by the Bank of Japan.
 Breedens Investments Pte on March 14 said it proposed to purchase Olam in a deal that values one of the world’s top three coffee and rice traders at S$53 billion ($42 billion).
 Greenland’s purchase of the former Sydney water board office for A$1075 million, and the acquisition of two buildings overlooking the city’s Hyde Park by Far East and pension fund CBUS Super for A$143 million and A$59 million respectively were among last year’s biggest transactions for conversion, according to Colliers.
 Soros Fund Management was ranked sixth among 95 investors or investment funds for the amount of shares purchased in the 13 billion-euro ($18 billion) offering, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the information isn’t public.
 “Our shareholders are far wealthier today than they would be if the funds we used for acquisitions had instead been devoted to share repurchases or dividends” Berkshire’s board also urged shareholders to reject a proposal that it set goals for reducing greenhouse gas and other emissions by its energy businesses.
 The companies had planned to complete the agreement by yesterday to purchase the stake for as much as $26 billion.
 With the purchase of a coffee, customers can also buy two of the pastries for $129, she said.
 The measure of consumers’ personal finances improved to a 10-week high of 51 from 5, while the index measuring whether it’s a good time to make purchases fell to minus 415 from minus 39.
 “We will be very judicious” While purchases may be necessary to lure technology investors looking for growth, buying companies has not been a strength of Hewlett-Packard’s over the past half decade.
 Both spent more on buybacks last year than Hewlett-Packard paid in dividends and repurchases combined.
 Investor concern about the Federal Reserve’s schedule for scaling back its bond purchases, Russia’s recent annexation of Crimea and possible weakness in first-quarter earnings reports have introduced a “healthy cautiousness” into the market, said John Carey, a portfolio manager at Pioneer Investment Management Inc.
 Buyback, Dividend GAM Holding said it has repurchased 74 percent of the maximum 413 million shares it expects to buy back by April 17 as part of a three-year initiative.
 The company plans a new program to repurchase about 10 percent of shares over as many as three years, beginning once the current buyback expires.
 in 1999 to expand in electronic markets and algorithmic trading, JPMorgan’s predecessor, Chase Manhattan Corp, purchased the UK’s Robert Fleming Holdings Ltd.
 Toyota will repurchase as many as 60 million shares, equivalent to a 19 percent stake, for 360 billion yen ($35 billion), according to a statement yesterday.
 phone company, approved a plan to repurchase 300 million shares, or about 6 percent of its outstanding stock.
 Bitcoin Network The Bitcoin network uses a public ledger to record transactions made under pseudonyms, a technological breakthrough that allows purchases and sales without using a trusted third party, such as Visa Inc.
 That compares with a 434 percent top rate on property sold within a year of purchase and the 396 percent top rate that applies to other types of income.
 Dah Sing Banking had surged 31 percent since June 30, while its parent rose 14 percent, as investors bet that a rival seeking to benefit from Hong Kong’s role in cross-border financing may seek to purchase the bank.
 A drop in the cap rate, which is a property’s net income divided by the purchase price, usually signals an increase in real estate prices.
 and Hyundai Capital America, a US-based unit of Hyundai Motor, raised a combined $2 billion in the quarter, drawing purchases from companies including the maker of the iPod.
 Federal Reserve cuts its asset-purchase program, there will be a greater differentiation in the credit performance of some individual countries and sectors, Moody’s said in a Mar.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Facebook Inc’s purchase of WhatsApp Inc.
 Clients canceled purchases of 296 million reais in the fourth quarter, equivalent to 24 percent of gross sales, the highest last year, according to a regulatory filing.
 Reuters reported that FXCM and a subsidiary purchased five trading desks and will take on 48 employees, while the rest of Infinium is being shut, citing an interview with Infinium President Mark Palchak, who didn’t respond to an e-mail or phone call from Bloomberg News.
 The purchase price includes about $119 million that Infinium owed FXCM, according to today’s press release.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- NanoH2O Inc, a manufacturer of reverse-osmosis membranes that purify seawater to drinking quality while lowering the cost of desalination, is being purchased by Seoul-based LG Chem Ltd.
 The purchase takes place amid record drought from California to southeast Asia and rising water-scarcity issues.
 Dimon’s Warning Wall Street’s clients are trading less as the Federal Reserve slows its monthly asset purchases and leaves bond investors preparing for rising interest rates.
 Pimco Allocation Pacific Investment Management Co, which runs the world’s biggest bond fund, purchased $8 billion of the debt while BlackRock Inc, the No.
 Even as the central bank has started slowing its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities, investors are still clamoring to buy corporate bonds in the face of an escalating crisis in Ukraine and volatility in emerging-markets currencies.
 Bernanke signaled in May that the central bank would start unwinding its unprecedented asset purchases.
 “Mando’s purchase of Halla E&C’s new shares through its unit Meister was to support its struggling parent company” Mando Chairman Chung Mong Won, a cousin of Hyundai Motor Co.
 “Their buying is tapering and yet home prices continue to go up at a pretty strong clip nationally -- even in markets where institutional buyers haven’t purchased a single home” American Homes 4 Rent, the largest publicly traded single-family landlord with about 25,000 houses, and Starwood Waypoint Residential Trust, a REIT headed by Barry Sternlicht, are the other two founding members of the association, which has retained the Glover Park Group, a Washington-based communications and government-relations firm.
 agreed last month to acquire Aurora Oil & Gas Ltd, while Devon closed a $6 billion purchase of closely held GeoSouthern Energy Corp’s resources in the region on Feb.
 While measures to rekindle lending and help banks are still on the table, including the release of cash linked to crisis-era bond purchases, Draghi’s main scenario is to let the recovery erode idle productive capacity and boost prices.
 in London, while its bond-purchase plan remained at 375 billion pounds ($627 billion).
 Halting the absorption of liquidity created by bond purchases under the ECB’s now-defunct Securities Markets Program may be a “compromise” solution, even though it will “help little in addressing alleged disinflation risks,” he said.
 “It is unwise for the council to go back on commitments it made in the past without an exceptionally good reason” Trichet said this week that pausing the operation is “certainly possible” Germany’s Bundesbank, whose presidents have opposed government-bond purchases and repeatedly warned of the risks they entail, said on Feb.
 Authorities also approved a deal for Etihad Airways PJSC to purchase a 24 percent stake in Jet Airways India Ltd.
 Many mobile games are free to download, with developers making money on in-app purchases and advertisements.
 Ardian, the former private equity unit of French insurer Axa SA, will part-finance the purchase with debt and plans to sell some of the holdings to its own investors, said the people who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The purchase would be Ardian’s second this month, following its agreement to buy $1 billion in buyout stakes from a division of General Electric Co.
 Cifu told Bloomberg News in May that Virtu would consider an IPO, about five months after he unsuccessfully tried to purchase Knight.
 Property sales will increase as Spain’s economy recovers from a five-year economic slump and banks seek to reduce the costs of holding the properties, said Fernando Acuna, founder of Aura Real Estate Experts, a company that advises investors on real estate purchases from Spanish banks.
 Investment in European property debt is set to rise to 40 billion euros this year as funds such as Apollo Global Management LLC and Cerberus Capital Management LP buy loans cheaply and financing for purchases becomes more readily available, Cushman & Wakefield said.
 Interest rates will stay low for a “considerable time” after asset purchases end, according to a Federal Open Market Committee statement.
 The Fed has been scaling back its large-scale bond purchases, announcing its first reduction to $75 billion from $85 billion on Dec.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP is slowing its purchases of houses to rent amid soaring prices after a buying binge made it the biggest US.
 “In addition, these companies have done this for a certain amount of time and there are lessons learned” While institutional purchases nationwide fell to a 22-month low in January, corporate investors were more active in the Atlanta region, buying 25 percent of homes sold, according to data firm RealtyTrac.
 “But the reality is that institutional buyers are in a relatively limited number of markets, their buying is tapering and yet home prices continue to go up at a pretty strong clip nationally -- even in markets where institutional buyers haven’t purchased a single home” American Homes At the height of its activity, Blackstone’s Invitation Homes LP made purchases that may have comprised as much as 6 percent of sales for several months in one or more of its 14 markets, Gray said.
 “It’s moving from a purchase model to a rental model -- subscriptions are essentially a rental,” said Jay Vleeschhouwer, an analyst at Griffin Securities, who has a buy rating on Adobe stock.
 There just hasn’t been a lot of meaningful profit yet” The acquisition is one of the biggest for Disney, the world’s largest entertainment company, since the $4 billion purchase of Lucasfilm Ltd.
 *** The potential for fire-sale liquidations of collateral in repurchase agreements could diminish pending an agreement by the biggest US.
 China will start canceling orders because it purchased more soybeans than it can use, and US.
 Costs may rise after the Federal Reserve halts bond purchases.
 Woodside, Australia’s second-largest oil producer, missed its March 27 deadline for completing the purchase of a stake in Leviathan.
 The company said in February it expects the purchase will add client assets toward the lower end of a target range of 57 billion francs to 72 billion francs, after 40 billion francs were booked and paid for last year.
 The Fed begins a two-day meeting tomorrow that analysts said will see policy makers further scale back bond-purchase stimulus.
 economy was strong enough to withstand measured reductions to the central bank’s monthly bond purchases.
 The Reserve Bank of South Africa unexpectedly lifted its benchmark repurchase rate 50 basis points to 55 percent on Jan.
 “Every potential purchaser knows how much ThyssenKrupp is standing with its back to the wall” The company’s construction-equipment business will continue to operate within the material services unit.
 The purchase underlines Cevian’s “long-term commitment” to the German company, the Swedish investor said in a separate statement.
 A planned sale of assets to complete the deal may produce cash for even more repurchases, he said.
 Time Warner Cable suspended its own repurchase program of about $25 billion after agreeing to Comcast’s buyout proposal in February.
 Comcast could increase its repurchases by that same amount if Time Warner Cable shareholders vote to approve the merger, Angelakis said.
 “We had a commitment to purchase $3 billion shares of our stock,” Angelakis said.
 “We’d evaluate whether we’d want to accelerate that plan and increase it above $3 billion, based on the fact that Time Warner Cable had terminated their buyback plan” That means Comcast’s share repurchases this year could total $55 billion.
 The central bank barred jewelers from buying gold on credit from banks and required evidence that 20 percent of the purchases were being used to make items that were exported rather than sold at home.
 To date, 25,180,201 shares have been repurchased for $947 million as part of the buyback program, the Edinburgh-based company said today in a statement.
 “It’s an exciting time to back tech startups” Accel said it has made more than $9 billion in the past year from transactions involving its portfolio companies, including the acquisition of AirWatch LLC by VMware Inc, the purchase of Braintree Payment Solutions LLC by EBay Inc, and MoPub Inc’s sale to Twitter Inc.
 Bank of England policy makers also convene and will probably keep rates and asset purchases on hold, according to economists at Credit Suisse.
 BANK OF ENGLAND -- The Bank of England’s nine-member monetary policy committee will leave its key rate at a record-low 05 percent and its bond-purchase program target at 375 billion pounds ($627 billion), according to Bloomberg surveys before the decision on March 6.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of funding availability, increased 75 basis points, or 075 percentage point, to 353 percent.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Foreign investors boosted purchases of China’s onshore bonds by 16 percent this year as some funds look at the yuan’s drop as a buying opportunity.
 Foreign investors have purchased more than $800 million of shares in Southeast Asia’s biggest economy this year, the most among seven Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 After refinancing more than $4 billion of mortgages, selling assets and issuing equity to help repurchase bonds at a discount, the owner of Caesars Palace and Harrah’s Las Vegas may be a step closer to pushing creditors to exchange notes trading below 50 cents on the dollar.
 AmEx, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, faces a slowdown in travel revenue as customers rely more on digital technology for bookings.
 Three rounds of bond purchases from the Fed have helped fuel economic growth, sending the S&P 500 surging as much as 178 percent from its 2009 low.
 Louis President James Bullard said today policy makers haven’t committed to a specific month to end the bond purchases even as it would take a significant shift in the outlook to alter the path of tapering.
 The casino operator in July completed the HK$325 billion purchase of the Grand Waldo complex in Macau, which includes a spa and hotel.
 The purchase “strengthens GDF Suez’s commitment to expand its wind portfolio in the UK,” the Courbevoie, France-based company said in a statement.
 The $87 billion purchase of eyecare company Bausch & Lomb Inc.
 They’re also disregarding diverging signals on the strength of the nation’s economy as the Fed curtails monthly bond purchases that have bolstered the market.
 The Fed’s approach could prompt brokers to pull back from financing sources such as repurchase agreements and securities lending, which are considered part of the shadow-banking system by some regulators, Gallagher said.
 The Abu Dhabi-based phone company, also known as Etisalat, has commitments to raise as much as 41 billion euros ($56 billion) from 17 international and domestic banks to finance the purchase.
 The purchase price, at 100 Moroccan dirhams a share in cash, includes a 74-dirham dividend to be paid to Vivendi, Etisalat said in a Nov.
 project also has been delayed because of an environmental assessment and land purchases.
 The German company has scaled back net debt to 59 billion euros at the end of December from a peak figure exceeding 10 billion euros shortly after the Continental stake purchase.
 While the multiple is low compared to takeovers such as Kroger’s purchase of Harris Teeter Supermarkets Inc.
 The Fed also reduced the monthly pace of bond purchases by $10 billion, to $55 billion.
 ‘Considerable Time’ Yellen said the quantitative easing program would end this fall if the Fed continues to taper purchases in measured steps.
 Overseas investors bought a net $693 million of Thai stocks yesterday, a fourth day of inflows and the biggest purchases in two months, according to the exchange data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Nothing has been decided on the purchase, Tokyo-based Orix said in a statement filed with the Tokyo Stock Exchange.
 The Interplex purchase will help Amtek’s sales exceed $1 billion and offer scale to win more contracts with plants in new markets including the US, Mexico and India.
 The Federal Reserve’s plan to scale back its monthly bond purchases will push up interest rates in intermediate maturities, Rick Rieder, co-head for Americas fixed income, said in an interview with reporters yesterday at BlackRock’s New York headquarters.
 Fueled by new gas production, the currency has gained more than 7 percent against the dollar since the beginning of last year, even as the Bank of Israel cut interest rates and purchased at least $735 billion in an effort to contain it.
 Little Latitude Last month’s rate cut didn’t stop the shekel appreciation because it wasn’t accompanied by foreign currency purchases, said Daphna Aviram, director of economic research at the Manufacturers Association.
 That means buying more foreign currency” The Bank of Israel said in October that it would buy $35 billion this year to offset the effect of gas production on the balance of payments and would also continue to make purchases in reaction to fluctuations “not in line with fundamental economic conditions or when the foreign exchange market is disorderly” While the bank bought $17 billion in January, reversing the shekel trend, purchases in February dropped to $350 million, and the shekel gained 08 percent that month.
 He declined to say which of Universal’s clients he has pitched the smart mannequins to, saying only: “They’re very interested” Iconeme’s VMBeacon, hardware which works within a 100 meters of phones that have a downloadable application turned on, enables retailers to beam details such as price, where to find the product in the store and links to make a purchase online.
 Europe’s largest-maker of commercial jet engines saidtoday it has ample liquidity to fund the purchase from existingcash and borrowing facilities.
 She said March 19 that the central bank’s monthly bond purchases could end this fall and benchmark interest rates may rise about six months later.
 Three rounds of central-bank bond purchases have helped the S&P 500 rally as much as 178 percent from its low in 2009.
 “The government and the central bank encourage and want to create favorable conditions for foreign investors to participate in the sale and purchase of bad debt,” Binh said.
 The repurchase rate was also reduced to 5 percent from 55 percent.
 The governor had said in December the entity may purchase as much as 150 trillion dong of non-performing loans by the end of 2014.
 The Hong Kong-based company is seeking to refinance an about $355 million bridge loan which part-funded the purchase and is due to be repaid at the end of the month, according to Moody’s Investors Service.
 The purchase was funded by a one-for-one stock rights offering in April and a bridge loan from DBS Group Holdings Ltd.
 The 75 billion-euro ($104 billion) purchase of Kabel Deutschland is part of Colao’s campaign to fend off rivals such as Deutsche Telekom AG.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 509 percent of the notes, highest since July, compared with an average of 453 percent for the past 10 sales.
 “Much has happened, however, in the nearly six months,” since the bankruptcy was filed and “Comcast is no longer prepared to purchase the network,” the company added.
 The purchase is Canada Pension’s first direct investment in the insurance sector.
 This is Canada Pension’s largest public acquisition since it led a consortium to purchase Neiman Marcus Group Ltd.
 The gauge gained 05 percent on March 28 as consumer shares rebounded amid data showing household purchases rose in February by the most in three months.
 The gathering also sets the stage for dealmaking, and Facebook’s $19 billion agreement last month to purchase messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 The lira weakened 09 percent on March 19 after Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen said interest rates could rise in about six months after asset purchases end.
 Potential buyers include Fast Retailing Co, owner of the Uniqlo clothing chain, which has held talks to purchase J.
 That came after overseas acquisitions by Japanese purchasers rose to a record $104 billion in 2012 as companies sought growth abroad in the wake of the March 2011 earthquake.
 They’re seeking deals abroad even as the weakened yen makes such purchases more expensive, Bain’s Okuno said.
 Suntory’s purchase of Beam was supported by a $125 billion bridge loan facility from Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ Ltd.
 In December, it completed the purchase of a $5 billion controlling stake in Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya Pcl.
 Facebook is also making changes on Instagram, the photo-sharing network it purchased for about $700 million in 2012.
 Adena Friedman, Carlyle’s chief financial officer, said on a February call with investors that expenses have increased as the firm hires for fundraising and makes strategic purchases to boost revenue.
 Grain companies halted purchases of some crops and pulled back on sales, prompting the biggest crisis for the industry since the government dismantled the grain-marketing monopoly of the Canadian Wheat Board in 2012.
 The central banks begins a two-day meeting today that analysts said will see policy makers further scale back bond-purchase stimulus.
 Homeowners with rooftop panels buy less electricity from the grid, and those who use batteries to store power may need to purchase even less.
 Industry Minister James Moore last month pointed to Videotron’s purchase of airwaves for C$233 million ($210 million) in a government spectrum auction as proof the policy is working.
 were strategic advisers on the purchase.
 The figures make up part of an evaluation the Fed will release next week that may affect banks’ plans to return capital to shareholders through dividends and share repurchases.
 Netanyahu told the Aipac audience that efforts to boycott Israel’s products over its settlement policies will fail because the “world wants Israeli technology,” citing the purchase of Israeli startups by Google Inc, Apple and Facebook Inc.
 Bernanke signaled that the central bank would start unwinding its unprecedented asset purchases.
 The Fed’s approach could prompt brokers to pull back from financing sources such as repurchase agreements and securities lending, which are considered part of the shadow-banking system by some regulators, Gallagher said.
 The purchases were improper because Ergen was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish, his satellite-TV company, and competitors are prohibited from owning LightSquared’s debt, according to the complaint.
 Ghana Drive Ghana is also introducing devices that will triple the number of people who can use debit cards to pay for purchases.
 Consumers are occasionally debited twice for the same purchase, it said.
 single-family home landlord, is slowing purchases of houses to rent as prices have risen about 24 percent since March 2012.
 Tananbaum likened his purchases of Russia’s biggest gas producer to investments he made in the debt of Spanish regional authorities including Madrid last year.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to a 20-year contract to purchase electricity from the solar farm, which is expected to be operational this year.
 Steinhoff said its purchase will help support JD Group, which is facing “many challenges in the furniture retail and consumer finance business segments” The difficulties will “take some time and additional capital to overcome” Steinhoff’s shares fell for a second day, sliding 26 percent to 5063 rand, paring its gain this year to 12 percent and giving the manufacturer a market value of 1051 billion rand.
 In the revised accord, Total purchased an InterOil subsidiary that held the 401 percent stake.
 24 with $8 billion of securities to help fund share repurchases.
 Facebook’s takeover of WhatsApp, the biggest Internet acquisition in more than a decade, followed Japanese online retailer Rakuten Inc’s $900 million purchase of the Viber Internet messaging and calling service.
 “The hawkish statement from the Fed occurred at a precarious time for the asset class from a medium-term supply and demand perspective” Closer Hurdle A more-immediate test for the market comes next month, when issuance of the types of bonds the Fed is buying overtakes its purchases for the first time since November, according to Credit Suisse Group AG.
 That’s in addition to purchases of Treasuries as well as reinvestment intended to prevent its holdings from shrinking.
 ‘Measured Steps’ While the Fed’s pullback isn’t “on a preset course,” policy makers said they’ll likely reduce purchases “in further measured steps at future meetings” if the economy matches expectations.
 Loans for home purchases will rise to $163 billion next quarter and then to $195 billion in the third quarter, from $115 billion.
 Loans used to purchase homes more often add to debt outstanding in the market than refinancings.
 Last year, the Fed’s net purchases more than doubled net supply of $256 billion.
 That will start to happen with the coming mismatch in supply and central bank purchases, they said.
 Yellen’s estimate last week that the Fed may start increasing its short-term interest-rate benchmark “around six months” after its purchases end also fueled doubt on how long it will maintain the size of its holdings with its reinvestment program, according to Nomura and JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The Fed’s settled purchases over the past four months equaled 106 percent of issuance of bonds traded in the main part of the market, according to Credit Suisse analysts led by Mahesh Swaminathan.
 Its $452 billion of purchases next month will equal 70 percent, with the share dropping to 46 percent by June.
 The Fed purchases followed a decade where prices were supported by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which now are being forced to shrink their balance sheets, he said.
 The utility, which has 43,000 megawatts of mostly coal-fired capacity, has been forced to increase its purchases of expensive coal imports due to domestic fuel shortages.
 The purchases are a reversal after withdrawals in every week but two from October through December.
 He unexpectedly raised the repurchase rate on Jan.
 Wind and solar projects qualify for federal tax credits that don’t apply to purchases of the land where they’re built.
 “It’s an absolutely great brand,” said Sal Galatioto, founder of Galatioto Sports Partners, a New York-based sports advisory firm that has represented, among others, Tom Ricketts in his $845 million purchase of Major League Baseball’s Chicago Cubs from Tribune Co.
 “As evidenced by the recent purchases of Inter and AS Roma, Serie A and certain of its clubs are great brands,” said Chuck Baker, a partner with DLA Piper’s Global Sports Media and Entertainment practice, whose clients include AS Roma and Pallotta’s Raptor Capital Management LP.
 is looking to purchase the maker of Newport cigarettes.
 The S&P 500 rallied 43 percent in February after Fed Chair Janet Yellen said the economy was strong enough to withstand measured reductions to the central bank’s monthly bond purchases.
 Part of the Help-to-Buy program enables purchasers to take out a loan with a down payment of as little as 5 percent on homes valued at as much as 600,000 pounds ($1 million).
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Leucadia National Corp, run by Jefferies Group LLC Chief Executive Officer Richard Handler, reaped a 50 percent gain in less than six months on its purchase of shares in Philip Falcone’s Harbinger Group Inc.
 Funds have set aside $354 billion for commercial property purchases globally as they seek returns that beat government bonds, DTZ said in a separate March report.
 With the purchase, Revolt TV would gain wider distribution and higher subscriber fees, one person said.
 Moody’s Investors Service and Fitch Ratings followed with cuts to junk, freeing up purchasers who had been holding off for months as they waited for the downgrades.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Temasek Holdings Pte, Singapore’s state-owned investment company, is in advanced talks to purchase a strategic stake in AS.
 Cost Savings The Ono purchase gives Vodafone 19 million customers in Spain, complementing its mobile service and helping it challenge Telefonica SA and Orange SA.
 Integration of the networks will start next month and will be the second such project since Vodafone’s 2012 purchase of UK.
 Exxon’s partner, Oil Search Ltd, agreed last month to purchase 228 percent of the Elk and Antelope license for an initial $900 million.
 Continental, which is also Europe’s second-biggest maker of car parts, is targeting a fifth consecutive year of record sales in 2014 and has returned to making acquisitions after working to reduce debt following the 2007 purchase of Siemens AG’s car-electronics unit.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said last month the central bank will probably maintain its strategy of trimming bond purchases under its quantitative-easing stimulus program.
 Policy makers reduced purchases by $10 billion in January and again in February, to $65 billion.
 Direct bidders, non-primary dealers buying for their own accounts, purchased 275 percent of the notes, the highest proportion since September.
 Indirect bidders purchased 299 percent, compared with 42 percent last month that was the most since August 2011.
 The Louisiana Municipal Police Employees’ Retirement System, which holds Hershey shares, sued last year seeking access to the company’s records about cocoa purchases from West African suppliers who don’t comply with international child-labor restrictions.
 Roche has been willing in the past to abandon planned purchases over price, and the company will review opportunities very carefully, said Christoph Franz, who was elected chairman today at the drugmaker’s annual meeting in Basel, Switzerland.
 LightSquared says the purchases were improper and seeks to disallow Ergen’s bankruptcy claim.
 The purchases accelerated after a Dec.
 Debt Purchases LightSquared alleges Ergen’s debt purchases were improper because he concealed that he was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish, and competitors were prohibited from owning LightSquared’s debt.
 As evidence that Ergen was acting for Dish, LeBlanc cited Ergen’s use of Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser to make the purchases, along with a firm that had bought debt for Dish before -- Steven Ketchum’s SoundPoint Capital Management LLC.
 Long-dated bonds fell amid speculation insurers such as Legal & General Group Plc and Aviva Plc will scale back purchases of the assets they use to back payments to retirees.
 “We don’t want to split up Ukraine, we don’t need that” Fed Meeting In the US, Federal Reserve officials begin a two-day meeting at which they will decide whether to pare the central bank’s monthly asset-purchase program.
 Facebook Inc’s $19 billion purchase of WhatsApp Inc.
 Acquisitions under Reitzle included the purchases in 2012 of Clearwater, Florida-based household oxygen and respiratory-therapy provider Lincare and the former home-care business of Allentown, Pennsylvania-based Air Products & Chemicals Inc.
 The purchase gives Vodafone 19 million customers in Spain, complementing its mobile service and helping it challenge Telefonica SA and Orange SA.
 ‘Spending Power’ Colao is making purchases while he has the benefit of the $130 billion sale of Vodafone’s stake in Verizon Wireless, much of which was returned to shareholders, and the potential of a takeover by AT&T to keep investors satisfied, Bienenstock said.
 The purchase of Ono could lead to further deals in Spain.
 Direct bidders, purchased 326 percent of the seven-year notes, the most on record going back to 2009 and topping the previous high of 246 percent at the last sale.
 was making long-term loans to clients so they could purchase shares in the company.
 Con Horan, Ireland’s ex-head of prudential regulation, understood that clients of the Dublin-based bank would get long-term funding from elsewhere to purchase some of its shares, he told a court in Dublin today during the trial of three former Anglo Irish executives.
 Prosecutors have claimed the loans were a breach of corporate law and amounted to unlawful financial assistance for the purchase of shares in the bank.
 Horan said he understood that most of them would finance the share purchases themselves while another, Quinn, would borrow from Credit Suisse Group AG to buy his stake.
 “They want to make Office massively more interactive” The product incorporates features from two Microsoft acquisitions: The 2012 purchase of Yammer Inc, which provides social-networking tools for companies, and the acquisition in 2008 of Norway’s Fast Search & Transfer ASA, a search technology developer.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- LightSquared Inc, which is seeking to put Charles Ergen’s $1 billion claim last in line behind other creditors, asked a judge not to re-open a trial over his purchases of the company’s debt after the Dish Network Corp.
 In a trial that ended March 17, Ergen was accused of intentionally delaying completion of some debt purchases, leading to “hung trades,” to thwart LightSquared’s ability to negotiate with debtholders and restructure out of court.
 LightSquared alleged that Ergen’s debt purchases were improper because he concealed that he was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish, buying through a newly formed fund, SP Special Opportunities LLC.
 Jefferies E-Mails Lawyers for Ergen on March 18 presented to the judge e-mail exchanges with Jefferies, which was an intermediary on the purchases, according to LightSquared.
 completed its $32 billion purchase of Nest Labs Inc.
 “That has swung back to where industry averages are becoming nicely attractive again” Faster Pace After WhatsApp, Nest and Oculus, the next biggest deal this year was VMware Inc’s $154 billion purchase of AirWatch LLC, whose technology helps businesses protect and manage mobile devices.
 The only other big purchase so far this year was RF Micro Devices Inc’s agreement in February to acquire TriQuint Semiconductor Inc.
 last year for $11 billion and AirWatch was VMware’s second purchase in two years, after the $126 billion acquisition of software networking startup Nicira Inc.
 Three rounds of bond purchases from the Federal Reserve have helped fuel economic growth, sending the S&P 500 surging as much as 178 percent from its 2009 low.
 Another report showed purchases of new homes in the US.
 ANA’s 70-plane purchase today tilted toward Boeing, with the US.
 The purchase of those models, the newest offerings from the planemaker’s single-aisle jet family, is ANA’s first from Airbus since ordering A320s in the 1990s.
 Boeing has long dominated sales of single- and twin-aisle planes in Japan, adding urgency to its pursuit of the ANA order after Japan Airlines Co’s first-ever Airbus purchase in 2013.
 In the past, overseas purchases accounted for about 11 percent of transactions in those cities, Sikaitis said.
 The Neptune Group issued shares on the Hong Kong stock market to raise money for operations, including funding the purchase of junket operators and a used Russian ocean liner that was converted into a floating casino.
 Humble Beginning Kingston Securities later lent Yeung money to help with his purchase of Birmingham City Football Club, according to company filings, and bought 4485 million shares in Yeung’s investment company after his 2011 arrest.
 Sony Corp’s PlayStation 4 and Microsoft Corp’s Xbox One, combined with Christmas purchases of Apple devices and Kindles from Amazoncom Inc.
 Federal Reserve has begun the process of reducing its monthly bond purchases, he said.
 RBI Governor Raghuram Rajan, who raised the repurchase rate three times since he took office in September, will keep the benchmark at 8 percent, according to 36 of 39 economists surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Of that, 84 appear to be consumer-related cases seeking the termination of purchase and sale agreements and “recovery of moral and material damages” Jeopardized Investments Letting the company fail could have jeopardized Carlyle’s other investments in Brazil, which range from a lingerie maker to CVC Brasil Operadora e Agencia de Viagens SA, a travel agency that sold shares to the public in December.
 completed its purchase of Leap Wireless International Inc.
 Interest in mergers continues, with Japanese billionaire Masayoshi Son, chairman of Tokyo-based SoftBank Corp, considering a purchase of fourth-largest US.
 The BOE cut its benchmark rate to a record-low 05 percent and started its emergency bond-purchase program in March 2009.
 Household purchases advanced 03 percent after a 02 percent gain, the Commerce Department said.
 The initiatives are aimed at financing tools such as repurchase agreements, or repos, that were relied on by Bear Stearns Cos.
 ‘One-Off’ Colombia’s central bank extended last week its two-year-old dollar purchase program, which it will use to build its foreign-exchange reserves.
 Should policy makers decide that some action is needed, other options might include issuing fresh long-term loans to banks or ending the absorption of liquidity created by the ECB’s crisis-era bond purchases.
 Governing Council member Jens Weidmann, who heads Germany’s Bundesbank, has indicated support for suspending sterilization of historic bond purchases.
 Institutional investors accounted for a quarter of home purchases in the Atlanta metropolitan area in January, the biggest share in the country after Jacksonville, Florida, according to data firm RealtyTrac.
 approval in June, Furiex could appeal to Actavis Plc, which will acquire complementary medicines through its planned purchase of Forest Laboratories Inc, said Cowen Group Inc.
 Japan Bank for International Cooperation, Asian Development Bank and six commercial lenders are providing construction and term loans to finance the project in northern Sumatra, and the national utility Perusahaan Listrik Negara PT will purchase the output under a 30-year contract.
 The data point to an expansion that will keep improving as temperatures warm, one reason why Fed policy makers this week will probably stick to their strategy of reducing the pace of monthly bond purchases.
 18 it would trim its monthly bond purchases to $75 billion from $85 billion, before cutting by another $10 billion in January.
 The purchases are designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and spur economic growth.
 Mortgage banks’ repurchase agreements with the central bank more than doubled to exceed 200 billion kroner ($37 billion) in 2008 after lenders struggled to sell their bonds on the market, according to a government-commissioned study published in September.
 Daimler also completed the purchase last November of a 12 percent stake in the BAIC Motor unit of Beijing Automotive for 625 million euros.
 6, when 10-year yields reached a two-year high amid speculation a strengthening economy would allow the Fed to begin slowing bond purchases.
 In its December “Strategy Spotlight,” Pimco wrote that the Fed’s plans to keep interest rates low were more important than its decision to taper its bond purchases, and as such Pimco’s funds would bet on the shorter-term debt while pulling back from five-, 10- and 30-year exposures.
 The Fed, which announced another reduction of $10 billion to its monthly bond purchases, has undertaken three rounds of bond-buying since 2008 under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy, swelling its balance sheet to a record $42 trillion.
 While other measures are on the table, including the release of cash linked to crisis-era bond purchases, his main scenario is to let the gradual recovery erode idle productive capacity and boost prices.
 in London, while its bond-purchase plan will stay at 375 billion pounds ($627 billion), according to separate Bloomberg surveys.
 Liquidity Measures Halting the absorption of liquidity created by bond purchases under the ECB’s now-defunct Securities Markets Program may be a “compromise” solution, even though it will “help little in addressing alleged disinflation risks,” he said.
 “It is unwise for the council to go back on commitments it made in the past without an exceptionally good reason” No Game-Changer Trichet said this week that pausing the operation is “certainly possible” Germany’s Bundesbank, whose presidents have opposed government-bond purchases and repeatedly warned of the risks they entail, said on Feb.
 The Bermuda-based insurer purchased Aviva Plc’s US.
 Profitability Target BNP Paribas agreed in November to buy the rest of its Belgian consumer-banking unit and three weeks later to purchase Rabobank Groep’s Polish division.
 BNP Paribas last month said it targets 2016 revenue at least 10 percent higher than last year, excluding purchases.
 Clients are trading less as the Federal Reserve slows its monthly asset purchases and leaves bond investors preparing for rising interest rates.
 BNP Paribas is also expanding its European equity derivatives franchise and last month agreed to purchase assets from RBS.
 have contributed to a slowdown in home purchases in recent months.
 The central bank has reduced bond purchases by $10 billion a month at each of its past three meetings, to $55 billion, and Chair Janet Yellen said last month that interest rates may rise “around six months” after it stops buying debt.
 New-home purchases dropped in February to the lowest level in five months, Commerce Department data showed.
 said today it filed for arbitration proceedings against UCP, saying its purchase of the 48 percent stake in VKCom last year was in breach of a shareholder agreement.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Bazaarvoice Inc, the maker of online product-review software, agreed to sell assets obtained in its $168 million purchase of PowerReviews Inc.
 on its purchase of Three Rivers Operating Co’s oil and gas assets in 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 A direct sale to a selected investor is also an option, in which the German company would have a pre-purchase right, the memorandum said.
 With European power prices near record lows, CEZ board members voted today to cancel the tender after Prime Minister Bohuslav Sobotka’s government refused to provide guarantees on the purchase price of electricity from the units.
 Its operations expanded following the $27 billion purchase of Koram Bank in 2004.
 Cost reductions and additional sales will boost annual profit by about $85 million in the third full year after the purchase is complete, Smith & Nephew said in February.
 He boosted the dividend 35 percent and said the company would borrow more to repurchase as much as $22 billion of shares over five years and spend $10 billion on acquisitions.
 After agreeing to purchase JPMorgan’s unit on March 19, Mercuria is now deciding which employees will be offered positions.
 The purchase will be the largest by Gallagher, which expanded in the UK.
 Brokers help commercial clients purchase coverage from insurers, collecting fees tied to the size of premiums.
 BAT couldhelp finance such a purchase, analysts at Exane BNP Paribas havesaid.
 Reasons ranged from slowing economic growth to the European debt crisis to Fed purchases of US.
 Two-year notes rose yesterday after Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen said “considerable slack” in labor markets showed that the central bank’s accommodative policies will be needed for “some time” The comments damped speculation the Fed is preparing to raise interest rates next year, after Yellen said in March the central bank might start increasing the benchmark rate about six months after ending its bond purchase program.
 The CEO declined to comment on what concessions he has offered to European Union regulators to win approval of the $11 billion pigment purchase.
 The real estate investment trust’s purchase of Cole Real Estate Investments Inc.
 A purchase of NorthStar would add to American Realty’s nontraded REIT fundraising and management business, which it acquired with its purchase of Cole.
 Archibald’s compensation include a cash bonus of about $51 million tied to Stanley Works’s $44 billion purchase of Black & Decker Corp.
 Zuckerberg collected $33 billion last year after exercising stock options to purchase 60 million shares, the firm’s proxy statement shows.
 Aquarius will announce details of the rights sale once its offer to repurchase bonds from holders closes on April 11, the Perth-based company said today in a statement.
 Swiss Subsidiary Caterpillar and its Swiss subsidiary entered into an agreement that let the Swiss company purchase parts from third-party suppliers and sell them to dealers outside the US, removing Caterpillar itself from the “legal title chain” of the transactions.
 Mega-Mergers A merger of this reported size would top Pfizer’s 2000 purchase of Warner-Lambert Co.
 A purchase of AstraZeneca could also potentially allow Pfizer to move its tax domicile to the UK.
 “The new Mission Bay arena will generate new jobs and millions of dollars in new tax revenue for our city” Salesforce, the biggest maker of customer-management software, purchased land in Mission Bay for $278 million with the intention of building a new headquarters before opting to lease space in downtown office towers instead.
 The company has so far spent $26 billion on stock repurchases.
 The Fed may reduce its monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $45 billion, economists predicted.
 The higher prices are eroding profit margins for domestic purchases including dairy processor Dean Foods Co, sandwich chain owner Potbelly Corp, and Annie’s Inc, a maker of organic macaroni and cheese.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- Petroleo Brasileiro SA Chief Executive Officer Maria das Gracas Foster gave documents to the federal police as a bribery audit and potential congressional probe into a refinery purchase has heightened public scrutiny into the state oil producer.
 The money laundering case comes as lawmakers question current and former officials on the 2006 purchase of the Pasadena refinery in Texas from Astra Oil Trading NV for a total cost of $12 billion.
 Following Derivatives More than 90 percent of agency mortgage transactions occur in what are known as To Be Announced trades, meaning investors don’t immediately purchase the bonds.
 LionTree also saw a bump in its ranking in 2013, following its work on the Liberty-Virgin transaction and after advising Warner Music Group in its purchase of EMI Group’s Parlophone Label Group from Universal Music Group for $764 million.
 On large deals, they have typically worked alongside traditional investment banks; on the purchase of Time Warner, Barclays Plc and JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Jodi Seth, a spokeswoman for Facebook, said of the FTC letter today: “We’re pleased the FTC has completed its review and cleared our acquisition of WhatsApp” Privacy Complaints The Electronic Privacy Information Center and Center for Digital Democracy filed a complaint with the FTC on March 6, saying the purchase may be an unfair trade practice because users of the messaging service had an expectation that their data wouldn’t be collected for advertising purposes.
 Arad will acquire 51 percent of Cicasa for $204 million with an option to purchase the remainder in either May 2019 or April 2024, the person said, asking not to be identified because the deal isn’t public yet.
 Rate Increases Last month after central bank officials predicted that the key rate would rise faster than previously projected, Yellen downplayed the importance of the forecasts, even as she said that rates might start to rise “around six months” after the Fed ends its bond-purchase program.
 The CEO also made $33 billion last year after exercising stock options to purchase 60 million shares, according to the filing.
 Who knew buying these assets would be the way to go as the Federal Reserve cuts back on its debt purchases? Two exchange-traded funds managed by Pacific Investment Management Co.
 The debt is more sensitive to moves in interest rates than most other bonds and tumbled as the Fed prepared to curtail its monthly securities purchases.
 Burberry is also the only luxury-goods company that lets clients order online and pick up their purchases in stores.
 Chief Executive Officer Martin Gilbert said the company identified cost savings “over and above” those expected from its purchase of Scottish Widows Investment Partnership, which was completed today.
 The company said the purchase brought assets under management to 3245 billion pounds as of Feb.
 The Fed is forecast to cut monthly purchases to $45 billion from $85 billion in December, according to a Bloomberg News survey of economists.
 The company said it spent $11 billion buying back 7 million shares, more than double the $461 million it spent on such repurchases in the first quarter of 2013, and increased its dividend payout to $444 million from $371 million.
 Minutes from the April 9 meeting of the Bank of England’s Monetary Policy Committee showed that officials voted unanimously to leave their benchmark interest rate at 05 percent this month and to maintain the stock of purchased assets at 375 billion pounds ($629 billion).
 Oi could finance a purchase of 40 percent of Tim Participacoes SA with debt and further asset sales, the analysts wrote.
 The Finance Ministry will resume foreign-exchange purchases on April 14, buying an equivalent of 35 billion rubles ($99 million) a day, it said in a statement on its website today.
 The vaccines purchase is the largest for Glaxo since Andrew Witty became CEO in 2008.
 With its vaccines purchase, Glaxo will gain Bexsero for meningitis to its Cervarix for human papillomavirus.
 drug wholesaler that noticed discrepancies between lot numbers in the packaging of medicine purchased through an Italian wholesaler and intended for sale in Germany, AIFA, the Italian drug regulator, said in a statement.
 The overseas purchases to be covered by the contracts include coking coal that makes up as much as 80 percent of the Mumbai-based company’s $1 billion in annual inbound shipments, two people said, asking not to be identified because the information is private.
 Tata Steel hedged about 60 percent of its purchases a year ago, one of the people said.
 The vaccines purchase is the largest for Glaxo since Andrew Witty became CEO in 2008.
 With its vaccines purchase, Glaxo will gain Bexsero for meningitis to its Cervarix for human papillomavirus.
 Maruti hasn’t yet seen customer interest translating into purchases, Mayank Pareek, the company’s sales chief, said at a press conference in New Delhi today.
 or the developed world really wants to get entangled in a military conflict, so sanctions are the only logical alternative” The lira rose the most in almost three weeks as Turkey’s central bank kept the benchmark repurchase rate at 10 percent, in line with estimates in a Bloomberg survey of economists.
 Yancoal purchased the mine in 2004.
 Suntech confirmed the purchase in a statement yesterday.
 declined 23 percent after the China Securities Journal called for maintaining restrictions on home purchases.
 In the first quarter of 2013, the lender generated gains by selling interests in its portfolio of government-guaranteed loans and debt repurchases, according to today’s statement.
 Imports increased by 12 percent to 917 billion rand as purchases of mineral products, which include oil, surged 37 percent.
 Machinery and electronics purchases rose 13 percent, while imports of vegetables jumped 77 percent.
 The withdrawals came in response to speculation that the Federal Reserve would pare its securities purchases sooner than investors expected.
 The Air Force agreed to the bulk purchase of the main rocket components last year.
 Tisch, who has been on Sears board since 2005, today disclosed the purchase of 475,000 of the retailer’s shares in the past two days.
 The purchases brought his holdings in the retailer to more than 933,000 shares, according to a filing.
 “It’s largely up due to the news that the director purchased shares and that there’s a high short interest,” Mary Ross-Gilbert, a Los Angeles-based analyst at Imperial Capital LLC, said in a phone interview.
 A deal would help Holcim and Lafarge to “cut a lot of costs and dominate a few more markets” An acquisition spree before the financial crisis, including Lafarge’s 102 billion-euro purchase of Orascom Cement in 2008 and Holcim’s $41 billion deal for Aggregate Industries in 2005, widened the dominance of both companies.
 Fannie Mae financed $288 billion in multifamily loans last year, while Freddie Mac purchased $259 billion of the debt.
 Under Noyer’s proposals, the Bank of France will create a private company to pool existing loans made by lenders into bonds that are eligible for use in repurchase agreements.
 Lowest Latency ICE purchased NYSE Euronext in November, brieflycatapulting itself to first place in the rank of world’s biggestexchanges by market value.
 demanded the company repurchase shoddy loans.
 26, 2010: Bank of America says the cost of resolving mortgage disputes rose to $19 billion in 2009 from $246 million in 2008 on “deterioration in the economy and housing markets combined with a higher rate of repurchase or similar requests” Oct.
 17, 2012: Moynihan’s company says losses could be as much as $6 billion beyond what’s been set aside for demands that it repurchase shoddy home loans.
 The purchase will end a planned initial public offering by closely held Biomet’s parent, Biomet Group Inc, Warsaw, Indiana-based Zimmer said today in a statement.
 1 manufacturer in the now-growing $45 billion market, and Stryker Corp, which it will leapfrog with the Biomet purchase.
 The purchase includes debt.
 It’s the fifth-largest medical device deal in past decade, and the biggest since J&J’s Synthes purchase for $197 billion in 2012.
 Smith & Nephew “Our initial thought following the Zimmer/Biomet news is that a purchase of Smith & Nephew is still unlikely in the 18-24 month time frame,” Clive wrote in a note to clients today.
 “Now, they have to roll up their sleeves and starting working to play catch-up” The purchase of the unprofitable division makes Microsoft the world’s second-largest maker of mobile phones with about 14 percent of the market, according to researcher IDC.
 The minutes, published in London today, showed BOE officials voted unanimously to keep the key rate unchanged at 05 percent this month and to maintain the stock of purchased assets at 375 billion pounds ($630 billion).
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries rose, pushing 10-year yields to a two-week low, as the Federal Reserve reiterated that it’s likely to keep the benchmark interest rate close to zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases end.
 “Every time we have a data point, the bond market will try to determine what it means through the eyes of the Fed, and that means more volatility, especially in the front end of the curve” Bond Purchases The Fed said its monthly bond purchases will now be divided between $25 billion in Treasuries and $20 billion in mortgage debt.
 Sixteen purchases of Treasuries are planned for May, versus 18 in April, schedules showed.
 More recently, AT&T revived interest in Europe, having looked at a potential purchase of Vodafone, though it has so far refrained from making a move as it focuses on investing in the US.
 is borrowing money to fund most of its $345 billion purchase of a Motorola Solutions Inc.
 Motorola will return the proceeds of the sale to shareholders, while Zebra said the purchase will immediately add to its earnings.
 LightSquared has alleged that Ergen’s debt purchases were improper because he concealed that he was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish, buying through a newly formed fund instead.
 American Electric Power, CenterPoint and Xcel Energy, all of which own regulated utilities in Texas, could become more efficient and potentially more profitable through a purchase of nearby Oncor, said Travis Miller, an analyst at Morningstar Inc, in a telephone interview.
 Other Interest Representatives for MidAmerican and Exelon declined to comment on speculation regarding a purchase of Oncor, as did representatives for American Electric Power, CenterPoint and Xcel Energy.
 A transaction that size would be the largest ever for LG Household, which spent about $34 million on three purchases last year and $485 million on four deals in 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 at an enterprise value of 13 billion euros ($18 billion) and will use the proceeds for purchases as it focuses on food-processing equipment.
 GEA declined to say how much debt Triton will assume in the purchase.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Global banks from Deutsche Bank AG to Credit Suisse Group AG are urging international regulators to rethink a liquidity rule they say risks harming the market for repurchase agreements and pushing up governments’ borrowing costs.
 “Manufactured housing is a big piece of rural affordable housing” Warren Buffett, the billionaire chairman of Berkshire Hathaway Inc, lamented the punitive rates charged to purchase factory-built homes in his 2009 annual letter to shareholders.
 Earnings in the same period of 2013 were boosted by one-time gains related to the purchase of nationalized lender Banco de Valencia SA.
 The anonymous seller purchased the work for $45 million in 2000, also at Sotheby’s in New York.
 “We never received a penny he sent,” Martin said of Ngo’s purchases through Court Ventures, saying it was up to Court Ventures and later Experian to ensure the security of the data.
 The repurchase rate was held at 075 percent for a second meeting, the Stockholm-based bank said today.
 While Xerox had no share repurchase plan in 2010, Maestri instituted a $700 million buyback in 2011 and another for $11 billion in 2012.
 The figures include the Dea oil and gas unit to be purchased by Russian billionaire Mikhail Fridman in a deal announced on March 16.
 The Bank of Thailand held its one-day bond repurchase rate at 2 percent, with monetary policy committee members voting six-to-one in favor of the decision, it said in Bangkok today.
 The cost of the one-year rate swap, the fixed payment needed to receive the floating seven-day repurchase rate, slipped two basis points, or 002 percentage point, to 406 percent as of 4:48 pm.
 Obamacare Enrollees The results included 230,000 customers who purchased plans through the health insurance exchanges set up under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.
 Sales for delivery in the 12 months that start June 1 are up 17 percent, with increased purchases by Mexico, South Korea and the Philippines, three of the top six buyers of US.
 The deal follows Apple Inc’s purchase of Topsy Labs Inc, which is used by companies to compile consumer sentiment on Twitter, such as responses to television shows or politics.
 “MidAmerican doesn’t mean much, either to its customers or potential acquisition candidates, so making it Berkshire Hathaway Energy makes total sense” Acquisition Strategy Abel has been expanding his business through acquisitions including the $56 billion purchase last year of NV Energy, Nevada’s largest electric utility.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said in Amsterdam last week that the Frankfurt-based central bank may start broad-based asset purchases if the inflation outlook worsens, preparing the ground for one of its most radical policies ever.
 The purchase won’t affect the timing of Actavis’s $25 billion acquisition of Forest announced in February, the company said.
 and its December purchase of half of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce’s Aerogold Visa portfolio.
 “As this middle class grows, more people will require financing for their homes and auto purchases,” Porter said.
 Disney Acquisitions The acquisition is one of the biggest for Disney, the world’s largest entertainment company, since the $4 billion purchase of Lucasfilm Ltd.
 GE can tap the $57 billion of cash it has amassed overseas to finance a purchase of most of France’s Alstom SA, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 Leonard Green, based in Los Angeles, purchased 205 million shares of the company, according to a filing today.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Reckitt Benckiser Group Plc said it’s no longer in active talks to buy the consumer-health arm of Merck & Co, saying the purchase doesn’t meet its investment criteria.
 EON sank 367 million reais into the company in July as part of an 800 million-real capital increase, following the purchase of a 245 percent stake from Batista for 14 billion reais earlier last year.
 Paying Price While EON’s entrance was seen as a positive step toward completion of MPX projects, Batista didn’t deliver on his promises, said Ildo Sauer, a professor at Sao Paulo University, who negotiated with Batista the purchase of his first MPX power plant as head of Petrobras’ gas and energy unit.
 raised C$225 million in its December stock sale to develop assets it purchased from Penn West Petroleum Ltd.
 Vale was cleared of any wrongdoing in connection with the purchase of Simandou mining rights by the governments of Guinea, France, Switzerland and the US, Ferreira said.
 At 57 purchases so far, the Max 7 has about 29 percent of the 1,934 total for the Max family.
 BlackRock, co-founded by Fink, 61, and Kapito in a one-room office in 1988, has grown from a bond shop to the world’s largest asset manager through acquisitions culminating in its purchase in 2009 of Barclays Plc’s investment unit.
 In its first buyback in more than a decade, Mitsui said in February it would repurchase 50 billion yen of stock.
 Mitsubishi’s last buyback was in 2007, when it repurchased 150 billion yen of stock.
 We think the market can be very supportive” One-time fees for personal seat licenses, which give the purchaser the right to buy season tickets, will be “modest” compared with amounts levied by the Dallas Cowboys and New York Giants when they moved to new stadiums, he said.
 Won Options The premium for three-month won put options granting the right to sell the currency on April 11 was 136 percentage points over calls, which allow for purchases, the least since January 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Clearwire Stock In a hearing last month, Buchwald criticized two of the counts against Rengan Rajaratnam charging him with aiding and abetting his brother in the purchase of Clearwire Corp.
 Google focuses its legal arguments on trying to curb the number of lawsuits against its search engine and other businesses, even though it also owns thousands of mobile-phone patents through its purchase of Motorola Mobility Inc.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Australia committed to buying a total of 72 F-35 Joint Strike Fighters, down from a 2009 plan to purchase about 100 of what has become the Pentagon’s most-expensive weapons system.
 Delays in the production and testing of the F-35s saw Australia announce last year it would purchase 12 more Super Hornets from Boeing Co.
 “The delays meant Australia purchased other aircraft as a stop-gap measure, which reduced the number of Joint Strike Fighters the country needed,” said John Blaxland, a senior fellow at the Australian National University’s Strategic and Defence Studies Centre in Canberra.
 The quota for purchases for the plan hasn’t been decided yet, the newspaper said.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Ireland’s state-owned bad bank agreed to buy Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc and KBC Groep NV loans to Ireland’s largest shopping mall, its first purchase of debt that didn’t belong to the country’s bailed-out lenders, people familiar with the matter said.
 The National Asset Management Agency’s purchase of RBS unit Ulster Bank and KBC’s combined 30 percent stake of a syndicated loan to the Dundrum Town Centre, a 150,000 square- meter (16 million square-foot) mall in south Dublin, gives it full control of the debt, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 The purchase of the remaining Dundrum loans is the first time the agency has moved to take over debt from non-Irish banks.
 rose 8 percent to C$523, the biggest increase since December, as analysts at the Royal Bank of Canada said the company’s purchase of Epitome Pictures Inc.
 BNSF requested bids for a potential purchase of 5,000 cars.
 backs “strengthening and updating state youth tobacco control laws to prohibit youth purchase” of tobacco products, Jane Seccombe, a spokeswoman for the Winston Salem, North Carolina-based company said.
 Danone could help finance a purchase with proceeds from shedding its medical nutrition unit, said Credit Suisse Group AG.
 Treasury 10-year notes yielded 67 basis points more than their Group of Seven counterparts last week, the most in four years, as the Fed unwinds its bond-buying program while Japan and Europe consider additional purchases.
 Fed Policy The central bank is in the process of scaling back the bond-purchase program it has used to help support the economy.
 The Fed purchased $36 billion in Treasuries maturing between January 2019 and December 2019 today.
 “SodaStream is unlikely to be viewed as a key strategic partner to a major beverage player” While Coca-Cola’s decision to purchase a 10 percent stake in Waterbury, Vermont-based Green Mountain spurred speculation rival PepsiCo Inc.
 debt auctions, are on track to purchase their smallest share of the sales since at least 2003, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Indirect bidders purchased 499 percent of the seven-year notes sold yesterday, compared with an average of 427 percent for the past 10 sales of the maturity.
 At the five-year auction on April 23, direct bidders purchased 186 percent of the debt, the second-highest since May.
 The purchase highlights the push by China, the world’s biggest energy consumer, to secure diverse energy assets abroad to meet rising demand at home.
 The contractor is trying to purchase companies with international operations to help it carry out projects with high returns, Ismaik said week.
 Once donations are processed, they get receipts by e-mail declaring the value of the donated items and receive sweeteners: gift cards they can use toward purchases at Neiman Marcus and its Bergdorf Goodman stores.
 Nespresso’s share of single-serve coffee machines purchased across Western Europe declined to 278 percent last year from 338 percent in 2008, according to data tracker Euromonitor.
 The purchase of Newmont would have been a dramatic finalmove by Barrick founder and Chairman Peter Munk, who is due toretire at the April 30 shareholders meeting.
 Some businesses are slowing purchases, particularly of high-end storage machines, and EMC is trying to focus more attention on middle-tier products as well as newer initiatives such as replacing storage machines with software.
 Businesses are continuing to purchase EMC’s storage products, particularly its mid-priced machines and newer technologies such as those made by its Isilon unit, said Ives, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 The central bank is winding down the most aggressive easing in its 100-year history and reduced asset purchases in March to a monthly pace of $55 billion from $85 billion in December, preparing to eventually raise the federal funds rate for the first time since 2006.
 Shareholder Return Motorola will return the proceeds of the sale to shareholders, while Zebra said the purchase will immediately add to its earnings.
 Policy makers are in the process of unwinding the bond-purchase program it has used to help support the economy.
 The central bank purchased $32 billion of Treasuries maturing from June 2018 to December 2018.
 The operations are part of the Fed’s debt purchases aimed at keeping long-term rates low and supporting economic growth.
 Even as the Federal Reserve reduced bond purchases that have suppressed yields, gains were bolstered by rising demand from pension funds seeking to lock in last year’s equity gains.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- BP Plc and OAO Rosneft abandoned plans to seek lower borrowing costs for an oil-purchase loan deal and cut the amount they are seeking because of the Ukraine crisis, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 BP, Europe’s third-largest oil company, holds about a 20 percent stake in Rosneft and the loans the companies are seeking will be used to finance the London-based firm’s purchase of crude from Rosneft.
 has struggled to reconcile its debt load with consumers curbing their discretionary spending since the Las Vegas-based company was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 He will report to Motorola’s operating board until the planned $291 billion purchase by Lenovo is complete.
 The Allergan deal would be his biggest acquisition, eclipsing the $87 billion purchase of eyecare company Bausch & Lomb Inc.
 “We know the marketplace out there, we know how to operate refineries out there, we’ve done it before, and certainly it’s an area where we have an interest” O’Malley is considering a purchase in California, the world’s ninth-largest economy, as refinery margins on the US.
 and Tribune Co, which have purchased local stations, will benefit, he said.
 and Perry Capital LLC each bought $120 million, while Och-Ziff Capital Management Group purchased $110 million, according to the newspaper, which also first reported the FTI appointment.
 Board Purchases Board members’ stock purchases and sales are used by investors to gauge leadership’s confidence in a company’s future earnings.
 Using its ad network, acquired in last year’s purchase of MoPub, Twitter has said it can reach more than 1 billion phones.
 Chairman Wan Long and executive director Yang Zhijun received shares worth a combined $597 million as a bonus for helping complete the $47 billion acquisition, the biggest Chinese purchase of a US.
 The quarter’s two sales for more than $40 million were both penthouses in new developments -- a $43 million purchase at One Madison and a $509 million deal at Walker Tower that set a downtown record.
 Now in his late nineties, he purchased it from London dealer Giuseppe Eskenazi in 2000.
 The instrument was purchased by a Dutch patron of musician Peter Schidlof for $81,000 in 1964, said Tim Ingles, founder of Ingles and Hayday Fine Instruments.
 Schidlof, who played in the Amadeus Quartet for 40 years, later purchased it at cost from his benefactor.
 After the decline, a purchase of Dayton, Ohio-based Teradata would be a cheap way for larger software makers to increase revenue from data storage and analysis, said Pacific Crest Securities.
 The company’s 2011 purchase of Autonomy Corp.
 Investors are concerned that much of the Nasdaq’s 38 percent rally last year was driven by stock buybacks instead of earnings growth as the Federal Reserve’s asset purchase program flooded the US.
 in 2012, its biggest purchase.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of funding availability in the banking system, tumbled as demand for cash eased after banks met quarter-end capital requirements.
 “All eyes are fixed on the Fed meeting that is expected to confirm a further decline in asset purchases” The volume of FTSE 100 shares changing hands today was 19 percent below the 30-day average, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The central bank reduced asset purchases in March to a monthly pace of $55 billion from $85 billion in December, and is preparing to eventually raise the federal funds rate for the first time since 2006.
 Separately, the company reported 12 billion pounds ($2 billion) of net inflows in the first quarter and said its recent purchase of Singapore-based Henley Group Ltd.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 234 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 286 percent for the past 10 sales.
 The Fed is in the process of phasing out quantitative easing, the bond-purchase program it has used to help support the economy.
 It purchased $102 billion in notes maturing between November 2039 and August 2043 today.
 Shares of Altice SA, the cable company negotiating Europe’s largest deal this year -- the purchase of Vivendi SA’s French wireless business SFR -- jumped as much as 16 percent when it was picked for exclusive talks, while those of rival bidder Bouygues SA tumbled.
 Once donations are processed, they get receipts by e-mail declaring the value of the donated items and in addition they’ll get sweeteners: gift cards they can use toward purchases at Neiman Marcus and its Bergdorf Goodman stores.
 Novatek and Gazprom Neft’s purchase valued SeverEnergia at $10 billion, while Rosneft’s deal valued it at more than $9 billion, according to the companies.
 Mylan’s top competitors, Actavis and Teva, have grown through purchases, expanding their product lines to include specialty and branded drugs.
 Mountain View, California-based Google inherited the case through its $124 billion purchase of Motorola Mobility in 2012.
 Gates was acquired in 1996 by London-based Tomkins Ltd, which was purchased 14 years later for about $45 billion by Onex and Canada Pension Plan.
 The firm’s real estate funds purchased Centro Properties Group’s US.
 New truck orders rose 4 percent in the quarter as European customers’ need to replace aging models more than made up for an emissions-rule change in the region that prompted some fleet owners to accelerate purchases to last year.
 Wolfsburg-based Volkswagen will carry through with the purchase provided it receives shareholder pledges giving it 90 percent ownership of Scania, the threshold needed under Swedish law to force remaining investors to sell their stock and delist the company.
 “Essentially, as I said, all consumer products are advertised at base price with taxes added at the point of purchase” That’s off base, say consumer groups including the Business Travel Coalition, which represents companies whose workers travel extensively.
 The company won an arbitration case against the government in October after Papua New Guinea failed to purchase 30 percent of Solwara under an earlier accord.
 It repurchased stock for the first time in a decade in the period.
 “Investors like the fact that Diamond is drawing a line in the sand with the share repurchase,” said Scholl, who rates the shares at hold and owns none.
 The company purchased $864 million of its shares in the first three months of the year and another $14 million so far in the second quarter, today’s statement showed.
 The accords resolve outstanding litigation with FGIC, as well as claims and potential claims that the lender is required to repurchase defective home loans backing the bonds because they failed to match their promised quality, Bank of America said today in a statement.
 A purchase of Alstom would be a rare example of a major French company being taken over by a US.
 The company has made several purchases in the oil and gas industry, including paying $33 billion in April 2013 for Lufkin Industries Inc.
 10-year notes rose more than a percentage point from May after Federal Reserve policy makers indicated they would begin trimming asset purchases.
 More money has already been earmarked for industry purchases so far this quarter than in any other in the last five years, and there’s still two months left.
 has everyone wondering whether it’s going to seek its own purchase.
 It will happen, but over years” ‘Good Thing’ Edge customers represented less than 15 percent of new phone purchases in the first quarter and now make up less than 2 percent of the total subscriber base, Verizon Chief Financial Officer Fran Shammo said today in a phone interview.
 The purchase extends state-owned ICBC’s reach overseas as China seeks to increase acceptance of the yuan globally.
 The electronic markets unit showed “strong growth,” boosted by volatility as the Federal Reserve considers whether to scale back bond purchases, ICAP said.
 The purchase will expand Post’s clout with retailers, broaden its distribution and give it products such as Papetti’s Easy Eggs, Simply Potatoes and Crystal Farms cheese.
 Each note will carry a warrant entitling the owner to purchase one Deutsche Bank share, according to the statement.
 Should the sale fetch more than the $1726 million needed for the repurchase, the company “intends to retain any additional amounts to improve the Aquarius group’s liquidity in order to fund the future redemption” of bonds, it said.
 The yield on the convertible notes due December 2015 closed at 1025 percent yesterday, 528 percentage points lower in the week since the company announced a rights offer to repurchase as much as 76 percent of its $298 million of debt.
 Asia’s largest Internet company purchased HK$767 million ($99 million) of shares yesterday, according to an exchange filing today.
 About HK$57 billion of Tencent shares changed hands yesterday, more than 70 times greater than the size of Tencent’s repurchase, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The purchase will allow Fosun Pharma, a maker of modern drugs and traditional Chinese medicine, to expand its care capabilities as China eases controls on foreign investment in hospitals.
 It also intends to spin off its California business and use the proceeds to repurchase shares.
 “The next key level is 63, at which we may see another round of unwinding in structured products, and so the selling pressure is still on” The Fed meets April 29-30, when economists predict the central bank will cut monthly asset purchases by another $10 billion to $45 billion.
 Oi could finance a purchase of 40 percent of Tim Participacoes SA with debt and further asset sales, the analysts wrote.
 The shift will provide a bigger jolt to purchases of zinc than for copper and iron ore, said Samya Beidas-Strom, a senior economist at the Washington-based International Monetary Fund.
 Siemens would also consider a straight-up purchase of Alstom’s energy assets comparable to GE’s proposal, one of the people said.
 Lender Banco Santander Brasil SA, the Brazilian unit of Spain’s biggest bank, may be active after agreeing to purchase a controlling stake in card-payment processor GetNet for 11 billion reais.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc, the boutique investment bank purchased by Stifel Financial Corp, hired Ryan Krueger as a managing director of equity research to oversee coverage of US.
 Bernanke fueled speculation that the central bank would pare bond purchases sooner than expected, according to Standard & Poor’s and Loan Syndications and Trading Association index data.
 Ameriprise raised its quarterly dividend 12 percent to 58 cents and announced the authorization of $25 billion in additional share repurchases over the next two years.
 Most of the condo purchasers have settled, and Cosmopolitan has just two remaining condo units under contract that it’s seeking to resolve.
 recently bought back 10 percent of mobile-dating site Tinder, said Sam Yagan, chief executive officer of IAC’s Matchcom IAC purchased the stake from venture capitalist Chamath Palihapitiya, Yagan said, who oversees the company’s Matchcom, Tinder and OKCupid properties.
 GE said its all-cash offer values the business at 79 times pro forma earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, adding that the purchase would be accretive to earnings in the first year.
 If Alstom were to support another transaction, GE would get a “break-up” fee equal to 15 percent of the purchase price, it said.
 About 29 percent of washing-machine purchases now fall into the lowest price category of less than 250 euros ($345), compared with 19 percent five years ago, according to the executive.
 The board includes Eric Knight, the founder of Knight Vinke, which owns 25 percent of Darty and has campaigned for changes including a share repurchase funded by a partial sale and leaseback of property.
 Foreign funds extended purchases of Indian assets last month as inflation cooled, the government forecast smaller budget and current-account shortfalls, and before parliamentary elections that begin April 7.
April 13 (Bloomberg) -- Symrise AG’s planned 13 billion-euro ($18 billion) purchase of French flavors and pet-food additive maker Diana Group helps the German company close the gap on larger rivals Givaudan SA and International Flavors & Fragrances Inc.
 The purchase of Vannes, France-based Diana also adds a pet-food additives business whose earnings are more resilient to the ups and downs of consumer spending.
 Three groups have been shortlisted to purchase the loans after 16 parties made non-binding preliminary offers, the people said.
 VW has reaped limited financial rewards for the billions of euros invested in the last decade to purchase control of Scania and MAN as minority investors resisted efforts to share technology that would boost profit.
 While Bravofly may pay a dividend in 2015 -- depending on how much cash it has after possible purchases -- no payment is planned in 2014, the company said.
 forecast full-year profit 14 percent below analysts’ estimates as Japanese consumers reduce purchases of electronics and housing-related products after a sales-tax increase.
 Japanese consumers flocked to make purchases ahead of the sales tax increase in April, shifting revenue into the fourth quarter and crimping the start of the new financial year.
 Japan is the world’s largest importer of pork, buying 124 million tons last year, representing 18 percent of global purchases, according to the US.
 The airline also said today it will purchase 62 Airbus Group NV A320 aircraft that had been on lease financing because it was able to negotiate better rates.
 Yellen said yesterday at a conference in Chicago that the Fed hasn’t done enough to combat unemployment even after holding interest rates near zero for more than five years and pumping up its balance sheet with bond purchases.
 Rolls has made purchases to strengthen its industrial engines business, and the company considered a takeover of Finnish marine-engine maker Waertsilae Oyj earlier this year before talks ended.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, jumped 95 basis points to 484 percent on March 27 in Shanghai, the biggest daily rise since Jan.
 Itochu joined a KKR & Co-led purchase of most of Tulsa, Oklahoma-based Samson as part of the biggest leveraged buyout in the oil and gas production industry, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Samson purchase included oil-producing fields in North Dakota and the US.
 The fact that they were actually three separate asset purchases and sales illustrates how the world’s biggest drugmakers are focusing on targeted deals to reshape their portfolios.
 Buffett shouldn’t vote based on “any other extraneous factors” Coca-Cola has said that stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 The investment will help Wasu accelerate expansion in new media and big-data services, fund purchases of cable TV networks to achieve economies of scale and cut the company’s debt-to-asset ratio to 282 percent from 643 percent as of Dec.
April 17 (Bloomberg) -- Power REIT, an investment trust that acquires land for infrastructure and renewable-energy assets, completed a purchase in California and established a credit line of $26 million.
 The 450-acre purchase in Kern County will be the site of a 60-megawatt photovoltaic plant that’s expected to be finished this year, West Babylon, New York-based Power REIT said today in a statement.
 The credit line is funding a portion of the Kern County acquisition and may be used for future purchases or to refinance existing debt, according to the statement.
 The EU is already concerned about Holcim’s market power in its review of the company’s purchase of Cemex’s plants.
 “Today’s takeover is part of our expansion strategy and should help us solidify our leading position in the region,” PZU CEO Andrzej Klesyk said at a news conference in Warsaw, adding the purchase won’t affect 2013 dividend.
 The central bank will probably double purchases of exchange-traded funds to 2 trillion yen in a second round of monetary easing under Governor Haruhiko Kuroda anticipated in coming months, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 The agreement remains in force, and Comcast has said it will be extended to subscribers brought to it as part of its proposed purchase of second-largest US.
 Blackstone Group LP, which purchased the company in 2009, is the largest shareholder.
 economic outlook and the prospect of the Federal Reserve cutting back on its monthly bond purchases.
 The central bank reduced its bond purchases in March for a third time and indicated it will continue to pare the program.
 Chair Janet Yellen also said at the time that the rate might start to be raised “around six months” after the Fed ends its bond-purchase program.
 A surge of new-home purchases by foreign investors has exacerbated a housing shortage in London, prompting Johnson to approve residential projects even when faced with local opposition.
 Sugar Deal A deal would be Wilmar’s biggest takeover since its A$154 billion purchase of CSR Ltd’s Australian sugar business in 2010, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 A deal would help Holcim and Lafarge to “cut a lot of costs and dominate a few more markets” An acquisition spree before the financial crisis, including Lafarge’s 102 billion-euro ($14 billion) purchase of Orascom Cement in 2008 and Holcim’s $41 billion deal for Aggregate Industries in 2005, widened the dominance of both companies.
 have grown through purchases, expanding their product lines to include specialty and branded drugs.
 While its purchase of PayPal more than a decade ago has created one of the company’s biggest businesses, its 2005 acquisition of Internet telephony company Skype led to a writedown two years later.
 The extra yield investors demand to hold Spanish 10-year bonds instead of similar-maturity German bunds shrank for the first time in three days amid speculation ECB stimulus will include debt purchases.
 central bank reduced monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $55 billion at the March 18-19 meeting.
 and consumers pushed forward purchases on concern more cities will limit ownership.
 Although ETNs are debt securities, they allow individual buyers, sometimes called retail investors, to track assets such as futures or options, financial instruments that may otherwise require certification that the purchaser is a sophisticated investor.
 purchased its asset management arm and its distressed-asset trading unit was sold to Daishin Securities Co.
 After buying the exchange operator in November, ICE purchased Algo Technologies Ltd.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan kept the repurchase rate at 8 percent, increasing scope to support growth before elections starting next week.
 “Foreign inflows are strong and there is money waiting on the sidelines to come in at every dip” Overseas investors bought a net $3754 million of shares on March 27, extending this year’s purchases to $361 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- An Indian court temporarily stalled Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd’s $32 billion purchase of Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 is slated to win back rental car locations it had to sell to resolve antitrust claims over its $23 billion purchase of Dollar Thrifty, diluting regulators’ efforts to promote competition in the industry.
 At $151 billion, the acquisition is the biggest overseas purchase by a Chinese company and was completed in February 2013.
 The BTIG stake purchase won’t affect CLSA’s business in the Americas, Jonathan Slone, CLSA’s Hong Kong-based chief executive officer, wrote in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Apple said it will also increase its repurchase authorization to $90 billion from $60 billion and announced a seven-for-one stock split.
 When asked on a conference call with analysts yesterday whether it’s planning any more transactions, Mallinckrodt executives said they wouldn’t rule out licensing deals, company takeovers or asset purchases.
 Valeant, the most acquisitive drugmaker in North America in the last five years, has been expanding into niche areas, such as eye care with its purchase of Bausch & Lomb Holdings Inc.
 domestic package segment fell 15 percent to $927 million, in part as overtime, purchased transportation and snow removal costs increased in the storms.
 The increase was led by the biggest gain in motor-vehicle purchases since September 2012.
 Another investor purchased 15,000 puts expiring in May with a strike price of $113 and sold 18,750 bearish May $106 contracts, according to Christopher Rich, head options strategist at JonesTrading in Chicago.
 Like the US, for example, the group originally planned to count as assets repurchase contracts, or repos.
 “However as OCBC will be seen as not overpaying, the negative impact on OCBC’s share price should be pretty mild” OCBC expects the purchase to add to per-share earnings and return on equity by 2017, the bank said today.
 China Merchants Bank’s purchase of Wing Lung Bank valued the lender at 31 times book value, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The company hasn’t decided on the proportion of debt and equity funding for the purchase, he said.
 The central bank is in the process of unwinding the bond-purchase program it has used to help support the economy.
 IBM said earlier this month that it won’t sustain its rate of share repurchases from the first quarter, when buybacks more than tripled from a year earlier to the most since 2007.
 The repurchases had helped IBM meet projections for earnings per share simply by reducing the number of shares in circulation.
 For Koch, the purchase ties in with its ownership of Georgia-Pacific LLC, which brings insight into the needs of packaging makers.
 Foreign-born buyers made 69 percent of central London new-home purchases in the two years through June, with 28 percent living outside the UK, broker Knight Frank LLP said in October.
 “They need to actively cool the market” There has been a significant increases in mortgages available above 75 percent of the value of the home purchased, the Bank of England said in a report today.
 The company said today it repurchased $125 billion of shares in the first quarter.
 in 2010 and completed the purchase of a 60 percent stake in Acibadem Saglik Hizmetleri & Ticaret AS, Turkey’s largest hospital group, in 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The agreement, which is pending a court appeal by other investors, settled claims that Bank of America’s Countrywide unit mishandled servicing and failed to repurchase mortgages that never matched their promised quality.
 Bank of America yesterday fell the most since November 2012 after suspending plans for a dividend increase and $4 billion of share repurchases because of an error in its stress-test submission to the Federal Reserve.
 The government report suggested warmer temperatures brought shoppers back into stores and enticed them to make purchases the blizzards had forced them to delay.
 Results were helped by the expansion in Chile through the purchase of a pension provider.
 Hopu Investment Management Co, a private-equity fund, has joined Cofco in the purchase, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 “If the project is too big for me or for us then you bring in help from outside,” Masilela said, citing PIC’s purchase of Cape Town’s waterfront in partnership with Growthpoint Properties Ltd.
 for $350 million and plans to purchase the 20 percent of Alfred C.
 District Judge Faith Hochberg must approve the accord, which would cover purchasers of Neurontin from December 2002 to August 2008.
 Japan Sales Sales slowed in Japan compared with a year earlier, when customers ramped up purchases ahead of a premium increase.
 Aflac said it repurchased $415 million of stock in the first quarter.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- The central fundraising network of billionaire energy executives Charles and David Koch purchased its first batch of television ads in this year’s US.
 Shuanghui International bought Smithfield Foods for $47 billion in September in the biggest Chinese purchase of a US.
 The initial public offering, first slated for 2012, increases liquidity at Genworth, which hasn’t paid a dividend since 2008 and last authorized share repurchases the year before that.
 The ministry, which needs to buy about 174 billion rubles for the fund, suspended the purchase of 212 billion rubles ($6 billion) on March 4 after the ruble fell to a record.
 Blackstone last month completed the purchase of Pactera Technology International Ltd, a Chinese information-technology services company.
 At the time, Chief Financial Officer Carlos Garcia Moreno said it received “very good financing” The credit line was used to refinance purchases of wireless-network equipment from Huawei.
 The loan was expressly for the purchase of Huawei products.
 Chief Executive Officer Louis Chenevert has transformed United Technologies with the 2012 purchase of aerospace supplier Goodrich Corp, asset sales and the combination of the elevator, climate-control and fire and security divisions into one unit.
 Moynihan, 54, has spent more than $50 billion to resolve claims related to mortgages, most tied to his predecessor’s 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 in its 1985 purchase of General Foods Corp.
 The two executives met in Chicago, where they made peace and, within hours, agreed to a purchase price of $106 per share.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Lonza Group AG, the Swiss chemical maker that purchased Arch Chemicals for $135 billion in 2011, is deepening the integration of the businesses to generate more sales from personal-care products.
 Lonza, founded in 1897 in the Swiss Alps, is undergoing its biggest revamp in 15 years as it looks to leverage the Arch purchase to expand in more stable consumer-goods markets to counter the ups and downs of drug ingredients.
 The financing and cash on hand will pay for the purchase.
 The fund’s actual withdrawals or deposits may differ from Morningstar’s estimates because of the timing of purchases and redemptions or dividend distributions.
 The company said some businesses are slowing purchases.
 The Fed meets begins a two-day meeting tomorrow, when economists predict the central bank will cut its monthly asset-purchase stimulus program by another $10 billion to $45 billion.
 The proposed acquisition by Laval, Quebec-based Valeant would surpass Vivendi SA’s $439 billion purchase of spirits maker Seagram Co.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries fell for the first time in a week before Federal Reserve policy makers begin a two-day meeting tomorrow at which they are forecast find enough economic improvement to further scale back stimulative bond purchases.
 They are forecast to cut monthly purchases to $45 billion, from $55 billion.
 The central bank in Kiev today eased capital controls on companies, annulling a required waiting period to purchase foreign currency.
 It also extended limits on foreign-currency cash purchases or bank withdrawals for individuals, according to a decree published on its website.
 Parisian taxi drivers blocked traffic from airports that month to protest about private car services, which don’t have to purchase a taxi permit at a cost of more than 200,000 euros ($276,000).
 real estate last year, with an average $425,000 purchase, Zillow said.
 Rhone has lined up loans to back the purchase from a group of lenders, according to two of the people.
 ASK didn’t immediately respond to telephone and email requests seeking comment on the purchase.
 That information is then crossed with details on consumer purchases and activities gleaned from outside vendors.
 Vodafone said the Piramal sale follows the purchase of the 45 percent stake held by Vodafone India non-executive chairman Analjit Singh, bringing its holding to 100 percent.
 The Newbury, England-based company is fighting a $22 billion tax bill related to its purchase of Hutchison Whampoa’s Indian unit 2007.
 Fed policy makers, who on the same day conclude their third meeting of the year, will probably reduce the pace of assets purchases designed to stoke the economy.
 At its March meeting, the Federal Open Market Committee decided to reduce monthly bond purchases by $10 billion, to $55 billion, and said it would continue to cut them in “measured steps” Three rounds of monetary stimulus have helped fuel economic growth, sending the S&P 500 surging as much as 180 percent from its 2009 low.
 ‘Investors’ Minds’ The plunge in longer-maturity Apple bonds may have hurt buyer psychology even though the losses resulted more from rising Treasury yields, according to Lon Erickson, a money manager at Thornburg Investment Management Inc, which didn’t purchase debt in last year’s sale.
 She said she now makes about 70 percent of her purchases from overseas websites.
 It also reduced the monthly pace of purchases by $10 billion, to $55 billion.
 Three rounds of bond purchases from the Fed have helped fuel economic growth, sending the S&P 500 surging as much as 180 percent from its 2009 low.
 The world’s most valuable company also said it will increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion, boost its dividend and split its stock seven for one.
 It also said it will increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion, boost its dividend and split its stock seven for one.
 The announcements come a day after the Commerce Department said new-home purchases plunged 145 percent in March and two days after the National Association of Realtors said existing-home sales fell 75 percent during the month, stoking concerns the two-year housing recovery is running out of gas.
 She also had no plans to join the unit’s purchaser, Geneva-based Mercuria Energy Group Ltd.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- JPMorgan Chase & Co, one of two banks that dominate clearing in the $18 trillion tri-party repurchase agreement market, said it curtailed daily credit risk that regulators blamed for fueling the 2008 financial crisis.
 Sales at the Yokneam Elit, Israel-based company missed estimates amid a delay in purchases by high-performance computing customers, according to Piper Jaffray Cos.
 Pershing Square Management LP, Allergan’s largest shareholder with 97 percent of shares outstanding, supports the purchase, Valeant said.
 Revenue from selling electricity lets them buy new plants as they go into production, and those purchases give the developers capital to build projects.
 The Bitcoin network uses a public ledger to record transactions made under pseudonyms, a technological breakthrough that allows purchases and sales without using a trusted third party, such as Visa Inc.
 Falling interest rates spurred by the Bank of Japan’s monthly purchases of about 7 trillion yen of sovereign bonds also support Sony.
 Apple said this week that it will increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion, to $90 billion, boost its quarterly dividend by 8 percent and split its stock 7-for-1.
 Fairfield, Connecticut-based GE may tap its overseas holdings to finance a $13 billion purchase of France’s Alstom, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Dow returned $17 billion to shareholders through dividends and share repurchases in this year’s first three months, executives told analysts this week on a conference call to discuss its first-quarter earnings.
 With European power prices near record lows, CEZ board members voted to cancel the tender after Prime Minister Bohuslav Sobotka’s government refused to guarantee the purchase price of electricity from the units.
 The purchase will make Lilly’s animal health business the world’s second biggest.
 The company repurchased $810 million of its common stock during the quarter, according to the statement.
 UBS is also raising as much as $500 million in debt to help an acquirer finance the purchase, according to one of the people.
 after its 2008 purchase of the investment bank, and earlier at Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 The People’s Bank of China sold a total of 72 billion yuan ($116 billion) of repurchase agreements today, adding to 974 billion yuan withdrawn in the previous seven weeks.
 ECB comments have seemed to inch further toward a rate cut or some form of asset-purchase program, so the backdrop for risk assets has been pretty good” Portugal’s 10-year yield fell six basis points, or 006 percentage points, this week to 368 percent after dropping to 362 percent on April 23, the lowest level since February 2006.
 SeaWorld, which owns eleven parks in the US, was purchased in 2009 by Blackstone Group LP.
 The purchase would allow the Singaporean bank more access to China-related business in the biggest center for offshore yuan trading.
 ‘Meaningful Foothold’ OCBC expects the purchase to add to per-share earnings and return on equity by 2017, the bank said yesterday.
 debt was little changed today as the central bank is forecast to cut its monthly purchases to $45 billion from $55 billion when its meeting ends tomorrow, based on a Bloomberg News survey of banks and securities companies.
 Fed Plans Fed officials are winding down the most aggressive monetary stimulus in the central bank’s 100-year history, reducing asset purchases in March to a monthly pace of $55 billion from $85 billion in December and preparing to eventually raise the federal funds rate for the first time since 2006.
 The sale price guaranteed under the purchase contract may be far higher than what Indian laws permit, and that may prompt NTT Docomo to settle for less, said Sandeep Parekh, a former official at India’s markets regulator.
 Japan’s largest wireless operator, which paid $26 billion in 2009 and 2011 for the 265 percent stake in the Mumbai-based carrier, said on April 25 that while it hasn’t decided on the selling price, it expects 50 percent of the purchase value assured under the deal.
 The sale is part of a $185 billion financing package to fund the purchase of four casinos from the parent’s operating unit -- a transaction some debt holders are challenging as fraudulent.
 Brentwood, Tennessee-based asset-management firm Hays Advisory reported the purchase of 195,665 shares, while Biondo in Milford, Pennsylvania, added 32,509 shares.
 Regulators rejected the firm’s request to quintuple its dividend and repurchase $64 billion of shares.
 The business was created from Daimler’s and Rolls-Royce’s joint 34 billion-euro purchase of German industrial-engine producer Tognum AG and the inclusion of the UK.
 A gauge of whether it’s a good time to purchase needed items improved to the highest since mid-January, while a measure of finances turned positive.
 Bidder Participation Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased their second-biggest share of a five-year note offering since May, when they took 233 percent.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 449 percent of the securities, compared with an average of 46 percent at the past 10 sales.
 After its first major overhaul since 1978, PPI now measures prices received for services, government purchases, exports and construction.
 Analysts polled said the bank will probably double purchases of exchange-traded funds when it conducts its next round of easing.
 Nicholas Schorsch’s American Realty has announced multiple purchases of at least $500 million in the past year.
 By 2020, 25 percent of the total of $523 billion of software applications purchased will be software-as-a-service, Forrester projects.
 Foreign-born buyers made 69 percent of central London new-home purchases in the two years through June, with 28 percent living outside the UK, broker Knight Frank LLP said in October.
 “They need to actively cool the market” There has been a significant increases in mortgages available above 75 percent of the value of the home purchased, the Bank of England said in a report.
 It’s bad for Berkshire” Coca-Cola said stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 The accords resolve litigation with FGIC and outstanding and potential claims that the lender is required to repurchase defective home loans backing the bonds because they failed to match their promised quality, Bank of America said yesterday in a statement.
 The larger the deal, the lower the chances, with cross-border purchases being particularly difficult, he said.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Sanofi Chief Executive Officer Chris Viehbacher said the return of mega-mergers doesn’t change his approach to deal-making: smaller purchases in emerging markets and consumer health-care.
 In May, the airline quadrupled its dividend, paid for 147 straight quarters, to 4 cents a share and boosted a stock-repurchase program by $500 million to $15 billion.
 Pimco Buys Newport Beach, California-based Pimco purchased $8 billion of the Verizon debt and BlackRock bought about $5 billion, people familiar with the sale said at the time.
 Portuguese and Spanish bonds also declined as investors await signals from policy makers on whether the European Central Bank will introduce new stimulus measures, including asset purchases.
 “Those who thought the Fed would be more concerned about the earlier weakness in the year are disappointed” The central bank said it would continue to trim the pace of bond purchases and that the economy is gaining momentum as consumers spend more.
 At the same time, the Fed repeated that it’s likely to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases end.
 It’s a close call” Sale’s Benefits Rosneft, the world’s largest publicly traded oil producer by output, agreed to the purchase in December, as political protests in Ukraine were heading toward an international crisis.
 Employees’ Decision The business being sold includes oil terminal storage agreements in many countries; physical oil inventory and related purchase, sale and supply agreements; freight shipping contracts; and a 49 percent stake in Heidmar Holdings LLC, which manages about 100 oil and chemical tankers.
 “The question is, ‘Can they do something more than just slavishly follow the market cap?’” Goldman Sachs, which has avoided large mergers throughout its history, has made several purchases in the past two years to grow an asset-management business that saw outflows in three straight years ended in 2012.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- Hannover Re, the world’s third-biggest reinsurer, has sufficient capital to offer investors a steady dividend and pursue potential purchases, Chief Executive Officer Ulrich Wallin said.
 A report by the National Association of Realtors showed contracts to purchase previously owned US.
 Federal Reserve policy makers, who on the same day conclude their third meeting of the year, will probably reduce the pace of assets purchases designed to stoke the economy.
 Existing home sales account for about 90 percent of the housing market and the figures reflect closings on purchase agreements signed a month or two earlier, when parts of the US.
 The six utility-scale projects will be in Fresno, Kern and Kings counties, and they all have long-term power-purchase agreements, Richmond, Virginia-based Dominion said in a statement today.
 Samsung argued that the iPhone maker’s multibillion-dollar damages demand is inflated, while Apple countered that the Galaxy maker chose to present low-value patents at trial -- which were purchased, and not awarded to the company -- to low-ball potential damages in the case.
 Retail Prices The increased cost of wholesale beans may mean higher prices for consumers, who show few signs of cutting back on purchases.
 14 that it had favorable costs for coffee purchases this year.
 “Recently it’s about 70 percent locally and 30 percent international” One of her more recent purchases, a pair of black Alexander Wang “Antonia” heeled sandals, cost A$495 at Green with Envy, a Melbourne-based fashion boutique.
 The company repurchased 194 million shares for $25 billion during the period after authorizing a $10 billion buyback plan, the largest in its history, in December.
 IBM said last week it won’t sustain its rate of share repurchases in the first quarter, when buybacks more than tripled from a year earlier to the most since 2007.
 With sales declining, she had ramped up repurchases, helping her hit projections for earnings per share simply by reducing the number of shares in circulation.
 The repurchases made up “a stunning” 14 percent of all stock traded in the quarter, Toni Sacconaghi, an analyst at Sanford C.
 Even so, IBM reported first-quarter adjusted earnings per share in line with analysts’ projections, suggesting it would have missed their profit estimates if it hadn’t been so aggressive in stock repurchases.
 Balance Sheet The repurchases, meanwhile, have taken a toll on IBM’s balance sheet.
 declined 23 percent after the China Securities Journal called for maintaining restrictions on home purchases.
 The government shouldn’t remove home purchase curbs nationwide as supply still can’t meet demand in first- and second-tier cities, according to a front-page commentary in the China Securities Journal.
 stocks rose, sending the Dow Jones Industrial Average to a record, as the Federal Reserve said it would continue to trim the pace of bond purchases as the economy gains momentum.
 Stocks climbed today after the Fed said that the economy is gaining momentum as consumers spend more, and said it would continue to trim the pace of bond purchases.
 At the same time, the Fed repeated that it’s likely to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases end.
 The purchase would give Tamedia the localch site, which provides phone number information and is at the “heart of the planned takeover,” according to the company’s April 17 statement.
 Like liquidity standards and leverage ratios, a proposal (just the word “proposal” sounds soft) on limiting counterparty holdings has been neutered to allow banks to keep most derivatives and repurchase contracts they share.
 “What we’re trying to do with banking is create that emotional experience inside the way which images are used, the way we greet and the way we understand how customers bank with us” Future versions will probably detect users’ location to tailor their experience and ease transactions including in-store purchases and pulling cash from automated teller machines, he said.
 surged 7 percent and a gauge of real-estate shares jumped to a six-week high after the Shanghai Securities News said some Chinese cities are discussing easing curbs on home purchases.
 Government officials in the cities of Changsha and Hangzhou told local property companies in meetings last week that local governments are considering property market stabilization policies, including relaxing home purchase curbs, the Shanghai Securities News reported, citing unidentified people in the property industry.
 LightSquared also alleged the debt purchases were improper because Ergen concealed that he was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish.
 “Through consistent, long-term policies, we will not just spur the process of economic growth, but also ensure that it is stable as well as balanced” Interest Rates Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan, who has boosted the benchmark rate by 75 basis points since taking over in September, kept the repurchase rate at 8 percent on April 1.
 “This would potentially give Chinese buyers a hedge on purchases” Li spent $22 billion buying the London Metal Exchange in December 2012, the most expensive bourse acquisition over $1 billion since at least 2000, according to data complied by Bloomberg.
 In the revised accord, Total purchased an InterOil unit that held the 401 percent stake, rather than buying the stake itself.
 Barak, 72, said in an interview that he used the profit to purchase a smaller home in the nearby Assuta luxury complex, and five apartments in the planned Icon TLV project close to city hall that he’ll rent out.
 “There’s no more space to buy, everything has to be demolished and the only way to build is up” Low mortgage rates have fueled the surge in purchases.
 “The United States is prepared to impose additional significant sanctions on Russia if it continues to escalate the situation in Ukraine” Russia’s Finance Ministry will resume purchases of foreign currency on April 14, buying an equivalent of 35 billion rubles ($98 million) a day until it reaches 174 billion rubles for its sovereign-wealth fund, it said yesterday.
 At the same time, the Fed repeated that it’s likely to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases end.
 Federal Reserve policy makers today decided to trim the pace of bond purchases as they looked beyond the slowdown in growth.
 Consumer purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, rose at a 3 percent pace, spurred by utility outlays and spending on health care tied to President Barack Obama’s Affordable Care Act.
 The wintry weather held back purchases of goods, which climbed at a 04 percent pace -- the least in almost two years.
 Proceeds, along with $675 million from a planned bond sale, will fund the purchase of four casinos from the parent -- a transaction some debt holders are challenging as fraudulent.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since it was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout put together by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital at the peak of the last takeover boom in 2008.
 Investors got so aggressive in those markets” Private-equity firms, hedge funds and real estate investment trusts have purchased as many as 200,000 houses during the past two years.
 Texas lawyer Hilliard said he wants the automaker to “disgorge” to all customers the full amount of their original purchase price so they can buy new cars.
 Policy makers cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $55 billion in March.
 The appointment of Weiss, who joined Wells Fargo with its 2008 purchase of Wachovia Corp, is a sign of how the company has leaned on that acquisition to expand what had been a fledgling investment-banking unit.
 3 from 11th in 2008, before it purchased Wachovia.
 The Hudson Yards district -- bounded by West 42nd Street, Eighth Avenue, West 30th Street and Hudson River Park -- was rezoned in 2005 and allows for 26 million square feet of office space, 20,000 units of new housing, 2 million square feet of retail space and 3 million square feet of hotels, according to Tishman Speyer   The company didn’t disclose financial terms of its purchase.
 “Utilities are having a tough time getting the coal that they already purchased,” Ted O’Brien, vice president at Doyle Trading Consultants LLC, a Grand Junction, Colorado-based coal analytics company, said in a March 14 interview.
 “Our revenue model is very different and hence our financing model is very different than a lot of other industries” Hydro One Pension funds may boost equity stakes in electricity ventures, similar to Ontario Municipal Employees Retirement System’s January purchase of a 316 percent interest in the Bruce Power Ontario nuclear site, he said.
 The company, which has brewing or beverage interests in 32 African countries, entered the Nigerian market in 2009 with the purchase of controlling interests in Pabod Breweries, based in the southern oil hub of Port Harcourt.
 The board set a share-repurchase plan that expires at the end of next year.
 Now bondholders are speculating the ECB will either tolerate inflation that’s slowed to a four-year low, preserving the purchasing power of the fixed payments on bonds, or unleash a debt-purchase program to fend off the risk of deflation.
 That amounts to about 1 percent of the fund and, while other money managers at Legal & General also bought the securities, this was the largest purchase, he said.
 Asset managers purchased 49 percent of the debt and hedge funds bought 33 percent, it said.
 “The Chinese art market is very strong and anew Southeast Asian record was set” Of the top 10 lots at the sale, nine were purchased byAsians, according to Sotheby’s, suggesting that slowing economicgrowth in China hasn’t damped regional demand for art.
 Thenecklace was once owned by American department store heiressBarbara Hutton and is described in the Sotheby’s catalog as“the most important piece of jadeite jewelry known to theworld” Auction Record Five bidders vied for several minutes to purchase the 1995Zhang oil on canvas measuring 179 centimeters (705 inches) by229 centimeters.
 Minth said it completed the purchases of Talentlink and Magic Figure for about 886 million yuan ($14 million) from Chairman Chin Jong Hwa’s nephew and niece, in April 2008.
 The purchase gives St.
 Laclede, in a separate statement, said the effective purchase price is $134 billion, after taking into account the present value, amounting to approximately $260 million, of tax benefits from the transaction.
 “So we need to go to different places that give us the right look and feel” The movie, to be released in December 2015, will be the seventh “Star Wars” picture from Lucasfilm, purchased in 2012 by Disney in a $405 billion bet on the franchise created by George Lucas.
 A deal would help Holcim and Lafarge to “cut a lot of costs and dominate a few more markets” Regulatory Scrutiny An acquisition spree before the financial crisis, including Lafarge’s 102 billion-euro purchase of Orascom Cement in 2008 and Holcim’s $41 billion deal for Aggregate Industries in 2005, widened the dominance of both companies.
 Discover previously set plans to boost its dividend 20 percent to 24 cents a share and said it would repurchase as much as $32 billion of shares through April 15, 2016, after passing annual stress tests administered by the Federal Reserve.
 Write-offs at Discover fell to 23 percent in March from 25 percent in February and loans at least 30 days overdue dropped to 17 percent from 18 percent American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by customer spending, said April 16 that net income increased 12 percent to $143 billion as card purchases climbed and expenses fell.
 The purchase involves five production slots that became available.
 RBS can use the extra capital to repurchase common stock without needing to buy back the Class B shares at 650 pence apiece, more than twice their current value, Jefferies said.
 The Monetary Policy Committee also kept its asset-purchase program on hold at 375 billion pounds ($629 billion).
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said in a press conference following last month’s meeting that they may increase about six months after the Fed halts its monthly asset purchases.
 Discover previously set plans to boost its dividend 20 percent to 24 cents a share and said it would repurchase as much as $32 billion of shares through April 15, 2016, after passing annual stress tests administered by the Federal Reserve.
 “The shares will continue to work as the company continues to show strong card balance growth with conservative underwriting” American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by customer spending, said April 16 that net income increased 12 percent to $143 billion as card purchases climbed and expenses fell.
 BAT could help fund such a purchase, analysts at Exane BNP Paribas have said.
 “Under the terms of the senior preferred stock purchase agreement, Fannie Mae is not permitted to retain capital to withstand a sudden, unexpected economic shock of the magnitude required by the stress test” The companies would need $84 billion to $190 billion by the end of 2015 in the worst circumstances, depending on accounting assumptions, the tests showed.
 The central bank is in the process of unwinding the bond-purchase program it has used to help support the economy.
 The Fed purchased $23 billion of Treasuries maturing from August 2021 to February 2024 today.
 Draghi said yesterday officials have discussed further options, including asset purchases, or quantitative easing.
 By contrast, Federal Reserve policy makers are slowing their bond purchases and debating when interest rates will rise.
 Portuguese spreads versus Germany are likely to tighten further given growing investor expectations that “we’re going to hear something more definitive” shortly about ECB plans to conduct asset purchases, Richard Hodges, head of high-alpha fixed income at Legal & General Investment Management in London, said in a phone interview today.
 Foschini, which may make about 14 billion rand from its 55 percent stake in RCS, will use the proceeds to repurchase its own shares, the Cape Town-based retailer said in a separate statement today.
 The company is focused on building CheckMate, which it purchased last year to help hotels manage mobile booking.
 Chief Executive Officer Hariolf Kottmann, who purchased German catalyst maker Sued-Chemie for about $23 billion in 2011, has been revamping Muttenz, Switzerland-based Clariant with the sale of non-core assets.
 Traders trying to purchase investment-grade notes were failing about 46 percent of the time at the end of last year, close to the worst rate in more than four years as measured by activity on MarketAxess Holdings Inc’s electronic platform.
 They have purchases lined up too, and they can’t close on those deals if they can’t sell their house.
 There is nothing worse in our industry” The majority of loans impacted are purchase mortgages.
 “HSBC Group has made significant progress under the current management team” The accord, approved by a judge in July, resolved claims that London-based HSBC failed to monitor more than $670 billion in wire transfers and more than $94 billion in purchases of US.
 EBay, which added $5 billion to its stock-buyback plan earlier this year, could also use the cash to repurchase shares.
 The third-biggest Gulf carrier is negotiating on both fronts, Chief Executive Officer James Hogan said today as he seeks to add Alitalia to a batch of minority holdings purchased to help funnel traffic through his company’s Abu Dhabi hub.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- American Water Works Co, the largest publicly traded water utility in the US, announced an agreement to purchase the Lucas Estates Water Co.
 3 deal to purchase the Mt.
 The purchase price represents 09 times the combined company’s 2013 book value and 69 times last year’s earnings, according to a company presentation.
 Raising Funds The asset purchase will reduce a public float that currently stands at 42 percent, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 At $36 billion, the Citic deal would top China Mobile Ltd’s $32 billion purchase of seven wireless networks from its parent to be the largest such asset injection into a Hong Kong unit by a Chinese company, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Citic Pacific’s purchase “is positive for the listed company because the new assets injected into the company can generate more than HK$30 billion to HK$40 billion a year,” AMTD’s Tang said.
 The brokers sold discounted euros obtained from the drug sales to cigarette importers, who then purchased Reynolds American cigarettes from wholesalers, according to the complaint.
 The Fed reduced asset purchases to a monthly pace of $55 billion in March from $85 billion in December, and is preparing to eventually raise the federal funds rate for the first time since 2006.
 “I think there will be an opportunity for us to refinance this unsecured debt and get a better rate than we get now” Freescale was purchased by private-equity firms including Blackstone Group LP and TPG Capital for $162 billion in 2006, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Blackstone last year plowed more than $1 billion into the Asia Pacific, with purchases ranging from Chinese shopping malls to Australian office buildings, in its quest to expand its presence in the region.
 He’s motivated by the disappearance of nickel producer Inco Ltd, which was acquired by Brazil’s Vale in 2007; Falconbridge, bought by Xstrata in 2005; and aluminum producer Alcan, purchased by Rio in 2007.
 “This option presents the lowest risk to complete a functional online exchange in time for the next open enrollment period and comes in at the lowest cost” Maryland, whose Health Benefit Exchange also suffered catastrophic computer errors, wants to spend about $45 million to purchase Connecticut’s technology, built by Deloitte LLP.
 Portfolio Drag “The more people purchase it without it paying off creates a drag on their portfolios, and to some extent some people may cease doing that,” Metz said by phone from Chicago.
 Apple will increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion, boost its dividend and split its stock seven for one.
 That compares with a $3 billion inflow into Indonesian equities and a $693 million net foreign purchase of Philippine shares.
 “While we applaud the newly introduced Fannie incentives program for REO purchase by potential owner occupants, we are concerned it will be no more effective than existing ’first look’ policies, which have failed to significantly expand homeownership opportunities for first-time homebuyers and others who wish to live in the homes they purchase,” the groups, including the California Reinvestment Coalition and the National Community Reinvestment Coalition, said in a March letter to federal regulators.
 “It does have a finished basement, but that doesn’t make up for the price difference” Mortgage Rates Mortgage rates are poised to continue rising as the Federal Reserve tapers its bond purchases that have kept borrowing costs low.
 Investor purchases have helped push prices higher in cities such as Phoenix, where values increased 44 percent since the 2011 low, S&P/Case-Shiller data show.
 Saputo may consider asset purchases to raise its mozzarella output, Chief Executive Officer Lino Saputo Jr.
 will probably expand share repurchases after agreeing to sell its Japanese operations to Orix Corp.
 insurer could repurchase $105 billion of stock, while paying down $350 million of debt, John Nadel, an analyst at Sterne Agee & Leach Inc.
 The transaction is expected to be completed in July, and the final purchase price is subject to adjustment for market fluctuations, Hartford said.
 In February, the insurer said it had $2 billion of repurchases authorized for this year and next.
 “Expectations tend to rise that Orix would buy back its shares unless they deploy their capital otherwise, so they will likely continue with mergers and acquisitions” Among Orix’s biggest takeovers was the purchase of the Robeco Groep NV asset-management unit from Rabobank Groep last year for about $26 billion.
 agreed to purchase earlier this week, plans to sell a $150 million bond to fund its operations across southern Africa.
 The company’s leverage will decline to 27 times this year as the earnings from its $15 billion purchase of TV broadcaster Belo Corp.
 “It needs to be transparent, and it shouldn’t be providing financing in any instance where there’s a private-market alternative” Anderson said the carrier’s complaint with the bank deals only with the lender’s support for purchases of wide-body aircraft.
 Fed officials began to signal about a year ago that they might start scaling back their asset-purchase program, and announced in December they would begin to trim monthly purchases of bonds.
 The increase last month was led by the biggest gain in motor vehicle purchases since September 2012.
 S&P cut its grade two levels to AA, citing ADP’s plan to use at least $700 million of proceeds from the tax-free spinoff to repurchase shares.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Symrise AG shares dropped the most in six months in Frankfurt trading after the German maker of flavors and fragrances said it is considering a capital increase to finance the planned 13 billion-euro ($18 billion) purchase of French competitor Diana Group.
 The purchase of Vannes, France-based Diana, predicted to close in the third quarter, also adds a pet-food additives business whose earnings are more resilient to the ups and downs of consumer spending.
 Alibaba, China’s biggest e-commerce company, will purchase shares at a 15 percent discount to Weibo’s IPO price, it said last month.
 collapsed in October after the Louisville, Kentucky-based firm didn’t meet a condition for the purchase.
 The team was debt-free before the Glazers’ purchase, and it has paid about 600 million pounds in interest and other financing costs since then.
 Some of the IPO shares were purchased by fans, which also helps support the stock price, Andrew Wilkinson, chief market analyst at Greenwich, Connecticut-based Interactive Brokers, which doesn’t rate stocks, said in a note.
 Tencent announced several purchases last month, including $500 million for a 28 percent stake in South Korea’s CJ Games, $180 million for a 15 percent stake in the Leju Holdings Ltd.
 While CEO, he made a series of acquisitions, including the $112 billion purchase of Ralston Purina Co, to diversify the business beyond food.
 Galderma Deal As part of the L’Oreal sale, Nestle made a $36 billion purchase in February of Galderma, a dermatology business that revives skin.
 The purchase of Newmont would have been a dramatic final move by Barrick founder and Chairman Peter Munk, who is due to retire at the April 30 shareholders meeting.
 About a third of these purchases are already made online, and that may double by 2020, according to research firm Kantar Retail.
 Revera’s partner in the purchase was Health Care REIT Inc, which finished buying Sunrise’s properties last July.
 Shuanghui International bought Smithfield Foods for $47 billion in September in the biggest Chinese purchase of a US.
 “Like it or not, M&A and share repurchases have been far better providers of shareholder value in recent years than” capital expenditures.
 Crane said today on a conference call that he is confident the company will gain all the necessary regulatory approvals for the purchase.
 The central bank cut its monthly debt purchases to $55 billion in March, lowering the amount by $10 billion for the third policy meeting in a row.
 That crime, tied to the purchase of film rights at his Mediaset SpA television broadcaster, led to Berlusconi’s expulsion from parliament after a 19-year tenure.
 While larger stockpiles in China prompted mills to import less fiber, the nation’s purchases of cotton yarn jumped 31 percent in the 12 months through Feb.
 Stress Test Corbat, 53, was dealt another setback last month when Citigroup failed an annual stress test administered by the Fed, which rejected the company’s request to quintuple its dividend and repurchase $64 billion of shares.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank might start broad-based asset purchases if the inflation outlook worsens as he prepares the ground for one of the most radical policies in the ECB’s history.
 “The ECB is unlikely to embark on broad-based asset purchases unless the ECB feels real deflationary risks” The euro fell after Draghi’s comments.
 While that prompted Draghi to say on April 3 that policy makers are willing to use unconventional measures including asset purchases if needed, he also said the figure was depressed by temporary factors such as lower energy and food prices and the timing of Easter.
 “The delay is largely explained by the impairments in the transmission mechanism that lengthen the lag between our accommodative policy stance and price developments” Draghi said that any asset-purchase program “should certainly take into account the heterogeneity, the fragmentation let’s call it, of our euro-area system, if that is relevant for the effectiveness of the purchase program” Euro Strength His words echo comments made by Executive Board member Benoit Coeure on April 13 in Washington.
 Coeure warned that “segmentation would have to be taken into consideration” to ensure a purchase program in the euro area achieved a “homogeneous reduction” of longer-term interest rates.
 The Fed objected to Citigroup’s 2014 submission two weeks later, blocking plans to quintuple the dividend and repurchase as much as $64 billion of stock.
 Pearson said in March he could do another transaction this year comparable in size to his debt-fueled $87 billion purchase of the eye-care company Bausch & Lomb Inc.
 Paulson’s firm is on track to invest $1 billion in the territory over the next two years through land purchases and properties to be torn down and rebuilt, Bague said in an interview yesterday.
 Portuguese and Spanish bonds also declined as investors await signals from policy makers on whether the European Central Bank will introduce new stimulus measures, including asset purchases.
 The ads are targeted based on data Apple has on customers, such as what apps a person has purchased from the company’s App Store or what songs and movies have been bought through iTunes.
 Petrobras may boost imports by 31 percent to 21 million cubic meters a day of gas this year, equal to annual purchases of about 57 million tons of LNG, Tavares of Gas Energy said on April 23.
 The water service should be integrated from purchase and treatment to consumption and wastewater-handling before it returns to rivers, the draft said.
 Builders were forced to cancel projects as buyers, who acquired properties before they were built, defaulted on thousands of purchases.
 The developer will also limit the number of properties buyers can purchase before development, he said.
 RFR, founded by Aby Rosen and partner Michael Fuchs in 1991, purchased the Seagram Building for $375 million in 2000.
 With an enterprise value of $30 billion, Kellogg would surpass Heinz as the biggest food company purchase on record, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 At the time, Buffett told CNBC that even after the Heinz purchase, he was “ready for another elephant” “The cash builds from month to month, so the gun is always getting reloaded,” he said.
 “My intention is to be here for many, many years,” Fink said, adding he and President Robert Kapito, 56, “aren’t going anywhere” BlackRock’s growth had been largely fueled by acquisitions, culminating in its 2009 purchase of Barclays Plc’s investment unit, which helped it expand into passive investments.
 Chief Executive Officer Jamie Dimon warned investors in February that trading had fallen 15 percent for the first two months of 2014, a decline analysts blamed on a reduction in the Federal Reserve’s bond purchases.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Hugh “Skip” McGee, Barclays Plc’s top-paid executive and one of the most senior dealmakers to join the British bank following its purchase of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s US.
 A deal would help Holcim and Lafarge to “cut a lot of costs and dominate a few more markets” Regulatory Scrutiny An acquisition spree before the financial crisis, including Lafarge’s 102 billion-euro purchase of Orascom Cement in 2008 and Holcim’s $41 billion deal for Aggregate Industries in 2005, widened the dominance of both companies.
 Mega-Mergers A merger of this reported size would top Pfizer’s 2000 purchase of Warner-Lambert Co.
 A purchase of AstraZeneca could also potentially allow Pfizer to move its tax domicile to the UK.
 hospital chain, in January to help fund its $76 billion purchase of Health Management Associates Inc, Bloomberg data show.
 economy with more than $3 trillion, the Fed began reducing stimulus by scaling back its monthly bond purchases this year.
 Minority Stake In February, Blackstone Group LP and GIC Private Limited agreed to purchase a minority stake in Hellman & Friedman-backed Kronos Inc.
 Last month, Hellman & Friedman agreed to purchase education-analytics company Renaissance Learning Inc.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said in Amsterdam last week that the Frankfurt-based central bank may start broad-based asset purchases if the inflation outlook worsens.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, posted a first-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates as customer spending climbed.
 In an April 14 proxy statement, Anworth defended its performance and said it had returned money to investors through a dividend increase and repurchased shares.
 management to repurchase stock.
 After Bulldog Investors threatened a proxy fight, Javelin repurchased 516,000 shares directly from the firm in December.
 It has had successful outcomes, including liquidation, increased dividends and share repurchases, in 31 of them.
 The firm repurchased at least 28 million shares in the fourth quarter when their stock was trading at the lowest levels since 2007, and in December announced board approval to buy back as many as 5 million more.
 That compares with 438 million shares repurchased, or 13 percent, by American Capital Agency Corp, the second-largest mortgage REIT.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve said it will keep reducing the pace of bond purchases as the economy shakes off the winter doldrums, putting the central bank on a course to end the unprecedented stimulus program by the close of 2014.
 “You need a much bigger swing in the data to stop tapering and much more weakness than just a 01 percent print on GDP” Stocks and Treasuries rose as the Fed repeated that it’s likely to keep the benchmark interest rate close to zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases end.
 That took this year’s purchases to $476 billion, the second-highest among eight Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg, after Taiwan.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- Federal Communications Commission Chairman Tom Wheeler is proposing to limit the amount of airwaves any single company can purchase at the largest US.
 Their new purchase, nicknamed the “Chicken Cup,” will be featured at their private Dragon Art Museum in Shanghai, said Nicolas Chow, head of Chinese ceramics and works of art and deputy chairman at Sotheby’s Asia.
 VW has reaped limited financial rewards for the billions of euros invested in the last decade to purchase control of Scania and MAN as minority investors resisted efforts to share technology that would boost profit.
 Carlyle agreed to purchase a 55 percent stake in ESG in June 2011.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to a 20-year contract to purchase electricity from the solar farm.
 Elop returned to Microsoft as part of its $75 billion purchase of the division.
 The proceeds from the Microsoft sale bring Nokia’s gross cash to more than 10 billion euros, giving it ammunition for purchases even after the planned dividends, buybacks and debt reduction.
 Since November, at least 10 Chinese cities tightened local restrictions by taking measures such as raising down payments for second homes, making purchases more difficult.
 The Co-Operative Group Ltd, the mutual that owned the lender, agreed last year to cede control of the banking unit to creditors under a plan to plug a 15 billion-pound capital shortfall that stemmed from its 2009 purchase of the Britannia Building Society.
 “We were pleased to announce plans to return more capital to our shareholders through a 9 percent increase in our quarterly dividend and reinstituted share-repurchase programs” PNC gained 21 percent to $8388 in New York trading at 11:30 am, pushing the gain for this year to 81 percent.
 Lending has fallen since mid-2013 and a surge in all-cash purchases may push the market down again this year, according to the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 At Qatar Air, CEO Akbar Al Baker said in a March 25 interview that he doesn’t favor investments “in bits and pieces,” having turned down “umpteen airlines” -- including Alitalia, which was made available “several times,” and recent Etihad purchases Air Seychelles and Air Serbia.
 Comcast is about to get even larger once its proposed $45 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Broadband Market Following Comcast’s purchase of Time Warner Cable, the combined companies would account for a little more than 38 percent of the total US.
 As the company looks to complete the deal toward the end of the year, Comcast plans to increase repurchases of its own shares by an additional $25 billion this year as a way to sweeten the offer if Time Warner Cable shareholders approve the merger.
 Bombardier Deal Government export credit agencies, which stepped in to finance aircraft purchases after the 2008 credit crisis froze capital markets, are generally paring budgets.
 Iraqi Airways also has a letter of intent to purchase five CS300 CSeries narrow-bodies from Bombardier Inc.
 Coca-Cola has said that stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 Total passenger-vehicle sales in China gained 9 percent in March, as consumers brought forth purchases on concern more cities will limit ownership, the Passenger Car Association said today in a statement.
 Hangzhou, the capital of eastern Zhejiang province, joined Beijing and Shanghai among Chinese cities to impose quotas on new vehicle purchases, as part of measures to alleviate traffic congestion and air pollution.
 Consumers are pulling ahead purchases in anticipation more cities will roll out similar steps as local governments respond to Premier Li Keqiang’s call to wage war on smog.
 The 2007 purchase of Dallas-based Energy Future Holdings, known as TXU Corp, for $48 billion came at the peak of a three-year boom in leveraged buyouts.
 One area of investigation is the difficulty some investors had in buying and selling bonds last May after the central bank suggested it might scale back its own bond purchases, according to the report.
 Facility Revenue Viola’s purchase included Sunrise Sports & Entertainment, which controls the Panthers and operates the arena.
 patents, including 20 purchased from International Business Machines Corp.
 The Telesat purchase would come in two pieces: buying publicly traded Loral, which owns 63 percent of the company, and acquiring the rest from Canada’s Public Sector Pension Investment Board, which co-owns the satellite operator.
 The central bank will probably cut its monthly asset-purchase stimulus program by another $10 billion to $45 billion tomorrow, a Bloomberg News survey of economists shows.
 As a result, multiple sets of buyers are making separate purchases and leaving volume-buying discounts on the table, said Silvio Abrahao Laban Neto, a professor of marketing at Insper Institute of Education and Research in Sao Paulo.
 ECB Executive Board member Benoit Coeure said in Washington that the fragmented euro area means the large-scale bond purchases favored by the Federal Reserve, Bank of England and Bank of Japan may not be appropriate.
 Asset purchases have also been discussed by the 24-member council.
 “It’ll be interesting to see whether the ECB will actually start a purchase program, even if a small one,” said Nick Kounis, head of macro research at ABN Amro Bank NV in Amsterdam.
 The agreement would release Citigroup’s obligation to repurchase loans sold to the trusts, according to the bank’s statement.
 The investment bank, which joined the NYSE in 1896, bought the operations in 2000 as part of a $54 billion purchase of Spear, Leeds & Kellogg.
 stock trading switched to decimal share pricing, from 16ths of a dollar, cutting the spread traders earn between purchases and sales.
 The Spear Leeds purchase also included an execution and clearing business that remains within Goldman Sachs.
 In a speech in Amsterdam last week, he said the central bank could start broad-based asset purchases if the medium-term outlook for inflation worsens.
 When the ECB announced an unlimited bond-purchase program in 2012, Bundesbank President Jens Weidmann insisted that his opposition to the program be made public.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, jumped 51 basis points, or 051 percentage point, to 402 percent as of 4:20 pm.
 Kelt raised equity funds this year after an asset purchase and almost doubled its drilling program for 2014.
 The Atlanta-based company purchased 167 million newly issued Keurig shares in February as part of the partnership, driving the coffee-maker’s stock to a record $12374 that month.
 The difference touched 67 basis points on April 18, the most in four years, as the Fed unwinds its bond-buying program while Japan and Europe consider additional purchases.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 215 percent of the notes at the last offering, compared with an average of 224 percent at the past 10.
 Fed Policy The Fed is in the process of phasing out the bond-purchase program it has used to help support the economy.
 It purchased $102 billion in notes maturing between November 2039 and August 2043 today.
 The Perth-based producer agreed in January to pay A$75 million for Barrick’s Kanowna assets after it said a month earlier it would purchase the same company’s Plutonic mine for A$25 million.
 “It clearly falls under this class of stocks that’s momentum-driven” Stock Acquisitions In February, Facebook ramped up its mobile business by agreeing to purchase WhatsApp Inc.
 The deal was followed by the purchase of Oculus VR Inc, a push into wearable hardware, for $2 billion in March, about $16 billion of which was agreed upon in stock.
 Making major changes midway through the life cycle of Camry, redesigned in 2011, is unprecedented for a car that’s purchased more for value and durability than looks.
 Sales of previously owned properties in March tumbled 75 percent from a year earlier to the slowest pace in 20 months, while purchases of new houses sank 145 percent from February, according to reports this week.
 “Once it goes back to the normal owner-occupied purchase market, you really realize how weak the market is” While last year’s spring buying season was characterized by bidding wars across the country as buyers rushed to take advantage of record-low mortgage rates amid low inventory, the market so far in 2014 has been more affected by issues specific to local geographic areas.
 The average rate for a 30-year fixed mortgage was 433 percent this week, according to Freddie Mac, up a full percentage point from near record lows last May as the Federal Reserve scales back bond purchases.
 The average dipped to 8 percent in 2009 and 2010, when tax incentives were put in place to encourage purchases by first-time buyers, who more often use federally-insured loans with lower down payment requirements.
 Lenders have begun to loosen credit for home purchases as they seek to hold onto business that plunged as fewer homeowners refinanced.
 The average FICO score for conventional purchase mortgages was 755 in March, compared with a 763 average in 2012, according to Ellie Mae Inc, a mortgage-software provider.
 The share of individual investor purchases declined in March to 17 percent, the smallest for that month in data since to 2008, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 Early figures show purchases in the first quarter by investors with at least 10 rental houses fell 57 percent from a year earlier, according to a presentation by CoreLogic.
 Initially, Comerica’s income from Direct Express was lower than expected because recipients, including veterans and the disabled who receive supplemental Social Security benefits, used the cards to get cash rather than make purchases that would generate fees for the bank.
 Moelis ranks 37th among M&A advisers in 2014, with its largest deal being TIAA-CREF’s $625 billion purchase of Nuveen Investments, the data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The purchase is Australia’s largest retail takeover since 2007, when Wesfarmers Ltd.
 The central bank reduced asset purchases in March to a monthly pace of $55 billion from $85 billion in December.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- India signed contracts to purchase solar power from companies building 700 megawatts of capacity awarded in a national auction.
 The government is waiting to sign purchase agreements for the remaining 50 megawatts from the auction in February, Tarun Kapoor, joint secretary at the Ministry of New and Renewable Energy, said today in an interview in New Delhi.
 Disposing of the plastics assets would further whittle down one of Europe’s last remaining major pharmaceutical and chemicals conglomerates, and a sale would coincide with a push by Bayer for purchases to broaden its drug and life-science offering, the people said.
 ICE became owner of the exchange through its purchase of NYSE Euronext in November.
 Talanx went public in 2012, gaining funds for expansion in industrial insurance coverage and repaying loans for its Polish purchases.
 Motier SAS, the Moulin family’s holding company, said it purchased 442 million Carrefour shares, according to a statement after European markets closed yesterday.
 Playing Brazil Motier has no intention of increasing the stake, which was purchased on the open market, said a person familiar with the matter, declining to be identified as the plans aren’t public.
 The purchase of a stake in Carrefour follows failures by Galeries Lafayette in the past year to acquire department stores Printemps and House of Fraser Plc.
 Spokeswomen for Carrefour and Colony Capital declined to comment on the purchase.
 Share Repurchases Book value, a measure of assets minus liabilities, increased to $4156 a share as of March 31 from $3914 three months earlier.
 The company said it repurchased $300 million of stock in the first quarter and another $300 million since April 1.
 “Our major program of restructuring and investment is on track and will drive a leaner, more cash-generative, faster-growing business from 2015” Pearson, which earns about 60 percent of revenue in the US, has blamed lower freshman enrollments and bookstore purchases for reducing earnings in the country.
 Federal Reserve said that it would start tapering its monthly bond purchases.
 India, the largest importer, cut purchases in March by 23 percent from a year earlier to 537,077 tons, down for a third straight month, the Solvent Extractors’ Association of India said April 15.
 The purchase of Fairlawn, Ohio-based Veyance, a maker of hoses and conveyor belts, will increase the share of revenue that Continental generates outside the car industry to 32 percent from 28 percent.
 Price agreed to pay $75 million to settle the New York attorney general’s lawsuit over alleged misrepresentations to investors about the bank’s 2009 purchase of Merrill Lynch & Co.
 Arbitration Award When Cukurova’s share sale to a Dutch unit of TeliaSonera didn’t go through, a Geneva-based arbitration tribunal found the parties had reached a purchase agreement and ordered Cukurova to pay $932 million in damages.
 A surge in all-cash purchases to more than 40 percent has kept housing prices rising, squeezing more Americans out of the market.
 All-cash purchases, dominated by investors, are surging as lending drops.
 Avolon Chief Executive Officer Domhnal Slattery said last year he was encouraged by transactions including Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc’s $73 billion purchase of Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s aviation unit and that he would explore strategic options as early as 2014.
 Its most recent financing closed last month, when it secured a $500 million debt facility to finance aircraft purchases this year.
 Other lessor transactions in the last 24 months include the purchase of Oaktree Capital Group LLC’s Jackson Square Aviation to Mitsubishi UFJ Lease & Finance Co.
 Put forward in June, these would force money funds that cater to institutional investors and purchase corporate debt to abandon their traditional $1 share price.
 More Memory The Elpida purchase brought Micron a bigger chunk of the DRAM market to help it gain scale and provide more of a return for its technology investments.
 His boss, Belinda Koh, made a complaint to the police on March 2, 2012, alleging he compromised confidential information relating to clients of the New York-based company, which is the world’s biggest credit-card issuer by purchases.
 In one of the first efforts to quantify the impact of states accruing more tax revenue from Web purchases, researchers at Ohio State University published a paper this month that found sales dropped for Amazon when the online charge was introduced.
 For online purchases of more than $300, sales fell by 24 percent, according to the report titled “The Amazon Tax” The findings add to concerns about how much the world’s largest online retailer can expand.
 Amazon has enjoyed an edge against brick-and-mortar retailers because consumers didn’t have to pay a sales tax for purchases from the e-commerce site, yet that has eroded as states including California and Texas have unveiled the levies.
 “It has been their competitive advantage” State Coffers The push by states to collect taxes on Internet purchases has gathered momentum in the past few years.
 Indirect Benefit In total, brick-and-mortar retailers enjoyed a 2 percent bump in purchases in states that introduced an online sales tax, while competing online retailers got a 20 percent increase, the study found.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Leroy Merlin, a French retailer of do-it-yourself goods, said sales in Russia have surged in recent weeks as customers hurry to make purchases amid concern that tension over Ukraine will lead to higher prices.
 Tax Boost The ONS budget data showed that March revenue climbed 57 percent from a year earlier, boosted by value-added tax on sales and a 45 percent jump in stamp duty on purchases of property and shares.
 “Our catering business for example is very much involved in acquisitions” Still, service deals in emerging markets are generally more successful when local partners are involved, mitigating against 100 percent purchases, she said.
 Apple attempted to turn the tables on Samsung’s tactics by arguing that the Galaxy-maker chose to present low-value patents at trial -- which were purchased, and not awarded to the company -- to low-ball potential damages in the case.
 Kearl also agreed that the patent Samsung is suing over is expired, and that Samsung purchased it after Apple met with the company and asked it to stop its infringement, and after Apple filed its second lawsuit, the one now at trial.
 The hedge-fund manager, who last year considered relocating to Puerto Rico to take advantage of new tax laws, said opportunities to buy real estate in the region won’t last much longer, and he’s looking to purchase sites that can be developed to serve people he expects to move here because of the legislation.
 28 and the purchase will add to underlying earnings per share in the first full financial year after completion.
 Founded in 2005, TrueCar helps consumers purchase vehicles using information gleaned from more than 7,000 dealerships, the filing showed.
 The purchase was made in the name of Aircraft Purchase Fleet, an entity created to help fund purchases for Air One, which later merged with state-controlled rival Alitalia.
 Taxpayer Cost The Air Force agreed to the bulk purchase of the main rocket components last year in an attempt to hold down costs.
 Repurchases could reach as high as $581 million in the current quarter, helping reward investors.
 Toronto-Dominion acquired Bank of America Corp’s C$736 billion MBNA Canadian MasterCard portfolio in December 2011 and agreed to purchase the C$495 million private-label card portfolio of HSBC Holdings Plc.
 Royal Bank was largest based on total volume and purchase transactions, the report said.
 The Toronto-based bank also had the highest increase in credit-card purchase transactions from a year earlier.
 Saab said a purchase of the unit, formerly called Kockums, would “meet the needs of Sweden” as well as its own ambitions to expand in the naval segment.
 A purchase would allow Saab, which already provides products such as ship-control management and electronic warfare systems for submarines, to build underwater vessels.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Petroleo Brasileiro SA, facing a growing scandal over its $12 billion purchase of a refinery in Texas, said it bought the plant to maximize returns on heavy oil that it couldn’t refine in Brazil.
 Opposition lawmakers are pushing for a formal investigation into the 2006 purchase from Astra Oil Trading NV, which Foster said paid at least $360 million for the plant.
 President Dilma Rousseff, then Petrobras’ chairwoman, said last month that directors approved the $370 million purchase of a 50 percent stake without knowledge of a clause that later forced it to buy the rest as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 The Pasadena refinery had $58 million in profit in January and February, after years of losses since Petrobras’s initial purchase of half of the plant, according to Foster.
 The court that oversees government spending and the Public Ministry is investigating Petrobras for the refinery purchase.
 has considered a purchase of the cognac maker.
 European equities climbed yesterday as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said that policy makers could turn to asset purchases to combat persistent low inflation in the 18-nation euro zone.
 The proportion of equity to debt jumped to almost one-to-one in deals such as TPG’s and Canada Pension Plan Investment Board’s $52 billion purchase in 2010 of health-care data provider IMS Health Inc.
 ‘Material’ Statements Cayer said the government in that case failed to make a compelling argument that Bank of America’s alleged misstatements were “material” The fraud statute on which it relied didn’t pertain to the purchase of securities, he said.
 In the first quarter, Raytheon spent $200 million to repurchase 21 million shares and boosted its dividend 10 percent to $242 a share.
 Hudson said the trend isn’t “sustainable over the long haul,” because businesses can only cut costs so much and repurchase so many shares.
 The purchase gives Roche its first drug in human testing in the field of epigenetics, in which scientists try to change the way genes behave without altering the DNA itself.
 “In the video programming industry, each content supplier negotiates separately and therefore MFNs are designed to ensure distributors are provided with equitable terms on the content they purchase,” Demming said in an e-mailed statement.
 “We have asked the central bank whether debt issues like ours are covered by the rules but no firm answer on that yet” Preferred Dollars In an economy where purchases from school fees to automobiles to rent are paid for in dollars, the Bank of Ghana on Feb.
 In 2007, he oversaw the purchase of cement operations from Egypt’s Orascom Construction Industries for $15 billion, saddling the company with debt just as construction slowed.
 “In the Orascom deal, maybe three or four people were in the loop” Rose, though, maintains that the Orascom purchase has paid off, despite its “unlucky” timing.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Contracts to purchase previously owned US.
 An improving employment outlook and easier access to credit would help entice more house hunters to sign purchase contracts.
 AT&T, Verizon Including customers Sprint acquired in its purchase of US.
 T-Mobile, which was the first to introduce phone purchase payment plans and buyout offers to lure customers out of competitors’ contracts, is expected to have added about 1 million monthly customers in the first quarter, according to the average of nine estimates from analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 The Help-to-Buy program, allowing purchasers to take out a mortgage with a down payment of as little as 5 percent, is prompting banks to offer more loans to first-time buyers.
 Pershing Square Capital Management LP, the fund run by Bill Ackman and Allergan’s largest shareholder, supports the purchase.
 The change matters because purchases previously were made at prices tied to crude oil, which has doubled in the last five years, an expense then passed on to consumers.
 Investors pulled $160 million from funds that purchase the floating-rate borrowings made to US.
 drugmaker proposed buying AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion) in what would rank as the industry’s biggest-ever takeover, surpassing Pfizer’s $64 billion purchase of Wyeth in 2009.
 The purchase would be the largest ever of a UK.
 Asian companies are seeking to benefit from the rising property values with the purchase of development land at sites including Battersea Power Station and Royal Wharf on the north bank of the River Thames.
 A year earlier, Lawsky had approved Ocwen’s purchase of Litton Loan Services on the condition that the new owner fix Litton’s mishandling of foreclosures.
 The Thousand Oaks, California-based company acquired Kyprolis for blood cancer in its purchase last year of Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Aberdeen, Europe’s largest publicly traded money manager, completed its purchase of Scottish Widows Investment on March 31 after agreeing terms last year.
 As part of the plan unveiled in February, Juniper is set to purchase more than $2 billion of shares through the first quarter of 2015 and will pay a dividend of 10 cents a share starting in the third quarter of this year.
 Spar Nord Bank purchased Sparbank A/S in 2012.
 The Roseland, New Jersey-based company will use the money to repurchase its own shares.
 The firm led by Chief Executive Officer Koji Nagai will spend as much as 70 billion yen to repurchase up to 26 percent of outstanding stock, it said.
 manufacturing rose in April, jobless claims climbed to a nine-week high last week and household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, added the most since August 2009.
 “As long as the Fed is going to remain friendly to the markets and rates are not going to go up, that’s going to be bullish for stocks” The Federal Reserve yesterday said it would continue to trim the pace of bond purchases as the economy gains momentum.
 The central bank cut its monthly asset purchases to $45 billion and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 Bancorp said April 14 it will purchase Ally Financial Inc’s custodian bank, adding 40 employees, and in January announced plans to buy 94 branches from RBS Citizens Financial Group Inc.
 Mylan is seeking a purchase amid a frenzy of industry consolidation that’s included Actavis Plc’s bid for Forest Laboratories Inc.
 The all-stock purchase helped push Actavis’s market value up 124 percent to $35 billion since then, compared with 70 percent for Mylan’s in the same period.
 That planned purchase may actually make Mallinckrodt more appealing for Mylan, Amsellem said.
 Bharti will spend 1853 billion rupees on the purchase, the company said Feb.
 Emergency Meeting Basci raised the benchmark one-week repurchase rate to 10 percent from 45 percent following the January policy meeting after direct interventions in the currency market and increases in the average cost of funds for lenders failed to stem the lira’s slide to a record 239 per dollar.
 life insurer, raised its quarterly dividend 27 percent as Chief Executive Officer Steve Kandarian works to reward investors while holding off on share repurchases.
 The Conference Board’s report showed more Americans said they planned to purchase previously owned homes in the next six months.
 Signs the economy is emerging from a slowdown in first-quarter demand indicate Fed policy makers will stick to plans for a gradual reduction in the asset purchases.
 Asia Demand In Thailand, Honda’s deliveries plunged 32 percent to 163,313 units last fiscal year, as the end of government incentives for first-time car purchases drove down demand.
 said operated an underground bitcoin exchange called “BTCKing,” are accused of engaging in a scheme to sell bitcoins to users of Silk Road for illegal purchases.
 The accord, approved by a judge in July, resolved claims that London-based HSBC failed to monitor more than $670 billion in wire transfers and more than $94 billion in purchases of US.
 Food-related acquisitions by Chinese buyers reached a record in 2013, led by the $47 billion purchase of Virginia pork processor Smithfield Foods Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 WH Group Ltd’s purchase of pork supplier Smithfield, a deal valued at almost $7 billion including net debt, was the biggest Chinese purchase of a listed American company.
 stocks snapped two days of gains as the European Central Bank left its key interest rate at a record low and President Mario Draghi said policy makers debated measures such as large-scale asset purchases.
 is seeking a buyer for its New York Stock Exchange designated market-making business acquired through the 2000 purchase of Spear, Leeds & Kellogg, a person briefed on the matter said.
 The purchase remains the biggest in the history of the firm, which is the world’s largest adviser on mergers and acquisitions in 11 of the past 13 years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The NYSE, purchased in November by Atlanta-based IntercontinentalExchange Group Inc, relies on traders known as designated market makers, or DMMs, to facilitate buying and selling.
 “One of their major customers has delayed purchases into the following quarter,” said Damian Thong, a Tokyo-based analyst at Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Exemptions to the measure will apply for intraday-interbank lending, and banks’ purchases of sovereign bonds.
 At JPMorgan, he advised A+E Networks on the repurchase of a stake held by Comcast Corp’s NBCUniversal in 2012.
 The pending home sales index, which tallies contracts to purchase previously owned houses, climbed in March by the most in almost three years, the Realtors group reported yesterday.
 Shuanghui International bought Smithfield Foods for $47 billion in September in the biggest Chinese purchase of a US.
 “Investors are anticipating lower purchases of materials from Brazil,” Paulo Brito, an investment manager at the brokerage firm HPN Invest, said by phone from Recife, Brazil.
 means the Fed will continue to wind down bond purchases and then consider raising interest rates.
 Medicare and Medicaid are the largest purchasers of health-care services in the nation.
 In addition to reducing expenses by $160 million, Juniper agreed in February to return at least $3 billion to shareholders through stock repurchases and dividends.
 Warner-Lambert was purchased by Pfizer in a hostile takeover that left American Home with a breakup fee of $18 billion.
 said will lead the Federal Reserve to further cut its debt-purchase stimulus and usher in a “tightening season” of higher interest rates.
 “Ultimately people are looking for the positive data” Fed Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher said the central bank will end its bond purchases in October if it continues to taper buying at the current pace, in comments today in Hong Kong.
 In three meetings since December the FOMC has reduced monthly bond purchases in $10 billion increments to $55 billion.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen signaled last month the central bank may end the bond-purchase program it uses to support the economy in the second half of 2014.
 Loan Yields Asurion, which was taken purchased by Madison Dearborn, Providence Equity Partners Inc.
 “The price is right for the borrower” Fed Taper The Federal Open Market Committee last month said it will reduce its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $55 billion and reiterated plans to taper additional purchases “in further measured steps at future meetings” The committee announced $10 billion of reductions at its previous two meetings.
 The repurchase deal announced yesterday coincides with the sale of 15 million SeaWorld shares by Blackstone in an underwritten offering, according to filings.
 The Fed is forecast to cut monthly purchases to $45 billion today from $85 billion in December, according to a Bloomberg News survey of economists.
 Reasons ranged from slowing economic growth to the European debt crisis to Fed purchases of government debt.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- Daimler AG is examining whether to build Mercedes-Benz cars in Russia as part of a plan to widen the automaker’s global production capacity and assemble more vehicles near the markets where they’re purchased.
 VW has reaped limited financial rewards for the billions of euros invested in the last decade to purchase control of Scania and MAN as minority investors resisted efforts to share technology that would boost profit.
 The Fed meets April 29-30, when economists predict the central bank will cut monthly asset purchases by another $10 billion to $45 billion.
 Fed Taper The Federal Reserve will likely wind back asset purchases to $45 billion as it finishes a two-day meeting today.
 German Financing Robrahn’s Anna Sirkka is among the smaller cargo ships purchased via Kommanditgesellschaft, or KG, a German system of using private funds, including loans, to finance ships.
 Between 36 percent and 45 percent of the shipping loans approved by the three lenders were used to purchase container ships, according to their latest financial statements.
 is selling 19 million shares of common stock to help fund the purchase of Wesfarmers Ltd’s insurance brokering operation, as the buyer extends its growth outside the US.
 The share sale announced today includes an option for the underwriters to purchase an additional 285 million shares within 30 days.
 Last month after central bank officials predicted that the key rate would rise faster than previously projected, Yellen downplayed the importance of the forecasts, even as she said rates might start to rise “around six months” after the Fed ends its bond-purchase program.
 Because the buyer couldn’t borrow the purchase price in excess of $500 million on his own, five construction firms formed a pool to help with the acquisition.
 Two of the firms at the center of the disputed purchase are among Turkey’s most successful and have borrowed from other banks, Aydin told Bloomberg HT, a broadcast partnership of Bloomberg News and an Istanbul media group.
 Volksbank Romania, which had a loss of 1036 million euros last year, is the only unit Sberbank didn’t purchase.
 Share repurchases helped increase per-share profit even as total net income fell.
 Aktif also promised to pool at least 150 million liras from commissions on ticket purchases for soccer clubs over the next 10 years, with another 15 million liras paid to the federation in August this year, Hacioglu said.
 Rates Rise The Reserve Bank of India kept its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 8 percent at an April 1 review after lifting it 075 percentage point since September to counter price gains.
 Actavis Plc agreed to purchase Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Zhejiang Rongxin, which is 991 percent controlled by Ma, purchased all of Hundsun Technologies Group, which owns a 206 percent stake in the listed Hundsun Technologies Inc, according to a filing with the Shanghai Stock Exchange.
 The company said today that it purchased Springstone Financial LLC for $140 million.
 India increased the tax on imports three times last year to 10 percent, required buyers to supply 20 percent of purchases to jewelers for export and sell 80 percent on the local market.
 Amazon’s Boxes Rovi conceded that, based on the court’s interpretation, Amazoncom’s products to allow the purchase of movies over the Internet didn’t infringe the patents.
 The private-equity firm also has invested in debt and purchased assets of bankrupt companies, such as Hostess Brands’ Twinkies business in 2013.
 and other banks over the last few months to consider a possible purchase of the cognac maker.
 No Risk Starbucks is the premier roaster and retailer of specialty coffee and the largest purchaser of high-grade specialty Colombian coffee, company spokesman Zack Hutson said in e-mailed response to questions.
 The central bank has been scaling back bond purchases that have bolstered the housing market by keeping interest rates low.
 Nokia could invest more in research and development and purchases, said Sami Sarkamies, an analyst at Nordea Bank AB in Helsinki.
 It will partner with India’s Sandesara Group on the potential purchase, according to the people, who asked not to be identified as the deliberations are private.
 Oil India, which had 1249 billion rupees ($21 billion) of cash at the end of September, has purchased stakes in gas fields in Mozambique and shale assets in the US.
 Dangote Group is in talks to purchase onshore oil blocks in the country as international companies sell assets, Group Executive Director Devakumar Edwin said in January.
 and Japan in using asset purchases to sustain the global economic recovery.
 If the ECB goes ahead with bond purchases, it would be joining a global monetary expansion led by the Federal Reserve and the Bank of Japan.
 Surpassing India China overtook India as the largest user last year as the biggest price drop in more than three decades spurred purchases, the World Gold Council said in February.
 Mainland Chinese buyers purchased a total of 1058 tons in March, including scrap, compared with 1272 tons in February and 2235 tons a year earlier, data from the Hong Kong government showed.
 Of the top 10 lots at the same evening sale, nine werepurchased by Asians, according to Sotheby’s, suggesting thatslowing economic growth in China hasn’t damped regional demandfor art.
 Auction Record Five bidders vied for several minutes to purchase the 1995Zhang oil on canvas measuring 179 centimeters (705 inches) by229 centimeters.
 Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s second-largest mobile carrier is buying Grupo Corporativo Ono SA, Spain’s biggest cable company, for 72 billion euros, while Paris-based Billionaire Patrick Drahi last week issued a record $23 billion of high-yield debt to fund his purchase of French phone company SFR.
 “They’re better at getting people through the modification process and getting resolutions because they started life focused on higher-risk loans” In the last year, Nationstar has purchased $305 billion in mortgage servicing rights, or MSRs, as Wells Fargo & Co, Citigroup Inc.
 In 1998, NationsBank purchased BankAmerica and changed its name to Bank of America Corp.
 In January 2013, Nationstar announced it would purchase $215 billion of mortgage servicing rights for $13 billion from Bank of America.
 The simmering conflict between Russia and Ukraine has also boosted demand for the safest assets, upending forecasts by economists for yields to rise throughout the year as the Fed moves to scale back its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities.
 economy shows signs of improving with the Federal Reserve beginning to taper its debt purchases.
 The strategy shift follows a decade of megamergers, including Sanofi’s $74 billion purchase of Aventis SA in 2004, Pfizer’s $64 billion purchase of Wyeth LLC in 2009, and four other deals since 2002 valued at $40 billion or more that consolidated the industry into today’s multinational giants.
 Daimler AG is examining whether to build Mercedes-Benz cars in Russia as part of a plan to widen the automaker’s global production capacity and assemble more vehicles near the markets where they’re purchased.
 A purchase of Alstom would be a rare example of a major French company being taken over by a US.
 For Welch, now 78, who built GE into the biggest company by market value during a 20-year reign as CEO and postponed retirement to oversee the Honeywell purchase, the failed US.
 The team was purchased by Arthur Blank, owner of the National Football League’s Atlanta Falcons.
 Beckham had a clause in his 2007 player contract that allowed him to purchase the team for the reduced price of $25 million.
 The New York City Football Club, which will join the league next year, was purchased for a $100 million fee.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- Cocoa purchases by Indonesia, the third-biggest grower, will probably increase fourfold to a record this year as the government plans to scrap an import tax, according to the country’s grinders association.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- Enghouse Systems Ltd, a Canadian software company that gets 95 percent of its revenue outside the country, has C$100 million ($911 million) cash available for acquisitions, as it hunts for purchases in countries including Germany and New Zealand.
 He declined to give a price-target range for possible purchases.
 The Basel Committee on Banking Supervision this month opted to let firms preserve most derivatives and repurchase agreements among themselves, reversing course on a goal set a year ago to block banks from relying too heavily on each other.
 Bernanke said last May that he was considering reducing the asset purchases.
 James River has said that a breakup fee of as much as 3 percent of the purchase price will be paid to the stalking horse if the assets are sold to a higher bidder.
 Plug, which buys most of its stacks from Ballard Power Systems Inc, also plans to make its own after the $4 million purchase of ReliOn Inc.
 That threshold was crossed 54 days earlier than in 2013, after more than $300 billion in purchases were announced by companies from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 Quantitative easing, the asset-purchase program designed to keep borrowing costs low and stimulate the economy, has left the London-based central bank with more than a quarter of the value of gilts outstanding.
 The Monetary Policy Committee voted 9-0 to maintain the stock of purchased assets this month, minutes of the April 9 meeting showed yesterday.
 The company said in February it expects the purchase will add client assets toward the lower end of a target range of 57 billion francs to 72 billion francs, after 40 billion francs were booked and paid for last year.
 fell the most since November 2012 after suspending plans for a dividend increase and $4 billion of share repurchases because of an error in its stress-test submission to the Federal Reserve.
 Bank of America, led by Moynihan since 2010, has been working for years to resolve headaches inherited with the purchases under his predecessor of Merrill Lynch and mortgage-lender Countrywide Financial Corp.
 The purchase gives Crescent Point access to the equivalent of about 10,000 barrels of oil a day and Calgary-based CanEra’s land holdings in the Torquay formation of southeast Saskatchewan.
 With 10 Canadian oil and natural gas purchases in the past four years, Crescent Point is the most active acquirer after Whitecap Resources Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 To curb inflation, Rajan has raised the benchmark repurchase rate to 8 percent from 725 percent since September.
 Consumer purchases of health services surged 99 percent at an annualized rate in the first quarter from the prior three months, the highest rate of growth since 1980, according to the Bureau of Economic Analysis.
 Governor Raghuram Rajan kept the repurchase rate at 8 percent, the Reserve Bank of India said in a statement today.
 The quota for purchases for the plan hasn’t been decided yet, the newspaper said.
 Apple also said it will increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion, boost its dividend and split its stock seven for one.
 After the Chinese company goes public, investors who bought Yahoo’s shares as a proxy for Alibaba can directly purchase stock of the e-commerce provider.
 The purchase extends an acquisition drive to about 20 companies in five years, with combined sales of 75 billion kronor ($11 billion).
 Alfa Laval will fund the purchase via existing credit facilities and a bridge loan, taking the net debt to earnings ratio to about 25 times.
 Of those economists, just under 50 percent said he may implement multiple measures ranging from interest-rate cuts to asset purchases and long-term loans.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- Passenger-vehicle sales in China gained 79 percent last month as consumers purchased cars on concerns that more cities may start limiting new license plates.
 The association last year identified eight cities that may impose car purchase restrictions.
 Consumers placed orders for 70,000 vehicles in Hangzhou on the day that the eastern city imposed quotas on new license plates, according to the Passenger Car Association, which estimates that panic purchases may boost sales by 500,000 units this year.
 ICD, which holds stakes in United Arab Emirates government businesses from transportation to heavy industry, purchased a “significant” stake in Kerzner, it said in a statement today without disclosing the size or cost.
 ICD purchased the stake from the founding Kerzner family and other institutional investors, according to the statement.
 in its $345 billion purchase of a Motorola Solutions Inc.
 The purchase includes corrective facial aesthetic treatments Restylane, Perlane and Emervel in the US.
 In March, it said it would repurchase as many as 60 million shares, equivalent to a 19 percent stake, for 360 billion yen.
 home purchases increased in April as a bigger supply of properties lured buyers and raised prospects for a stronger spring buying season.
 Compared with a year earlier, purchases were down 73 percent.
 Investors continued to play a big role in the market, the April increase was driven mainly by purchases of condominiums and the share of first-time buyers was little changed.
 Investor Purchases Investors accounted for 18 percent of the home purchases last month, up from 17 percent a month earlier.
 “We’re seeing job growth pick up, income growth pick up, and now there’s talk of loosening up credit for home purchases,” and those “should contribute to a pick-up in single family activity” Another report showed consumer confidence slipped this month.
 Shanghai-based iResearch Consulting Group sees annual growth of 20 percent to 30 percent in Internet purchases over the next three to five years.
 China’s data collection system is a legacy of the old planned economy, and online purchases are a “part of sales that they weren’t capturing fully before,” Song said.
 Annual Growth IResearch measured a 40 percent increase last year to about 184 trillion yuan ($295 billion) in online retail sales, including purchases on mobile devices.
 The data include purchases by the government and companies, distorting the picture of spending by consumers.
 The NBS counted 1139 billion yuan in Internet purchases from large vendors in the January-April period, just 14 percent of the broader figure.
 The purchase would allow Kalamazoo, Michigan-based Stryker to reduce its tax bill by domiciling itself in the UK, the newspaper reported.
 The exchange said it is weighing a purchase of Russell Investments Ltd, the indexing and fund-management unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.
 Since taking over, the former BP Plc executive announced the sale of $23 billion of gas properties, the purchase of $31 billion of oil lands, planned a royalty spinoff and paid down debt.
 Apollo purchased the company, then called CKX, for $509 million in 2011.
 His major equity purchases can often send a company’s shares higher.
 Complaints Filed Italian consumer group Adusbef filed two complaints in 2012 regarding the alleged purchase of luxury goods by bank managers at low prices and the management of the factoring and leasing units, Elio Lannutti, who heads Adusbef, said in a statement today.
 Wesfarmers’ agreed purchase from Peabody Energy Corp.
 South African retailers are targeting customers who spend cash rather than make credit purchases in order to reduce the possibility of non-payment.
 The nation’s jewelry purchases of almost 669 tons in 2013 accounted for 30 percent of the global total, according to the council.
 The purchase price for the Dynasty stake is subject to possible increase, said Tianjin Development, which is also based in Hong Kong.
 “We are confident that with the plans in place, we should be able to rebound” The Reserve Bank left its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 55 percent on May 22 as concerns about slow growth outweighed worries that inflation will continue to exceed the bank’s 3 percent to 6 percent target band.
 The central bank lent 20 billion liras ($95 billion) at an auction of one-week repurchase agreements, the highest since April 9.
 Purchase Offer In October, Burkle sent a letter to the Morgans board “expressing a desire to make a proposal to the board to purchase the company for $8 per share” Yucaipa also encouraged Morgans to seek other bids to see if a higher price “can be obtained” Morgans has hired Morgan Stanley to help explore strategic alternatives, including a sale, according to a statement yesterday.
 “Companies spending on capex and M&A have instead been outperforming” The Bloomberg Buyback Index, made up of companies with the top announced repurchases in the past 18 months, backs her up.
 Those unable to get enough locally must purchase credits from clean-power plants sold over power exchanges in monthly trading sessions.
 Partners’ Purchase Dongfeng and France spent a combined 105 billion euros in a purchase in April that initiated the capital increase.
 rose the most among major Colombian stocks after Mexico’s Alfa SAB became the oil producer’s third-largest shareholder, fueling speculation the purchase will herald operational partnerships.
 The share purchase is a “financial investment” that may go up or down in the future “depending on markets, the performance of Pacific Rubiales or the economy,” he said by phone.
May 25 (Bloomberg) -- An Indian court removed the stay on Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd’s $32 billion purchase of Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 Whitman joined Barclays through its purchase of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc, which he had first joined in 1986.
 JDcom Inc, the Chinese online retailer that handled more than $20 billion of purchases on its website last year, rose 10 percent in its trading debut after a larger-than-expected initial public offering.
 Chief Executive Officer Marc Benioff has been bolstering his online services through acquisitions, including the purchase last year of e-mail marketing provider ExactTarget Inc.
 growth “has picked up recently” and policy makers will keep reducing the pace of bond purchases, the Federal Open Market Committee said in Washington after its April 29-30 meeting.
 Eight percent said they would likely make more purchases at Target after the CEO change, while 7 percent it would reduce their spending.
 Acquirers of scientific instrument makers in the past five years have paid a median of 10 times Ebitda, according to data compiled by Bloomberg on seven purchases.
 Chief Executive Officer Doug Suttles will double Encana’s oil output with last week’s $31 billion purchase of Texas properties from Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc.
 The company won’t update its plans in the Eagle Ford shale in Texas until the purchase from Freeport-McMoRan closes, Suttles said.
 Most of that was used to purchase solar panels from closely held Looop Inc, a Tokyo-based company that makes the equipment in China, according to Takazawa.
 As an introductory promotion, customers who place an order will receive 5 percent back in Groupon Bucks, an on-site credit that can be used for a future Groupon purchase.
 “It becomes more important as these individuals go through various life stages and need financial security” While people can often lock in lower annual rates by starting coverage as young adults, potential customers are taking longer to reach the milestones that typically trigger the purchase of a policy.
 “The agent channel will always be with us, but consumers are looking for new ways to purchase financial products and especially life insurance,” William Wheeler, the New York-based company’s president of the Americas, said at the time.
 Job gains helped sustain household purchases last month, as payrolls rose by the most in more than two years.
 While United Technologies isn’t ruling out more large deals after its 2012 purchase of Goodrich for about $16 billion in cash, it said on an April earnings call that acquisitions are difficult right now because targets have gotten expensive.
 While GE is mostly known for making large aircraft engines, it also owns other industry assets it gained from the 2007 purchase of Smith Aerospace, he said.
 He gained art-world fame about a decade ago by paying $8 million to purchase Damien Hirst’s sculpture of a shark preserved in formaldehyde, and in 2012 spent some $120 million on four bronze sculptures of a woman’s back by the artist Henri Matisse, according to the New York Times.
 Hacking Tools Northrop Grumman, which makes the Global Hawk drones, purchased Essex Corp, a NSA supplier, in 2006.
 purchased Crucial Security Inc, which develops hacking tools, in 2009.
 Its best realized return has come from a 2008 investment in AppAssure Software, which made the fund almost 12 times its money when it was purchased by Dell Inc.
 In April, purchase applications for loans of $729,000 and higher were down 6 percent from a year ago, while purchase applications for loans below $150,000 were down 21 percent from a year ago, the MBA said.
 Temasek and one of its units announced two purchases in March that amounted to $89 billion, or 57 percent what the two companies invested last year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Among GIC’s major transactions in 2013 were the purchase of a 50 percent stake in London’s Broadgate office complex and the acquisition of a 285 percent stake in Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s European insurance business.
 This year’s purchase of the stake in AS.
 The purchase led Adam Jonas, an auto analyst at Morgan Stanley, to publish a report titled “Buffett Motors” Praising Barra Buffett, 83, said this month at Berkshire’s annual meeting that he had lunch with Barra about a week earlier and called her “terrific” in an interview with CNBC.
 The system would allow consumers to purchase games online via smartphones, according to the report.
 The gains in prices, along with low interest rates and better weather are “good reasons to be fairly optimistic that the housing market can continue to chug along” Slowing Demand Sales of previously owned homes fell to the slowest pace in 20 months in March and purchases of new houses sank 145 percent from February, according to reports last month.
 is doing extremely well and India might be the flavor of the month again” Foreign buying of $114 billion of Philippine shares in the 15 weeks through May 23, the longest stretch of weekly purchases since February 2012, supported a 15 percent rally in the nation’s benchmark stock index this year.
 24 and halting nine straight days of purchases.
 The Allergan deal would be his biggest acquisition, eclipsing the $87 billion purchase of eyecare company Bausch & Lomb Inc.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 India’s national auditor, a constitutional body, in 2012 said in a public comment that Adani Power Ltd, operator of the world’s largest coal-fired power plant, received an “undue benefit” from the state government, which failed to collect the full penalty for a breach in the terms of a power purchase agreement.
 recovered only 800 million rupees from Adani Power of a penalty that the auditor said should’ve amounted to 24 billion rupees based on the power purchase agreement.
 GE, which said the purchase would lead to a net growth in French jobs, acquired an Alstom plant in 1999, a move Immelt said “has been a big success for the company and the people” Germany’s Siemens AG said it plans to make a competing bid, swapping most of its rail business for Alstom’s energy assets.
 Elior may spend about 150 million euros a year on acquisitions, and may use stock for future purchases, he said.
 New rules designed to plug shortfalls at pension funds may now triple their purchases of longer-dated Treasuries, creating $300 billion in extra demand over the next two years that would equal almost half the $642 billion outstanding, Bank of Nova Scotia estimates.
 Fewer available bonds, along with a lack of inflation and increased foreign buying, help to explain why longer-term Treasuries are surging this year even as the Fed pares its own bond purchases.
 borrowing costs would rise for a second year as the economy strengthens enough to enable the Fed to end its debt purchases, investors instead poured into longer-term Treasuries and pushed yields lower.
 The central bank, which bought $85 billion of Treasuries and mortgage bonds each month last year in its third round of quantitative easing, or QE, has cut those purchases by $10 billion in each of its four meetings in 2014.
 Kinross, which took control of the project as part of its C$12 billion ($118 billion) purchase of Aurelian Resources Inc.
 Democrats argue that the $12 trillion worth of outstanding student-loan debt retards economic growth as young college graduates are forced to postpone home buying or other purchases.
 A purchase price wasn’t disclosed.
 Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen will testify to lawmakers tomorrow after last week cutting monthly bond purchases used to boost economic growth.
 It reduced monthly debt purchases to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 “When you get that money back the market has tended to reinvest it in the Lehman structure; that’s been a recycling-of-capital effect” Accelerating Purchases Solus, the $43 billion event-driven distressed hedge fund-firm run by Christopher Pucillo, accelerated its purchases of bankruptcy claims in 2012 after hiring Scott Martin and CJ.
 The shares have rallied 72 percent since early March when Chief Financial Officer Pete Bensen said the company may look to borrow money to repurchase stock.
 Next month’s capital increase will be the bank’s biggest since it sold about 10 billion euros of shares in 2010 to fund its purchase of Deutsche Postbank AG.
 agreed to a French government request to extend by three weeks the deadline for its planned $17 billion purchase of Alstom SA energy units.
 Blackstone is hunting for acquisitions to expand LivCor, a Chicago-based company formed last year from the purchase of stakes in 71 apartment properties valued at $24 billion.
 The company’s most recent acquisitions include an agreement last week to purchase the Cosmopolitan resort in Las Vegas for $173 billion, its first major casino investment.
 It drew only two bids and was purchased by a private Asian client, Sotheby’s said.
 The anonymous seller purchased the work for $45 million in 2000 at Sotheby’s.
 Non-revolving debt, which includes loans for college tuition and car purchases, increased $164 billion after a $157 billion gain the month earlier.
 Many banks are showing a greater willingness to extend credit cards and finance car purchases amid growing demand and rising competition, according to a Fed survey of bank senior loan officers at 74 domestic banks and 23 US.
 The state of residential mortgage lending is less clear, with banks reporting weaker demand for purchase loans and home equity lines of credit, according to the survey, released May 5.
 In recent months, Tencent agreed to buy a $500 million stake in Seoul-based mobile game developer CJ Games and purchased exclusive rights to the Chinese version of Candy Crush Saga from King Digital Entertainment Plc, of Dublin.
 Rolls-Royce has moved to build up its range of engine operations, agreeing last month to pay 243 billion euros ($34 billion) for Daimler AG’s 50 percent stake in a marine-, energy-and defense-engine venture, created from the purchase of Germany’s Tognum AG, after the carmaker exercised a put option.
 policy makers say near-zero rates will remain for a “considerable time” after debt purchases end, according to Prudential Financial Inc.
 In March, Fed Chair Janet Yellen said economic conditions may “warrant keeping the target federal funds rate below levels the committee views as normal in the longer run” The Fed has reduced monthly debt purchases by $10 billion at each of its past four meetings from $85 billion last year.
 He said last month that any worsening of the medium-term inflation outlook would warrant broad-based asset purchases.
 metropolitan areas for multimillion-dollar sales showed purchases for $2 million or more jumped 33 percent in January and February from a year earlier.
 Loan Demand Loan applications rose in February for home purchases of $500,000 or more while declining for all other levels, according to the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 In April, the average loan size for purchases climbed to $280,000, the highest in figures dating to 1990, the trade group said.
 Miami Condos In downtown Miami, many young professionals aren’t able to purchase in condo towers near their jobs because lenders require higher down payments in buildings where more than half of the units aren’t owner-occupied, said Bo Mastykaz, an agent at Redfin.
 The greater danger comes when a slowdown in inflation turns into deflation, or a protracted drop that leads households to delay purchases in anticipation of even lower prices.
 Canada requires mortgage insurance where the down payment is less than 20 percent of the purchase price.
 Hasan Ismaik, who is also Arabtec’s managing director, raised his stake to 215 percent from 803 percent through direct purchase from the market, the UAE-based company said in an e-mailed statement.
 Congress has failed to act on passing a tax on Internet sales, which means customers will keep using Best Buy’s stores as showrooms while going to the Web to actually purchase their gadgets.
 The purchase, which would be JBS’s biggest since 2009, threatens to boost debt levels to a four-year high and reverse a drop in leverage that reduced borrowing costs.
 The company had reduced the multiple to 34 times at the end of the first quarter from 41 times following its 585 billion real ($26 billion) purchase of Marfrig Global Foods SA’s Seara food-processing assets in Brazil, announced last June.
 American Realty expects to complete the deal within 30 days and use the proceeds to fund its purchase of Red Lobster’s real estate portfolio, the company said today in a statement.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- Loews Corp, the holding company run by New York’s Tisch family, is weighing a divestiture of HighMount Exploration & Production LLC seven years after it purchased the business in a bet on natural gas prices.
 Loews is considering alternatives for HighMount, “including a potential sale of the business,” according to a statement today, and “may incur a loss as a result of this process” Natural gas surged the year after Loews purchased HighMount in 2007 for about $4 billion.
 Possible options include suspending the absorption of liquidity created by crisis-era bond purchases or re-purposing its offerings of unlimited cash in a way to encourage bank lending.
 In a Bloomberg survey last month, just 8 percent of economists forecast the ECB will start asset purchases, indicating they don’t see it following the Bank of England and the Federal Reserve down that road.
 rallied and data showed purchases of new homes climbed in April.
 The company purchased its first US.
 Private-equity firms, hedge funds and real estate investment trusts have spent more than $20 billion to purchase as many as 200,000 homes in the past two years, betting they can take advantage of rising demand for rentals and recovering property values after the biggest housing bust since the Great Depression.
 Inoue takes charge of a company that’s been expanding abroad through acquisitions including the $25 billion purchase of Rabobank Groep’s asset management unit last year.
 “Barring some destabilizing development in the real economy that comes out of left field, I will continue to vote for the pace of reduction we have undertaken, reducing by $10 billion per meeting our purchases and eliminating them entirely” at the Oct.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said May 7 that, with inflation and employment far from the central bank’s goals, “a high degree of monetary accommodation remains warranted” Policy makers haven’t indicated whether their plans for tapering $45 billion in monthly bond buying would mean announcing an end to purchases in October or a final $5 billion reduction in December.
 DRB, controlled by billionaire Syed Mokhtar Al-Bukhary, has been trying to restructure the unit after inheriting the British company through its purchase of taxi-and-sedan maker Proton in 2012.
 is considering using an inversion transaction to purchase AstraZeneca Plc.
 The insurer expects “bulk purchase annuities to more than offset the individual market decline.
 The investor purchased 20,000 June 16 calls and offset the cost by selling the same amount of June 20 calls, according to a research report from Interactive Brokers LLC.
 Fed Stimulus The Fed is gradually reducing its monthly bond purchases known as quantitative easing, which have helped fuel economic growth, sending the S&P 500 surging as much as 180 percent from its 2009 low.
 gas transmission business in 2012 with the 645 million pound ($11 billion) purchase of Wales & West Utilities Ltd.
 APA added to its networks in Australia with the purchase of Hastings Diversified Utilities Fund in 2012.
 dollar and euro-denominated loans the inks supplier is seeking to finance its purchase by Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s merchant banking division and a unit of Koch Industries Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s energy unit plans to issue debt to help fund the $29 billion purchase of SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink.
 “Berkshire Hathaway Energy expects to fund the purchase price with capital from its shareholders and by issuing senior unsecured debt,” the power business said today in a regulatory filing.
 The government has approved Samsung Heavy Industries Co’s purchase of as much as a 50 percent of a shipbuilding company held by Shipbuilding Industry Corp, formerly known as Vinashin, in Cam Ranh Bay, according to Truong.
 IBM’s debt has climbed, and its cash balance has dropped, partly because of spending on stock repurchases -- spending that could have gone to acquisitions or other investments.
 An increase in economic growth promises to drive truck purchases throughout this year, CEO Cutler said.
 It’s a “good time” for the firms to begin selling risk-transfer bonds tied to borrowers with higher loan-to-value ratios because the loans are becoming a bigger share of the market as refinancing drops after a surge in interest rates, leaving a greater proportion of mortgages for home purchases, Davis said.
 The purchase of rights to sell products including Restylane anti-wrinkle treatment in North America expands the division formed when Nestle took full control of the Galderma joint venture from cosmetics giant L’Oreal SA in February.
 “Dermatology has a key role to play in improving the quality of life” The Valeant deal, combined with yesterday’s move to reduce its presence in the Latin American chilled-milk industry and the earlier sale of brands like PowerBar, show how Nestle Chairman Peter Brabeck-Letmathe and Chief Executive Officer Paul Bulcke have shifted away from an increasingly commoditized food industry to fulfill their ambition of becoming “the world’s leading health, nutrition and wellness company” Slowing Sales Today’s purchase includes corrective facial aesthetic treatments Restylane, Perlane and Emervel in the US.
 With real estate prices seen rising by 74 percent this year, the Item Club sees mortgage lending expanding by 28 percent, as cash-only purchases amount to a “historically large” share of about one-third of property sales.
 Earlier this year, the company completed its purchase of South Korean e-commerce marketplace Ticket Monster Inc.
 agreed to buy Argentine government bonds from oil producer Repsol SA for $2 billion, bringing its purchases of the country’s securities to about $5 billion in less than a week.
 JPMorgan agreed to purchase Argentine bonds due in 2015, 2017 and 2033, Madrid-based Repsol said in a filing.
 JPMorgan, which has already sold some of the Argentine bonds received from the first purchase, is wagering that its remaining holdings will gain in value, a person with direct knowledge of the bank’s strategy said earlier this week.
 Investors from Apollo Global Management LLC to George Soros have purchased Spanish banking assets as the economy began pulling out of a six-year slump.
 central bank is still injecting cash into the financial system by purchasing $45 billion of bonds per month, a pace that’s declined from $85 billion before it moved in December to start trimming purchases.
 Pfizer contacted AstraZeneca last year to discuss a purchase, and Chairman Leif Johansson and Soriot flew to New York to meet with Pfizer, which made the initial bid of about 4661 pounds a share, Soriot said.
 China’s anti-trust watchdog approved the purchase on condition that Gavilon and Marubeni maintain separate grain trading desks for Chinese sales to foster greater competition.
 The purchase will add a business with wider profit margins than PCs and give it about 14 percent of that market.
 If successful, DirecTV could be a vindication for Stephenson after his $39 billion purchase of T-Mobile US Inc.
 “There is a campaign to track and arrest more from the syndicate” Merchandise was purchased using stolen personal identity information and fraudulent credit card information and then shipped through services owned by the US.
 The question we’ll have to address is whether the aircraft purchase agreement has value or not and, if it does, then it becomes an asset and assets can be sold” Bedford said he doesn’t expect deliveries of the CSeries until 2016’s third quarter.
 A Bombardier executive said yesterday that the planemaker has had no conversations with Republic about scrapping the purchase.
 European Gas Mercuria’s head of compliance Victoria Attwood Scott said last month that the trading house is in discussions with Britain’s Financial Conduct Authority to determine whether the purchase of JPMorgan’s European gas and power business means Mercuria should be subject to regulatory oversight.
 Income growth slowed to 03 percent in April from 05 percent the prior month and household purchases dropped 01 percent, a report today showed.
 The purchase came as investors sold the stock, leading to the biggest drop in more than 2 1/2 years on May 7, because of skepticism that the CEO will be able to meet the 2018 targets.
 It reduced monthly debt purchases to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 The quarrel goes back to Vodafone’s 2007 purchase of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Indian assets.
 ^Excludes potential purchase of assets for $612 million.
 Critical Step Deutsche Bank sold about 10 billion euros of stock to shareholders in 2010 to fund the purchase of Deutsche Postbank AG.
 Mortgage Bankers Association President David Stevens said this week that 2012 Home Mortgage Disclosure Act data showed a 56 percent denial rate for blacks seeking home-purchase loans eligible to be sold to taxpayer-backed Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which are known as government-sponsored enterprises.
 A Federal Reserve report in November showed a 32 percent denial rate for blacks on “conventional” purchase loans in 2012 based on HMDA data.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Saab AB risks losing a $35 billion order for its Gripen fighter seen as crucial to the program’s future as Swiss voters review the purchase in a referendum.
 A majority against could kill not only the current order but any Swiss purchase of warplanes over the next 10 years, he said.
 The Swiss federal government, which officially supports the Gripen purchase, has said it will honor the result of this weekend’s vote.
 Both jumped in with offers to acquire Hillshire and derail the Pinnacle purchase.
 Investors are paring back their bets on rate increases” Household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the US.
 It has pumped up its balance sheet to $43 trillion since 2008 in bond purchases designed to lower longer-term borrowing costs and fuel economic growth.
 purchased AirTran Airways in 2011.
 The central bank bought $25 billion today in securities maturing between August 2021 and February 2024 as part of the purchase program, which is designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and spur economic growth.
 New rules designed to plug shortfalls at pension funds may now triple their purchases of longer-dated Treasuries, creating $300 billion in extra demand over the next two years that would equal almost half the $642 billion outstanding, Bank of Nova Scotia estimates.
 The decision dismissed claims by Motorola Mobility stemming from about $5 billion in LCD screens purchased from foreign manufacturers.
 stocks rose last week, with the Dow average reaching an all-time high, as earnings topped forecasts and the Federal Reserve said it would further trim bond purchases as the economy gains momentum.
 Domestic retail bank earnings were bolstered by the company’s purchase of a C$33 billion Visa card portfolio from Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce in December.
 In March, it said it would repurchase as many as 60 million shares, equivalent to a 19 percent stake, for 360 billion yen.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Contracts to purchase previously owned homes rose for a second month in April, a sign the residential real estate market is stabilizing after a weak start to the year.
 Leading Indicator Economists consider pending sales a leading indicator because they track new purchase contracts.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Encana Corp, the Canadian energy producer seeking to boost investor returns by shifting toward crude, is doubling its oil output with a $31 billion purchase of shale lands from Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc.
 The company may expand in the Eagle Ford formation and other areas of focus with purchases except the Tuscaloosa Marine Shale area, which spreads across Mississippi and Louisiana, he said.
 The purchase is “credit positive” for Encana because it will be funded in cash and adds more liquids to Encana’s portfolio, Matthew Kolodzie, a credit analyst at Royal Bank of Canada in Toronto, said in a note.
 “We bought a lot of land that we felt was not distressed, a lot of property-tax bonds where we felt the project itself was not distressed, but the bonds were available to be purchased at distressed levels,” Miller said.
 Cash will probably be used to repurchase shares this year, said Charles Sebaski, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets.
 AIG repurchased $867 million of shares in the first quarter, and $405 million in the final three months of last year.
 “We are seeing the last vestiges of panic buying by investors who delayed their purchases because they expected yields to go up,” said Aaron Kohli, an interest-rate strategist at BNP Paribas SA in New York, one of 22 primary dealers that trade with the Fed.
 Yellen reiterated that the Fed’s benchmark interest-rate target will stay near zero for a “considerable time” after the end of a bond-purchase program to spur growth.
 The Reserve Bank left its benchmark repurchase rate at 55 percent on May 22 as concerns about a slowing economy outweighed worries about inflation, which breached the bank’s 3 percent to 6 percent target band in April.
 The German unit bought Belgian catering operations fromGategroup Holding AG (GATE) in November and closed the purchase of acatering business from Finnair Oyj (FIA1S) in February.
 Symantec said it bought back $125 million worth of its shares in the latest quarter and has $658 million remaining for stock repurchases.
 It anticipates continued purchases of Lockheed’s C-130J transport plane, buying 32 more by 2021 for use by special operations forces as AC-130 gunships.
 In addition, the Marine Corps will continue to purchase the aircraft, the first version of which flew in 1955, made at Lockheed’s Marietta, Georgia, facility as an aerial tanker, “expanding its inventory of this aircraft, which has proven its combat effectiveness and reliability” Boeing’s P-8 Poseidon reconnaissance aircraft didn’t fare as well.
 The report also outlines steps the Navy is taking to make up for delaying the purchase of 33 F-35C aircraft from Lockheed beyond fiscal 2019 for budget reasons.
 And you cannot wear 500,000 shares of AT&T” Harry Winston’s purchase follows its $267 million acquisition last May of a colorless diamond with almost 102 carats.
 It acquired Clos du Bois along with other labels when it purchased the wine division of Fortune Brands Inc.
 Rajan will keep the benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 8 percent after a June 3 review, according to all 34 economists in a Bloomberg survey.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc Chief Executive Officer Paul Bisaro will become executive chairman after the generic-drug maker completes its $25 billion purchase of Forest Laboratories Inc, with the head of acquired company succeeding him as CEO.
 Overseas investors purchased a net $115 million of securities on the Ho Chi Minh City Stock Exchange yesterday, the most in five weeks, as the benchmark VN Index sank 59 percent to a four-month low.
 Munich-based Siemens must do more to capitalize on surging demand for shale gas and oil equipment in the US, Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser said yesterday, referring to his $13 billion purchase of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s gas turbine and compressor business and the replacement of his energy operations head with a US-based executive from Royal Dutch Shell Plc.
 purchased 53 million shares.
 On March 26, the company said the Fed approved a quarterly dividend increase to $005 a share and $4 billion in share repurchases.
 “It’s a courageous plan that in several respects represents a major break with the tradition of the past” The push marks a critical step in the CEO’s decade-long effort to turn Turin, Italy-based Fiat into a carmaker big enough to challenge General Motors Co, Volkswagen AG and Toyota Motor Corp, following the completion of the purchase of the rest of Chrysler Group LLC in January.
 Four years ago, the state-owned airline topped up its A380 order book with the purchase of 32 more double-deckers, at the time the biggest single order of the superjumbo.
 The purchase will add one to two percentage points to Vantiv’s revenue growth per year, Symmes Township, Ohio-based company said in a statement yesterday.
 Bank of America last month suspended plans for a dividend increase and $4 billion of share repurchases because of an error in its stress test submission to the Fed.
 President Mario Draghi has said the central bank is ready to use all possible tools, including large-scale asset purchases, to head off the threat of deflation in the euro region.
 May 14, 2014: The deal is completed in a purchase valued at $76 billion after a surge in the price of AerCap’s stock.
 Large cigars are taxed less heavily, often making them cheaper to purchase.
 has held talks to purchase video service Twitch Interactive Inc.
 Walt Disney Co’s recent agreement to purchase Maker Studios for as much as $950 million has set off a scramble among well-capitalized companies to invest in or acquire online video companies that have a large viewer base.
 About Bouygues The failed bid has turned Bouygues Telecom, France’s third-largest mobile-phone company, into a takeover target itself, with Iliad open to discussing a purchase of the business, people familiar with the matter said in March.
 “We’re evaluating our options, but nobody from the side of the government has asked me to study the purchase of Bouygues Telecom,” French newspaper Les Echos quoted Orange’s Richard as saying yesterday.
 The Scania purchase caps an effort that began in 2006 to create a global trucks division that can compete with leaders Daimler AG and Volvo AB.
 The company, which would maintain its head office in New York, also would gain a portfolio of experimental cancer drugs from the purchase.
 In the past, dealers would purchase bigger clumps of bonds than they could immediately sell, allowing investors to get out of positions even if a broker didn’t have a client on the other side looking to buy.
 “Most purchases are now made via mobile and can be delivered same-day or next-day.
 Forty nine of 66 analysts who track the stock recommend investors purchase the stock, giving Mumbai-based HDFC Bank a consensus rating of 418 out of a possible 5, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 declined, decreasing home-loan costs as fewer Americans sought financing for purchases.
 “However, consumers in the market for a home may find it easier than they thought to purchase, with the added bonus of interest rates near historic lows” Rates have declined since the beginning of the year, when the 30-year average was 453 percent.
 The central bank pared monthly bond purchases to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 Invesco Mortgage Capital Inc, a real-estate investment trust, has purchased the junior-ranked notes in previous non-agency deals with names containing IVR, its stock ticker symbol.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index climbed to a record at the end of last week, closing above 1,900 for the first time, on data showing new-home purchases climbed in April.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 281 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 343 percent at the past 10 sales.
 It reduced monthly debt purchases to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions are likely in “measured steps” if the economy continues to improve.
 Qualified Purchasers Private-equity funds have mainly been open to so-called qualified purchasers, defined as individuals who have $5 million of investments or institutions that have $25 million.
 It will primarily invest in newly created KKR funds, while allocating some of its assets to the purchase of interests in existing funds from other investors.
 incorporating technology from its $2 billion purchase of SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 The refiner is increasing purchases by 8 percent this year to 325 million metric tons.
 Financing Needs “I think we’ll be doing it in the decade of the 2020s, because the financing needs are so ugly” as aging populations and declining workforces spur foreign central banks to curtail their purchases of US.
 Trade Secrets/Industrial Espionage Tesla Said to Tell Car Owner to Disconnect It From His Computer A purchaser of a Tesla Motors Inc.
 Treasuries gained after the Fed reiterated at its April 30 meeting that it’s likely to keep the benchmark interest rate close to zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases end.
 “The exchange is taking this action following a decision by the board of directors of CBSX to cease trading activity on NSX, if the NSX’s trading volume does not materially increase or a purchaser does not emerge,” NSX said in an informational circular today.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of funding availability, rose five basis points to a two-week high of 342 percent, according to a daily fixing from the National Interbank Funding Center.
 The currency is unlikely to appreciate beyond 60 as importers step up dollar purchases around those levels, according to Sharma.
 The company was purchased in 2008 in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 The House would authorize the purchase of two of the three ships requested by the Pentagon in fiscal 2016.
 Levin said he isn’t in favor of breaking up a block purchase of as many as 36 launches through 2017 that the Air Force already has awarded to the joint venture.
 Considering Spinoff Canadian Natural is considering a spinoff of royalty assets that are expected to deliver at least C$140 million of pretax cash flow in 2014, President Steve Laut said on a May 9 conference call, including properties purchased from Devon Energy Corp.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Herbalife Ltd, which suspended its dividend last month to increase share repurchases, agreed to buy back $266 million of its stock from Bank of America Corp.
 The total number of shares repurchased will be determined by the average volume-weighted price during the buyback program, which will be completed by the end of the second quarter, Cayman Islands-based Herbalife said today in a statement.
 Greece, Italy and other Southern European states profit from Russian tourism and luxury-goods purchases, and are advocating more diplomacy and less punitive action.
 It also purchased 148 million LinkedIn Corp.
 No more than 478 million shares will be purchased and repurchasing will end on Oct.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- AerCap Holdings NV completed its $76 billion purchase of International Lease Finance Corp, creating the largest independent jet-leasing firm and a windfall for seller American International Group Inc.
 agreed to purchase the output under a 20-year contract, Tempe, Arizona-based First Solar said today in a statement.
 Southern and Turner Renewable Energy have jointly purchased seven solar farms since January 2010 with more than 290 megawatts of total capacity.
 Ineos will seek a buyer for sites producing suspension polyvinyl chloride and related assets, giving the purchaser a “self-standing S-PVC business capable of competing with the new joint venture,” the European Commission said in an e-mailed statement today.
 Ineos and Solvay won’t close their deal until they have a binding agreement with a purchaser approved by EU regulators, the commission said.
 Caterpillar and its Swiss subsidiary entered an agreement that let the Swiss company purchase parts from third-party suppliers and sell them to dealers outside the US, removing Caterpillar itself from the “legal title chain” of the transactions.
 Three rounds of Fed bond purchases have helped send the S&P 500 up as much as 180 percent from a 12-year low in 2009.
 The fund applauded some moves made by Dow since January, including an increase in its dividend, planning $45 billion of share repurchases and expanding a program to divest underperforming assets.
 A few other data points he highlighted: E*Trade customers purchased a net $39 billion of securities in the first quarter, matching the strongest buying since the company began reporting the metric five years ago, and the brokerage attracted a record amount of new assets.
 President Mario Draghi has said the central bank is ready to use all possible tools, including large-scale asset purchases, to head off the threat of deflation in the euro region.
 Loan applications for home purchases were down 15 percent last week from the same period a year earlier, according to a Mortgage Bankers Association index.
 The decline in borrowing costs is more likely to spur buyers of cheaper homes, yet more purchases have been of pricier homes, she said.
 While the Fed has begun tapering, rates have continued to fall because, in part, its mortgage-backed securities purchases now make up a larger share of a smaller market, said Nela Richardson, chief economist for Redfin Corp, a Seattle-based brokerage firm.
 “Until that inflection point, the Fed will be the biggest elephant in the room and that will keep mortgage rates low” Investors overreacted a year ago to the Fed’s decision to slow bond purchases, and the market is now adjusting to reality, said Guy Cecala, publisher of Inside Mortgage Finance.
 The average purchase application loan amount reached $280,500 in the week ended April 18, the highest since the survey started in January 1990, the MBA said.
 Household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 09 percent in March, the most since August 2009, the Commerce Department said yesterday.
 Mack joined the board last year as Rosneft was completing its $55 billion purchase of TNK-BP from BP Plc to become the world’s largest publicly traded oil producer.
 is boosting its shopping services with the purchase of Rangespan Ltd, a company founded by former Amazoncom Inc.
 The company financed the purchase through a loan of about $4 billion from VTB Group.
 The Fed pared its target yesterday for monthly asset purchases that have buoyed debt markets, cutting them for the fourth straight month to $45 billion, the Federal Open Market Committee said in a statement after its meeting in Washington.
 The standardization drive will introduce a “catalog of building blocks,” slashing costs yet providing the basis for a vehicle that the purchaser can still customize.
 NBA Overseas Additionally, the NBA is benefiting from a growing international fan base that will help attract more sponsorship, media and merchandise revenue, said Rob Tilliss, founder of Inner Circle Sports LLC, which represented Apollo Global Management LLC co-founder Joshua Harris in his purchase of the NBA’s Philadelphia 76ers.
 in London today after the insurer said more than 70 percent of its existing customers continued with their annuity purchases.
 The purchase price is $26 billion, with $400 million more that will vest over time.
 have spent billions on purchases, Apple previously avoided tie-ups of this size.
 Microsoft, which continues to provide Windows 7 to government customers, was “surprised” to learn Windows 8 was shut out of China’s purchase of energy-efficient computers, Joanna Li, a Beijing-based spokeswoman for Microsoft, said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 While its purchase of PayPal more than a decade ago has created one of the company’s biggest businesses, its 2005 acquisition of Internet telephony company Skype led to a writedown two years later.
 “These purchases strengthen Lithuania’s position in the pursuit of its strategic energy goals,” Butkevicius told reporters.
 China’s central bank has proposed a cap on purchases of 5,000 yuan ($804) per single transaction done over Alipay, the filing showed.
 Debt Load Hillshire shares dropped as much as 74 percent on the day the purchase was announced, partly on concern that it will increase the company’s borrowing.
 It also is suspending share repurchases, further irking shareholders.
 Vedanta, mainly a mine operator, in 2011 gained access to India’s biggest onshore oilfield after completing the purchase of a controlling stake in Cairn India Ltd.
 purchase in Canada were a boon, he said.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Fort Wayne City Council approved the purchase of Aqua America Inc’s Indiana water system assets in Allen County, the second-largest publicly traded water company in the US.
 That’s led to consumers waiting to make purchases until major new products are released, it said.
 The central bank, led by Chair Janet Yellen, has said the benchmark rate is likely to stay low for a “considerable time” after it ends a bond-purchase program that’s set to wind down this year.
 No other companies have sought to purchase AstraZeneca, he said.
 Justice Department last week said it was closing its investigation into the possibility of anticompetitive practices by Chesapeake and Encana involving the purchase or leasing of oil and gas development rights in Michigan.
 There won’t be enough demand for Argentine securities if New York-based JPMorgan continues to sell the bonds it purchased from Repsol, according to Siobhan Morden, the head of Latin America fixed-income strategy at Jefferies Group LLC.
 Late last year, Governor Jerry Brown announced new tax credits the state can use to persuade companies to add or keep jobs, as well as tax breaks on the purchase of new equipment.
 The Autorite des Marches Financiers found that Elliott used material nonpublic information in the purchase of shares of Autoroutes Paris-Rhin-Rhone SA in 2010, according to a letter the hedge-fund firm sent to clients today.
 The APRR purchases were made as part of a long-standing trading strategy dating to 2005, the New York-based firm wrote in the letter, a copy of which was obtained by Bloomberg News.
 Grievance Letter The firm had received a “letter of grievance” in December 2012 from the AMF that said Elliott may have purchased APRR shares between May 28, 2010, and June 11, 2010, based on material, nonpublic information.
 Abel, 51, purchased NV Energy, Nevada’s largest electricity utility, last year for $56 billion and also oversees subsidiaries including Kern River and PacifiCorp.
 “Berkshire has shown a consistent interest for some time in expanding with regulated utility platforms, most recently with the purchase of NV Energy,” said Paul Patterson, an analyst for Glenrock Associates LLC, in a telephone interview.
 Chamber of Commerce after reiterating last week that the Fed’s benchmark interest-rate target will stay near zero for a “considerable time” after the end of a bond-purchase program intended to spur growth.
 The Fed cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion at each of the past four policy meetings, from $85 billion last year, and has said reductions will continue in “measured steps” as the economy improves.
 While the purchase of government bonds by the central bank in the primary market is prohibited by treaty, “our mandate nevertheless includes the possibility of buying” in the secondary market if necessary, Mersch said in a speech in Berlin.
 in its $2 billion purchase of Sterling Financial Corp, SNL data show.
 Warmstein joined JPMorgan in 2007 from UBS AG, where he worked on transactions such Bank of New York Co’s purchase of Mellon Financial Corp, and Bank of America Corp’s purchase of US.
 CFR’s price won’t prevent Abbott from more purchases to boost that area, Abbott Chief Executive Miles White said.
 Abbott’s biggest acquisition came in 2000, when it purchased BASF SE’s pharmaceutical business for $7 billion.
 Indonesia supplied 68 percent of China’s purchases in 2013, so the race is on to fill the void as demand grows, said Levy, the chief executive officer of Australian Bauxite Ltd, which will open its first mine late this year.
 asset managers have seen a flurry of deals in the past year, including Schroders’s purchase of STW Fixed Income Management LLC in the US, Standard Life Investments Ltd’s purchase of Ignis Asset Management Ltd.
 interest rates by the middle of next year, six months after bond purchases end.
 The size of the transaction could approach $49 billion including funding for taxes and fees associated with the purchase, the person said.
 “An initial one this evening would be premature” The Swiss Defense Ministry, which initiated the Gripen purchase, has repeatedly said that it will honor the vote’s results.
 The Swiss purchase was put up for a plebiscite after opponents collected the required 50,000 signatures needed for a national referendum to cancel a recently passed law.
 Fed Meeting The central bank decided at the April meeting to pare bond purchases to $45 billion per month, while reiterating that it will keep the key interest-rate target at almost zero for a “considerable time” after concluding the bond-buying program.
 Yellen told reporters at a press conference after the Fed’s March meeting that interest rates might rise about six months after bond purchases end.
 “If the response of financial conditions to tightening is very mild -- say similar to how the bond and equity markets have responded to the tapering of asset purchases since last December -- this might encourage a somewhat faster pace,” Dudley told the New York Association for Business Economics.
 The purchase includes all Rural Finance’s assets and its loan book, which is valued at around A$17 billion, Bendigo & Adelaide said in an e-mailed statement today.
 Together with Bendigo & Adelaide’s existing Rural Bank, the purchase will allow the lender to reach 5,200 farmers in Victoria state with a loan book of more than A$24 billion, the bank said.
 Several buyers have upgraded to larger units or purchased second apartments at the tower, where prices range from $395 million for a one-bedroom to $60 million for the two-floor penthouse, he said.
 At One57, Bill Ackman, founder of New York hedge-fund firm Pershing Square Capital Management LP, is part of an investor group that agreed to purchase one of the apartments, a duplex on the 75th and 76th floors.
 found a purchaser who agreed to pay $95 million.
 “While it’s not on a typical New Yorker’s top list of neighborhoods, there is a fair amount of interest from foreigners” At the Baccarat, named for the crystal established by King Louis XV, about 40 percent of the units purchased so far have been by non-US.
 jobs report raised the likelihood the Federal Reserve will continue to slow the pace of its bond purchases.
 “The sale of BSI will more than offset the purchase of PPF,” Minali said.
 in September 2012 for about $190 million, its third purchase in Nigeria.
 South Korea’s purchase of as many as four drones, along with contracts for parts, training and logistical support may be valued at as much as $12 billion, the Pentagon estimates.
 For the second quarter, the company expects sales to decline as much as 21 percent, a reflection of weaker ad spending before purchases for the next TV season begin next week, Hall said.
 EON sank 367 million reais into the company in July as part of an 800 million-real capital increase, following the purchase of a 245 percent stake from Batista for 14 billion reais earlier last year.
 The Fed is scaling back the bond-purchase program it has used to pump money into the economy amid signs growth is accelerating.
 San Miguel has announced 41 purchases worth $78 billion since 2000, about three-fourths of which were made since 2008 when it started to expand out of the food and brewery business, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The CEO has used dividends and repurchases to reward shareholders who’ve helped recapitalize AIG as the company emerged from the US.
 The insurer said it repurchased $867 million of its stock in the quarter.
 The Allergan offer eclipses last year’s $87 billion purchase of eye-care company Bausch & Lomb Inc.
 As part of its defense, Allergan yesterday criticized Valeant’s management practices and operations, saying it believes the Canadian company’s organic sales growth is overstated and that its two largest acquisitions, Bausch & Lomb and Medicis, have underperformed since the purchases.
 The previous purchase from BofA covered $450 million in customer accounts.
 That transaction, the industry’s biggest deal ever, was followed by purchases of Peet’s Coffee & Tea Inc.
 The purchase of the Mondelez division follows a surge in prices for coffee.
 Overseas investors purchased $12 billion more Taiwanese stocks than they sold this month, exchange data show.
 The deal follows the purchases of Axell Wireless Ltd.
 The purchase, announced May 18, gives Dallas-based AT&T a national satellite-TV provider to combine with its US.
 Gold Fields has spent about $1 billion developing South Deep in addition to the purchase price.
 venture from buying Russian-made rocket engines for the Air Force, saying the purchases don’t violate sanctions imposed after Russia’s takeover of Crimea.
 The government request to lift the ban includes a letter from a senior Treasury Department lawyer stating that “to the best of our knowledge” purchases from rocket maker NPO Energomash, which is owned by the Russian government, “currently do not directly or indirectly contravene” the sanctions against Rogozin.
 Europe’s largest hotel operator said the purchase will contribute to earnings before interest and taxes this year.
 rallied and data showed purchases of new homes climbed in April.
 It’s a preview of the discussion we will have next month” In the UK, the Bank of England also kept its key interest rate at 05 percent and maintained its bond-purchase plan at 375 billion pounds ($636 billion).
 The New York-based firm purchased 87 million shares of Verizon in the first quarter, which had a market value of $4159 million as of March 31, according to a filing with the US.
 The purchase may help Tencent defend services such as restaurant recommendations against Alibaba, China’s largest e-commerce company, which is buying AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said last month that quarterly net income rose 12 percent to $143 billion, exceeding analysts’ expectations.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Liberty Global Plc faces an extended European Union probe of its 49 billion-euro ($68 billion) purchase of Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV as regulators cited antitrust concerns over Dutch pay-TV and telecommunications.
 The purchase gives seven-year-old Flipkart access to Myntra’s customers and suppliers strengthening its position as the retailer fends off competition from EBay Inc.
 Ontario Teachers’ Pension Plan is in the lead to purchase the unit for $7 billion including debt, people with knowledge of the matter told Bloomberg News in April.
 Newbury, England-based Vodafone’s quarrel dates back to its 2007 purchase of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Indian assets.
 Surging Value When Silver Lake first purchased its Alibaba stake, in September 2011, along with investors including DST Global and Singapore’s Temasek Holdings Pte, the Hangzhou-based company was valued at $32 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said at the time.
 The problem for them there is I don’t know if they even know themselves” Three rounds of bond purchases by the Fed have helped send the S&P 500 up as much as 180 percent from a 12-year low in 2009.
 Then Merrill suggests Series A financing once a player has purchased all of the properties of a given color, so that hotel construction can begin as quickly as possible.
 Facebook’s first day of trading two years ago was delayed by a software malfunction at Nasdaq, and some investors ended up with more shares than they intended to purchase.
 The central bank will maintain its current pace of dollar purchases to keep the peso from rising until June and then decide on its next move, he added.
 Exxon was the sole customer of the site from 1984 to 2001, when the Irving, Texas-based company purchased it from Rogers Rental & Landfill Company, according to the court document.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The BOE is forecast to leave its key interest rate at a record-low 05 percent and maintain the stock of purchased assets at 375 billion pounds ($634 billion).
 The bonds’ 82 percent surge since the purchase was announced on Oct.
 BicBanco said last week that regulators will approve the purchase, the first by an Asian bank in Latin America’s biggest economy, by the end of June.
 “These bonds are trading already based on the risk of China Construction Bank, even though the purchase was not completely approved yet,” Marco Aurelio de Sa, the head of fixed-income trading at Credit Agricole Securities USA, said by telephone from Miami.
 Brazil’s antitrust regulatory agency approved the purchase in January.
 is expanding its in-store payments business with a new service that lets merchants identify customers with the company’s coupons and enable them to pay for purchases using Apple Inc’s iPad mini.
 The UBS real estate index comprises six sub-indicators tracking the relationships between purchase and rental prices, house prices and household income, house prices and inflation, mortgage debt and income, construction and GDP, and the proportion of credit applications by UBS clients for residential property not intended for owner occupancy.
 Scotiabank, Canada’s third-biggest lender by assets, said it intends to repurchase as many as 12 million shares, or about 1 percent of its outstanding stock, during the next year.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s antitrust regulator approved Kroton Educacional SA’s $34 billion purchase of Anhanguera Educacional Participacoes SA, cementing its position as the world’s biggest for-profit education company.
 The purchases will contribute to earnings before interest and tax this year, the Paris-based owner of the Sofitel and Ibis brands said in a statement today.
 Accor is in talks with Axa Real Estate Investment Managers to finalize the purchase of 11 hotels in Switzerland with 1,592 rooms.
 After the purchases, HotelInvest’s owned hotels will contribute about 68 percent of the unit’s net operating income compared with a medium-term target of 75 percent.
 The purchase would give Teva access to Cipla’s manufacturing base in India, its emerging markets presence, and its global share of the market for respiratory drugs, the publication reported, citing an unnamed consultant.
 While the Federal Reserve is scaling back its monthly bond purchases, it’s still holding overnight borrowing costs at about zero.
 A purchase by John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc, which is pursuing a similar strategy to Vodafone’s in expanding Internet and TV service across Europe, would be too difficult to pull off since the companies overlap heavily in the UK.
 The buying climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, stood at 345.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac have forced banks to repurchase defaulted home loans with a balance of $812 billion between 2011 and 2013 alone.
 Banks say the companies’ campaigns to make them repurchase $812 billion in home loans between 2011 and 2013 alone is a major reason they’re still requiring credit scores averaging about 740 on loans they sell to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, far above the sub-700 average before 2007.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac also will stop automatically issuing repurchase requests when private mortgage insurers rescind coverage on loans.
 The problem, lenders say, is that they’re sometimes asked to repurchase mortgages that were originated many years earlier and it isn’t always clear what constitutes a serious underwriting flaw.
 The agency may also set up an independent arbitrator to weigh in when lenders and Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac can’t agree whether a loan is defective enough to require a repurchase.
 Only 025 percent of loans issued between 2009 and 2012 have been subject to a repurchase, compared to 37 percent of those originated between 2005 and 2008, according to Fannie Mae data.
 Mayopoulos attributed to rising interest rates that have sapped the refinancing boom as much as to the efforts to improve certainty around loan repurchases.
 Sarah Bailey, a spokeswoman for the Bank of England, said by telephone that Lloyds’s move was a “commercial decision for the firm” Lloyds said the government’s Help to Buy mortgage-support program isn’t driving prices in London, and said 2 percent of purchases in the city this year have used the plan.
 The UK’s coalition government is coming under pressure from opposition politicians to modify Help to Buy, which allows homebuyers to purchase properties with small deposits.
 Imports decreased by 1 percent to 904 billion rand as purchases of mineral products, which include oil, fell 14 percent and imports of chemical products jumped 20 percent.
 It will own about 37 percent of the company following the transaction and a separate purchase of shares from Michael Lund Petersen, a minority founding shareholder.
 Applications for jumbo mortgages of at least $729,000 for home purchases fell only 6 percent in April from a year earlier, while requests for loans of less than $150,000 fell by 21 percent, according to the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 The jump in those yields was spurred in part by the Federal Reserve’s move last May toward slowing its monthly bond purchases.
 Chief Executive Officer Heinz-Juergen Bertram is expanding Symrise with the acquisition of Diana Ingredients SAS, a 13 billion-euro purchase that will add pet-food ingredients and bolster access to natural raw materials.
 tax system that would stretch out deductions for equipment purchases and put the revenue toward reducing the corporate tax rate to 25 percent from 35 percent.
 Third is the shift to mobile – while Alibaba's mobile-purchase numbers are up, they could be higher.
 The share-repurchase program will be completed by Dec.
 Petersburg, Florida, and Kevin Crissey, founder of Skyline Research LLC in Mahwah, New Jersey, had been forecasting a buyback program closer in size to the $500 million share repurchase plan Delta announced a year ago.
 Rowe Price Group, said he thought Delta potentially could have repurchased $2 billion in stock.
 The Dearborn, Michigan-based Ford, which took a $310 million charge in the first quarter for the sharp devaluation of the Venezuelan bolivar, had already cut production in the South American nation because a shortage of hard currency made it difficult to purchase parts.
 It’s raised about $4 million from 40 investors, and the Iowa purchase reflects its strategy of bundling numerous small assets into a single portfolio.
 agreed to buy Argentine government bonds from oil producer Repsol SA for $2 billion, bringing its purchases of the Latin American country’s securities to almost $5 billion in the past week.
 The New York-based bank, which has already sold some of the Argentine bonds received from the first purchase, is wagering that the remaining holdings will gain in value, a person with direct knowledge of the bank’s strategy said earlier this week.
 Wills is accused of using a nonprofit he controlled, New York 4 Life Inc, along with a shell company called Micro Targeting, to direct as much as $11,500 in campaign funds to himself for personal use and purchases, including a $750 Louis Vuitton handbag, according to Schneiderman.
 Maryland Governor Martin O’Malley and Delaware Governor Jack Markell said they fear Pfizer Inc’s potential purchase of AstraZeneca will lead to job cuts in their states.
 Chief Financial Officer Miguel Martinez said this month that the $37 billion company is looking for takeover targets that offer a “growth platform” and are based in more stable countries after its biggest purchase so far, a more than $15 billion deal for YPF SA, ended with a government seizure.
 It reduced monthly debt purchases to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 Vice Premier Ma Kai said last month that buyers of electric cars may be exempted from paying purchase taxes as part of expanded state measures to bolster their sales.
 That’s not to say Alstom’s 2,600 workers are thrilled at the prospect of a purchase by an American industrial giant with a history of moving quickly to shut down unprofitable plants and shifting jobs to lower-wage areas.
 Liberty Global, which owns cable companies from Hungary and Poland to Germany and the UK, said EU merger watchdogs will probably extend their examination of its planned purchase of Ziggo for 49 billion euros ($68 billion).
 Any such move would be “in incremental steps to build a content portfolio” and not a large transaction such as the purchase of a studio, he said.
 Gherkin Tower The way the Gherkin’s 2007 purchase was funded contributed to the default and the eventual decision by debt holders to put the building into receivership.
 He had financed their $7 billion purchase the year before with almost all short-term debt.
 Diageo, the world’s biggest distiller, acquired Whyte & Mackay last year when it purchased a controlling interest in W&M’s Indian parent, United Spirits.
 Last month, he said that a worsening of the medium-term inflation outlook would justify broader-based asset purchases.
 Oxford plans to purchase 100 High St.
 The retailer said it probably won’t repurchase more stock before the second half of the year.
 The ECB now holds 307 billion euros of notes as collateral and is considering making direct purchases of ABS as part of efforts to counter sluggish economic growth.
 Federal Reserve reduces its asset purchases and the European Central Bank struggles to revive growth in the euro region.
 The world’s biggest economy will expand about 3 percent this year, which will probably prompt the Fed to stop its bond purchases in October or December, Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta President Dennis Lockhart said this month.
 “Bulk annuity purchases will be a target to fill some of that gap” Aviva had more than 700 million pounds wiped off its market value after the UK.
 Wilson said Aviva made 60 bulk-annuity purchases in the last 12 months with a value of 400 million pounds and said the insurer may exceed that level in 2014 in the mid-size range.
 Issuers held back ahead of a Federal Open Market Committee meeting, where policy makers decided to keep trimming the pace of their asset purchases as the economy gains momentum.
 It reduced monthly debt purchases to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 Electronic Arts also announced a $750 million share repurchase program through May 2016.
 Membership in the 35-company IPC opens the way for share purchases by a greater range of investors, bolstering demand for a stock and possibly increasing the price.
 The purchase would add to the $17 billion of acquisitions Carlyle has completed in Japan over the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The year before, it purchased bearing and machine tool maker Tsubaki Nakashima Co.
 Measured Steps The Federal Reserve yesterday said it would continue to trim the pace of bond purchases as the economy gains momentum.
 The central bank cut its monthly asset purchases to $45 billion and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 An inflation rate that has stayed below the central bank’s goal of just below 2 percent in the past 15 months has fueled speculation the ECB will soon introduce more measures, including bond purchases, to support the economy.
 While the company has offered promotions, including discounts for group purchases, “cutting prices will not solve every problem unlike in the past because that won’t help sales of some high-end homes,” Yu said.
 Half see a bubble in some cities, and a majority say the loosening of restrictions on home purchases and loans will be limited to a regional level.
 In 2005, Mizkan bought Holland House cooking wines and in 2011 it purchased Border Foods, a processor of hot peppers.
 The purchase will allow Mizkan to get a majority of its revenue from abroad, compared with 34 percent in the year through February, Misato Kimata, a spokeswoman, said by phone.
 Unilever announced that purchase three days ago.
 Comcast is planning to spin off operations that serve about 25 million customers in Alabama, Indiana, Michigan and other states after completing the purchase of Time Warner Cable.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Consolidated Water Co, the Caribbean water provider that’s expanded to Bali, Indonesia, completed the purchase of two parcels of land for its proposed desalination plant in Rosarito Beach, Baja California.
 If its NSC Agua SA unit secures water purchase and other required agreements and approvals, the plan is for the plant to purify seawater for drinking and feed it to a pipeline to deliver water to the Mexican system and the US.
 “This helps to justify the FOMC’s tapering of asset purchases,” he said, referring to the Federal Open Market Committee.
 Policy makers cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $45 billion and are on track to halt buying in the second half of this year.
 The Autorite des Marches Financiers found that Elliott used material nonpublic information in the purchase of shares of Autoroutes Paris-Rhin-Rhone SA in 2010, the letter said.
 The purchases were made as part of a long-standing trading strategy dating to 2005, the New York-based firm said in the letter.
 Almost 16 percent of the mortgages for home purchases in March went to borrowers with monthly debt obligations exceeding 43 percent of their pay, according to data compiled by Morgan Stanley.
 “They over-tightened the standards to the point where qualified borrowers couldn’t get access to credit” The banks boosted requirements partly to stem the costs of having to repurchase soured mortgages.
 As defaults soared, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac used a clause in their purchase agreements that let them return loans to lenders if they went bad after faulty underwriting.
 “We have more confidence that should the loans go into default we’ve done our job properly and we aren’t going to get a repurchase,” Codel said.
 Cash purchases mostly by investors have filled the void, accounting for 33 percent of sales in March compared with 12 percent in mid-2009, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 In April, Mortgage Bankers Association Chief Economist Mike Fratantoni lowered his forecast for home-purchase loans in 2014 to $626 billion.
 “It’s generally not our game plan to chase volume by loosening up on quality” Government-backed programs should be further modified to reduce lenders’ concerns about repurchases and encourage them to widen access to credit, said James Parrott, a former member of President Barack Obama’s National Economic Council and now a senior fellow at the Urban Institute.
 SMUD has spent $35 million on wholesale power purchases this year to make up for a shortage of hydropower caused by the drought.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- London Stock Exchange Group Plc is considering a purchase of Russell Investments Ltd, the indexing and fund-management unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, to expand its FTSE International Ltd.
 Three rounds of bond purchases by the Fed have helped send the S&P 500 up as much as 180 percent from a 12-year low in 2009.
 JDcom Inc, the Chinese online retailer that handled more than $20 billion of purchases on its website last year, rose in its trading debut.
 Farm Heroes King generates revenue when users purchase virtual items, such as extra lives or additional game content, to help complete levels.
 The purchase of Sprint gave Son access to about 50 million subscribers in the US, which he has described as an “oligopoly” market.
 The EU wants to avoid an outcome like that of its decision on Hutchison’s purchase of Orange in Austria in 2012, where Hutchison’s offer to cede spectrum to a new rival found no takers and a virtual operator is yet to start a competing service.
 Another report showing the second-strongest level of consumer confidence since 2008 indicated employment opportunities will keep underpinning household purchases.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan kept the benchmark repurchase rate at 8 percent last month after raising it from 725 percent in September, and said further tightening isn’t anticipated if consumer-price gains stay on path to hit 8 percent in January 2015 and 6 percent a year later.
 Imports were also boosted by increased purchases of foreign goods before the tax hike.
 The deal, which will allow Baytex to add output from the Eagle Ford shale formation in Texas, follows purchases by the producer in North Dakota’s Bakken and Three Forks shale formations.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index climbed to a record at the end of last week, closing above 1,900 for the first time, as a report showed purchases of new homes climbed in April.
 While other media CEOs spend much of their time searchingfor the next big purchase, any dealmaking ambitions Rabe harborsare constrained by Bertelsmann’s ownership structure.
 By the 1980s, Bertelsmann hadpurchased Bantam Books, Doubleday and the RCA Victor recordlabel and was the world’s largest media company -- a title Rabedoesn’t much care for today.
 To meet Rabe’s growth target, Bertelsmann is focusing onacquisitions of about 500 million euros rather than blockbusterdeals such as Vivendi SA (VIV)’s purchase of Vodafone’s stake in SFRfor 8 billion euros in 2011, Disney’s $4 billion buyout ofLucasArts Entertainment Co.
 That month’s figure included a $30 billion repurchase-plan boost from Apple Inc.
 Adometry, which specializes in what’s called attribution services, has built software that lets companies track how well their marketing efforts, through e-mail, digital advertising and offline campaigns, lead to purchases.
 LSE, which is diversifying its traditional operations from equities after losing market share to new entrants, said on May 13 that it is considering a purchase of Russell Investments Ltd, the indexing and fund-management unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, to expand its FTSE International Ltd.
 The largest investors have raised about $20 billion to purchase as many as 200,000 properties in the past two years after prices nationally plunged as much as 35 percent from the 2006 peak.
 Corporate landlords are looking to the debt market for capital to buy more houses and increase returns by adding leverage to the properties they purchased with cash.
 Rising Prices With home prices up 23 percent since a post-bubble low in March 2012 and bargains harder to find, some of the largest buyers have been scaling back purchases.
 It’s also focused on reducing debt after last year’s $9 billion purchase of oil and gas companies Plains Exploration & Production Co.
 Brokers are seeking to buy overseas firms as property investment rises and more buyers are willing to purchase assets outside their region.
 Difficult Balance With the new rewards program, Applebee’s diners provide their phone numbers as an identification to record their purchases when they visit restaurants.
 mortgage business, partly by increasing purchases of home loans from other firms, according to Jane Fraser, who oversees the lending.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 “It’s still a very small pool” Blood Diamonds The endeavors follow past pushes around conflict minerals, including efforts in the 1990s and last decade to end the purchase of so-called blood diamonds from civil war-ridden countries such as Angola and Cote d’Ivoire.
 “Nothing we do can be out of line with that goal” Credit Rating The company lost its rating in 2009, two years after the $142 billion purchase of Rinker Group Ltd.
 with its proposed purchase of AstraZeneca Plc, have contemplated such transactions.
 The purchase may allow Tata Steel to reduce its net debt, which is 6733 billion rupees, according to company data.
 Mordashov followed a similar strategy to that of billionaire ArcelorMittal founder Lakshmi Mittal, whose string of acquisitions in the previous decade included the $36 billion purchase of Arcelor SA in 2006, the industry’s largest deal.
 Eye Treatments Two of Ornskov’s first purchases as CEO were companies with experimental therapies for eye disease, Premacure AB and SARCode Biosciences Inc.
 Sundance plans to add more acreage in the Eagle Ford through leases, small purchases and potentially larger acquisitions, Managing Director Eric McCrady said today by phone from Denver.
 The company, whose shares trade in Sydney, may purchase as much as 25 percent of the more than 50,000 acres it’s evaluating, he said.
 “So that has resulted in a little less competition for smaller deals” Sundance’s purchase earlier this week of Eagle Ford assets for an initial $33 million boosts its holdings in the region to 19,500 net acres.
 The Federal Reserve said yesterday it will keep trimming the pace of bond purchases as economic activity picks up, putting the central bank on course to end the unprecedented stimulus program by the close of 2014.
 Household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 09 percent, the most since August 2009, after a 05 percent gain in February that was larger than previously estimated, Commerce Department figures showed in Washington.
 economic outlook and there’s nothing in the statement to suggest it would not continue to cut asset purchases in coming months,” said Nick Stamenkovic, a fixed-income strategist at broker RIA Capital Markets Ltd.
 “Its a tug of war between its safe-haven appeal and its use as industrial metal” Policy makers have cut monthly bond purchases four times, to $45 billion yesterday compared with $85 billion in November, and signaled that borrowing costs might climb as soon as next year.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The Swiss Defense Ministry, which initiated the purchase, has said it will honor the result of the vote.
 The Swiss result risks making Sweden’s purchase of 60 jets more expensive, especially if the contract with Brazil isn’t finalized before the end of this year, according to Sweden’s Green Party, currently in opposition with the Social Democratic Party.
 The Swiss purchase was put up for a plebiscite after opponents collected the required 50,000 signatures needed for a national referendum to cancel a recently passed law.
 and Leucadia National Corp, added $2 billion to its loan-servicing portfolio with the purchase of Phoenix-based Keystone Commercial Capital.
 Berkadia picks up 16 employees with the purchase.
 The German lender, which joined the league of global investment banks more than 20 years ago with the purchase of Morgan Grenfell and the hiring of Merrill Lynch & Co.
 said it will repurchase $18 billion of its shares to reduce dilution from recent stock grants to executives and to offset shares that may be issued to holders of convertible debt.
 Ford said it took similar action in 2012 and 2013 to repurchase shares to offset executive awards.
 The purchase, which people have said would value DirecTV at about $50 billion, would give AT&T a national satellite-TV provider to combine with its US.
 was blocked more than a decade ago, and AT&T had to abandon a purchase of T-Mobile in the US.
 Foreigners bought a net $88 million of local shares on May 8, a 13th day of purchases, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 They purchased a net $212 million of stocks today, according to provisional data from the exchanges.
 Marathon Petroleum, which was itself formed by the spinoff of Marathon Oil Corp’s refinery and retail business, said the purchase will make it one of the largest owners and operators of convenience stores in the US, with locations in 23 states.
 That comprises a cash purchase price of $237 billion, an estimated $230 million of working capital and $274 million of capital leases, it said in a separate statement.
 ‘Best-Looking’ Heminger has openly coveted the Hess stores, telling analysts on an October earnings call that they “have one of the best-looking systems on the East Coast” The purchase is “a win-win situation and not totally unexpected,” Fadel Gheit, a New York-based analyst for Oppenheimer & Co, said today in a telephone interview.
 “What Hess got was at the high end of Street estimates and much higher than we thought they could do” Proceeds from the sale will be used for additional share repurchases.
 Aercap Holdings NV is set to close its purchase of International Lease Finance Corp.
 Other sales include Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc’s $73 billion purchase of Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s aviation unit and the sale of Oaktree Capital Group LLC’s Jackson Square Aviation to Mitsubishi UFJ Lease & Finance Co.
 The yield on prime Dublin offices, which measures a property’s rental income as a percentage of its purchase price, has fallen to 5 percent from 6 percent in September, according to data compiled by CBRE Group Inc.
 The $9589 million represents the venture’s gross purchase price of the 47 hotels.
 “Under the terms of the senior preferred stock purchase agreement, Fannie Mae is not permitted to retain capital to withstand a sudden, unexpected economic shock of the magnitude required by the stress test” The companies would need $84 billion to $190 billion by the end of 2015 in the worst circumstances, depending on accounting assumptions, the tests showed.
 Today’s $13 billion auction of 10-year Treasury Inflation Protected Securities attracted the highest demand in two years, including record purchases from a category of bidders that includes foreign central banks.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 63 percent of the TIPS.
 It has expanded its balance sheet to more than $43 trillion since 2008 in bond purchases designed to lower longer-term borrowing costs, fueling concern the strategy would spur inflation.
 Twenty-six of the 30 economists surveyed by Bloomberg predict the bank will keep the benchmark repurchase rate at 55 percent tomorrow, with the others forecasting an increase of 25 or 50 basis points.
 Ergen “found a loophole and exploited it,” Chapman said, concluding that he acted improperly by concealing his identity and leaving some of his debt purchases in limbo in a bid to derail LightSquared’s bankruptcy.
 ‘No Doubt’ Chapman found that while it was unclear whether Ergen was acting for himself or Dish when he started making the purchases in 2012, there was “no doubt” he was acting on Dish’s behalf by April 2013, when he bought $320 million in face value of the debt and hired Willkie Farr & Gallagher LLP as bankruptcy counsel.
 The fund Ergen used to buy the debt, SP Special Opportunities LLC, wasn’t technically prohibited from making the purchases because it was owned by him and not Dish, Chapman said.
 Chapman also cited intentional delays in the completion of some debt purchases.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Exor SpA, the holding company of Italy’s Agnelli family that controls automaker Fiat SpA, plans major asset purchases in the service industry after disposing of its stake in product-inspection provider SGS SA last year.
 The company, incorporated in 1962, made its first acquisition with the purchase of The Art Institute of Pittsburgh, according to its website.
 2006 Purchase The business was purchased for about $34 billion by investors including Goldman Sachs and Providence Equity Partners in June 2006, with about $13 billion in equity contributions, according to a regulatory filing the previous month.
 “That is why bankers are able to create selective accounting for each deal” Credit Suisse Group AG marketed $560 million of term loans for Thoma Bravo’s $930 million purchase of TravelClick this month with higher earnings after adjustments for both deferred revenue and planned cost savings, according to a person with knowledge of the deal.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Hewlett-Packard Co’s board was urged by a committee that reviewed the company’s purchase of Autonomy Corp.
 Last week, in another derivative suit, a federal judge in San Francisco granted another request by both Hewlett-Packard and investors also suing over the writedown caused by the Autonomy purchase to put that case on hold until June 16.
 Paramount Holdings Services Ltd, an investment vehicle of Qatar, purchased 175 billion euros of shares at 2920 euros each, the lender said last night.
 It has reduced monthly purchases by $10 billion at each of the past four meetings, from $85 billion last year.
 “These are massive decisions and massive pieces that are moving forward” Senator Al Franken, who opposes the Comcast-Time Warner Cable merger, said in an interview on Bloomberg Television yesterday that he’s concerned the AT&T purchase of DirecTV marks further consolidation in the industry.
 The CEO said that as demand from the marine market remains strong, the company expects the current level of order intake to continue “for some time” Renstroem has spent this week inspecting Frank Mohn’s operations in Bergen, Norway, and said the company “is exactly as good and well run as we thought” With the 13 billion-krone ($22 billion) purchase, announced in April and completed today, Alfa Laval aims to grow in the marine and offshore oil and gas markets.
 In February, BNSF sought bids for a possible purchase of 5,000 tank cars built to the AAR standard.
 and biggest shareholder BAT have explored the purchase of Lorillard for several months and found efforts so far stymied by the complexity of a potential deal, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Even as the Federal Reserve starts slowing its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities known as quantitative easing, other buyers have emerged, surprising traders expecting a surge in yields.
 Had the rights involved not held any value, “no purchaser would have bought the assets,” Huffard said.
 According to Ichitan’s founder and president, Tan Passakornnatee, the purchase covers use of the Birely’s trademark in other Asian countries as well as Thailand, Canada and the US, the newspaper reported.
 Norilsk doesn’t need state purchases as a measure of support, Potanin said.
 Orange SA (ORA) is considering a purchase of Bouygues Telecom,Les Echos reported today, quoting Orange Chief Executive OfficerStephane Richard as saying that the company is “assessing” itsoptions.
 In the US, the Federal Open Market Committee reduced its monthly asset purchases to $45 billion, matching the median estimate of economists surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Purchase Orders Braden’s temporary order doesn’t cover purchase orders placed or money paid before yesterday.
 Weak economic growth prompted the central bank to keep its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 55 percent for a second consecutive meeting on May 22 even as inflation exceeded the bank’s 3 percent to 6 percent target.
 The mine cost Gold Fields about $4 billion, including the purchase price, and is seen producing 700,000 ounces a year until at least 2075.
 Suedzucker AG fell after Exane BNP Paribas said a possible purchase of Bunge Ltd’s Brazil sugar assets would be negative for the sugar producer.
 As many as 478 million shares could be repurchased by October 2015, the company said.
 Options range from a negative deposit rate to liquidity injections and large-scale asset purchases.
 Shell has repurchased about $12 billion of B shares this year.
 The purchase of the Jundee gold mine in Western Australia would lift output to about 550,000 ounces a year from 350,000 ounces a year, making Northern Star the nation’s second-largest publicly traded producer, the Perth-based company said today in a statement.
 Northern Star agreed in January to pay A$75 million for Barrick Gold Corp’s Kanowna assets after it said a month earlier it would purchase the same company’s Plutonic mine for A$25 million.
 home purchases.
 Goldman Sachs raised its rating on the shares to neutral from sell, citing cost synergies and business diversification related to its purchase of LCHClearnet Group Ltd.
 Diageo, the world’s biggest distiller, acquired Whyte & Mackay last year when it purchased a controlling interest in W&M’s Indian parent, United Spirits.
 The German company finally closed a purchase that includes Belgian arm VLM yesterday, ending an auction that began in 2012 as Air France revamped regional flights after years of losses.
 for C$313 billion, its largest purchase in six years.
 Investors already have factored in the higher oil and gas prices and are now focused on how Canadian Natural and regulators proceed at Primrose, as well as how the company incorporates its Devon purchase, Chris Cox, a Calgary-based analyst at Raymond James Ltd, said in a May 5 phone interview.
 The company, based in Dearborn, Michigan, had already cut production in the South American nation because a shortage of hard currency made it difficult to purchase parts.
 The lender’s purchase of the Barclays asset was a rare chance to secure 110,000 new customers at home.
 The nation’s largest home-improvement retailer blamed lackluster first-quarter revenue on the harsh winter -- not a slowdown in the housing market -- and said sales this month have rebounded as it recoups garden and other spring purchases delayed by record snow and cold temperatures.
 housing market included sales of previously owned homes falling to the slowest pace in 20 months in March, and purchases of new houses sinking 145 percent from February, according to reports last month.
 With the new $5 billion pool, the biotechnology drug company has $79 billion to repurchase some of its $1211 billion in outstanding shares.
 An affiliate of Millhouse will purchase 50 percent of Biocad while Pharmstandard is set to buy 20 percent, the companies said in a joint statement today.
 Millhouse’s purchase is subject to regulatory approval, according to the statement.
 While 48 percent can be purchased immediately, the remaining 5 percent can only be bought upon approval by Australia’s foreign investment board.
 Gallagher said he plans to use the acquired businesses to expand further in their home countries through smaller purchases.
 The “purchases demonstrate our continued belief that Keurig Green Mountain has substantial growth potential,” Atlanta-based Coca-Cola said in an e-mailed statement.
 The company signed a pact with Credit Suisse Group AG to purchase the balance of the stake by Feb.
 The sale and purchase agreement is conditional upon receipt of antitrust approvals, according to the statement.
 That contrasts with BASF’s purchases of catalytic converter maker Engelhard Corp.
 market will be bigger than Medtronic anticipated when it purchased CoreValve in 2009 for $700 million plus milestone payments, Chief Executive Officer Omar Ishrak said.
 EON sank 367 million reais into the company in July as part of an 800 million-real capital increase, following the purchase of a 245 percent stake from Batista for 14 billion reais earlier last year.
 School purchases of meat with the substance are running at 035 percent of total beef purchases in the current fiscal year, little changed from last year.
 Bayerische Landesbank led a group of banks that provided the financing for the Gherkin’s purchase, according to Evans Randall.
 Completing both purchases will give Renewable Energy Group full ownership of the refinery.
 While its repurchase program lets it acquire shares once owned by AT&T when they’re in the open market, America Movil has no plans to buy any significant portion of AT&T’s stake, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 The purchase may be announced today, when New York-based Viacom reports quarterly results, the newspaper said.
 DreamWorks Animation, the studio led by Jeffrey Katzenberg, was an early buyer in the field with its $33 million purchase in May 2013 of AwesomenessTV, a popular teen network on YouTube.
 Most of Hibernia’s purchases have been negotiated with sellers in “off-market” transactions, rather than through auctions.
 The chief executive officer is overseeing talks to purchase Beats Electronics LLC, the headphones and music service company founded by music-industry executive Jimmy Iovine and hip-hop artist Dr.
 Since then, the largest known purchase was Anobit Technologies Ltd, a flash-memory drive maker, for about $390 million two years ago.
 after the drugstore chain’s purchase of a controlling stake in UK.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Qinetiq Group Plc said the purchase of US.
 “If the response of financial conditions to tightening is very mild -- say similar to how the bond and equity markets have responded to the tapering of asset purchases since last December -- this might encourage a somewhat faster pace,” Dudley told the New York Association for Business Economics.
 “If bond yields were to move sharply higher, as was the case last spring, then a more cautious approach might be warranted” ‘Considerable Time’ The Fed reiterated on April 30, after its last policy meeting, that it will keep the key rate target at almost zero for a “considerable time” after concluding the bond-purchase program it has used to fuel growth.
 The central bank has cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion at each of the past four meetings, from $85 billion last year, and has said reductions will continue in “measured steps” as the economy improves.
 “We have more than earned back all the expenses spent on the purchase of Pimco over the past few years,” Michael Diekmann, the 59-year-old chief executive officer of Europe’s biggest insurer, said today at the company’s annual shareholder meeting in Munich.
 Prudential purchased a life insurer from Hartford Financial Services Group Inc.
 Prudential purchased Hartford’s individual-life business for $615 million in a reinsurance deal completed in January 2013, adding about 700,000 policies.
 Tax Dispute One potential stumbling block in India is a dispute with the government over a tax bill stemming from the 2007 purchase of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Indian assets.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Doyen Sports, an investment fund that finances player purchases for soccer clubs, wants to expand into England’s Premier League, the sport’s richest domestic competition, its top executive said.
 Overseas investors bought a net $2102 million of shares on May 9, the 14th day of purchases, taking this year’s inflows to $56 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Importers typically purchase more spot shipments in June through September to meet increased power needs amid hotter weather during summer.
 Criminal Charges Berlusconi’s tax fraud conviction last year was tied to the purchase of film rights at his Mediaset SpA television broadcaster and led to his expulsion from parliament after a 19-year tenure.
 The $54 trillion agency mortgage-bond market last year suffered its first annual loss since 1994 even after the Federal Reserve in 2012 started open-ended purchases of the debt.
 Public discontent over mainland visitors’ purchases of homes, designer handbags and daily necessities prompted street protests in Hong Kong this year that demanded the government limit arrivals.
 “One of the few items in their earnings they can control is the cost line and I think they know they should do more including on compensation” ‘Disadvantage’ Barclays will now have to compete without some of the key dealmakers it acquired with its purchase of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s North American operations.
 Contracts to purchase previously owned homes rose for a second month in April, a sign the residential real estate market is stabilizing after a weak start to the year.
 CEO Changes As part of the CEO’s makeover at Encana, the company also has announced $23 billion of gas property sales, the purchase of $31 billion of oil lands, a 35 percent dividend reduction and the firing of almost 1,000 people, about 20 percent of its workforce.
 Encana’s purchase of Texas shale lands from Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc, set to close by the end of June, will double the company’s crude output and hasten its transition toward more oil and liquids in the four-year strategy laid out by Suttles last November.
 Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen will speak May 15 after saying last week the American economy still needs support from the central bank even as policy makers wind down a bond-purchase stimulus program.
 It has cut monthly purchases by $10 billion at each of the past four policy meetings, from $85 billion last year, and has said further reductions are likely in “measured steps” if economic progress continues.
 Personal Spending Another report today from the Commerce Department showed personal spending in March increased by the most since August 2009, propelled in part by purchases of motor vehicles.
 Federal Reserve Fed policy makers, who pared the central bank’s monthly asset purchases to $45 billion from $55 billion, said in a statement following the two-day meeting that “economic activity has picked up recently, after having slowed sharply during the winter in part because of adverse weather conditions.
 “The products of Whyte & Mackay may not also be a big hit in the Philippines” The purchase could move Manila-based Emperador closer to its goal of having a 33 percent share of the global brandy market in four years.
 It also purchased vineyard land in Madrid and is expanding brandy production there.
 Diageo Plc, the world’s biggest distiller, acquired Whyte & Mackay last year through the purchase of a controlling interest in its Indian parent, United Spirits Ltd.
 The 1969 purchase of Fisher-Price Toy Co.
 Shipments of e-commerce purchases will be among those affected as size becomes part of the rate calculations, buoying FedEx as shoppers go online to order everything from shoes to household supplies.
 After spending 600 million pounds on acquisitions in the two years through March 2012, purchases have dried up for Compass.
 “We don’t have a specific target for investment at this point” SoftBank purchased Sprint Corp.
 Aldar, which received billions of dirhams in government bailouts after Abu Dhabi’s property market collapsed, has focused on reducing debt following its state-backed purchase of competitor Sorouh Real Estate Co.
 They could also purchase credit derivatives, a more expensive way of insuring they are protected in the event of nonpayment.
 The Dow last week climbed to an all-time high as earnings topped forecasts and the Federal Reserve said it would further trim bond purchases as the economy gains momentum.
 The purchase follows three sewage-treatment plants bought late last year that are operated by Beijing Municipal Group Co, Sound Global said.
 ‘More Skeptical’ “The masses are much more skeptical of owning a home right now given the job situation and what happened in terms of owning over the last several years,” Khanduja said today in a telephone interview from Bethesda, Maryland, before the sale of the American Homes bonds, which he expected to purchase.
 Rising expenses for food and gasoline are leaving households with less money for non-essential purchases.
 Coca-Cola Co’s purchase of a 10 percent stake in Keurig Green Mountain earlier this year “has made the situation even more challenging” for Nestle, Euromonitor’s Lee said, as it strengthens Keurig’s financial position.
 Chief Executive Officer Kevin Lobo said yesterday that his $31 billion company has been evaluating a purchase of London-based Smith & Nephew, which would expand its share of the market for artificial hips and knees.
 It has cut monthly purchases by $10 billion at each of the past four meetings, from $85 billion last year, and has said further reductions are likely in “measured steps” if economic progress continues.
 They’ve purchased at least 12 houses and three multifamily buildings from the beginning of 2013 through last month for a total of $587 million, according to Los Angeles County Office of the Assessor records.
 He owns at least 160 apartment buildings, office properties and single-family homes in the area, many of which he purchased with cash, according to county records compiled by data provider LexisNexis.
 Family Trust The buildings the Sterlings have purchased since the beginning of 2013 range in price from $13 million to $146 million.
 Max Blecher, an attorney for Donald Sterling, didn’t return phone calls seeking comment on the couple’s property purchases.
 While they remain business partners, Shelly has denounced his racist statements in the strongest terms” Latest Deal Donald Sterling’s latest recorded real estate deal was the $516 million cash purchase of a six-bedroom, six-bath, Spanish Mission-style house in Beverly Hills.
 In March, it said it would repurchase as many as 60 million shares, equivalent to a 19 percent stake, for 360 billion yen.
 Mitsubishi UFJ purchased Thai lender Bank of Ayudhya Pcl for about $5 billion in December, its biggest acquisition in Asia outside of Japan, and Sumitomo Mitsui agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion last May.
 “I know the business so well” By expanding the retirement business, Reynolds is adding stable and recurring revenues and the possibility to sell more products to savers, a rationale that helped Fidelity diversify as clients scaled back purchases of traditional active mutual funds.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- California, New York and six other states aiming to get more than three million zero-emission vehicles on the road in the next decade, unveiled steps to help achieve that goal including harmonizing consumer incentives and encouraging fleet purchases.
 The proposed purchase, which would be BSkyB’s largest, may cost the company 10 billion euros ($14 billion), according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Tokyo Electric’s steps to market electricity nationwide follow Chubu Electric Power Co’s move into the Kanto region in August through its purchase of Diamond Power Corp, a small Tokyo-based electricity supplier.
 Even if Caesars used the proceeds from recent asset sales to repurchase some debt at 50 cents on the dollar, the company won’t generate enough earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization to cover remaining interest expenses and capital spending needs, Holloway said.
 The purchase, which ends July 31, comes on top of a record dividend last fiscal year and the company’s expectations of higher returns this year.
 Mitsui, Japan’s second-largest trader, bought back 50 billion yen of stock in February, its first repurchase in more than a decade.
 and European markets business of Nasdaq, joined the exchange through the acquisition of Stockholm-based OMX AB, a purchase that was completed in 2008.
 Zambrano’s buying spree was capped by the $142 billion purchase of Rinker Group Ltd.
 military won an end to a ban on buying Russian rocket engines as a federal judge said the purchases don’t violate sanctions stemming from Russia’s annexation of Crimea.
 While SpaceX didn’t ask Braden to block purchases of the Russian technology, its court filings highlighted links between rocket-engine maker NPO Energomash and Russian Deputy Prime Minister Dmitry Rogozin, who heads the country’s defense and space industries and is subject to US.
 “It’s a sign of easing in the property sector and we need to see more follow-up measures such as the loosening of purchase restrictions to fuel a broad-based rally for stocks,” said Wu Kan, a fund manager at Shanghai-based Dragon Life, which oversees about $33 billion.
 Wiles wouldn’t disclose the purchase price.
 With Brookfield we are at a much better vantage point” Andrew Willis, a Brookfield spokesman, declined to comment on the purchase.
 In the related kickback scheme, prosecutors alleged that Sigelman agreed to increase the purchase price of another company in exchange for $435,000 from the owners.
 “So it will obviously lead to more high-yield issuance down the road for sure” Acquisition Activity Red Deer, Alberta-based Parkland, a fuel marketing and distribution company, sold C$200 million of seven-year notes to repay a bank loan and for general corporate purposes after making a $10486 million purchase in November.
 AutoCanada Purchases Northern Frontier, formed in 2011 to “buy and build” an industrial and resource services business, is seeking to sell C$75 million of five-year notes to fund the purchase of a firm that provides water for industrial uses, according to another person who declined to named.
 AutoCanada announced the purchase of eight dealerships in April.
 On a March 21 call presenting the company’s fourth-quarter earnings, CEO Patrick Priestner said he expected to purchase 10 to 12 dealerships over the next 24 months.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc, the maker of Camel cigarettes, has explored the purchase of Lorillard Inc.
 BAT is weighing options such as increasing its stake in Reynolds or funding Reynolds’s purchase of Lorillard, and hasn’t yet decided what it wants to do, one person said.
 “We believe a sizable amount of the potential purchase price, which may exceed $25 billion, will be financed with debt,” Gerald Phelan, an S&P analyst in Chicago, said in a report.
 with its recent purchase of Nest Labs Inc; Comcast Corp.
 Because Vivint’s customers are still tied to the grid, Vivint is able to also sell any excess power they generate back to the utilities under so-called net-metering programs by which state regulators mandate such purchases.
 BHP, the world’s largest mining company, is contracted to buy 12,000 tons a year and Jinchuan purchases 13,000 tons annually under its current contract.
 “You do the best you can” Bank of America halted $4 billion of share repurchases and a boost to its common-stock dividend on April 28 after finding the mistake in a stress-test submission to the Federal Reserve.
 tax code, Camp proposed repealing the penalty exceptions for higher education and first-time home purchases, contending that the changes would encourage Americans not to tap their retirement accounts early.
 They include Horizon Pharma Inc’s purchase of Vidara Therapeutics International Ltd.
 “You do the best you can” Bank of America halted a planned dividend increase and $4 billion of share repurchases on April 28 after finding the mistake in a stress-test submission to the Federal Reserve.
 The team is now worth more than the $550 million paid for the Milwaukee Bucks last month, according to Rob Tilliss, founder of Inner Circle Sports, which represented Apollo Global Management LLC co-founder Joshua Harris in his purchase of the NBA’s Philadelphia 76ers.
 incorporating technology from its $2 billion purchase of SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 They have stepped up purchases of big-ticket consumer goods, such as cars and televisions, as shown by a 4 percent increase in retail sales in March, according to Sterina.
 Convertro Purchase Yesterday, AOL announced it would buy Convertro Inc, which helps marketers evaluate ad purchases, for $101 million, part of AOL’s continuing investment in ad technology.
 gas transmission business in 2012 with the 645 million pound ($11 billion) purchase of Wales & West Utilities Ltd.
 APA added to its networks in Australia with the purchase of Hastings Diversified Utilities Fund in 2012.
 The previous system there was run by Electronic Data Systems Corp, which Hewlett Packard purchased for $132 billion in 2008.
 Paul, Minnesota, said it would exercise its right to purchase the 81 percent of Atlanta-based CardioMEMS that it doesn’t already own for $375 million.
 The purchase price wasn’t disclosed.
 “Mexichem is a company that has grown organically and inorganically by making good purchases at low prices,” Bruny said by telephone from Mexico City.
 The closing of its purchase of the Family Channel, Disney XD and Disney Jr.
 Fewer consumer purchases in developed markets are behind slowing growth in the tablet market, according to IDC.
 The family later purchased Brandlin, a vineyard in the nearby Mount Veeder appellation known for its hearty cabernets.
 While purchases costing $1 million or more rose 78 percent in March from a year earlier, deals for $250,000 or less, which represent almost two-thirds of the market, plunged 12 percent, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 bond purchases and the Turkish central bank’s more than doubling of its benchmark interest rate.
 “The era of abundant hot money is ending” with the Fed starting to trim asset purchases in January, he said.
 The team is now worth more than the $550 million paid for the Milwaukee Bucks last month, according to Rob Tilliss, founder of Inner Circle Sports, which represented Apollo Global Management LLC co-founder Joshua Harris in his purchase of the NBA’s Philadelphia 76ers.
 Household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 09 percent, the most since August 2009, after a 05 percent gain in February that was larger than previously estimated, Commerce Department figures showed today in Washington.
 Today’s report showed that after adjusting consumer spending for inflation, which generates the figures used to calculate gross domestic product, purchases increased 07 percent, also the most since August 2009, after a 04 percent advance the previous month.
 Whirlpool reported first quarter sales of $436 billion, surpassing analysts’ estimates, as sales increased in March after soft demand in January and February caused by “extreme weather” Consumer purchases advanced at a 3 percent rate in the first quarter, spurred by utility outlays and spending on health care.
 ICE is seeking to spin off Euronext after acquiring the exchange through its purchase of NYSE Euronext in November.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- A judge in Siena, Italy ruled that a case brought by prosecutors against former managers of Banca Monte dei Paschi di Siena SpA for obstructing regulators and market manipulation in the purchase of Banca Antonveneta SpA should be heard in Milan.
 rose 12 percent after a local court removed the stay on the drugmaker’s $32 billion purchase of Ranbaxy Laboratories.
 The Hotel del Coronado, featured in the 1959 Billy Wilder film “Some Like It Hot,” was valued at about $590 million at the time of that purchase, according to Strategic.
 This supply is equivalent to about 28 million metric tons of LNG, and combined with Sinopec’s purchase of LNG from Petronas’ Canada project, it means 33 million tons of demand has been “taken off the market,” Fesharaki said.
 China purchased 186 million tons as the world’s third largest buyer of LNG in 2013, according to the International Group of LNG Importers.
 Cash Allocation Yahoo may need to spend more to compete with Web companies that are broadening their business after Facebook’s $19 billion purchase of WhatsApp Inc.
 Underwriters exercised their option to purchase an additional 233 million shares after Radian’s offering of 155 million shares.
 The $305 million purchase price includes the repayment of Clayton’s outstanding debt, according to the statement from Radian.
 Gaymard’s comments, made a day after the Fairfield, Connecticut-based company agreed to a government request to extend the deadline for the planned Alstom purchase by three weeks, underlined GE Chief Executive Officer’s Jeffrey Immelt’s commitment to respect “the sovereign character” of France’s nuclear industry.
 Fewer consumer purchases in developed markets are behind the weaker outlook, growth in the tablet market, according to IDC.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Temasek Holdings Pte, Singapore’s state-owned investment firm, purchased stocks in Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc.
 It purchased 16 million shares valued at $106 million in BioMarin Pharmaceutical, a developer of therapeutic enzyme products.
 The central bank lent 20 billion liras ($95 billion) at an auction of one-week repurchase agreements today, the highest amount since April 9.
 “Foreigners are demanding the long end of the curve more” Basci said two days ago policy makers did not see any need for additional tightening, after raising the benchmark one-week repurchase rate to 10 percent from 45 percent following an emergency meeting on Jan.
 The rest of the shares will be purchased for $14 apiece, PetroLogistics and Flint Hills said in a joint statement today.
 That pared this year’s purchases to $76 billion, still the highest among eight Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 “We have always prohibited cash-back activities through bankcard transactions that are made without actually making purchases” MGM China tumbled 82 percent yesterday and Galaxy sank 76 percent to the lowest since September.
 Users can still obtain Macau currency beyond the legal limit through pawnshops that let customers use UnionPay cards to buy watches, which the stores then repurchase.
 It generates a lot of cash flow, and they like that” Simple Businesses Buffett said this month he is looking for purchases to put to work the $489 billion of cash his holding company has, adding that he’d welcome more deals with 3G.
 Buyers of stainless steel will step up purchases to avoid higher surcharges, which will be reflected in rising orders for the world’s mills over the next few months, Moll said.
 Speculative purchases including those for stockpiles may drive up European demand by 10 percent this year, compared with growth in actual use of as much as 4 percent, he said.
 The customers each agreed to purchase 3 kilowatts of capacity from the 150-kilowatt solar farm in Rutland, Vermont, NRG said today in a statement.
 The Rutland project was built by its NRG Residential Solar Solutions unit, which also leases rooftop systems to homeowners who pay little to nothing up front and sign long-term contracts to purchase electricity.
 cards and Royal Bank of Canada’s 2012 purchase of a MasterCard portfolio as part of a co-branding deal with pharmacy chain Shoppers Drug Mart Corp.
 Total, based outside Paris, purchased its oil-sands stakes in 2010.
 Borrowers would eventually get used to the higher rates and return to the market, he said, pointing to the housing boom in the late 1990s when people purchased homes even as rates averaged about 6 percent.
 The cost of one-year swaps, the fixed payment needed to receive the floating seven-day repurchase rate, fell 20 basis points, or 02 percentage point, this week to 347 percent as of 5 pm.
 The People’s Bank of China reduced the amount of repurchase agreements this week, leading to a net injection of 20 billion yuan ($32 billion) in the past four days.
 Federal Reserve first suggested it would reduce its monthly bond purchases, triggering a flight from risker assets.
 mortgage-bond market is getting some relief as the Federal Reserve winds down purchases of the debt, with fewer new loans reducing supply.
 Trimming Purchases The Fed said last week it would reduce its monthly mortgage-bond purchases in May by another $5 billion to $20 billion, down from $40 billion in December.
 No ‘Panic’ “It is really difficult to panic about the implications of lower Fed purchases against the backdrop of plummeting originations,” American Capital Agency President Gary Kain said April 29 on a conference call.
 The Mortgage Bankers Association, which in December was forecasting $711 billion of loans would be granted for home purchases this year, lowered the forecast last month to $626 billion.
 JPMorgan’s team led by Matthew Jozoff and Brian Ye, top-ranked last year by Institutional Investor magazine, lowered their net sales forecast by $25 billion to $125 billion, saying in an April 25 report the current “anemic” pace partly reflected a rise in all-cash purchases to 35 percent, from 15 percent five years ago.
 The retailer said earnings this year still will meet its projections and that it will repurchase $15 billion more in stock than originally planned while raising its dividend.
 On May 5, the company said it bought flash startup DSSD Inc, following the purchase of ScaleIO Inc.
 CEO Hasan Ismaik raised his holding to 215 percent from 803 percent through direct purchase from the market, the company said after the end of trading yesterday.
 While the central bank is unwinding the bond purchases it has used to fuel growth, it has kept its benchmark interest rate close to zero since 2008.
 GP, based in Hamilton, Bermuda, bought the stake as an “opportunity to get into a company with clear competitive advantages that benefits from an extremely favorable market,” according to a regulatory filing when it purchased the stake in July.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, which reported results last month.
 phone company, approached DirecTV about a purchase, the Wall Street Journal said, citing people familiar with the situation who it didn’t name.
 “Negative interest rates are a possible part of such a combination of measures” The ECB would only embark on Federal Reserve-style government-bond purchases “if the economy and the inflation in the euro area develop significantly worse than we expect,” Praet said, according to the interview in Die Zeit.
 Electronic Arts also announced a $750 million share repurchase program through May 2016.
 “I like buying with cash, because then I can control my investments” Investors like Leffel helped spur all-cash home purchases to a record 43 percent of US.
 Americans seeking a loan to purchase their first dwelling are increasingly shut out.
 Cash sales are rising from coast to coast, comprising more than half of all purchases in many metropolitan areas in the first quarter.
 In Manhattan, buyers are using cash for trophy apartments and to gain an advantage over borrowers who must depend on loans to finance a purchase.
 single-family home landlord, cut purchases by 70 percent from last year’s peak and is now concentrating on just five markets, Jonathan Gray, global head of real estate, said in a March interview.
 Wells Fargo “The increase in all-cash purchases is partly because rates are higher than they were a year ago, so it’s made buying with a mortgage more expensive on top of home price increases,” said Jed Kolko, chief economist at real-estate information service Trulia Inc.
 Household purchases climbed in March by the most since August 2009, according to Commerce Department data.
 Household purchases, which make up about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 09 percent in March after a 05 percent gain in February that was larger than previously estimated, Commerce Department figures showed.
 A measure of whether it’s a good time to make purchases reached its highest point since November 2007 and the outlook on personal finances was the best since April 2008.
 “Household spending appears to be rising more quickly” A pickup in hiring would help sustain the gains in purchases.
 A call to a Danske Bank spokeswoman in Dublin wasn’t immediately returned, while a Deutsche spokesman in London declined to comment on the purchase.
 Loreley sought an order rescinding the purchases and the return of its investment.
 Earlier this year, the company completed its purchase of South Korean e-commerce marketplace Ticket Monster Inc.
 The central bank decided at the session to pare bond purchases to $45 billion per month, while reiterating that it will keep the key interest-rate target at almost zero for a “considerable time” after concluding the bond-buying program.
 Yellen told reporters at a press conference after the Fed’s March meeting that interest rates might rise about six months after bond purchases end.
 “If the response of financial conditions to tightening is very mild -- say similar to how the bond and equity markets have responded to the tapering of asset purchases since last December -- this might encourage a somewhat faster pace,” Dudley told the New York Association for Business Economics.
 shale boom, signed a 20-year sale and purchase agreement with Iberdrola SA.
 Spain’s biggest utility agreed to purchase about 400,000 metric tons a year of liquefied natural gas from Train 1 of the LNG export facility being developed near Corpus Christi, Texas, Cheniere said today in a statement.
 “We expect the company’s financial metrics to worsen” Funds from the offering will also be used to repurchase its $16 billion of 775 percent subordinated bonds due December 2018, according to the filing.
 Buffett told shareholders in his annual letter that in order to trigger repurchases, the stock would have to trade for 120 percent of book value or less.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank is unlikely to begin large-scale asset purchases to stimulate inflation and such a plan would have limited effect as nations’ borrowing costs are already low, according to Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 “We doubt that a large-scale asset-purchase program would have a meaningful impact on yields,” Goldman Sachs analysts, including London-based chief European economist Huw Pill, wrote in a client report.
 With a rally in the region’s sovereign bonds leaving borrowing costs in the most-indebted nations near record lows, “the likelihood of a large-scale asset-purchase program remains small,” the Goldman Sachs analysts wrote in the report, dated yesterday.
 The purchase would give AT&T a national satellite-TV provider to combine with its wireless, phone and high-speed broadband Internet services as competition ramps up.
 was blocked more than a decade ago, and AT&T had to abandon a purchase of T-Mobile several years ago in the face of antitrust opposition.
 Federal Reserve isn’t allowed to purchase stocks, and the European Central Bank, the Bank of England, and the Bank of Canada don’t hold any equities in their foreign-exchange reserves.
 Earnings per share have benefited from Fox’s steady stock repurchases, which totaled $1 billion in the past three months.
 Park Square Capital Partners III LP will invest in the subordinated debt of large and middle-market companies and purchase performing and distressed credits on the secondary market, according to marketing documents.
 Cupertino, California-based Apple said April 23 it will increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion and boost its dividend.
 stocks rose for the week, with the Dow Jones Industrial Average reaching a record, as earnings topped forecasts and the Federal Reserve said it would further trim bond purchases as the economy gains momentum.
 Household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 09 percent in March, the most since August 2009.
 rallied 36 percent to $59258, extending gains from the previous week after reporting surging sales of iPhones and setting plans to increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion, boost its dividend and split its stock 7-for-1.
 Internet sales are growing at an annual clip of about 20 percent, while standard retail purchases dropped 11 percent in March from a year earlier, the biggest decline in a decade, according to the national statistics agency.
 The items won’t be purchased until users go to their Amazon shopping carts to complete the transactions.
 A Telesat purchase would come in two pieces: buying publicly traded Loral, which owns 63 percent of the company, and acquiring the rest from Canada’s Public Sector Pension Investment Board, which co-owns the satellite operator, the people said last month.
 The prospect of additional ECB stimulus, including potential purchases of debt, is helping to propel prices higher still.
 Obama, 52, and first lady Michelle Obama, 50, are still making payments on the same mortgage they took out when they purchased their Chicago residence in 2005 at an interest rate of 5625 percent, according to a disclosure form released today.
 The policy-setting Federal Open Market Committee yesterday said it will keep trimming asset purchases as the economy shakes off the winter doldrums, putting the Fed on a course to end the stimulus program by the end of 2014.
 That followed the purchase of Kijipwa Aviation, based in the Kenyan port city of Mombasa, in November.
 home purchases climbed the most in six months.
 It has expanded its balance sheet to more than $43 trillion since 2008 in bond purchases designed to lower longer-term borrowing costs, fueling concern the strategy would spur inflation.
 The deal will help SingPost build their presence in China” The purchase price of S$142 a share is 84 percent lower than the close on May 27.
 manufacturing increased in April, while household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the world’s largest economy, jumped by the most since August 2009.
 It purchased more than $1 billion of property in the US.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 That is bolstering demand for EZchip processors and allaying concern Cisco will follow rival Juniper Networks Inc, which is cutting purchases from EZchip and developing its own technology in-house.
 “We are not interested in mass-market banking through a bricks-and-mortar model” Toronto-Dominion’s domestic retail bank earnings were bolstered by the company’s purchase of a C$33 billion Aeroplan Visa card portfolio from Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce in December.
 private-equity purchases this year, up from an average of 13 percent in the previous decade, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 funds struck $659 billion of deals from 2005 through 2007, including the purchases of HCA Inc, Hilton Worldwide Inc.
 The Pilgrim’s all-cash preliminary proposal is contingent on Hillshire scrapping its purchase of Pinnacle Foods, which would force the meat producer to pay a $163 million breakup fee.
 and shelve a deal for Eddie Bauer, is planning to vote against the Pinnacle Foods purchase.
 “Interest rates need to normalize over time, but it is not a preset course and will be data dependent” The central bank left its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 55 percent for a second consecutive meeting on May 22 as concerns about growth outweighed worries about inflation, which accelerated to 61 percent in April.
 Online Video The purchase would give AT&T a national satellite-TV provider to combine with its wireless, phone and high-speed broadband Internet services as competition ramps up.
 “You’ve built up this investment and if you can run it, why don’t you run it yourself?” In 2011, South Africa’s minister of economic development and two other ministers, as well as a labor union, tried to prevent Wal-Mart Stores Inc’s purchase of a controlling stake in retailer Massmart Holdings Ltd.
 Federal Reserve, which began in December tapering its monthly debt purchases through its quantitative easing program, is likely to wind them down completely by the fall, central-bank Chair Janet Yellen has said.
 Buying Climate The buying climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, dropped to 322, the lowest since early April, from 345.
 The two purchases will give Renewable Energy Group full ownership of Dynamic’s plant, which has annual production capacity of 75 million gallons (284 million liters) of biodiesel.
 The company will repurchase $6 billion of its stock this year, executives said on a conference call yesterday.
 Faster improvement in the labor market will be needed to generate more wage growth and boost consumer purchases, which will in turn create more orders for factories.
 Apple’s $3 billion plan to purchase Beats Electronics and Beats Music is likely to alter that relationship, as the iPhone maker pushes further into streaming.
 Me and a lot of my music artist friends are worried about the switch from music buyers to music listeners” That’s also the dilemma for the recording industry, which is finding that streaming, while growing, isn’t making up for shrinking purchases, physical and online.
 Apple could also provide links that let interested listeners easily buy music they like, in much the same way conventional radio encouraged purchases over the years.
 Boards Approve Hillshire’s purchase of Pinnacle reflects a multiple of 96 times adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, the companies said.
 It reduced monthly debt purchases to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 JBS Chief Executive Officer Wesley Batista said last week in an interview with Bloomberg News that his company will keep expanding via more purchases as opportunities arise.
 Hillshire is currently rated Baa2 by Moody’s, just two levels above junk, and a purchase of Pinnacle could push it below investment grade.
 JBS’s last large purchase was its acquisition of the Seara food-processing assets in Brazil from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais ($26 billion), announced in June of last year.
 gained on speculation the government will ease curbs on home purchases.
 The China Securities Journal said the government will remove restrictions on home purchases depending on market conditions.
 “We are open to the possibility of someone coming in with an RMT or even a sale, a direct purchase opportunity,” Fanandakis said today at Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s Basic Materials Conference in New York.
 “Freedman purchased only non-voting shares; he cannot now use federal tax law as a back door through which he may pass to obtain rights that as a shareholder he does not possess,” the appeals panel ruled.
May 26 (Bloomberg) -- Venezuela reached deals with six airlines to pay dollar debt and may devalue the bolivar for ticket purchasers as it works to normalize flights and prevent airlines from leaving the country.
 Worldwide purchase volume growth was 13 percent.
 MasterCard repurchased $17 billion of shares in the quarter, according to the statement.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said last month that quarterly net income rose 12 percent to $143 billion, exceeding analysts’ expectations.
 Weixin Payment’s user growth is mainly coming from mobile game purchases, e-commerce transactions and Didi Taxi, said Lau.
 The London-based firm purchased 135 million shares of Verizon valued at $641 million as of March 31, according to a filing today with the US.
 ‘Shadow Demand’ The “inventory of homes for sale that buyers actually want to purchase is even less than what’s on the market now, and many people who are looking (and qualified) to buy a home are holding off because they can’t find the right one,” Fleming wrote.
 Mitsubishi Chemical’s stake in Taiyo Nippon will increase to 51 percent from 27 percent after the purchase.
 adults purchased its products for personal use in the previous three months.
 Of the 349 survey respondents who said they had purchased for personal use, 87 percent said they didn’t buy as a distributor themselves.
 About 5 percent of respondents had purchased an Herbalife product within the past three months.
 The Fed reiterated at the time that it will keep the key rate target near zero for a “considerable time” once it concludes the bond-purchase program.
 Three rounds of bond purchases by the Fed have helped send the S&P 500 up as much as 180 percent from a 12-year low in 2009.
 “Household spending appears to be rising more quickly” Household purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 09 percent in March, the most since August 2009, the Commerce Department said earlier in the week.
 The purchase of David Jones will help Woolworths compete with Northern Hemisphere chains including Inditex SA’s Zara, Fast Retailing Co.
 He oversaw the 1989 purchase of London-based Morgan Grenfell before hiring Merrill Lynch bankers including Jain in 1995.
 Legal & General, the UK’s biggest manager of pension assets, acquired the building earlier this year as part of a group of 55 assets it purchased from Telereal Trillium for 550 million pounds.
 Kaufman, a dental hygienist, said she planned to purchase her first home with a mortgage backed by the Federal Housing Administration, whose mandate is to help lower-income buyers.
 The increases, which have helped replenish the FHA’s coffers, have also prevented hundreds of thousands of first-time purchasers from getting FHA loans, according to an estimate from the National Association of Realtors.
 The higher fees prevented new buyers from making as many as 375,000 purchasers in 2013, NAR said in a letter to FHA Commissioner Carol Galante in April.
 The average FICO credit score for an FHA mortgage to purchase a home was 686 in February, compared with 755 for Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac loans, according to data compiled by mortgage processor Ellie Mae.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 After holding out the prospect of more monetary stimulus in May, ECB President Mario Draghi will have to decide whether low inflation and mediocre growth warrant an interest-rate cut, asset purchases or more liquidity measures.
 The Monetary Policy Committee will probably keep its benchmark interest rate at a record-low 05 percent and leave its bond-purchase program unchanged.
 The stock has advanced 10 percent from when it first announced plans for the asset purchase on March 26.
 The purchase price represents 09 times the combined company’s 2013 book value and 69 times last year’s earnings, according to an April company presentation.
 With the purchase, Buffett’s Omaha, Nebraska-based company expands its energy business, which has been growing through acquisitions.
 Possible Purchases Oudea, 50, also said at a press conference in Paris today that the bank has 4 billion euros to spend on potential consumer and private banking purchases through 2016.
 About 20,000 June 16 calls were purchased and the cost was offset by selling the same amount of June 20 calls, according to a research report from Interactive Brokers LLC.
 Norbert Barthle, the budget spokesman for Merkel’s Christian Democrats in parliament, said in an interview the Bundestag would have concerns about making way for unlimited bond purchases by the ECB.
 And when AT&T tried to make a big bet on wireless in 2011, with the $39 billion purchase of T-Mobile US Inc, it was derailed by regulators.
 The purchase will immediately boost earnings, according to a statement from New York-based Viacom, which also today reported second-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates.
 With the purchase, Viacom significantly increases its UK.
 Wilson paid $25,000 to purchase the Buffalo franchise in the American Football League in 1959, and the Bills became part of the NFL when the leagues merged in 1970.
 The biggest of those was the $42 billion purchase of ViroPharma Inc, which added the treatment Cinryze for a rare swelling disease.
 Norway’s sovereign wealth fund, which invests the country’s oil wealth and held 13 percent of the world’s listed stocks at the end of last year, purchases several services from external providers, such as investment managers.
 Johnson purchased 250,000 shares on May 6 and 7 at an exercise price of $775 apiece, spending about $194 million, according to a regulatory filing disclosed yesterday.
 Herbalife, which suspended its dividend last month to increase share repurchases, said May 7 that it had agreed to buy back $266 million of stock from Bank of America Corp.
 About 20,000 calls expiring in October with a strike price of $150 were purchased at 10:25 am, according to Trade Alert LLC.
 Short Sales The rally may have forced short sellers to close bearish positions and purchase the stock, said Mark Neuman, managing director of derivatives trading at JonesTrading Institutional Services LLC in New York.
 Separately, the Bank of England also left its key rate at 05 percent and its asset-purchase target at 375 billion pounds, matching the median economist estimates.
 purchased another messaging company, Viber, for $900 million, and SoftBank Corp.
 The purchase from trusts of William Hesketh Lever will boost earnings per share at the Anglo-Dutch company by 2 percent a year, Unilever said today.
 The fund’s actual withdrawals or deposits may differ from Morningstar’s estimates because of the timing of purchases and redemptions or dividend distributions.
 Foreign investors purchased a net $1988 million of securities on the Ho Chi Minh City Stock Exchange last week, the most in a month, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Watt, 68, in his first speech as director of the Federal Housing Finance Agency, announced new rules to reduce the risk that lenders will have to repurchase bad mortgages.
 They force lenders to repurchase these soured loans when they contain underwriting errors.
 Repurchase Risk Banks such as Wells Fargo & Co.
 “I know that repurchase risk remains a top concern for the mortgage industry,” Watt said in his May 13 speech at the Brookings Institution, a nonpartisan think tank in Washington.
 ’Very Contentious’ “The FHFA under Demarco was very contentious, with Fannie and Freddie demanding banks repurchase a large volume of loans and pay fines,” McCanless said.
 He also said he would not reduce the cap on the size of individual mortgages eligible for purchase, known as the conforming loan limit, reversing a plan announced by Demarco last year.
 decided this month to scrap its $32 billion purchase of eAccess Ltd.
 target than it is to tap Nomura” Corporate Ties Goldman Sachs advised 210-year-old Japanese food maker Mizkan Group on its $215 billion purchase this month of Unilever’s Ragu and Bertolli pasta sauce business.
 Yahoo Japan said on March 27 that it agreed with SoftBank to purchase the mobile carrier’s eAccess stake.
 Nagai, who took the post in August 2012, spent the first year of his tenure cutting $1 billion in costs that swelled following his predecessor’s 2008 purchase of bankrupt Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s European and Asian operations.
 While its repurchase program lets it acquire shares once owned by AT&T once they’re in the open market, America Movil has no plans to buy any significant portion of AT&T’s stake, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 Steeper Competition To lure more subscribers, DirecTV has purchased rights, some of them exclusive, to broadcast soccer’s World Cup games this year, Bruce Churchill, head of new enterprises at DirecTV, said in a conference call in May.
 At the same time, the Fed repeated that it’s likely to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases end.
 in September 2012 for about $190 million, its third purchase in Nigeria.
 Hutchison is “already in advanced discussions with a number of potentially interested parties” to purchase network access, Pat Walsh, a spokesman in Dublin, said in a statement.
 Regulators “were wrong” to approve Hutchison’s purchase of an Orange unit in Austria without demanding such a pledge, he told reporters.
 All purchase orders and invoices for Oracle and the company’s work statements were also ordered to be turned over, according to the subpoena.
 rallied and data showed purchases of new US.
 The German operator, which bought its stake in the former fixed-line monopoly in 2000, has a pre-purchase right if a direct sale to an investor is chosen, the memorandum says.
 The deal will help SingPost build their presence in China” The purchase price of S$142 a share is 84 percent lower than the close on May 27.
 Coca-Cola has said that stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 asset sales to purchasers including affiliates of Goldman Sachs Group Inc, Deutsche Bank AG and Lone Star Funds, according to an April 22 filing by Kiernan Wallace, the liquidator of the nationalized lender, in US.
 purchased LuxVue Technology Corp, a startup that specializes in power-efficient displays that could be used in small consumer devices lacking space for bulky screens or batteries.
 “As a significant investor in the hospitality sector, Blackstone recognizes the value and potential in the Cosmopolitan and Las Vegas and looks forward to working to build on the success to date” Nevada Investments The purchase marks Blackstone’s first major casino investment.
 The purchase gives AT&T a national satellite-TV provider to combine with its existing packages of wireless, phone and high-speed Internet service.
 Including debt, the acquisition is AT&T’s third-largest deal on record, behind the purchase of BellSouth for $83 billion in 2006 and the deal for Ameritech Corp, which closed in 1999, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 wireless venture and the pending $68 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable, the data show.
 mobile-phone carrier, had to abandon a purchase of Deutsche Telekom AG’s T-Mobile US.
 Unlike Comcast’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable, AT&T’s purchase of DirecTV would eliminate a choice for pay-TV customers in some markets because AT&T’s U-verse landline video service competes with DirecTV.
 and Royal Dutch Shell Plc were among the companies that qualified to purchase the permits put up for sale May 16, a report posted today on the state Air Resources Board’s website shows.
 will purchase 583 million new APT shares in a private placement at NT$20 apiece, a 12 percent premium to its previous closing price, and could introduce international strategic investors to buy a further 244 million new shares, the companies said in exchange filings yesterday.
 The debt is purchased by retail and institutional investors on the companies’ websites.
 “As the pay-TV industry has matured, we and our competitors increasingly must seek to attract a greater proportion of new subscribers from each other’s existing subscriber bases rather than from first-time purchasers of pay-TV services,” Dish said today in a regulatory filing.
 Over the next 18 months, the chain also will repurchase as much as $100 million in stock.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Irvine Co, the developer led by billionaire Donald Bren, agreed to purchase a 60-story Chicago skyscraper from an affiliate of KBS Realty Advisors for $850 million, a record price for an office tower in the city.
 The closely held buyer entered into a purchase agreement for 300 N.
 The Fed reiterated on April 30, after its last policy meeting, that it will keep the key rate target near zero for a “considerable time” once it concludes the bond-purchase program it has also used to fuel growth.
 Rate Squeeze Still, government bond purchases by the Bank of Japan have crimped interest rates.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Lukoil, Russia’s second-biggest oil producer, is poised for its first monthly gain since October as investors anticipate an increase in earnings and dividend payments while its top executives purchase shares.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Alitalia SpA and Etihad Airways PJSC agreed the terms of a stake purchase giving the Middle Eastern airline 49 percent of the unprofitable Italian carrier and access to one of Europe’s biggest travel markets.
 “It’s apparent that these are issues from the previous government and the current emir is trying to weather these events” Under the 34-year-old emir’s father, Sheikh Hamad Bin Khalifa Al Thani, Qatar used the world’s third-largest gas reserves to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, Volkswagen AG and purchased London’s Harrods department store.
 Malaysian Air had anticipated ordering as many as 100 jets and was considering a range of models from both Airbus Group NV and Boeing Co, a person familiar with the purchase strategy told Bloomberg News in February.
 An additional $400 million of the purchase price will be deferred.
 Competition Appeal Tribunal in December overturned a June decision on the grounds that Eurotunnel’s takeover of the SNCF’s SeaFrance operation may have amounted to the purchase of three ships rather than a business, since the company had ceased operating.
 SeaFrance constituted an enterprise because its purchase allowed Eurotunnel to establish ferry operations quicker, cheaper and with less risk than if the rail company had bought alternative assets separately, the regulator said.
 Previous purchases by Dai-ichi include a stake in Janus Capital Group Inc.
 completed a $45 billion purchase of commercial insurer Philadelphia Consolidated Holding Corp, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The purchase of Pine Grove Asset Management LLC, which charges its investors fees to pick credit hedge funds, is scheduled to close in the third quarter, London-based Man Group said in a statement today.
 Man Group said the purchase will add to its existing fund-of-funds business FRM, which oversees $11 billion.
 sold $10 billion of notes in the second-largest dollar-denominated corporate bond offering this year to help finance the purchase of Micros Systems Inc.
 Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes, which may include stock repurchases, dividend payments, refinancing of debt and acquisitions including the company’s pending purchase of Micros, according to a regulatory filing.
 In an op-ed column published in the Financial Times in April, Tusk called for the creation of an EU institution to negotiate energy contracts with Russia, along the lines of joint purchases of uranium for nuclear power.
 Terms of the power-purchase agreements weren’t disclosed.
 With credit cards on file at the Cupertino, California-based company, they are always just a click away from a purchase, whether it’s a beatbox portable speaker or a new generation of linked products for the home.
 Early on, the company barely broke even on music purchases after subtracting infrastructure costs and other expenses from its 30 percent cut of sales, said McQuivey, the Forrester analyst.
 Airbus Retreats Airbus lost 31 percent to 5221 euros after saying that Emirates has canceled its planned purchase of 50 A350-900 planes and 20 of the larger -1000 variant.
 “We are generating a positive margin with our coal plants and cover our variable and operational costs, such as coal purchases or personnel expenses,” Hoffmann, who has traded energy since 1998, said by telephone on June 24.
 He also said officials would intensify work on a potential asset-purchase program.
 Exceeded Authority The operators sued again in July, and a judge blocked the plan from going forward, saying the commission exceeded its authority under the city charter by requiring the purchase of a specific vehicle.
 Yuan positions at financial institutions accumulated from foreign-exchange purchases, a barometer of inflows, rose 387 billion yuan ($62 billion) from a month earlier, compared with a 117 billion yuan increase in April, data showed yesterday.
 2 in six of the top 10 categories for hospital purchases.
 “A Covidien deal will allow Medtronic to rival Johnson & Johnson’s med-tech business in size and scale as the world’s largest medical device company” The purchase dwarfs Medtronic’s largest deal to date, the acquisition of Kyphon Inc.
 and Toyota Motor Corp, with $25 billion of announced purchases so far this year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Companies that announced purchases worth more than $100 million this year climbed an average 41 percent in 2014 through June 20.
 “Return to shareholders is a big theme” Companies’ purchases of their own equity can be seen as a vote of confidence by executives that their stock has room to rise.
 More Investments Even if buybacks continue, companies need to increase investments at a faster pace, according to Coutts’ Calder, a harder choice compared to improving return on equity with share repurchases in the short term.
 For those executives contemplating share repurchases, valuations are attractive.
 It said March 26 it plans to buy back 360 billion yen of stock, its first such purchase in five years.
 GPIF should avoid buying into markets that have rallied on bets its purchases will boost prices, he said.
 Gallagher also has called for updating the capital rules without restricting the use of secured funding such as repurchase agreements, or repos.
 The Swiss company has made a string of acquisitions, including the purchase of Sunfield Seeds, to build out its offerings, yet it faced a dominant Monsanto in the US.
 He also set out to dial back the investment bank that former CEO Robert Diamond built in a 15-year expansion of Barclays’s fixed-income business, capped by the firm’s 2008 purchase of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s North American operations out of bankruptcy.
 Jumbo Lessor ICBC Leasing would be the first Chinese lessor to order the 747-8 as planemakers brace for a wave of purchases from the world’s second-largest economy.
 approval in December for Sovaldi, the $1,000-a-pill treatment it acquired in its $11 billion purchase of Pharmasset Inc.
 Better Odds Merck’s purchase has a higher probability of success, though there’s still risk tied to the development of Idenix’s hepatitis C drug, Mark Schoenebaum, a New York-based analyst at International Strategy & Investment Group LLC, wrote in an e-mail.
 Acquiring Insurers Athene CEO Jim Belardi built his firm by acquiring insurers, most recently completing the purchase of Aviva Plc’s US.
 Global Asset Capital, Deka Group and Merlin Properties SA are among investors buying or looking to purchase commercial property in the country.
 Gallagher also has called for updating the capital rules without restricting the use of secured funding such as repurchase agreements, or repos.
 Officials will start work on an asset-purchase plan.
 pulls back on asset purchases, Breier of BMO said.
 The rhetoric comes after China said it would vet technology companies and the Central Government Procurement Center excluded Windows 8 from a purchase of energy-efficient computers.
 China’s government took a separate step against Microsoft by telling officials in Jiangsu province, south of Shanghai, to cancel purchases of computers running Windows 8, CCTV reported.
 “Customers around the world have evaluated and embraced Windows 8 as our most secure operating system” Microsoft said last month it was “surprised” to learn of the central government’s decision not to include Windows-run computers in its purchase of energy-efficient machines.
 have amassed more than $12 trillion in debt, putting a drag on the economy because some young people avoid making big purchases or starting a business.
 He oversaw Kubota’s purchase of Norway’s Kverneland ASA, which was completed in May 2012.
 This year, the Structured Finance Industry Group started an initiative known as RMBS 30 which brings together market participants to find solutions to issues including contractual promises about the quality of loans and the process for forcing repurchases of misrepresented debt.
 Justice Department yesterday approved its $27 billion purchase of Texas Industries Inc, helping the company gain entry into the cement market amid a recovery in the construction industry.
 There will be about 10 Amiibos for purchase with the Super Smash Bros.
 Xylem, with an estimated 17 percent of sales from emerging markets now, isn’t likely to make acquisitions at present though purchases are part of the strategy, wrote the analyst, Deane Dray, who rates the stock neutral.
 Draghi also said the ECB will introduce targeted offerings of liquidity to banks to encourage them to lend, and that officials will also start work on purchases of asset-backed securities.
 The anonymous seller purchased the piece for $17 million at auction in 2005.
 Traders have been willing to pay to borrow the notes in exchange for loaning cash overnight for the most actively traded 10-year maturity, with a repurchase agreement rate at negative 294 percent, according to data from ICAP Plc tracked by Bloomberg.
 recovery may not be as strong or fast as people want, but Europe has been even worse at a time when the US is getting stronger” Fed Taper The Fed is tapering its monthly asset purchases as officials debate how to end their ultra-loose monetary policy.
 “It’s not a bad business; it’s a stressed balance sheet” The Martinez Sampedro family became majority owners in 2006 when they purchased the stakes of fellow founders, the Franco brothers.
 RFR, founded by Aby Rosen and partner Michael Fuchs in 1991, purchased the Seagram Building for $375 million in 2000.
 Data today showed purchases of new homes in the US.
 Consumer purchases, after accounting for the influence of prices, fell 01 percent in May after a 02 percent decline a month earlier, signaling the rebound in growth this quarter will be more muted than previously projected.
 Yesterday’s consumer spending report showed clothing purchases dropped 09 percent in May from the prior month after adjusting for inflation.
 The purchase boosts Nokia’s ability to provide personalized maps and services using predictive data, according to a statement today from the company.
 The plant has a long-term power-purchase agreement with the National Electric Power Co.
 Whetsell said Amalgamated Bank purchased the property after the bankruptcy.
 The purchase “significantly strengthens Hirslanden’s position in western Switzerland, through providing a footprint in Geneva, and is in line with the company’s strategy to increase capacity in attractive markets with strong fundamentals,” Mediclinic said.
 agreed to buy ABB Ltd’s Meyer Steel Structures unit for about $600 million as the Swiss company sells assets acquired in the purchase of Thomas & Betts Corp.
 Trinity said it expects to complete the purchase in the third quarter and pay with cash on hand.
 and the purchases of Ragu pasta sauce and Wish-Bone salad dressings.
 The policy-making Federal Open Market Committee repeated it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 Officials will also start work on purchases of asset-backed securities, he said.
 The Fed is tapering its monthly asset purchases as officials debate an exit to its ultra-loose monetary policy.
 The central bank will reduce its stimulatory asset-purchase program by $10 billion for a fifth straight month, to $35 billion, according to all 43 economists surveyed by Bloomberg.
 The purchase of El Segundo, California-based DirecTV would give AT&T, the second-biggest US.
 Williams purchased for $24 billion in December 2012 a half stake in the entity that controls Access and 25 percent of the units traded publicly.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan kept the repurchase rate at 8 percent, as forecast by all 38 analysts in a Bloomberg survey.
 That took this year’s purchases to $81 billion, the most among eight Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 India imports about 65 percent of its coking coal requirement, with the top three steelmakers accounting for half of the purchases.
 The Menlo Park, California-based company purchased about 59 acres (24 hectares) adjacent to a 1 million-square-foot (92,900-square-meter) complex designed by architect Frank Gehry that’s set to open next year, Genevieve Grdina, a Facebook spokeswoman, said in a telephone interview.
 Prudential’s Chang, whose investors include insurers and individuals, has cut his holdings of government notes to 10 percent from 15 percent two years ago, while boosting purchases of higher-yielding corporate debt.
 Terms of the purchase weren’t disclosed.
 Globalfoundries was created in a 2009 transaction in which an investment arm of the government of Abu Dhabi purchased the manufacturing facilities of Advanced Micro Devices Inc.
 Draghi unveiled an unprecedented round of measures to avoid the threat of deflation, saying officials will speed up preparations related to the purchases of asset-backed securities.
 What’s driving risk assets today is that if inflation continues to fall and the euro continues to rally, the ECB will do conventional QE” ECB Liquidity The ECB opened a 400-billion-euro ($542 billion) liquidity channel tied to bank lending, and officials will begin work on an asset-purchase plan.
 The purchase by Canada’s largest pension fund would be the latest demonstration of that country’s demand for US.
 to allocate some of that money” Of their $114 billion in purchases last year, $14 billion was planted in New York, making Canada the market’s second-largest source of foreign real estate capital, behind the $24 billion in deals by the Chinese, according to Real Capital.
 New York University’s Langone Medical Center, which occupies about half the building and is its largest tenant, extended its lease to 2041 after Vornado’s purchase.
 “Down the line the central bank’s restriction on lending for construction or vehicle purchases risks increasing vulnerabilities in the banking sector as banks move into less well established areas in search of yield,” Alyssa Grzelak, a banking economist at IHS, said in e-mailed comments from Washington on June 27.
 Thor, based in New York, is joining with Chicago-based General Growth and Scott Rechler’s RXR Realty LLC in the purchase, said three people with knowledge of the terms, who asked not to be identified because the deal isn’t complete.
 Axel Springer, based in Berlin, said today it made the purchase through its Digital Ventures unit.
 Customers could buy the music or purchase a retailer package enabling them to sell music and earn rewards to buy more music.
 Yields on benchmark Treasuries have dropped this year, confounding analysts’ expectations that they’d quickly rise as the Federal Reserve curtailed its monthly bond purchases.
 By dollar amount, the sale is the biggest of an entire building in New York since Google Inc’s purchase of 111 Eighth Ave.
 Next year, United plans to introduce new ways for members to redeem their miles, including single-flight purchases of seats with extra legroom and checked-baggage privileges.
 “You will need to see how she handles a troubled period” Low Rates After years of holding benchmark interest rates near zero and bolstering the market through asset purchases, the Federal Reserve last year said it would start to unwind its unprecedented stimulus.
 Bank of China sank 26 percent after the nation’s seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of cash availability, rose to a seven-week high.
 AT&T is gaining more than 38 million video subscribers at home and in Latin America with the purchase of satellite-TV provider DirecTV.
 The company won’t use the funds from last week’s debt offering to help finance its Viber acquisition or accelerate purchases because of the issuance, he said.
 At Shire his other deals included the purchase of ViroPharma Inc.
 As CFO, Russell oversaw the $16 billion purchase of Transkaryotic Therapies Inc, an unprofitable company with more debt than sales that became the foundation of Shire’s rare disease business.
 The Aleman family, which owns airline Interjet, is one of as many as six investment groups that have studied a purchase of the company, according to Thomas Heather, the lawyer working for the Finance Ministry to reach an accord with Oceanografia’s creditors.
 Policy makers decreased the monthly pace of debt purchases by $10 billion, to $35 billion, the fifth cut of that amount since officials first announced they would taper bond buying in December.
 Fed View The policy-making Federal Open Market Committee repeated today that it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 The two firms set up a specially created company to raise the debt, which will be used to finance BP’s purchase of oil products from Rosneft.
 He’ll also get a $500,000 signing bonus, 30,000 restricted stock units and the option to purchase 413,000 shares, according to a company filing.
 The notice escalates the conflict between Las Vegas-based Caesars, purchased in a 2008 buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital, and some of its creditors.
 The buyout firms are among at least six groups exploring the purchase of Americana from the biggest shareholder, the Al-Kharafi family, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 The purchase will also let Level 3 own more network capacity in cities with the heaviest traffic and give it more control over pricing.
 The deal “creates a franchise that will provide compelling products and services for our customers” The purchase price is 33 percent more than Western World’s book value of $5183 million, according to the statement.
 The exchange operator is spinning off Euronext after acquiring it through the purchase of NYSE Euronext in November.
 as it seeks regulatory clearance of its $45 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said two days ago the central bank would start work on a quantitative-easing-style plan to purchase asset-backed debt and introduce a program to encourage banks to lend as he sought to counter slowing inflation.
 Moshayedi, who co-founded the maker of computer-storage cards with his two brothers in 1990, sold 45 million STEC shares in an August 2009 secondary offering after learning that a major customer, EMC Corp, would scale back purchases of the company’s ZeusIOPS flash memory product, the SEC alleged in its lawsuit against the ex-CEO.
 It feels like the calm before the storm” The S&P 500 and the Dow advanced earlier as data showed the number of contracts to purchase previously owned US.
 Best Buy Co’s sales trailed analysts’ estimates as mobile-phone and tablet purchases waned.
 Fed Buying Fed policy makers at their June 17-18 meeting cut monthly debt purchases by $10 billion, to $35 billion, while leaving the target rate for overnight lending between banks in the range of zero to 025 percent, where it has been since December 2008.
 Treasuries fell today as home purchases climbed 49 percent, the biggest increase since August 2011, to a 489 million annualized rate, figures from the National Association of Realtors showed today in Washington.
 “Everything that’s being done is being done to make it easier to use your mobile device or any digital form to purchase,” Visa CEO Charlie Scharf said in a May 19 conference call, adding that plastic cards will eventually disappear.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 82 percent, versus a 15 percent average at the past 10 offerings.
 Treasury Bond Index rose 03 percent yesterday as the Fed reduced its long-term estimates for growth and its target interest rate, while also cutting monthly debt purchases by $10 billion.
 European government bonds advanced after after Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen and policy makers yesterday reduced long-term estimates for interest rates, while cutting monthly debt purchases by $10 billion.
 She may well be right” The Federal Open Market Committee repeated yesterday it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after bond-buying ends.
 The company also said today it may boost its stock-repurchase program by 3 million shares.
 It is on track to end the purchases by year-end.
 $475 million purchase of Intucell Ltd.
 Those unable to get enough locally must purchase credits from clean-power plants sold over power exchanges in monthly trading sessions.
 “It is intended to provide the board of directors and stockholders with time to make informed judgments” The rights will be “attached to all shares of common stock,” and each right entitles the holder to purchase one ten-thousandth of a share of preferred stock at an exercise price of $275, according to the statement.
 If a person or group already beneficially owns 15 percent or more of the common stock, the person won’t be deemed a so-called acquiring person unless an additional 1 percent of the company’s shares is purchased, American Apparel said.
 They purchased a net $296 million of shares on June 4, according to data released yesterday by the market regulator.
 Target offered to repurchase bonds from among $38 billion face value in six series of notes with coupons ranging from 635 percent to 7 percent, the Minneapolis-based company said today in a statement.
 About 2,900 calls expiring in July with a $95 strike price were purchased at 12:46 pm.
 “It appears definitely that the investor is expecting an announcement soon” Other large purchases included 1,000 July $9250 calls and 1,000 June $90 calls.
 Users will be able to purchase goods through the Yandex service, and the company will arrange delivery through its Multiship unit.
 Of Russian Internet users, 71 percent make at least one online purchase a year, according to TNS Web Index.
 and Dean Foods Co, and called a report by the Wall Street Journal “completely irresponsible” “I never purchased or have been involved in any way with Dean Foods,” Icahn said in a telephone interview.
 Federal Reserve and Bank of Japan have purchased trillions of dollars of debt to stimulate economies and European Central Bank president Mario Draghi said in July 2012 he would do “whatever it takes” to protect the euro.
 The Fed said today that growth in the world’s biggest economy is bouncing back and that it will continue to reduce its bond purchases.
 Medtronic’s Deal The prospect of lower tax rates through a tax inversion are a reason in Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion purchase of Covidien Plc and Pfizer Inc’s more than $100 billion effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 Actual withdrawals or deposits may differ from Morningstar’s estimates because of the timing of purchases and redemptions or dividend distributions.
 The purchase will make Amaya the biggest publicly held online gambling company in the world, the company said.
 After trimming its monthly asset purchases by $10 billion yesterday, the Federal Open Market Committee said it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after bond-buying ends.
June 6 (Bloomberg) -- Indian police will send a team to London to question an Airbus Group NV executive as part of a four-year investigation into a plane purchase deal, a person with direct knowledge of the decision said.
 Sending a team to London is part of the Central Bureau of Investigation’s probe into state-owned Indian Airlines Ltd’s 2006 purchase of 43 single-aisle planes from Toulouse, France-based Airbus.
 The biggest was the purchase of ViroPharma Inc, valued by Shire at about $42 billion, which added the treatment Cinryze for a rare swelling disease.
 In 2007, Shire also gained its top-seller, Vyvanse for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, with the $26 billion purchase of New River Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Bank of America and firms it purchased issued about $965 billion between 2004 and 2008, while JPMorgan and firms it bought issued $450 billion, according to analysts at Sanford C.
 tapped Jefferies Group LLC to lead a $725 million term loan backing its purchase of landscape business ValleyCrest Companies LLC, using a different group of underwriters than the one that arranged debt for its buyout just six months ago, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Chief Executive Officer Domhnal Slattery had signaled his interest in a transaction by saying he was encouraged by acquisitions such as Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group’s $73 billion purchase of Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s aviation unit in 2012.
 AerCap Holdings NV vaulted to the top of the industry as the biggest stand-alone lessor by completing its $76 billion purchase of International Lease Finance Corp.
 The Blackstone Real Estate Partners VII fund will own 95 percent of a venture formed to purchase the properties, with DDR owning the rest, the companies said in a statement today.
 American Realty said last month it planned to sell the multitenant shopping centers to Blackstone to fund its purchase of Red Lobster’s real estate portfolio.
 “Another bump tomorrow could be the FOMC, although the outcome is largely already priced in” Online Brokers The S&P 500 has advanced 51 percent this year, reaching a record on June 9, as equities were boosted by better-than-forecast economic data and monthly asset purchases by the Fed.
 The central bank will reduce the pace of monthly asset purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion, economists project.
 Federal Reserve officials are watching the labor market as they move to complete their bond-purchase program late this year.
 We’ll “see a moderate-growth economy for the remainder of this year that will allow the Fed to continue to unwind extraordinary policy” Fed Action Fed policy makers yesterday trimmed monthly bond purchases by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion, keeping them on pace to end the program late this year.
 The fund’s actual withdrawals or deposits may differ from Morningstar’s estimates because of the timing of purchases and redemptions or dividend distributions.
 since its $155 billion purchase of Household International Inc, a subprime lender, in 2003 led it to set aside more than $65 billion for souring loans.
 Terms for the power purchase agreement and heat purchase agreement are still under discussion, according to Uyanga Dashzeveg, Newcom’s chief operating officer.
 The purchase may boost profit by about 25 cents a share in 2015 and by about $1 annually in three to four years, the Winston-Salem, North Carolina-based company said today in a statement.
 Moynihan, seeking to move on from the housing-bubble fallout, has spent more than $50 billion to resolve claims related to shoddy mortgages, most tied to his predecessor’s 2008 purchase of Countrywide, once the biggest US.
 That spending would cover the purchase of the first new aircraft for delivery in fiscal 2018, Gulick said.
 for $23 billion, its largest purchase since acquiring Berry Petroleum Co.
 Linn, which has interim financing for the acquisition, plans to fund the purchase ultimately by selling its holdings in the Granite Wash and Cleveland plays in Texas and western Oklahoma.
 The New York-based insurer hasn’t authorized a share repurchase since 2008.
 The retail chain accepts Progreso purchase cards and allows borrowers to make loan payments at its stores, though it has no direct relationship with the lender, Wal-Mart has said.
(Corrects story that moved June 12 to remove reference to UCWeb deal boosting Alibaba valuation) June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Alibaba Group Holding Ltd’s purchase of the rest of UCWeb Inc.
 “There’s no question that investors who purchased the stock in recent months would have wanted to know the true scope of the problem,” said Thomas, who previously worked as a trial lawyer at the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 Many of the loans were inherited by the Charlotte, North Carolina-based bank when it purchased subprime lender Countrywide Financial Corp.
 The company also said it would repurchase about $32 billion of mortgage bonds from the government-sponsored enterprises.
 That accord, which included a $4 billion agreement with the FHFA, encompassed loans New York-based JPMorgan acquired through its purchases of Bear Stearns Cos.
 Harnessing the full potential of drones, such as Bezos’s vision of robot aircraft lugging Amazon purchases, will require the ability to fly on autopilot and beyond the line of sight.
 The sale follows the purchase in January by KKR & Co.
 Some dealers have sought to block Tesla retail operations, saying requiring people to purchase new cars from dealerships encourages competition and give customers an advocate.
 VTB Capital was Yandex’s financial adviser for the purchase, according to the statement.
 Today, the European Central Bank cut its deposit rate below zero, the world’s first major institution to use such a measure, and is preparing to start an asset-purchase plan.
 In 2013, this same market lost 65 percent, plunging 9 percent last May and June as investors had palpitations over the Federal Reserve’s plan to slow its monthly debt purchases.
 investor agreed to drop a lawsuit in which the search-engine company was accused of overpaying for its repurchase of 40 million shares from director and activist Daniel Loeb.
 New-home sales account for about 7 percent of the residential market and are tabulated when contracts are signed, making them a timelier barometer than purchases of previously owned dwellings.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 The Federal Reserve has bought trillions of dollars of government bonds and mortgage securities since the credit crisis -- purchases that are intended to boost economic growth by lowering borrowing costs for businesses and individuals.
 More information has been beneficial, though, because it has given investors confidence in the value of their purchases.
 For that, customers must purchase another device from Really Simple Software Inc’s SimpleTV, which can cost as much as $350.
 Processing plants are unable to purchase as many animals for slaughter because of the labor shortage, and feedlot operators are selling more animals to the US, he said.
 Traders are willing to pay to borrow the notes in the repurchase-agreement market in exchange for loaning cash overnight for the most actively traded 10-year maturity, with rates reaching negative 295 percent today, according to data from ICAP Plc tracked by Bloomberg.
 Bakala has also been criticized by Czech politicians for his purchase of apartments in Ostrava, mostly housing miners, and reneging on a promise to sell them at a controlled price to their long-term tenants.
 Passenger-car sales rose 13 percent in April as consumers brought forward purchases in anticipation that more cities will impose ownership restrictions to fight pollution.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 It took issue with Citigroup’s ability to project revenue and losses in its global operations, and rejected the New York-based firm’s request to quintuple its dividend and repurchase $64 billion of shares.
 The bank has been stockpiling cash to pay back the bailout, which ranked as the largest still outstanding for TARP’s capital purchase fund.
 Sumitomo Mitsui’s purchase of Societe Generale SA’s Japan private-banking unit last year enabled it to join Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc.
 Default Odds Caesars was purchased in 2008 in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital and is fighting with its creditors over the March deal that moved the Bally’s, Quad and Cromwell casino-hotels in Las Vegas, as well as Harrah’s New Orleans, from its operating unit to affiliate Caesars Growth Partners LLC.
 “This pent-up demand from purchasers has been worked off and more people are getting hired.
 Rents tend to react more to rising employment than purchases” New York City added 75,000 jobs in the 12 months through April, according to the state Labor Department.
 While share purchases by the nation’s 587 billion-ringgit ($182 billion) pension fund support prices, money managers at Samsung Asset Management Co.
 High debt levels will “weigh on the property market and consumer spending” Malaysian stocks get support from a steady stream of purchases by Employees Provident Fund, the nation’s biggest state pension fund, according to Aberdeen Asset Management Sdn.
June 5 (Bloomberg) --Asset-backed debt sales are heading for their busiest week in three years as the European Central Bank said it’s preparing plans to purchase the securities to boost lending in the region.
 Fed Target In the US, where policy makers are still buying $35 billion of bonds per month, Fed Chair Janet Yellen has said the central bank plans to keep its interest-rate target low for a considerable time after its completes the process of winding down purchases.
 Money managers will need to be more discriminating in the second half as the Federal Reserve continues to scale back monthly asset purchases that have helped developing nations lure foreign capital and cover up structural shortcomings.
 Under Chief Executive Officer James Hogan, Etihad has embarked on an purchase spree of stakes in second-tier airlines, assembling a group with interests from Germany to Serbia to the Seychelles and Australia.
 Officials will also start work on purchases of asset-backed securities, he said.
 MBIA claimed the bank misrepresented the way it put protocols in place that were designed to avoid acquiring loans from “deficient originators,” and that the company didn’t correct its quality-control and repurchase practices.
 “Businesses will be able to search, find, purchase and transfer the best domain for their business - - whether it’s com, biz, org, or any of the wide range of new domains that are being released to the Web” Web-coupon website RetailMeNot Inc’s shares plunged 19 percent on May 22, after a report said Google tweaked its search algorithm, making results leading to RetailMeNot 33 percent less visible.
June 15 (Bloomberg) -- Williams Partners LP is proposing a merger with Access Midstream Partners LP after a $6 billion purchase that would create one of the biggest US.
 Mike Stice, Access Midstream’s CEO, said that “since Williams invested in ACMP in 2012, it’s been clear to me that our companies share many common values” The purchase, which isn’t contingent on the related merger, will increase Williams’ ownership of Access to 100 percent of the general partnership and 50 percent of the limited partnership, according to the statement.
 In 2012, Williams purchased about 25 percent of Oklahoma City-based Access and half of its general partner -- called Access Midstream Partners GP LLC.
 Citizens who hadn’t been been declaring income will now have to pay higher advance taxes on income and dividends, cash withdrawals, car registrations and on purchases including property and business class flight tickets.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- European car sales rose 43 percent in May, the ninth consecutive monthly gain, as a recovery in consumer confidence encouraged purchases of new models from Renault SA and Volkswagen AG following a six-year market slump.
 Calantzopoulos said today that the tobacco industry is at “the early stages of a transformational process” as he also announced the purchase of Nicocigs Ltd, a UK.
 “He oversaw efforts to expand the company’s asset base, including the purchase of Getty Oil, which continue to benefit our company today” Alabama Upbringing John Key McKinley was born on March 24, 1920, in Tuscaloosa, Alabama, according to a paid notice in the Times.
 He added that Medtronic might also be able to put some of the $205 billion to use in the purchase price for Covidien without triggering a tax bill.
 Household purchases unexpectedly fell 01 percent in April, the first decrease in a year, after a 1 percent gain the prior month that was the strongest since August 2009, according to the Commerce Department.
 Fed officials are watching the labor market as they get closer to completing their bond-purchase program later this year and start considering the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 A group led by buyout firm Warburg Pincus LLC that includes Singapore’s Temasek Holdings Pte agreed to the purchase, which values the businesses at 975 million euros ($133 billion), the Santander, Spain-based lender said today in a filing.
 Federal Reserve continued to unwind the asset-purchase program that fueled the five-year rally in stocks, support from the European Central Bank sent bond yields to record lows in nations such as Italy and Spain during June.
 “They’re leveraging that to purchase cottages.
 purchased a 10th of an Angolan oil and gas field for $15 billion.
 The world’s largest publicly traded tobacco company also announced the purchase of Nicocigs Ltd, a UK-based cigarette maker.
 While helping to oversee the integration of the $743 million purchase of Uniqema from Imperial Chemical Industries in 2006, Christie is also treading a path between investor demands for cash returns and hoarding funds for expansion and acquisitions.
 The Federal Housing Administration, a mortgage insurer run by HUD that helps lower-income borrowers buy houses, is on pace to back only 500,000 loans for purchases this fiscal year, about half the number in fiscal 2010.
 BRF completed the $649 million purchase of Abu Dhabi-based Federal Foods in April and agreed to buy 40 percent of Al Khan, a Sadia distributor in Oman, for $685 million in February.
 A purchase of BancWest would bring Tokyo-based Sumitomo Mitsui back to the US.
 Potential new infrastructure operators in Germany have until the end of the year to sign deals with Telefonica to purchase assets, two of the people said.
 The yield spread narrowed toward a one-year low with the Federal Open Market Committee on course to end its monthly bond purchases this year and markets pricing a 61 percent chance interest rates will increase by July 2015.
 The Fed is reducing its monthly bond purchases, while keeping the target for overnight lending between banks in the range of zero to 025 percent it has been since 2008.
 Inflation accelerated to 66 percent in May, increasing pressure on the Reserve Bank to raise its benchmark repurchase rate to bring consumer price growth back to within the target range of 3 percent to 6 percent.
 Italian police searched two of the company’s sites as part of a probe into possible fraud related to the purchase of the vaccines by the Health Ministry, one for a pandemic in 2009, according to an e-mailed statement from the police.
 The purpose is to see how the companies report purchase prices, goodwill and other aspects of merger and acquisition deals, the newspaper reported, without attribution.
 for as much as $19 billion and Rakuten Inc’s $900 million purchase of Viber Media Ltd.
 He stopped short of announcing asset purchases as done by the Bank of England, the Federal Reserve and Bank of Japan.
 The desire for such an arrangement, known as a tax inversion, is a factor in Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion purchase of Covidien Plc and Pfizer Inc’s more than $100 billion effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 purchases into the low-tax environments accounted for 15 percent of all overseas transactions with a value of $250 million or more, Goldman Sachs’s data show, up from an average of 7 percent in the previous 15 years.
 Actavis Plc’s $208 billion purchase of Forest Laboratories Inc.
 This total doesn’t include Medtronic’s purchase of Covidien, which is largely based in the US, Pfizer’s so-far unwelcome bid for AstraZeneca, or the $542 billion offer for Allergan Inc.
 The effect of its purchase of Allergan would be the same as an inversion deal.
 -- money that will help it purchase fast-growing startups.
 Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, which agreed in April to purchase Ranbaxy, gained 41 percent to a record 66085 rupees.
 Profits Later The company, with razor-thin profit margins that have raised hackles among investors, has shown that it’s willing to lose money on hardware with the goal of later making money from sales of entertainment content like videos and music, or purchases from Amazon’s store.
 The automaker, which also offers wholly online car purchases, is following larger competitors Bayerische Motoren Werke AG and Audi AG in developing a retail format that targets younger, media-oriented buyers in urban areas.
 BMW’s I sub-brand of electric and hybrid autos has a website enabling direct online purchases.
 had to drop a planned purchase of T-Mobile in 2011 after failing to convince regulators it could remedy the market impact of absorbing the carrier.
 completed its purchase of Medco, the spread was so wide that traders had a chance to make a 90 percent annualized return, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 It took about four months for the Committee on Foreign Investment in the US, or CFIUS, to approve WH Group Ltd’s purchase of Smithfield Foods, the biggest Chinese takeover of an American company.
 said Shire needs to make purchases if it wants to keep from being gobbled up amid the record $139 billion in pharmaceutical deals that were announced so far this quarter.
 The biggest of those was the purchase of ViroPharma Inc, valued by Shire at about $42 billion, which added the treatment Cinryze for a rare swelling disease.
 While it would be surprising if the company was purchased before Natpara was approved, an acquirer confident in the drug’s prospects might be able to get the company at a cheaper price if it bid now, Nierengarten said.
 Previously it had forecast purchases of 872 million tons this year and 916 million tons in 2015.
 “It’s been a natural transition for us” Terms of the power purchase agreements weren’t disclosed.
 Last year’s purchase of Kayak Software Corp, for about $17 billion, helped Priceline capture revenue in hotel search and the company is now making its largest purchase ever to branch out in restaurant bookings.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Remy Cointreau SA, the maker of Remy Martin cognac, plans to return to earnings growth in the current fiscal year after Chinese customers’ cutbacks on purchases of the drink caused annual profit to plunge 39 percent.
 Leverage Levels Credit Suisse, which has captured a 101 percent share of the institutional market, led about $28 billion of loans this month to help finance Blackstone Group LP’s $54 billion purchase of Gates Global, an industrial-products maker based in Denver, from Onex Corp.
 Sense of Urgency Mitsubishi Heavy’s bid “reflects the sense of urgency that GE’s purchase of Alstom would allow it to hold an overwhelming position in the global gas-turbine markets,” Masanori Wakae, an analyst at Mizuho Securities Co, said ahead of the deal’s formal announcement.
 “This announcement makes it more valuable for customers to want to purchase,” Skrbec said.
 The Swiss lender has advised Qatar’s sovereign wealth fund on high-profile deals including stake purchases in German automaker Porsche SE and the acquisition of London’s Harrods department store.
 is considering the purchase of a solar cell and module factory outside China to feed growth in demand for the technology.
 In a bid to get credit flowing, Draghi also opened a 400-billion-euro ($542 billion) liquidity channel tied to bank lending and officials will start work on an asset-purchase plan.
 “Farmers are spending less bags of soybean to buy the same amount of fertilizer, so they are anticipating the purchases to hedge their cost of production” After tumbling 13 percent against the dollar last year, the Brazilian real is the best performer among major emerging-market currencies this year, gaining 44 percent.
 The Tokyo-based maker of nuclear power plant equipment, ships, aircraft and machinery intends for the purchase to bolster a planned bid with Siemens AG for France-based Alstom’s turbine business, the Nikkei said, without attribution.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- While AT&T Inc’s $95-a-share bid to purchase DirecTV puts a lid on prices of contracts to buy the stock, options traders are willing to dish out more for protection in case the deal falls apart.
 The purchase of DirecTV would give AT&T, the second-biggest US.
 Time Warner’s purchase of DirecTV still has a 90 percent chance of being approved in mid-2015, James Ratcliffe, an analyst at Buckingham Research Group, wrote in a June 18 client note.
 He will be deeply missed” In February, Comcast agreed to purchase Time Warner Cable.
 In May the London Stock Exchange Group Plc said in a statement it was in discussions with Northwestern over the possible purchase of Russell.
 The price may increase by 10 million euros if Telefonica completes its purchase of 56 percent of DTS from Promotora de Informaciones SA, or Prisa, and by as much as 20 million euros more depending on gains in pay-TV customers over four years, Telefonica said today in a statement.
 The Bank of England left its key interest rate at a record low of 05 percent and held its asset-purchase target at 375 billion pounds ($629 billion), matching the predictions of economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 “I have every confidence that Richie Boucher and his team will continue to do a great job” Loans Shrink Ross’s profit was calculated by Bloomberg from company filings showing his purchases in 2011 and sales this year and don’t include costs and fees.
 This year, the Structured Finance Industry Group started an initiative known as RMBS 30 which brings together market participants to find solutions to issues including contractual promises about the quality of loans and the process for forcing repurchases of misrepresented debt.
 yesterday filed notice of its purchase of 128 percent of Aquila, saying it wants to ensure the project goes into production as soon as possible.
 He said he had no knowledge if any potential investors, including Chanceton Financial Group Ltd, have approached Taiwan Life for alliances and stake purchases.
 Central Banks Federal Reserve officials are watching the labor market as they move to complete their bond-purchase program late this year and start considering the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 Argentina purchased 69 percent of Brazilian exports in the period, down from 82 percent the prior year.
 As CEO, Chapoulaud-Floquet will be responsible for reviving growth after the liquor company last week reported a 39 percent drop in annual profit as Chinese customers cut back purchases.
 for $2 billion and RF Micro Devices Inc’s purchase of TriQuint Semiconductor Inc.
 Alfa said it made the purchase “for investment purposes” in a statement today.
 Alfa’s purchase of the Pacific Rubiales stake will probably be used to develop exploration and production joint ventures as Mexico opens to foreign energy investment, according to Eric Conrads, a money manager who helps oversee $500 million in Latin American stocks at ING Groep NV.
 Alfa’s purchase of the stake in Pacific Rubiales “is a financial investment that provides the possibility to develop a joint venture in Mexico and take advantage of the country’s potential,” said Jean-Baptiste Bruny, a BBVA Research analyst in Mexico City, who rates the stock underperform.
 Fed officials are watching the labor market now as they move to complete their bond-purchase program later this year and start considering timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 While the purchases gave the Montreal-based company an opportunity to expand its mobile-phone service nationwide, it said it had no immediate plans for how to use the assets.
 Device companies are banding together to gain leverage and prominence on hospitals’ supplier lists, as medical centers cut costs by concentrating their purchases.
 J&J Deal Consolidation in the medical device market was sparked by Johnson & Johnson’s $213 billion purchase of Synthes Inc.
 Borrowers who have lower scores will generally have to make larger down payments for Western Asset to purchase the loan.
 “If he wins the Triple Crown, I think the figure doubles” Which still would be a nice return for Martin and Coburn, thoroughbred racing neophytes who call themselves Dumb Ass Partners, a name that grew out of the purchase of that mare.
 Before the deal was halted, Energy Transfer had been out seeking debt to finance the purchase, one person said.
 Federal Reserve officials are watching the labor market as they move to complete their bond-purchase program late this year and start considering the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 Jefferies Group LLC raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold after Icahn’s purchase of Family Dollar shares.
 The purchase price of $78 a share is 29 percent more than Hittite’s closing price on June 6.
 There have been about $230 billion of deals proposed or announced in the industry since the end of March, including Medtronic Inc’s purchase of Covidien Plc this month and Merck & Co’s takeover of Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 will start accepting bitcoins for hotel purchases, becoming the largest online travel service to adopt the virtual currency.
 in the market for mobile ad dollars, the purchase of San Francisco-based Namo Media brings technology for native advertising, a strategy that blends ads with the rest of a website.
 Using its ad network, acquired in last year’s purchase of MoPub, Twitter has said it can reach more than 1 billion phones.
 24, 2014 to repurchase the outstanding $180 million of 1025 percent notes due November 2015, it said in a filing to the Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday.
 It said at the time it owned $25 million of the securities as a result of open-market purchases.
 The central bank has been reducing its monthly bond purchases while keeping the target for overnight lending between banks in the range of zero to 025 percent, where it has been since 2008.
 “In aspiring to leaving a mark, you want something that sticks around” Affirm, based in San Francisco, offers on-the-spot financing for shoppers making purchases online.
 The idea is to let consumers take out a loan with an upfront charge, rather than having to put the purchase on a credit card and worry about late fees and interest payments.
 When it’s time to pay, Affirm evaluates a shopper’s creditworthiness, calculates interest and divides the purchase into installments.
 Instead, the startup takes into account the cost of the item being purchased, social-media profiles and a range of personal data.
 MegaFon, controlled by Russia’s richest man Alisher Usmanov and part-owned by TeliaSonera AB, will use a credit line from China Development Bank to fund the purchases.
 “The era of highly-priced purchases is over,” Bashmakov said.
 The purchase by Lew, a former board member of Reserve Bank of Australia, is threatening the bid by Woolworths to take control of Australia’s biggest department store chain by market value.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Monsanto Co, the world’s largest seed company, sold $45 billion of notes in its biggest bond sale ever to help fund share repurchases.
 The seed producer plans to use the proceeds of the bond issue along with as much as $12 billion of commercial paper and available cash to finance accelerated stock repurchases, according to a regulatory filing today.
 Monsanto announced a $10 billion stock buyback plan and an intention to repurchase $6 billion of shares on an accelerated basis after ending preliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that would have cut its tax bill.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- AGL Energy Ltd, Australia’s second-largest electricity retailer, said the competition tribunal’s decision to allow its A$151 billion ($142 billion) purchase of state-owned power plants should spur further asset sales.
 With the Macquarie Generation purchase, AGL won’t pursue the Delta assets, Fraser said.
 He said the issues stemmed from buyer furnished equipment, referring to components purchased and supplied by the future owner of a plane.
 The purchase would create one of the biggest US.
 agreed to purchase the maker of flash-memory technology for about $11 billion.
 Vontobel has the right to repurchase the entire stake, it said in a statement from Zurich today.
 The reassurance is that the easy money policy has more to go” Fed Chair Janet Yellen said the central bank will keep interest rates low for a considerable time after ending its asset-purchase program, even as it saw improvements in the economy and labor market.
 It didn’t specify the size of the stake purchased by KKR and its fellow investors.
 The Fed has pumped up its balance sheet to $43 trillion since 2008 with bond purchases designed to lower longer-term borrowing costs and fuel economic growth.
 “Coty would like to have a brand like Elizabeth Arden in its portfolio” However, a bid from Coty may be unlikely now that it’s spending $468 million to repurchase stock, she said.
 LG Household, valued at $74 billion, completed its pre-due diligence and may spend the equivalent of $148 billion to purchase the company, according to an article this week on DealReporter that cited a newspaper in South Korea.
 Fees Oracle Agrees to Pay $15 Million to Settle Pillar Data Suit Oracle Corp, the largest maker of database software, agreed to pay $15 million in attorneys’ fees to help settle a shareholder lawsuit challenging its purchase of a company controlled by founder Larry Ellison.
 Deal activity will persist, especially in the wound-care sector of the medical-device industry, following Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion purchase of Covidien Plc, Odell said today in a phone interview.
 “There’s a case for it, because by having cars like that you run the risk of diluting and lessening your brand” Winning Streak On a retail sales basis, excluding vehicle purchases by businesses, Lexus was the top-selling US.
 They purchased a net $47 million of shares today, according to provisional data from the National Stock Exchange Ltd.
 Recovery A Commerce Department report showed purchases of new homes in the US.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Chubu Electric Power Co, Japan’s second-biggest purchaser of liquefied natural gas, plans to increase its use of a type of LNG contract that allows buyers more flexible terms and competitive prices.
 Chubu is attempting to diversify its purchases amid rising supply from producers including Australia and Russia and as North America is poised to become a major exporting region.
 Digital downloads of the movies are available for purchase through Amazon Instant Video.
 China Eastern, based in Shanghai, will fund the purchase from business operations, bank loans and other finances, according to the statement.
 Earlier this month, Sweden’s government and the main opposition party agreed to work to secure continued production of submarines and warships in Sweden and to promote Saab’s purchase of the unit from ThyssenKrupp to return the shipyard in Karlskrona to Swedish hands.
 Pilgrim’s said it expects cost savings from the proposed deal to exceed $300 million annually, and that the purchase would boost earnings per share immediately.
 inflation trends, as the economy recovers” Fed policy makers at their June 17-18 meeting cut monthly debt purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion, while leaving the target rate for overnight lending between banks in the range of zero to 025 percent, where it has been since December 2008.
 home purchases increased 19 percent in May, according to a Bloomberg survey before the June 23 report, after a 13 percent gain in April that was the first this year, National Association of Realtors data showed.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Williams Partners LP is proposing a merger with Access Midstream Partners LP after a $6 billion purchase that would create one of the biggest US.
 Mike Stice, Access Midstream’s CEO, said that “since Williams invested in ACMP in 2012, it’s been clear to me that our companies share many common values” The purchase, which isn’t contingent on the related merger, will increase Williams’ ownership of Access to 100 percent of the general partnership and 50 percent of the limited partnership, according to the statement.
 In 2012, Williams purchased about 25 percent of Oklahoma City-based Access and half of its general partner -- called Access Midstream Partners GP LLC.
 Moynihan, seeking to move on from the housing-bubble fallout, has spent more than $50 billion to resolve claims related to shoddy mortgages, most tied to his predecessor’s 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp, once the biggest US.
 The Fed is reducing its monthly bond purchases, while keeping the target for overnight lending between banks in a range of zero to 025 percent.
 Loyalty Goal Started in February, CommuteStream knows users’ daily commute patterns, has access to data from their phones and can figure out just how much time they have to stop by a merchant and make a purchase before needing to board a bus.
 is close to announcing a new aircraft to succeed the 757 jetliner that ceased production almost a decade ago, according to central Asian carrier Air Astana, which is keen to purchase the plane.
 Air Astana -- which is 51 percent owned by Kazakhstan’s sovereign wealth fund -- plans to hold further talks with the Brazilian company at the Farnborough Air Show in July, where it could commit to a purchase, he said.
 After Berkshire’s purchase of HJ.
 “Smaller funds are having a tougher time raising money” Small Base Panorama investors can choose among three types of private deals: loans to mid-sized companies, purchases of family-owned businesses or stakes in technology firms poised to go public.
 The negative part is it took so long for us to get there” Federal Reserve officials are watching the labor market as they move to complete their bond-purchase program late this year and start considering the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 Abney led UPS’s 2001 acquisition of Fritz Cos, its largest purchase at that time, for $450 million in stock.
 UPS later combined Fritz and seven other purchases made over 18 months into a new customs-brokerage and freight-forwarding unit led by Abney.
 TNT Appeal While UPS is appealing a decision by the European Union’s antitrust regulator to block the purchase, it’s “unlikely we’ll take another stab at purchasing TNT,” Davis said.
 Risk Appetite Scotiabank’s purchase of 20 percent of Canadian Tire Corp’s financial unit, which increases its risk from unsecured consumer credit, and the firm’s strategy to expand credit-card lending and auto financing, also were mentioned by the ratings firm.
 Debt Levels The purchase threatened to boost debt levels and reverse a drop in leverage that reduced borrowing costs at JBS.
 Consumer purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 02 percent after being little changed in April, Commerce Department figures showed.
 Direct bidders purchased 167 percent of the securities, compared with an average at the past 10 auctions of 218 percent.
 Fed policy makers cut monthly debt purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion at their June 17-18 meeting, while leaving the target rate for overnight lending between banks in the range of zero to 025 percent, where it has been since December 2008.
 “Both local and foreign automakers are trying to gain more market share as consumers advance their purchases on concern their city may cap the growth in vehicle ownership” Separate data from the state-backed China Association of Automobile Manufacturers showed May auto sales climbed 139 percent from a year earlier to 159 million units.
 Auto Demand Demand for automobiles in China has been driven in part by concerns that more cities will impose quotas on new vehicles or restrictions on their usage, leading many consumers to bring forward their purchases.
 An agreement in December gave Total the option to negotiate the purchase of an interest in the four licenses, according to a statement at the time.
 Developed economies are moving in the right direction, notwithstanding the current geopolitical risks” The Federal Open Market Committee will reduce the pace of monthly asset purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion, according to the median of estimates compiled by Bloomberg News.
 Profit Margins Amazon has shown a willingness to lose money on hardware with the goal of later making it back from sales of entertainment content like videos and music, or purchases from Amazon’s store.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- JSW Steel Ltd, the Indian steelmaker that purchases all its iron ore, will import the raw material in bulk for the first time as local supplies remain scarce and global prices hover near a 21-month low.
 will buy 69 percent and a Blackstone affiliate will purchase 15 percent, Metrovacesa said.
 “We’re really pretty close to normal” The Federal Open Market Committee is debating how long to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero after completing a bond-purchase program that’s set to end late this year.
 The committee repeated on June 18 that it expects the rate to remain near zero for a “considerable time” after the purchases end.
 Rachael Bennett, an analyst at Dallas-based MD Buyline, which provides research for health-care systems, said about 80 percent of hospitals they assist have purchased Hologic mammogram systems.
 The term sheet has sections redacted, including the name of a third party that is “contemplating” purchase of all shares owned by Turquoise Hill Resources Ltd.
 As the 134-year-old company focuses on industrial and power services, as well as facility management, it added almost 6,000 employees through purchases in 2013.
 Recent purchases have been 300 million euros or less, according to the company.
 One of the biggest recent deals was last year’s purchase of Johnson Screens Inc, a US.
 It topped RF Micro Devices Inc’s planned purchase of TriQuint Semiconductor Inc.
 Concordia’s status as an inversion target may be forefront in investors’ minds because of recent Canadian inversions, including Endo Health Solutions Inc’s purchase of Paladin Labs and Valeant, which has soared since it announced plans to buy Biovail Corp.
 Concordia plans to fund its next purchase through debt rather than equity, he said.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, climbed a second week as banks hoarded cash to meet quarter-end requirements.
 The Fed repeated that it will probably reduce asset purchases in further “measured steps” and that it expects rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 presence in 1990 under the Precept brand, Bridgestone has been chasing Titleist, which was purchased by Fila Korea Ltd in 2011.
 The health system is placing its data, which include purchases a patient has made using a credit card or store loyalty card, into predictive models that give a risk score to patients.
 Compared with a year earlier, purchases decreased 82 percent before seasonal adjustment.
 First-time buyers accounted for 27 percent of all purchases and are still having trouble getting into the market, Yun said.
 Timelier Gauge Existing home sales, tabulated when a purchase contract closes, account for more than 90 percent of the residential market.
 New-home purchases, which make up about 7 percent and are tabulated when contracts are signed, are considered a timelier barometer.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 The group also cut its prediction on mortgage lending volume for purchases.
 “The speculation is, what will they do on top of the rate cut that’s looking like a done deal?” Asset Purchases ECB officials have said they’re working on a package of possible measures, and have held out the prospect of asset purchases as a more powerful option.
 Other possible actions include suspending the absorption of liquidity created by crisis-era bond purchases, extending the full-allotment mode for refinancing operations, reducing reserve requirements and changing its collateral framework.
 In a Bloomberg survey last month, just 8 percent of economists forecast the ECB will start asset purchases, indicating they don’t see it following the Bank of England and the Federal Reserve down the quantitative-easing road.
 Birla is seeking to purchase more cement plants in India and abroad, he said in an interview with Bloomberg TV India in September.
 The company has reaped the benefit of the agency’s support for overseas purchases of crop-dusting planes, said Joe Brown, Hartzell’s president.
 Anadarko would probably be at the top of the list for multinational oil companies seeking purchases to turn around years of declining production, David Neuhauser, managing director of investment firm Livermore Partners, said in December.
 Mineral Resources, which today filed notice of its purchase of a 128 percent stake in takeover target Aquila Resources Ltd, said it wants to ensure the project in Western Australia goes into production as soon as possible.
 Of the pending deals, a Sprint purchase of Bellevue, Washington-based T-Mobile is “going to be the hardest one to get through,” said Jeff Blumenfeld, an attorney at Lowenstein Sandler LLP.
 Ratcliffe, who formed the chemical company through a series of deals including the purchase of Innovene from BP Plc in 2005, is betting the company can compete with Asian competitors including Chimei Materials Technology Corp.
 to overcome a last hurdle for its $17 billion purchase of Alstom’s energy assets.
 The Fed reduced its bond purchases by $10 billion for a fifth consecutive meeting, to $35 billion, leaving it on track to end the program this year.
 “The committee will likely reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps at future meetings,” policy makers said in a statement, adding that rates will stay low after bond buying ends.
 While the development of the A350 has been free of major glitches for at least a year -- an increasingly rare occurrence for aircraft programs -- Airbus has struggled to keep the momentum particularly for the smallest variant, with customers dropping purchases to move to bigger planes.
 “Despite the recent disturbances, both economies are functioning and since the price of companies has come down, there are opportunities to purchase stocks at reasonable valuations,” Mobius said in e-mailed comments to Bloomberg News.
 He’s raised the benchmark repurchase rate by 75 basis points since taking charge in September to rein in prices and left the rate unchanged at 8 percent for a second straight meeting on June 3.
 Half a year after Goldman’s purchase of a stake in state-held Dong split the minority coalition of Prime Minister Helle Thorning-Schmidt, investors are benefiting from the transaction.
 The Wall Street bank’s $15 billion purchase of an 18 percent stake was part of a deal, made together with pension funds ATP and PFA, that helped cauterize losses after Dong failed to turn a profit on natural gas projects.
 The purchase comes after the Gates Foundation Asset Trust, the entity that manages the investments for the $402 billion Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, liquidated its entire stake in G4S Plc, the world’s biggest security-services provider.
 The measure of the state of the economy rose to a six-week high, and the gauges of personal finances and whether this is a good time to make purchases also advanced.
 The debt is secured by a loan made by Bank of America to Apollo Global Management LLC for the purchase of secondary quality properties, according to Matthias Baltes, head of commercial real estate financing at Bank of America in London.
 In April, Suntory completed the purchase of Deerfield, Illinois-based Beam for $16 billion, its biggest acquisition abroad.
 The new venture will have about $11 billion available for asset purchases after the floating facilities transaction, Petrofac Chief Financial Officer Tim Weller said by phone.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Monsanto Co, the world’s largest seed company, intends to offer senior notes to help buy back $10 billion of shares in its biggest stock repurchase plan.
 Monsanto intends to help finance the share repurchases over two years with debt, the company said in a separate release.
 The objective is always to get the balance right” The push to develop Europe’s ABS market gained momentum on June 5, when Draghi, president of the European Central Bank, said the ECB would “intensify preparatory work related to outright purchases” of asset-backed debt.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve said growth is bouncing back and the job market is improving as it continued to reduce the monthly pace of asset purchases.
 ‘Measured Steps’ Yellen repeated that the Fed is likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the buying ends.
 ‘Shadow Unemployment’ Still, Yellen said, “a portion of the decline we’ve seen in the unemployment rate probably reflects a kind of shadow unemployment or discouragement” The Fed has sought to spur growth and employment with three rounds of large-scale asset purchases intended to hold down long-term borrowing costs.
 The purchases have swelled the central bank’s balance sheet to a record $434 trillion.
 “This is another offering that helps people get insights into their home” The purchase underlines how Nest, which Google bought for about $32 billion earlier this year, is working to become a bigger player of connected devices for consumers.
 Deal Machine The acquisition adds to a growing list of purchases by Google this year as it looks beyond its own engineers for new capabilities.
 The Mountain View, California-based company disclosed at least five purchases in May and has announced at least three more in June.
 Fed policy makers last week trimmed monthly bond purchases by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion, keeping them on pace to end the program late this year.
 Provisions for anticipated losses on power-purchase agreements will be increased by about 300 million euros, the Karlsruhe, Germany-based utility said today in a statement.
 Yahoo in particular will seek to expand advertising using social-media tool Tumblr, purchased last year for $11 billion, she said.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 525 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 448 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 93 percent of the notes at the sale, compared with an average of 131 percent for the past 10 auctions.
 Fed policy makers cut monthly debt purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion at their June 17-18 meeting, while leaving the target rate for overnight lending between banks in the range of zero to 025 percent, where it has been since December 2008.
 The China Central Government Procurement Center last month announced that Microsoft’s Windows 8 operating system was excluded in the bidding process for China government purchases of energy-efficient information technology products.
 Martin Marietta Materials Inc’s $27 billion purchase of Texas Industries Inc.
 Martin Marietta, based in Raleigh, North Carolina, gains entry into the cement market with the Texas Industries purchase as construction bounces back.
 European Central Bank Vice President Vitor Constancio signaled on June 19 that large-scale asset purchases are the next step policy makers are prepared to take if the inflation outlook worsens.
 The purchase would create one of the biggest US.
 He also said policy makers will start work on an asset-purchase plan.
 The deal would eclipse last year’s $87 billion purchase of Bausch & Lomb Inc.
 housing recovery, borrowed $2 billion with a bond sale that may fund share repurchases.
 The company repurchased $125 billion of stock in the first quarter.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Oracle Corp, the largest maker of database software, agreed to pay $15 million in attorneys’ fees to help settle a shareholder lawsuit challenging its purchase of a company controlled by founder Larry Ellison.
 “Factorial will continue to fully co-operate, and is confident that a complete investigation will fully absolve it” Factorial built a huge short position in L&T Finance futures and options on March 13 from scratch and then covered it through purchases in the heavily discounted share offering, making the profit, SEBI said.
 said a joint venture including the insurer’s real-estate arm purchased property in Manhattan’s Chelsea neighborhood for $160 million.
 The Chelsea property was purchased on behalf of German institutional investors, the Prudential unit said.
 Tesla, Beckham The office properties purchased by Prudential, which were constructed between 1910 and 1917, were renovated over the last two years and have views of the High Line, the company said.
 Related purchased the properties in 2012 for $93 million, said Joanna Rose, a spokeswoman for the company.
 conglomerate seeks to close what would be its biggest purchase yet, while Siemens is trying to avoid its main competitor bulking up in its own backyard.
 As they agreed to more than $900 billion of purchases in the second quarter, acquirers turned to their rising stock prices to finance deals.
 “The equity rally over the last 12 months has helped facilitate large transactions” Drug companies, meanwhile, are using a third way to structure deals -- swapping assets and forming joint ventures as part of purchases.
 Global acquirers made $913 billion of purchases in the quarter, data compiled through June 27 show.
 European Shift European buyers have made the biggest shift away from cash, the data show, with all-cash purchases falling to just 28 percent of the $88 billion of takeovers announced by public companies during the quarter, compared with 68 percent from 2008 to 2013.
 buyers, all-cash purchases accounted for 31 percent of the $331 billion in deals announced, compared with 45 percent in the five years through 2013.
 The largest purchase by a European acquirer in the quarter highlights just how desirable shares can be: Holcim Ltd’s $40 billion merger with cement peer Lafarge SA was paid for entirely in stock.
 only secured its purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets when it offered its rail-signaling business, after rival joint bidders Siemens AG and Mitsubishi Corp.
 Rate Outlook The Federal Open Market Committee is debating how long to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero after completing a bond-purchase program that’s set to end late this year.
 Exelon and Entergy Corp, the two largest nuclear plant owners, could enjoy “material earning gains,” as the price of power rises on competitors’ needs to purchase emissions permits, the Bernstein analysts wrote.
 completed a $45 billion purchase of commercial insurer Philadelphia Consolidated Holding Corp, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The deal is intended to accelerate Williams’ growth prospects, four months after the company avoided a potential proxy fight by giving board seats to activist investors Keith Meister and Eric Mandelblatt, who had urged it to consider “strategic combinations” In 2012, Williams purchased about 25 percent of Tulsa, Oklahoma-based Access and half of its general partner -- called Access Midstream Partners GP LLC.
 The company said in the filing it expects mobile transactions as a percentage of the total to continue increasing, as more shoppers use smartphones to purchase items online.
 (MON), the world’s largestseed company, sold $45 billion of notes in its biggest bondsale ever to help fund share repurchases.
 The seed producer plans to use the proceeds of the bondissue along with as much as $12 billion of commercial paper andavailable cash to finance accelerated stock repurchases,according to a regulatory filing today.
 Monsanto announced a $10billion stock buyback plan and an intention to repurchase $6billion of shares on an accelerated basis after endingpreliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that wouldhave cut its tax bill.
 and Canadian Natural’s purchase of assets from Devon Energy Corp.
 Stimulus Measures In a bid to get credit flowing to parts of the economy that need it, the ECB also opened a 400-billion-euro ($542 billion) liquidity channel tied to bank lending and officials will start work on an asset-purchase plan.
 Fed officials are watching the labor market as they move to complete their bond-purchase program late this year and start considering the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 Bloomberg News purchased seven copies of Clinton’s book prior to the publication date at stores in two cities.
 Dufry shares rose as much as 79 percent, the steepest intraday gain since January 2012, after the Basel, Switzerland-based company announced its biggest-ever purchase and said the deal will boost earnings next year.
 The purchase is a “great geographical fit” Global spending by travelers is set to increase as more middle-class consumers in China go abroad and wealthy Chinese splurge overseas amid a crackdown on lavish spending at home, Exane BNP Paribas said last month.
 Today’s purchase is a “transformational deal not only for Dufry, but also for the travel-retail industry,” Diaz said in the statement.
 Dufry said it expects to complete the purchase in the third quarter and AT Kearney was an adviser on the deal.
 Additional share purchases in the last two weeks on the Toronto Stock Exchange made Alfa the second-largest shareholder in Pacific Rubiales, surpassing Capital Group Cos, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 France’s clearance of GE’s purchase was conditioned on getting the stake in Alstom, one of the country’s industrial icons.
 overcame the last hurdle for the $17 billion purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets as shareholder Bouygues SA agreed to sell a stake to France, enabling the US.
 Alaska Permanent Fund was an early investor in American Homes 4 Rent, one of the single-family landlords formed after the real estate crash to purchase thousands of homes at distressed prices and rent them out.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- The Chinese agency that stockpiles strategic commodities is checking to ensure its copper purchases are free of collateral risks amid an investigation of metals at Qingdao Port, said people with knowledge of the matter.
 Compared with a year earlier, purchases decreased 82 percent before seasonal adjustment.
 Existing home sales, tabulated when a purchase contract closes, account for more than 90 percent of the residential market.
 New-home purchases, which make up about 7 percent and are tabulated when contracts are signed, are considered a timelier barometer.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 The group also cut its prediction on mortgage lending volume for purchases.
 Dufry said June 4 it agreed to buy Nuance for about $17 billion, its biggest-ever purchase.
 Any shares not purchased by existing shareholders may be offered to other investors.
 Best Buy’s sales trailed analysts’ estimates as mobile-phone and tablet purchases waned.
 The company is tendering a long-term contract, worth“several hundred million dollars,” to purchase electricityfrom a proposed solar power plant in Chile.
 The purchase of Japanese rival Elpida Memory Inc.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 265 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 336 percent at the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 194 percent, compared with an average of 188 percent at the past 10 auctions.
 Traders are willing to pay to borrow the notes in the repurchase-agreement market in exchange for loaning cash overnight for the most actively traded 10-year maturity, with rates reaching negative 295 percent today, according to data from ICAP Plc tracked by Bloomberg.
 “If that’s the case, you might see slightly upward pressure on yields” The Fed is tapering its monthly asset purchases, while keeping the target for overnight lending between banks in a range of zero to 025 percent.
 The French government sold 31 percent of the company, trimming its holding to 336 percent, as it seeks to raise funds to purchase a stake in Alstom SA.
 to overcome a last hurdle for its $17 billion purchase of Alstom’s energy assets.
 That policy runs afoul of a state law that allows a foreclosed-home purchase at the lesser price, Coakley said.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Dunes Point Capital, the investment firm started last year by former Blackstone Group LP executive Timothy White, purchased the manufacturing businesses of Alco Industries Inc.
 Dunes Point completed its first deal in August with the purchase of Professional Plumbing Group Inc.
 SoftBank’s Masayoshi Son, which owns 80 percent of Sprint, is trying to sell the deal to regulators as essential to competing with AT&T and Verizon, and if Comcast-Time Warner Cable goes anywhere, his purchase wouldn’t seem so outlandish.
 “At Pimco, that’s what we’ve tried in the last four or five weeks” Economic growth is bouncing back and the job market is improving, Fed Chair Janet Yellen said in a press conference June 18 following the Federal Open Market Committee’s decision to reduce monthly asset purchases by $10 billion.
 also in New York, declined to comment on the debt purchase.
 The purchase would be the largest ever orchestrated by Warren, who expanded Dallas-based Energy Transfer through a $13 billion buying spree in 2010 and 2011 into the country’s fourth-biggest pipeline company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Assuming a value of at least $15 billion, the purchase would be the biggest North American pipeline deal since Houston-based Kinder Morgan Inc.
 are working with wireless carriers to cut down on fraudulent transactions by tying purchases to the location of a shopper’s smartphone.
 That would mean that the same device could be used to make a purchase and authenticate its location.
 national-security review of Lenovo’s planned purchase of IBM’s low-end server unit, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Proceeds of the unsecured debt were to repay Forest Oil borrowings in connection with the purchase.
 The company would help finance purchases through debt, and it could raise funds through a capital increase if needed, he said.
 Foschini is targeting customers who spend cash rather than make credit purchases in order to reduce the possibility of non-payment.
 Because the purchase had a limited effect on the currency, weakening it by 01 percent, “the bank is either going to have to buy dollars more aggressively, or in the end will be forced to cut the rate,” said Yshai Shilo, a bond trader at Israel Brokerage & Investments Ltd.
 Fischer had resumed foreign currency purchases for the first time in almost two years in April 2013 to stem the shekel’s rally.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 Last May, for example, the Ritz-Carlton Hotel Company purchased ads that resulted in an avalanche of new fans.
 With new Gallup data showing that social media ads don't affect the buying purchases of 63% of people, companies are radically rethinking why they're on Facebook and how they can best reach and communicate with their customers.
 We’ll see what kind of concrete news comes out of it and whether it stabilizes or continues” Equities climbed to start the day after a Commerce Department report showed purchases of new homes in the US.
 for a “considerable time” after ending the purchases.
 The purchase will reinforce expertise in the upstream and downstream oil and gas industry, one of the utility’s “key targeted sectors,” according to Suez.
 Bank of America alone has spent more than $50 billion to resolve claims related to shoddy mortgages, most tied to its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp, once the biggest US.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank should only engage in broad-based asset purchases if it sees a risk of falling prices in the euro area, said Clemens Fuest, president of the ZEW Center for European Economic Research.
 Mahoney said he’s seen the effect of the movie on the streets of China, where more than 70 percent of Camaro sports cars are purchased in the same color as the character.
 Bank of America alone has spent more than $50 billion to resolve claims related to shoddy mortgages, most tied to its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp, once the biggest US.
 life insurer announced it will repurchase $1 billion of common stock in its first repurchase since 2008.
 Sycamore also purchased Hot Topic Inc.
 The New York-based firm, which oversees more than $35 billion in capital, purchased Talbots Inc.
 Walgreen purchased 45 percent of Zug, Switzerland-based Alliance Boots in 2012 for $67 billion, with the option to gain full control of the UK’s largest drugstore three years later.
 The measure climbed to a record yesterday after the Fed continued to trim bond purchases that have fueled a rally in equities around the world.
 The Atlanta-based company purchased 167 million newly issued Keurig shares in February as part of the partnership, driving the coffee maker’s stock to a record $12374 that month.
 and would work with strategic investors to purchase another 244 million shares after both companies bought spectrum for fourth-generation mobile services last year.
 It also suspended the sterilization of crisis-era bond purchases to raise liquidity in money markets.
 The ECB will now seek time to assess the impact of its new policy measures, making it “less likely” it will embark on any quantitative easing imminently, said Ken Wattret, chief euro-area economist at BNP Paribas SA, who had predicted asset purchases would begin in the third quarter.
 predicts that the ECB will start by then with only “very small” purchases of asset-backed securities.
 A full-blown program of quantitative easing with sovereign-bond purchases that those central banks previously implemented might be even thornier for the ECB to contemplate than just ABS buying as the euro region lacks a unified government debt market that would be its obvious target.
 The Mountain View, California-based company purchased video-advertising provider MDialog Corp.
 The company disclosed at least five purchases last month and has announced at least three more in June.
 The third-largest independent oil trader, Trafigura has purchased stakes in pipelines, mines, smelters, ports and storage terminals to diversify its business and wring efficiencies from its trading operations.
 Still, Electrolux isn’t ruling out purchases.
 “This creates a vicious circle: ever-higher prices, ever-less trading and liquidity” As expected, Fed policy makers today reduced their monthly asset purchases to $35 billion from $45 billion, keeping it on pace to end the program later this year.
 Treasury Supply In the second half of 2014, the market will have to absorb $238 billion of Treasury supply, net of Fed purchases, compared with $133 billion in the first half of the year, according to Bank of America Merrill Lynch data, as the central bank phases out its bond-purchase program.
 domestic investors would need to increase their already high purchases by 70% compared to H1 -- all else equal -- in order for the market to clear,” strategists David Woo and Shyam Rajan wrote in a note to clients.
 The Fed is unwinding bond buying under the quantitative-easing strategy it has used to support the economy, reducing monthly purchases to $35 billion from $85 billion last year.
 It is scheduled to purchase up to $218 billion in Treasuries, including inflation indexed debt, in 12 transactions in July.
 Since 2010, stocks of American companies that announced or completed purchases of an overseas target to shift their incorporation abroad and avoid onerous US.
 “That gets reflected in the share price” Neither Medtronic Chief Executive Officer Omar Ishrak nor the company’s executive team have to move to Ireland to consummate the purchase of Covidien.
 ‘Bold Transaction’ Still, the Covidien purchase “makes a lot of sense over time,” Wuensch, a New York-based analyst, said by phone.
 Banks now demand that would-be buyers demonstrate they have savings equivalent to 20 percent of a property’s purchase price, and are in stable employment with permanent contracts, Encinar said.
 They have already purchased blocks of homes to rent in anticipation of a surge in demand, Seguoro said.
 New York-based Blackstone in July agreed to purchase 18 apartment blocks from the city of Madrid for 1255 million euros ($171 million).
 Tepper School of Business in Pittsburgh, who has warned for the better part of five years that Fed interest rate cuts and asset purchases were going to trigger inflation any day now.
 It will consider a large purchase only if it adds value and can be integrated without disruption to the company’s development program, he said.
 The insurer will repurchase as much as $1 billion of common stock utilizing existing authorizations from the board of directors, New York-based MetLife said today in a statement.
 “Meanwhile, our capital continues to grow” Kandarian cited the upcoming conversion into common stock of the last tranche of equity units issued in connection with the 2010 purchase of American Life Insurance Co.
 While avoiding buybacks, MetLife last year increased its dividend for the first time since 2007 and purchased Chilean pension provider AFP Provida SA for about $2 billion.
 chief executives officers argued their case for a joint purchase of Alstom SA’s energy operations, saying their bid trumps an offer from General Electric Co.
 Shares of Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, the Laval, Quebec-based drugmaker, have soared almost 900 percent since 2009 amid an acquisition spree including an $87 billion purchase of eye-care firm Bausch & Lomb Inc.
 Foreigners bought C$364 billion in shares during April, an eighth month of purchases and the most since November, according to data from Statistics Canada.
 has explored the purchase of Lorillard Inc.
 may make a purchase worth the price.
 Bidder Participation Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 361 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 452 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 194 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 189 percent at the last 10 auctions.
 Treasury 10-year notes have become the most coveted in almost a year in the short-term market for borrowing and lending securities amid a dearth of the debt before the auction, making them more expensive than they otherwise would be at auction, said Thomas Tucci, managing director and head of Treasury trading in New York at CIBC World Markets Corp Repo Rate Traders have been willing to pay to borrow the notes in exchange for loaning cash overnight for the most actively traded 10-year maturity, with a repurchase agreement rate reaching negative 290 percent, according to data from ICAP Plc tracked by Bloomberg.
 “It looks like it’s moving forward” Montebourg’s announcement may clear a path for GE to purchase Alstom’s gas turbine operations and create joint ventures in the steam turbine, renewable energy and electrical transmission businesses.
 The government and Bouygues so far disagree about the price, timing and conditions of the purchase, according to a person familiar with the matter, asking not to be named as the talks are private.
 Time Warner Inc, which also met with Univision, isn’t interested in a purchase, another person said.
 He cites the 2005 purchase of Spirit AeroSystems Holdings Inc.
 Onex has also had its misses, as with executive jet maker Hawker Beechcraft, which it purchased in March 2007, just before the onset of the economic crisis and a new stigma attached to private aviation.
 The central bank’s policy making Federal Open Market Committee announced yesterday a fifth straight $10 billion reduction in monthly asset purchases, to $35 billion.
 Honors Student Bets on the debt may be unusually treacherous now with the Fed tapering bond purchases this year and interest rates poised to rise, said Anthony Sanders, a professor of real estate finance at George Mason University in Fairfax, Virginia, and a former head of mortgage-bond research at Deutsche Bank AG.
 Pilgrim’s Pride said today it expects cost savings from the proposed takeover to exceed $300 million annually, and that the purchase would boost earnings per share immediately.
 Bank Rossii will probably leave its one-week repurchase rate on hold at 75 percent at its June 16 meeting, according to a Bloomberg survey of economists.
 Bryn Mawr, Pennsylvania-based Aqua America has purchased 25 municipal water systems in 22 years.
 In November, it purchased a majority stake in seven malls from Westfield Group, following a similar transaction with the Sydney-based company in 2012.
 The purchase gives Origin entry into one of the largest offshore gas discoveries at a “competitive entry price when compared to recent transactions in the Browse-Bonaparte region,” King said in the statement.
 drugmaker and took an option to purchase a products business in a $1 billion deal last year.
 Kinder, which declined to comment, has a contract with BP Plc to purchase the feedstock and sell the products from its Houston Ship Channel plant, which will start operating in November.
 Buyers in Venezuela, Brazil or Mexico might also purchase US.
 They purchased a net $184 million of stocks today, according to provisional data from exchanges.
 Exceeded Authority The operators sued again in July, and a judge blocked the plan from going forward, saying the commission exceeded its authority under the city charter by requiring the purchase of a specific vehicle.
 Earlier this month, the European Central Bank introduced a negative deposit rate, announced targeted loans to stimulate lending and held out the prospect of asset purchases to stoke growth and inflation in the 18-nation region.
 fell 11 percent after clinching the $17 billion purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets, its biggest acquisition ever.
 Altice will use 529 million euros of the proceeds to fund its purchase of a 14 percent stake in Numericable from buyout firms Cinven Group Ltd.
 If that doesn’t happen, that’s definitely going to hurt the market” Interest Rates The Federal Open Market Committee said it expects the benchmark interest rates to remain near zero for a “considerable time” after completing a bond-purchase program that’s set to end late this year.
 economy is bouncing back and interest rates are expected to stay low for a “considerable time” after the end of bond purchases.
 Policy makers reiterated that they will probably “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and will keep rates low after the bond buying ends.
 General Electric fell 11 percent after clinching the $17 billion purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets, its biggest acquisition ever.
 Primary dealers serve as counterparties in open-market operations, the central bank’s mechanism for maintaining its target rate for overnight loans between banks as well as its purchases and sales of securities.
 supermarket chain, last week said profit this year will be more than previously forecast, helped by increased sales from its purchase of the Harris Teeter chain.
 4 in the industry, and its self-styled rebel Chief Executive Officer John Legere have tried to rejuvenate the carrier by dropping the standard two-year contracts, financing phone purchases and offering to reimburse early termination penalties for customers who switch service to join T-Mobile.
 The FOMC repeated today that it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and to keep rates low after the bond-buying ends.
 Morgan Stanley advised the company in the purchase of Grupo Campsi SA.
 in 2001, when it was known as Pulte Homes, and oversaw the $18 billion purchase of Del Webb that created what was then the nation’s largest residential builder.
 “O’Brien comes from a homebuilder background that includes financing those home purchases and really knowing those customers,” said Credit Suisse’s Harter.
 Condo builders were burned during the market’s collapse because buyers -- often investors -- were able to cancel purchases once prices started falling.
 Those plans were disrupted when Hillshire itself received takeover bids that may be too good to pass up, spurring bets that the Pinnacle purchase is dead.
 With few immediate suitors, Pinnacle, which bought Wish-Bone salad dressing last year, will go back to making more purchases of its own, Barclays Plc said.
 The company said it’s not making any recommendation regarding either of the competing proposals, and that it wasn’t withdrawing or altering its recommendation regarding the planned purchase of Pinnacle.
 If the deal with Hillshire is shelved, Pinnacle will likely go back to making purchases and consolidating the packaged-foods industry, Andrew Lazar, a New York-based analyst at Barclays, wrote in a report last week.
 Google’s $32 billion purchase in February of Nest thrust the owner of the world’s biggest search engine into the digital home-automation market.
 The company plans to borrow in five- or seven-year tenor to repay debt used to purchase UK-based Corus for $129 billion, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 The buyers purchased the club using a bank loan personally guaranteed by Walters.
 Failed Golf Deal Details of Walters’s bank debt and failed golf course deal are included in a 2008 lawsuit brought against him and associates by the investor group that purchased the club.
 The course was temporarily closed, and Community Bank purchased it with $5 million in credit at a foreclosure sale in December 2008.
 In their lawsuit, the purchasers claimed that Walters and his associates had failed to disclose in a private placement memorandum that revenue had been declining before the sale and that internal forecasts indicated the course would lose money afterward.
 Merck’s purchase price represents a record premium for health-care deals larger than $100 million, the data show.
 The company plans to use about $1 billion to pay debt, while the remainder will be used to fund stock repurchases in fiscal 2015.
 Fed Stimulus Fed officials are watching the labor market as they move to complete their bond-purchase program late this year and start considering the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 The company said the purchase will giveit access to markets near the booming Marcellus and Utica gas-shale formations.
 Trust banks made 250 billion yen in net purchases of Japanese equities last week, according to data from the Tokyo bourse published yesterday.
 GPIF Speculation “Given that it’s the biggest net purchase since stock prices plummeted during the financial crisis, you’d have to speculate that GPIF or corporate pensions were doing the buying,” said Shoji Hirakawa, chief equity strategist at Okasan Securities Co.
 Hopes are high that change is about to come” Japanese investors also boosted purchases of foreign shares to a five-year high last week, separate data from the finance ministry shows.
 Money Rates The seven-day repurchase rate dropped for a second quarter.
 “There are ample funds at lenders now” The PBOC didn’t sell repurchase agreements in its June 26 auction window, refraining from using the contracts to drain cash for the first time in four months, and money-market operations added a net 12 billion yuan ($19 billion) to the financial system last week.
 The central bank asked lenders to submit orders for 14-and 28-day repurchase agreements, seven- and 14-day reverse repos, and 91-day bills for this week as usual, according to a trader at a primary dealer required to bid at the auctions.
 Raising Eyebrows Blackstone’s purchase is “a big signal,” said Charles Moore, a property sales broker at CBRE Group Inc.
 Blackstone Bets For Blackstone, the Cosmopolitan purchase was its latest investment in the area.
 They may reduce asset purchases by $10 billion for a fifth straight month, bringing it to $35 billion, according to the median of estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, which agreed in April to purchase Ranbaxy, rallied 4 percent to a record.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, climbed for a second week as banks hoarded cash to meet quarter-end requirements.
 He also led the purchase of a controlling stake in Prumo Logistica SA, then called LLX Logistica, from former billionaire Eike Batista in August 2013.
 He added that he “never purchased” or was “involved in any way with Dean Foods,” and that he never spoke to Mickelson.
 and Scott Rechler’s RXR Realty LLC in the purchase, said three people with knowledge of the terms, who asked not to be identified because the deal isn’t complete.
 They are competing in a market where consumers are bringing forward purchases in anticipation more cities will implement ownership restrictions to fight pollution and congestion.
 In a bid to get credit flowing to parts of the economy that need it, policy makers also opened a 400 billion-euro ($546 billion) liquidity channel tied to bank lending, and officials will start work on an asset-purchase plan.
 IAG will most likely place an order that would firm up potential purchases already agreed with planemakers, Walsh said in an interview in Qatar.
 Draghi said officials will start work on purchases of asset-backed securities after the ECB became the first major central bank to take one of its main interest rates below zero by cutting its deposit rate to minus 01 percent.
 in 12 months after the initial purchase, according to a statement issued yesterday.
 The Fed is reducing its monthly bond purchases, while keeping the target for overnight lending between banks in the range of zero to 025 percent where it has been since 2008.
 Borrow Bikes Ikea will lend out cargo bikes and clients may borrow bike trailers for free to transport their purchases home if they return them within three hours.
 All the same, for a buyer such as Teva, a purchase would land it a network of factories and a range of respiratory medications to bolster its own products in that area, CIMB’s Agarwal said.
 Det Norske’s purchase of Marathon’s assets, effective Jan.
 The purchase price is “fair,” he said.
 Santander expects to complete the purchase in the second half of the year, it said in a statement today from Madrid.
 “After some big purchases over the past few years they are now focusing on small deals in the areas where the bank wants to grow and consumer finance is one of them,” Nuria Alvarez, analyst at Spanish bank Renta 4 in Madrid, said by telephone.
 Current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved this month, today’s figures showed, indicating mortgage rates close to historically low levels and a strengthening job market are sustaining demand.
 Sustained gains in employment will also encourage more home purchases.
 is adding enough jobs to allow the Federal Reserve to keep reducing bond purchases.
 Fed Tapering The Fed is tapering its monthly asset purchases as officials debate an exit to their ultra-loose monetary policy.
 Gains were spurred by optimism the city’s government may relax the timeline on the double stamp duty refund, giving buyers will more time to sell their existing homes to qualify for a refund of the additional tax from a new property purchase.
 Of those, more than 20 have been geared at specific industries, including the 2010 acquisition of clinical-trial software maker Phase Forward Inc, and purchases of retailer-software makers ProfitLogic Inc.
 He headed the legal teams behind new GM’s purchase of its bankrupt predecessor’s assets and stock sale to the US, according to the firm’s website.
 Fed officials led by Chair Janet Yellen, who meet June 17-18, will determine whether the economic outlook is stable enough to warrant another $10 billion reduction in monthly asset purchases from the current $45 billion pace.
 Adjusted for seasonal trends, purchases rose to 167 million, the highest since February 2007, according to Ward’s Automotive Group.
 Measures of current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic were the highest since January.
 Federal Reserve officials are watching the labor market as they move to complete their bond-purchase program late this year and start considering the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 and Canada, said it may repurchase as much as an additional $2 billion of common stock after selling its aircraft-leasing business.
 It has $212 billion remaining on its share-repurchase authorization.
 The ILFC sale “and our strong capital position have allowed us to authorize this share repurchase, which enables us to return a portion of our sale proceeds directly to our shareholders,” AIG Chairman Robert S.
 The utility took $100 million from its capital budget last month to purchase fuel.
 The cabinet today approved speeding up plans to buy anti-tank rockets from the US, authorizing Defense Minister Sven Mikser to hold talks to purchase the missile systems “in a somewhat bigger scope and on a quicker timetable than initially planned,” the government press office said by e-mail.
 Passenger-car sales rose 13 percent in April as consumers brought forward purchases in anticipation that more cities will impose ownership restrictions to fight pollution.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 In the past decade, Disney made a big push into online virtual worlds, including the $350 million purchase of Club Penguin in 2007.
 Providing Standard General’s funds are able to purchase at least 10 percent of outstanding shares in the retailer, it will loan Charney funds to buy the stake, charging annual interest of 10 percent, according to a filing yesterday.
 Both types are smaller than the A380s around which the current fleet is built, as well as the larger version of the planned Boeing 777X Emirates plans to purchase.
 The retailer, seeking to shore up its balance sheet and maintain an investment-grade credit rating, would sell 51 percent of its credit card and consumer loans business in Chile to Scotiabank for $280 million with an option to repurchase the stake in 15 years.
 national-security review of Lenovo’s planned purchase of IBM’s low-end server unit, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 supermarket chain, rose the most in two years after saying profit this year will be more than previously forecast, helped by increased sales from the purchase of Harris Teeter.
 Kroger has boosted sales with its purchase of the Harris Teeter grocery chain earlier this year and by selling more organic food, contributing to a first-quarter profit that topped analysts’ estimates.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets, already cleared by France, is being held up by a dispute between the government and shareholder Bouygues SA, people familiar with the matter said.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- GTECH SpA, the operator of Italy’s state lottery, said it’s discussing a purchase of International Game Technology, the world’s largest maker of slot machines.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s planned $17 billion purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets, which includes creating joint ventures and a stake sale to the French state, will take time and face operational challenges, according to the French company’s chief executive officer.
 Consumer purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 02 percent in May after being little changed the prior month, Commerce Department figures showed today.
 The purchase of the hotel in France’s capital is the Hong Kong-based company’s second acquisition in six months.
 The Paris Marriott purchase includes a 226 million-euro purchase of the real estate and a 1185 million-euro acquisition of operating and holding companies, Kai Yuan said.
 TapCommerce targets people on their mobile phones or tablets with ads for things they’ve already expressed interest in buying, urging them to complete the purchase.
 That could put it in a good position to purchase MillerCoors from its joint venture with SABMiller Plc if Anheuser-Busch InBev NV proceeds with a takeover bid for SABMiller, Holland at Societe Generale said.
 Hot Topic Sycamore also purchased Hot Topic Inc.
 The New York-based firm, which oversees more than $35 billion in capital, purchased Talbots Inc.
 SNC said the Kentz purchase probably will close in the third quarter.
 ABN Amro, one of the top four lenders to the industry, last year was the first to demand that clients put up more of their own money for gem purchases, cutting the amount it lends to 70 percent of purchases from 100 percent.
June 6 (Bloomberg) -- Enbridge Inc, facing resistance to the end point for its proposed Northern Gateway oil pipeline, could pursue another option thanks to its December purchase of a parcel of land close to the British Columbia port of Prince Rupert.
 “There was no Gateway connection to this purchase at all” Avoid Skeena The Grassy Point property is about one-third the size of the 220 hectares it set aside for a Gateway marine terminal in Kitimat.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of funding availability, dropped 093 percentage point last month to 325 percent, according to a daily fixing.
 The agreement doesn’t allow for an adjustment to the purchase price, Chief Financial Officer Steve Tremblay said on the call.
 An unexpected takeover offer drives the stock price up though, forcing short sellers to pay up to repurchase the shares they borrowed.
 The shareholder plan contains rights that will be attached to all shares of common stock, with each right entitling the holder to purchase one ten-thousandth of a share of preferred stock at an exercise price of $275, the company said last week.
 If a person or group already beneficially owns 15 percent or more of the common stock, the person won’t be deemed a so-called acquiring person unless an additional 1 percent of the company’s shares is purchased, American Apparel said.
 currency rallied as payrolls matched forecasts and the unemployment rate held at the lowest since 2008, backing speculation the Federal Reserve will hold interest rates at record lows as it curtails bond purchases.
 job growth” The Fed, which meets June 17-18 to review policy, is slowing the pace of the bond purchases it uses to hold down long-term borrowing costs and fuel growth.
 The Reserve Bank kept its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 55 percent last month even as it forecast inflation would stay outside the 3 percent to 6 percent target band until the second quarter of next year.
 The biggest was the purchase of ViroPharma Inc, valued by Shire at about $42 billion, which added the treatment Cinryze for a rare swelling disease.
 Less than eight months after completing the purchase of Los Angeles-based Bel Air Investment Advisors LLC and New York-based Wilkinson O’Grady & Co.
 The purchases will be funded by existing bank facilities and cash.
 Retail Sales In the 1970s, Redken began offering its products for retail purchase at salons, spurring growth, according to a 2004 article in American Salon magazine.
 She also purchased the local newspaper in May.
 Daniel Ives, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets, expects more acquisitions after the Micros purchase.
 Of those, more than 20 have been geared at specific industries, including the 2010 acquisition of clinical-trial software maker Phase Forward Inc, and purchases of retailer-software makers ProfitLogic Inc.
 Legere, a self-styled rebel, has branded T-Mobile the un-carrier and gained subscribers by making aggressive moves like financing phone purchases and buying out contract penalties for customers that switch service.
 Basci, who cut the benchmark repurchase rate by 50 basis points last month after more than doubling it to 10 percent in January, said April 30 that an improvement in current inflation and in price expectations is a prerequisite for meaningful rate cuts.
 Whether the central bank is going to do that is another matter” Emergency Hike The bank increased its one-week repurchase rate by 55 percentage points to 10 percent following an emergency rate meeting Jan.
 utility purchase announced this year behind Chicago-based Exelon’s $68 billion cash offer for Pepco Holdings Inc, owner of Washington’s electric utility.
 We did not base this deal on synergies” The purchase will increase profit in the first full year after closing.
 Lapidus had said his leasing plan would attract airlines that previously had shied away from the high purchase costs of the airliner.
 The deal would involve the purchase of PokerStars parent Rational Group Ltd, which is based in the Isle of Man, according to people close to deal.
 He alleged Trinity’s move lowered its manufacturing costs and made the ET-Plus more difficult to reuse after accidents than the earlier version, requiring highway authorities to purchase new ones.
 A sales tax in April prompted consumers to cut purchases, with vehicle sales falling that month and in May.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The Bank of Thailand held its one-day bond repurchase rate at 2 percent, with monetary policy committee members voting unanimously in favor of the decision, it said in Bangkok today.
 SolarCity this week said that impending tariffs were part of the rationale behind its purchase of panel manufacturer Silevo, including a 1-gigawatt capacity plant it will build in Buffalo during the next two years.
 Consumer purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, rose at a 1 percent annualized rate in the first quarter, the weakest pace in five years.
 The New York-based firm’s $26 billion purchase of Hilton in 2007 came at the tail end of the buyout boom.
 Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen last week pledged to maintain monetary aid for as long as necessary even as officials pare asset purchases, while Bank of England Governor Mark Carney this week tempered recent comments on the timing of rate increases.
 The Federal Reserve is seeking to taper its asset purchases without stoking US.
 It has increased its balance sheet to $43 trillion since 2008 in bond purchases designed to lower longer-term borrowing costs and fuel growth.
 Instead, Kotick and Kelly pushed directors to have Activision buy back almost $6 billion of Vivendi’s stake and allow the executives to form an investment group that would purchase almost $25 billion worth of shares.
 The drugs Merck gained in its purchase of Idenix also may carry more risk than Gilead’s approved Sovaldi, he said.
 purchased Inhibitex Inc.
 Until Merck’s purchase, companies had held off acquiring smaller developers such as Idenix and Achillion Pharmaceuticals.
 “I’m just saying we have to generate value from any purchase we make, and we find it difficult to get the returns we want” The explosion of upstart breweries in recent years has brought both headaches and opportunities to Molson Coors.
 The Federal Open Market Committee will reduce the pace of monthly asset purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion, analysts project.
 company is eager to stress what it sees as the strategic benefits of the proposed purchase, and not just its tax implications, said the person, who asked not to be named because preparations are private.
 It’s a perfect storm for different parties to take some money off the table” Consumer purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy, climbed 02 percent after being little changed in April, Commerce Department figures showed.
 The Federal Open Market Committee is debating how long to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero after completing a bond-purchase program that’s set to end late this year.
 The committee repeated on June 18 that it expects the rate to remain near zero for a “considerable time” after the purchases end.
 In a bid to get credit flowing to parts of the economy that need it, the ECB also opened a 400-billion-euro ($543 billion) liquidity channel tied to bank lending and officials will start work on an asset-purchase plan.
 and Canada, increased by $1 billion the maximum amount it will spend to repurchase bonds in an offer expiring next month.
 That’s a potential deterrent to would-be purchasers, Clozel said.
 Together with the company’s two acquisitions, “the latest release appears consistent with the potential separation” of the consumables unit that includes B/E’s oil and gas purchases and retention of the commercial-aircraft and business-jet divisions, wrote Reiner and Lee, who are based in New York.
 The central bank will reduce its asset-purchase program by $10 billion for a fifth straight month, bringing it to $35 billion, according to the median of 43 economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 He led a group of investors that purchased the company from Steven A.
 first-time purchasers, historically about 40 percent, was 27 percent in May as slow wage growth, tight mortgage standards and rising prices put buying out of reach for many Americans, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 When valuing the properties, the banks will use the lower of the market value or purchase price, and a borrower’s secondary income will only be considered when evaluating affordability in case of joint liability, it said.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 361 percent of the notes, the least since May 2013 and compared with an average of 452 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 194 percent, compared with an average of 189 percent at the past 10 sales.
 The Fed is reducing its monthly asset purchases, while keeping the target for overnight lending between banks in a range of zero to 025 percent.
 Though the company has more than 100 million readers every month across all its publications, it typically sells advertising by individual magazines, making it more difficult for marketers who prefer to buy large swaths of audiences in a single purchase.
 ICE, as the company is known, bought NYSE Euronext in November and said at the time it would shed some of the technology units that came with the purchase.
 The purchase price represents a multiple of 156 times the adjusted book value of PHH Arval, a Maryland-based unit of PHH, Element said today in a statement.
 Hudson said in a February interview the company planned at least two purchases this year totaling at least C$1 billion ($918 million) to expand its North American rail-car unit and enter the US.
 unit and the net proceeds will be used to fund the PHH Arval purchase, the company said.
 The proposed purchase price of $2450 a share is more than triple Cambridge, Massachusetts-based Idenix’s closing level on June 6 of $723.
 “You follow the large trades and you can take part in the gains without doing your research” About 5,700 Clorox calls expiring in July with strike prices as high as $95 were purchased in the two minutes after 12:46 pm.
 RadioShack, Coors On May 29, about 20,000 RadioShack calls expiring in October with a strike price of $150 were purchased at 10:25 am, according to New York-based Trade Alert.
 He added that he “never purchased” or was “involved in any way with Dean Foods,” and that he never spoke to Mickelson.
 Stocks rose earlier after data showed purchases of new US.
 Earlier this month, the European Central Bank introduced a negative deposit rate, announced targeted loans to stimulate lending and held out the prospect of asset purchases to stoke growth and inflation in the 18-nation region.
 China Eastern, based in Shanghai, will fund the purchase with business operations, bank loans and other finances, according to the statement.
 Fed Stimulus The central bank reduced its bond purchases by $10 billion for a fifth consecutive meeting, to $35 billion, leaving it on schedule to end the program this year.
 The US’s largest supermarket chain said profit this year will be more than it previously forecast, helped by increased sales from its purchase of Harris Teeter.
 Former Qatari Prime Minister Sheikh Hamad Bin Jassim Bin Jabr Al Thani was approached by banks offering loans to fund the purchase as well as derivatives to protect him from losses on the shares he purchased, said four market participants who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 He frequently talks about hunting for “elephant”-size acquisitions and making multibillion-dollar stock purchases.
 The purchase announced today is expected to increase its supply of owned and controlled lots by about 30 percent and add plots in the land-constrained markets of Washington and Oregon, it said.
 Threes and fives have to start pricing for that” The Fed is reducing its monthly bond purchases, while keeping the target for overnight lending between banks in a range of zero to 025 percent.
 Drivers who purchase SUVs, pickups and luxury cars spend the highest percentage of their income on their vehicles, he said, citing Ford research.
 Among Protective’s largest purchases were a $11 billion deal last year for policies from Axa SA and the $12 billion acquisition of insurance units from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 AT&T, in announcing its deal May 18, promised the new company wouldn’t raise rates for at least three years on stand-alone broadband service and DirecTV video purchased separately.
 Following the 30-minute free session, users may purchase additional access at a cost based on Wi-Fi speed.
 With the purchase of the Taesa stake, EPM would expand its presence in Latin America and pair up with Brazil’s largest power generator by market capitalization, Cia.
 Arabs to put in $6 billion,” Raj Rajaratnam told his brother, adding he was “buying 250 for you” Raj was referring to his purchase 250,000 AMD shares on Rengan’s behalf in a Galleon account, according to prosecutors.
 While Raj Rajaratnam purchased at least 12 million shares of AMD, Rengan sold all of his AMD holdings in his personal account, Gitner said.
 The rights purchase stems from concerns raised by Indian officials that unlicensed screenings of the films at India’s diplomatic outposts may have been illegal under copyright law, according to the Telegraph.
 government-backed mortgage bonds is poised for its biggest first-half rally since 2010 as a surprising drop in supply outweighs a pullback in Federal Reserve purchases.
 The market has been able to withstand less demand from the Fed -- its biggest investor -- because issuance is slumping as home sales fail to keep up with 2013’s pace and property-buyers make purchases with just cash.
 central bank said last week it will cut its monthly mortgage-purchase program by another $5 billion in July to $15 billion, down from $40 billion in December.
 The Fed began tapering its purchases after homeowner refinancings slumped because of rising interest rates, slowing gross issuance.
 As home sales slowed in the first quarter, all-cash purchases rose to 33 percent from 31 percent in 2013 and 29 percent in 2012, the National Association of Realtors said last month.
 The Fed this week will cut its asset-purchase program by $10 billion for the fifth straight month, to $35 billion, according to the median of 43 economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 The central bank’s bond purchases have helped fuel gains in emerging-market assets as low interest rates in the US.
 In dollar terms, International Paper’s purchase would’ve been about 45 percent more expensive when the real was at its five-year high on July 26, 2011.
 “Confidence is percolating up through the economy, making people reach for big purchases like new homes,” said Chris Rupkey, chief financial economist at Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ Ltd.
 Today’s report followed data yesterday that showed sales of existing homes climbed to the highest level since October as purchases jumped in May by the most in three years.
 New-home sales, which account for about 7 percent of the residential market, are tabulated when contracts are signed, making them a timelier barometer than purchases of previously owned dwellings.
 The capital increase will be Deutsche Bank’s biggest since selling about 10 billion euros of shares in 2010 to fund the purchase of Deutsche Postbank AG.
 David Riedel, president and founder of Riedel Research Group Inc, said he hopes that the company doesn’t make a purchase and instead focuses on digesting the deals it’s already done and paying down debt.
 JBS has spent $127 billion on acquisitions in the last five years including its purchase of a majority stake in Pilgrim’s in 2009, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 BT plans to purchase enough clean energy from Pennant Walters Ltd’s wind farm to match the consumption of about half of its operations in Wales, the London-based company said today in a statement on its website.
 When valuing the properties, the banks will use the lower of the market value or purchase price, and a borrower’s secondary income will only be considered when evaluating affordability in case of joint liability, it said.
 It also announced the purchase of Nicocigs Ltd, a UK.
 Expanding Alternatives BlackRock has expanded its alternatives business through acquisitions, adding private equity with its purchase of Merrill Lynch & Co’s investment unit in 2006 and a hedge fund-of-funds business from Quellos Group LLC in 2007.
 Of the pending deals, a Sprint purchase of Bellevue, Washington-based T-Mobile is “going to be the hardest one to get through,” said Jeff Blumenfeld, an attorney at Lowenstein Sandler LLP.
 The bank left its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 55 percent for a second consecutive meeting last month as growth concerns outweighed worries about inflation.
 will invest 80 percent to 90 percent of the equity capital for 118 megawatts of projects, while Plymouth, UK-based Rame has the right to repurchase the stakes when operations are scheduled to start at the end of next year, the British developer said today in a statement.
 Credit Scores Borrowers who have lower FICO scores will generally have to make larger down payments for Western to purchase the loan, Carr said.
 Honda is seeking to regroup against the backdrop of a two-year diplomatic freeze that began after the Japanese government purchased three of the five disputed Senkaku, or Diaoyu, islands in the East China Sea.
 The most recent of these deals was the 72 billion-euro ($97 billion) purchase of Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March.
 Cook Group competes with Minneapolis-based Medtronic Inc, which announced June 16 that it would purchase Dublin, Ireland-based Covidien Plc for $429 billion, the largest deal for a medical-device maker in 30 years.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- Tokyo Electric Power Co, Japan’s biggest buyer of LNG, is considering purchases of the fuel from natural gas export projects being developed on the West Coast of North America, said three people with knowledge of the matter.
 Hiroshi Itagaki, a Tokyo-based spokesman for Tepco, declined to comment on the company’s potential LNG purchases.
 It has power purchase agreements with Pacific Gas & Electric Co, Edison International’s Southern California Edison and the city of Palo Alto, 8minutenergy said in a statement.
 The coverage is purchased by mortgage servicers and billed to borrowers who allow their policies to lapse.
 Boston-based Baupost owns 259 million shares of Liquefied Natural after making purchases over the past three weeks, a filing to the Australian stock exchange shows.
 New Egypt Investment will own 1782 percent of EFG-Hermes after the purchase, the Egyptian Financial Supervisory Authority said in a statement.
 The purchase will help LSE expand its index and exchange-traded fund businesses, the company said.
 The purchase will be finalized later this year, pending regulatory and shareholder approvals, according to a Northwestern Mutual statement.
 Officials will also start work on purchases of asset-backed securities, he said.
 Postage Stamp An anonymous buyer on June 17 set a stamp record with the $95 million purchase of a one-cent postage from 1856 sold by Sotheby’s in New York.
 The combined purchase is the biggest so far in the 14 months since American Energy CEO McClendon, 54, was dismissed from Chesapeake Energy Corp.
 The company intends to finance the $10 billion of repurchases over two years with debt.
 The company has $11 million remaining on a prior repurchase authorization and $6 billion of the new $10 billion program will be “accelerated,” Monsanto said today.
 The purchase “offers Starwood Capital the exciting opportunity to build on our investments in select-service and extended-stay lodging,” Suril Shah, senior vice president of acquisitions at Starwood Capital, said in a statement today.
 Andrew Backman, an American Realty spokesman, and Joe Calabrese, a NorthStar Realty spokesman, didn’t return telephone calls seeking comment on their companies’ purchases.
 The purchase consists of 126 hotels with 14,934 rooms in 35 US.
 The ECB may announce bond purchases under QE, along with downward revisions to inflation projections, BNP Paribas said in a note today.
 In a Bloomberg survey last month, 8 percent of economists forecast the ECB will start bond purchases.
 Stamp Record An anonymous buyer on June 17 set a stamp record with the$95 million purchase of a one-cent postage from 1856 sold bySotheby’s in New York.
 Index Records The benchmark index has advanced 51 percent this year, reaching a record on June 9, as equities were boosted by better-than-forecast economic data and monthly asset purchases by the Fed.
 The Federal Open Market Committee will reduce the pace of monthly asset purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion, economists project.
 The SEC claimed Manouchehr Moshayedi, who co-founded the maker of computer-storage cards with his two brothers in 1990, sold 45 million STEC shares in an August 2009 secondary offering after learning that a major customer, EMC Corp, would scale back purchases of the ZeusIOPS flash memory product.
 Among the deals that followed, Julius Baer purchased ING Groep NV’s Swiss private bank in 2009.
 Its stock price tumbled 63 percent, the most in 17 months, on April 28 after the bank suspended plans for a dividend increase and $4 billion of share repurchases because of a mistake in its stress-test submission to the Federal Reserve.
 Adobe has been trying to tap customers to purchase subscriptions for software based in the cloud, helping to smooth revenue by replacing one-time purchases of programs such as Illustrator and Photoshop.
 At least four federalinvestigations in Brazil are currently looking into the deal andthe decisions of officials including President Dilma Rousseff,the Petrobras chairman at the time of the purchase.
 Comparable deals at the time show that Petrobras overpaidThe average purchase price of all US.
 After the recession, pricesbegan to drop, and by 2010 the average refinery purchase was 12percent of replacement cost, he said.
 Citigroup’s purchase may mark a return of investment demand in Hong Kong’s office market as falling vacancies and high rents pose a challenge for companies seeking large office spaces.
 It’s going to be interesting to see if it changes the perception for occupiers in Hong Kong whether more people will look at purchase” Wheelock shares fell 08 percent to close at HK$3280 in Hong Kong, compared with the 01 percent drop in the benchmark Hang Seng Index.
 The purchase “underlines our belief and confidence in Hong Kong’s continued growth as a leading global financial center and hub for some of our core regional businesses,” Stephen Bird, Citigroup’s Asia-Pacific chief executive officer, said in yesterday’s statement.
 interest rate and the pace of asset purchases.
 But energy companies with a high exposure to exploration and production benefit a lot” In the US, the Federal Open Market Committee will reduce the pace of monthly asset purchases by $10 billion to $35 billion, according to the median of estimates compiled by Bloomberg News.
 Deutsche Boerse, which was criticized by some shareholders in 2007 for paying too much for ISE, has already written down more than one-third of the value of the purchase amid a sharp slowdown in the growth of options trading.
 Atticus Capital LLC, Deutsche Boerse’s biggest shareholder at the time of the ISE purchase, said the takeover would erode shareholder value, and some analysts said the exchange may have paid too much.
 They purchased shares valued at 1066 billion dirhams ($290 million) and sold 1036 billion dirhams, according to data from the DFM.
 Financing transactions, involving a simultaneous purchase of nearby metal and forward sale, are intended to capitalize on a market in contango, when prices rise for later deliveries.
 sank for a fourth day as the nation’s seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of cash availability, rose to a seven-week high.
 Hunt said that Prudential would consider “bolt-on” acquisitions to add specialized skills, though such purchases would probably be small.
 overcame the last hurdle for the $17 billion purchase of the company’s energy assets.
 In the US, a National Association of Realtors report showed that purchases of previously owned US.
 Microsoft’s own retail stores are using the software to predict fraud, while another unnamed retailer is analyzing past customer purchases to decide future inventory, said Kelly.
 First Quantum, which last year completed its purchase of Inmet Mining Corp.
 Competitor Remy Cointreau SA today predicted a return to growth in the current fiscal year after annual profit plunged due to Chinese customers cutting back purchases and using up inventory.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 BBA loans approved for house purchases (May), Swiss exports (May), German Ifo business confidence (June), Turkey capacity utilization (June).
 A purchase of Smith & Nephew would be the latest in the $45 billion orthopedic market.
 J&J’s $213 billion purchase of Synthes Inc.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Martin Marietta Materials Inc’s $27 billion purchase of Texas Industries Inc.
 Martin Marietta, based in Raleigh, North Carolina, gains entry into the cement market with the Texas Industries purchase as construction bounces back.
 agreed to purchase Talisman’s 25 percent stake in the Kitan oil field for $18 million, according to a stock exchange filing yesterday.
 The measures include limits on mortgages as a multiple of income and caps on loans as a proportion of the purchase price.
 The purchase will give Gildan, the biggest maker of blank tops for printed T-shirts, a bigger sales platform for its Gildan and Gold Toe brands in Canada.
 T-Mobile has gained subscribers by financing phone purchases and buying out contract penalties for customers who switch service.
 The revised outlook doesn’t include the impact of DirecTV, which AT&T agreed to purchase last month for $48 billion.
 The company is on the verge of its longest stretch without a purchase in at least 19 years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 A weak monsoon poses a risk as almost 65 percent of Indian purchases are from the rural areas, according to UBS AG.
 The purchase caps an effort that began in 2006 to create a global truck division that can compete with leaders Daimler AG and Volvo AB.
 Earlier this month, Sweden’s government and the main opposition party agreed to work to secure continued production of submarines and warships in Sweden and to promote Saab’s purchase the unit from ThyssenKrupp to return the shipyard in Karlskrona to Swedish hands.
 That deal followed Scientific Games’ own purchase of WMS Industries Inc.
 Intel also added $20 billion to its stock-repurchase program, including $4 billion planned for the third quarter.
 consumers were making online purchases of prescription drugs, and that many of the pharmacies distributed medicines based on an online consultation rather than a valid prescription, according to the US.
 Big banks are exercising caution to avoid losses if their home loans sour and government-controlled Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac force them to repurchase the mortgages.
 Banks have been in a dispute with Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac and FHA over rules that force the firms to repurchase mortgages that go bad.
 Plaza Home Mortgage has been able to increase its originations by working with brokers who focus on purchases.
 “As the market has moved from refis to purchases, service becomes a bigger factor, and brokers will use us because they know us and trust we will get them to close on time,” said Parra.
 Plaza Home originated $1 billion in mortgages for purchases in the second quarter compared with $780 million a year earlier, and increased its total market share to 06 percent, said Parra.
 The purchase will probably reduce the number of networks in Norway to three from four in a move that mirrors Telefonica SA’s deal to buy Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany.
 There’s also a chance that the purchase will win approval without such concessions, since Norway isn’t part of the European Union and can handle competition issues locally, he said.
 This week, the company completed the purchase of Oculus VR Inc, which makes a virtual-reality headset that Zuckerberg has said will be a major communication device after mobile phones.
 by seeking to purchase London-based AstraZeneca Plc.
 firm couldn’t get a foreign tax address through a purchase of a smaller firm.
 Akzo Nobel NV’s ICI Pension Fund, which it inherited through its $17 billion purchase of Imperial Chemical Industries Plc in 2008, struck a 36 billion-pound bulk annuity deal with Legal & General Group Plc and Prudential Retirement Income Ltd.
 that oversees about $214 billion, said the surge presents a risk for investors still pondering whether to purchase Time Warner ahead of a potential deal.
 A driving force for media consolidation is Comcast Corp’s pending purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Consolidation Wave Almost $200 billion of media acquisitions have been announced this year, including Comcast’s purchase of Time Warner Cable and AT&T Inc’s takeover of DirecTV, both valued at more than $65 billion including debt.
 737-800s in service with 10 more on order, won’t purchase more jets until restrictions are eased, Aeroflot Chief Executive Officer Vitaly Savelyev said today in London.
 The government has already scrapped rules to allow the sale of non-refundable tickets and recruitment of foreign pilots, while easing the tax burden on the purchase of larger single-aisle models, Savelyev said in London.
 purchase of Trulia Inc.
 Zillow may pay about two-thirds of the purchase price with its own stock, one of the people familiar with the matter said.
 Earlier this month, the company purchased Retsly Software Inc, a Vancouver-based real estate software company.
 Debt Repayment The company is raising money to repay part of a $4 billion loan that funded its purchase of Smithfield Foods Inc, the biggest Chinese acquisition of a US.
 Drillisch Agreement Smaller operators would be forced “to compete very aggressively on the market as they have to commit upfront to purchase a significant amount of capacity, much larger than what they need to serve their current customer base,” the EU said.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Tesla Motors Inc, a month after starting Model S deliveries in the UK, said its flagship electric sedan is among the cars being considered for purchase by the government there to transport officials.
 ministers will make the initial purchases under a program to buy more than 150 ultra-low emission vehicles, the nation’s Department for Transport said yesterday in London.
 ‘Two Round Trips’ The prospect of sales to the government in the UK, which already has consumer incentives for electric car purchases and is poised to install charging infrastructure, comes as China this week set a goal for electric cars to make up at least 30 percent of government vehicle purchases by 2016.
 policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 after a hiatus, Susan Cameron closed a complex agreement to purchase Lorillard Inc.
 Unlike Hunter, though, she already had a major deal on her resume: She executed the $35 billion purchase of Conwood, then the second-largest maker of smokeless tobacco in the US.
 plans to raise about $90 million over the next two months to fund the purchase of office and retail developments in Africa.
 investment team includes Peter Stern, a former Credit Suisse Group AG investment banker who advised Alibaba on its $76 billion stock repurchase from Yahoo! Inc.
 The website says that for about $50, it is possible to purchase e-mails and phone numbers that would put the buyer in touch with celebrities.
 Standard General has warrants to buy that stock back and purchase 10 percent of Charney’s original stake at that 71-cent price.
 Wild Flavors, the maker of Capri Sun juice drink and natural food ingredients, is being purchased from Hans-Peter Wild and funds affiliated with KKR & Co, Decatur, Illinois-based ADM said today in a statement.
 in a cash deal for C$1460 a share, or a total equity purchase price of about C$495 million.
 Several of the labels also owned a piece of YouTube before it was purchased by Google in 2006.
 companies have completed so-called inversions and another seven are pending, including Medtronic Inc’s planned purchase of Dublin-based Covidien Plc.
 Standard Chartered predicts the euro area’s Frankfurt-based central bank will start its own asset-purchase program before the end of this year.
 The acquisition followed several recent purchases in the oil and gas market, including paying $33 billion in April 2013 for Lufkin Industries Inc.
 Microsoft completed its purchase of Nokia’s unprofitable phone business in April.
 Dalian Wanda, led by billionaire Wang Jianlin, purchased the company in 2012 for $26 billion including debt.
 index was little changed yesterday as the economic growth report was offset by weaker earnings and the Federal Reserve’s decision to keep trimming asset purchases.
 Fed Stimulus Policy makers tapered monthly bond-buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the asset-purchase program in October.
 The People’s Bank of China offered 26 billion yuan ($42 billion) of 14-day repurchase agreements today for the first time in three months, according to a trader at a primary dealer required to bid at the auctions.
 Bond Holdings Bond yields will rise because of “strong growth and an acceleration of inflation in the US; our expectation that, as the Fed concludes bond purchases in October 2014 and the macro outlook strengthens, the market will become more hawkish relative to the timing, speed and size of the Fed tightening cycle,” the strategists wrote.
 inflation accelerates and the Fed stops its bond purchases in October.
 The record-setting purchase of TXU Corp.
 Apparel stores such as Ann and Guess benefit from shoppers’ preference for trying on items to make sure they fit before making a purchase, he said in a phone interview.
 The pickup in growth, as the expansion enters its sixth year, is among reasons Federal Reserve officials meeting today continued to pare monthly asset purchases.
 Fed Pledge Policy makers also said slack in the labor market persists even as the economy is picking up, and repeated they will keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending asset purchases.
 Excluding inventories and trade, so-called final sales to domestic purchasers climbed at a 28 percent rate, the biggest increase since the third quarter of 2011.
 airline, the world’s largest carrier, will purchase 200 Leap-1A engines from CFM International Inc.
 The purchase of the Parsippany, New Jersey-based company is expected to be completed by the end of September, Onex said in a statement today.
 The waste-management and renewable-energy company is seeking equipment-lease financing to fund the purchases because it has similar duration and has lower interest costs than the high-yield bond market, Helgeson said.
 “We need to spend a pretty significant amount of capital to purchase transportation equipment” A basis point is 001 percentage point.
 The company purchased OnCure Holdings Inc.
 The purchase from Unibail includes malls in the Paris and Toulouse regions.
 ‘Unjustifiable Entrenchment’ With a leveraged recapitalization, a company borrows money in order to repurchase more stock or pay dividends.
 ‘Best Idea’ While home-loan bonds slumped further after the purchase in the wake of Bear Stearns Cos’s collapse, many buyers in that period don’t regret it, said David Castillo, a Los Angeles-based managing director at Odeon Capital Group LLC responsible for mortgage sales and trading.
 The BlackRock fund still holds other mortgage bonds from the purchase, the person said.
 Still, Mohamed’s extra purchases are mainly drinks and snacks for watching at home.
 The subdued sentiment was reflected in purchases of World Cup-related items, which got off to a slow start as the Dutch showed little faith the team would enjoy success in Brazil, Holla said.
 While Sony’s machine has led in sales since the new generation of consoles was introduced last year, Microsoft said yesterday that purchases of its Xbox One more than doubled last month.
 Azul has the option to purchase 20 more of the E195-E2 planes, bringing the total value to $31 billion, the Barueri, Brazil-based carrier said today in an e-mailed statement.
 Oi has said it wasn’t aware that Portugal Telecom had purchased the Rioforte paper in April.
 She recently provided a mortgage of more than $6 million for a client’s purchase of a second property in Colorado.
 The island’s financial regulator last week eased rules that will permit professional investors to purchase offshore-issued structured notes linked to a range of assets including Chinese stocks, bonds and equity indexes.
 Wuhan city will relax rules on local residents third-home purchases and forbid developers cutting prices ’’maliciously,’’ China Times reported yesterday, citing an unidentified local developer.
 Cities such as Hohhot and Jinan have said they may consider easing home-purchase limits.
 Siemens’s $13 billion purchase of most of Rolls-Royce Plc’s energy assets in May plugs the same technology gap for turbines and compressors used in gas extraction that Dresser-Rand would offer, according to analysts including Commerzbank’s Ingo-Martin Schachel.
 The transaction, by which Analog Devices gains a company with better growth prospects, may serve as a model for purchases of other chipmakers.
 Still, those valuations haven’t deterred purchasers.
 After Medtronic’s purchase of Covidien, the largest such deal was Zimmer Holdings Inc’s $134 billion purchase of Biomet Inc.
 may block cross-border deals such as AbbVie Inc’s planned purchase of the drugmaker in which US.
 Macquarie Infrastructure, part of Australia’s Macquarie Group Ltd, will purchase the stake from the founding family, the New York-based company said in a statement today.
 The northern city of Hohhot and the eastern city of Jinan have become the first to ease home-purchase restrictions.
 demanded the company repurchase shoddy loans.
 26, 2010: Bank of America says the cost of resolving mortgage disputes rose to $19 billion in 2009 from $246 million in 2008 on “deterioration in the economy and housing markets combined with a higher rate of repurchase or similar requests” Oct.
 17, 2012: Moynihan’s company says losses could be as much as $6 billion beyond what’s been set aside for demands that it repurchase shoddy home loans.
 April 28, 2014: Bank of America suspends plans for a dividend increase and $4 billion of share repurchases after finding an error in its stress-test submission to the Federal Reserve.
 The company also said it expects to complete a 420 million-pound share repurchase program in the second half.
 regulators over claims the online retailer failed to get customer consent for mobile-application purchases made by children.
 Under that deal, Apple had to refund at least $325 million to consumers for charges in mobile applications and to change its billing practices to ensure customers consent to purchases.
 The company, based in Seattle, said that it refunded customers for unwanted purchases made by children, according to the letter.
 Jay Mayfield, a spokesman for the FTC, declined to comment on the Amazon case and said the agency is focused on enforcing rules governing unauthorized purchases.
 Hungary’s purchase of MKB squares with Prime Minister Viktor Orban’s agenda of having a banking industry that’s at least 50 percent locally owned.
 “Our aim is to create a stable, strong banking system, in which local ownership may increase gradually and the purchase of MKB Bank is a first step,” Varga said in a video on the ministry’s website.
 Consumer spending, the biggest part of theeconomy, rose 25 percent, reflecting the biggest gain inpurchases of durable goods such as autos in almost five years.
 The pickup ingrowth, as the expansion enters its sixth year, is among reasonsFederal Reserve officials meeting today may continue to paremonthly asset purchases while keeping interest rates low.
 Excluding inventories and trade, so-called final sales todomestic purchasers climbed at a 28 percent rate, the biggestincrease since the third quarter of 2011.
 Speaking in semi-annual testimony, she repeatedthat policy makers will probably keep interest rates low for a“considerable period” after ending monthly bond purchases,which she said may be announced at an October policy meeting.
 Share Repurchases Book value, a measure of assets minus liabilities, rose to $6860 a share from $6636 as of March 31.
 A measure to purchase liability insurance for directors and officers received 74 percent of the votes, in a symbolic rebuke from investors dissatisfied with the board’s overhaul.
 They also advised investors to vote against the insurance purchases.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- India’s rupee fell, extending its retreat from a one-week high, on speculation companies stepped up dollar purchases to meet import payments.
 Last month, it cut the benchmark rate to a record-low 015 percent, took the deposit rate below zero and said it would intensify work on a purchase plan for asset-backed securities.
 Tencent, seeking to build a stronger competitor to Alibaba, bought a 15 percent stake in JDcom and agreed to purchase an additional 5 percent after JD’s IPO.
 We’ve reduced the quantum of our debt and gone back into the capital markets” Bannister was hired in 2011 to help reduce 27 billion pounds of debt accrued following Phoenix’s purchase of Resolution Plc for 5 billion pounds in 2007.
 IP Australia said the oil company failed to provide convincing evidence that the average gas purchaser would inevitably link the company to a color of green known as Pantone 348C, according to the Guardian.
 The bank’s Monetary Policy Committee raised the benchmark repurchase rate by a quarter of a percentage point to 575 percent last week, even as it forecast economic growth will slow to 17 percent this year.
 “I myself still have to figure out how to deal with my newly fused spine due to this accident” The vehicle brake line is not one of the parts a person should expect to have to replace in the normal lifetime of a vehicle, said Bill Visnic, senior editor at vehicle-purchase website Edmundscom.
 Inversion Mania When Mylan announced the purchase of Abbott’s generic drug operations in developed markets this week, it became the latest company to strike a crossborder deal to avoid high US.
 Yandex said it completed a plan to buy back 15 million shares and authorized a repurchase of 3 million more.
 “This is very unfortunate for the industry” India, which represented about 25 percent of global demand in 2013, raised the tax three times last year and linked purchases to re-exports to contain a record current-account deficit and stem a decline in the currency.
 Portugal Telecom will have a six-year option to repurchase the shares.
 Oi has said it wasn’t aware that Portugal Telecom had purchased the Rioforte paper in April.
 The anonymous seller purchased the piece for $17 million at auction in 2005.
 Intel also raised its annual revenue forecast and added $20 billion to its stock-repurchase plan.
 JSW Steel, the nation’s third-largest producer, will import 6 million tons of iron ore, its first overseas purchase in bulk, as it isn’t able to procure enough in the local market.
 The lender’s African private-equity unit has invested funds in Zambia Energy Corp, whose CEC Africa unit has bought the 600-megawatt Shiroro hydropower plant in Nigeria’s Niger state and also purchased Abuja Electricity Distribution Co.
 The lawsuit was brought on behalf of people who purchased stock in the bank from October 2006 to October 2009.
 Record Buybacks Companies are buying back their own shares at the fastest rate ever, with about $28 billion of announced purchases by Topix companies so far this year.
 It plans to use proceeds from the sale to repurchase shares and repay debt, which may increase 2015 earnings per share by 2 cents.
 The new repurchases will follow its existing program, which had about $861 million remaining as of May 31, Bed Bath & Beyond said today in a statement.
 Sales of new properties, which are tallied when purchase contracts are signed, are considered a more timely measure of the market than sales of previously owned dwellings, which are counted when a sale is final.
 and Embraer SA will be bracing for the all-night horse-trading often required to seal purchases.
 Among genuine order prospects, Airbus is currently in the throes of negotiating a $20 billion deal for 200 narrow-bodies with India’s IndiGo, people familiar with the talks have said, though a purchase isn’t certain to be done by show-time.
 Hazy is also a potential purchaser of the A330neo, whether it’s launched in Farnborough or not, after endorsing Airbus’s view that the plane could attract more than 1,000 orders over 20 years.
 BMW is planning to increase its purchases of SDI battery cells for the electric i3 city car and the plug-in hybrid i8 sports car as well as for “additional hybrid models” in the coming years, the Munich-based carmaker said today in a statement.
 is buying Japanese shares for the first time in at least five years, speculating they will rise as the Government Pension Investment Fund purchases shares and the global economy expands.
 The purchase will add to the $52 billion of acquisitions Orix has announced in the past three years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Shares also gained after two more Chinese cities eased restrictions on home purchases and industrial profits surged 18 percent in June.
 The company has written off more than one-third of the value of the ISE purchase amid a slowing growth in options trading.
 purchased a majority stake in Atrium last year.
 IGT Chief Executive Officer Patti Hart agreed to pay as much as $500 million in 2012 to purchase Double Down Interactive LLC, a maker of slot machine-like games for Facebookcom.
 The company acquired blood cancer treatment Kyprolis in its $104 billion purchase of Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The company benefited from the purchase in January of Invensys, a UK.
 While the pharmaceutical sector has seen increased acquisition activity, including AbbVie Inc’s $55 billion purchase of Shire Plc, Lilly isn’t interested in large-scale deals, Chief Financial Officer Derica Rice said today in a conference call with investors.
 Tyson also announced the sale of shares and tangible equity units, each comprising a stock purchase contract and an amortizing note, to help fund the takeover.
 Policy makers trimmed bond purchases last month by $10 billion for the fifth consecutive time, saying economic growth is rebounding and the job market is improving.
 purchased Jaguar Land Rover for $23 billion in 2008, and a year later, introduced the Nano, the world’s cheapest car.
 Home sales in China slid 102 percent by value in the first five months of the year, the statistics bureau said June 13, and would-be buyers are being offered no-money-down purchases to clear stock.
 Verizon in February completed its $130 billion purchase of Vodafone Group Plc’s minority stake in Verizon Wireless, reducing Verizon’s cash by $51 billion.
 The repurchase rate was increased to 575 percent, Governor Gill Marcus told reporters in Pretoria today.
 Overseas investors bought $31 million more Taiwanese equities than they sold this week, the smallest purchases since May, exchange data show.
 “Significant slack” remains in labor markets, and rates are likely to stay low for a “considerable period” after bond purchases end, which could happen after the Fed’s October meeting, Chair Janet Yellen said yesterday in remarks to the Senate.
 Reap Windfall Combined with the Vivendi shares Activision purchased, Kotick and Kelly now control the US.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc, the producer of Camel cigarettes, is closing in on a purchase of Lorillard Inc.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA said it wasn’t aware that merger partner Portugal Telecom SGPS SA had purchased debt issued by Rioforte, a holding company that’s selling assets amid speculation it may be unable to pay its bills.
 Oi, the Brazilian telephone company, is asking for more information about Portugal Telecom’s April purchase of 897 million euros ($122 billion) in commercial paper from Rioforte, according to a regulatory filing today.
 Blackstone in 2007 was set to acquire Park Avenue Tower as part of its $39 billion purchase of what was then known as Equity Office Properties Trust.
 The buyout firms are among at least six groups exploring the purchase of Americana from the biggest shareholder, the Al-Kharafi family, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 China is mandating that electric cars make up at least 30 percent of government vehicle purchases by 2016, the latest measure to fight pollution.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- As Airbus and AirAsia Bhd executives hugged and basked in mutual congratulations after signing a $138 billion aircraft purchase, the one man at the table not dignified with a name card looked on silently.
 The company is the reason the deal came together: Rolls-Royce will fit more efficient engines under the wing of the A330s that AirAsia purchased, making the jet the hottest seller at the show.
 and Airbus Group NV new-engine versions of earlier models, manufacturers of the power plants are playing a key role pulling in purchases.
 “It’s a market where we see there is the potential for steady growth for many years to come, especially in what we still call the emerging markets” Eutelsat is targeting revenue growth of 4 percent for the fiscal year ending June 2015, followed by expansion exceeding 5 percent for the next two years, adjusted for currency fluctuation and asset sales or purchases.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Tesla Motors Inc, a month after starting Model S deliveries in the UK, said its flagship electric sedan is among the cars being considered for purchase by the government there to transport officials.
 ministers will make the initial purchases under a program to buy more than 150 ultra-low emission vehicles, the nation’s Department for Transport said yesterday in London.
 ‘Two Round Trips’ The prospect of sales to the government in the UK, which already has consumer incentives for electric car purchases and is poised to install charging infrastructure, comes as China this week set a goal for electric cars to make up at least 30 percent of government vehicle purchases by 2016.
 Because Amazon hasn’t released more details about how it came up with the numbers in the post, such as methodology and sample size, it’s impossible to know whether lower prices have an effect on total purchases, IBISWorld’s Crompton said.
 Easing home-purchase limits will boost sales in the second half, UBS AG said.
 Its portfolio of Boeing planes is far smaller, with 60 737 models that have all been delivered, and it’s been almost a decade since BOC made that purchase from Chicago-based Boeing.
 The Kodiak purchase will give Whiting drilling rights across 855,000 net acres in the Bakken, surpassing Exxon as the second-biggest leaseholder in the area, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Facebook is testing a “buy” button on browsers and mobile devices that lets users make purchases through advertisements, the world’s largest social network said in blog post yesterday.
 As competition between the sites heats up, they’re betting that goods and services displayed alongside posts are more likely to lead to impulse purchases, giving retailers and advertisers an opportunity to boost sales.
 Facebook, which has more than 12 billion users, has tried enabling purchases on its social network in the past, with limited success.
 CardSpring lets people claim coupons or special deals via tweets, however it won’t enable the direct purchase of products.
 Facebook is testing the buy button even after saying earlier this year that direct purchases wouldn’t be the best strategy to serve marketers.
 The Fed may refrain until the second half of 2015, with Chair Janet Yellen saying rates are set to stay low for a “considerable time” after asset purchases end.
 The company didn’t disclose terms of its purchase of the startup, which is based in Caesarea, Israel.
 with its purchase of wireless-chip maker Atheros Inc.
 At the same time, Abbott is expanding sales of those drugs in emerging markets, with deals such as the purchase of Chile’s CFR Pharmaceuticals in May.
 Following the purchase, Motshoane received several traffic fines linked to a newer model Range Rover with the same license plate, he said.
 Liking Lineup Legg Mason made its first major purchase since 2005 last year with fund-of-hedge-funds business Fauchier Partners, which contributed about $5 billion in assets to its Permal unit.
 The Federal Reserve will reduce its monthly purchases for the sixth time to $25 billion from $35 billion after a two-day policy meeting starting today, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 “Returning that cash to the shareholders in the form of a repurchase or a dividend increase, or taking on more debt -- they could accelerate that,” said McGowan, who recommends holding the shares.
 “The alpha heyday of all risk premiums is over” Pimco, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, expects returns to fall as the Federal Reserve unwinds bond buying under the quantitative-easing strategy it has used to support the economy, reducing monthly purchases to $35 billion from $85 billion last year.
 Maersk in 2011 purchased stakes in three oil blocks in Brazil for $24 billion, which it has now written down to $600 million, it said in a statement.
 The aim of the BOJ’s unprecedented bond purchases was to end 15 years of crippling deflation in part by flooding the economy with yen, debasing the currency in the process.
 tapering its bond purchases will cap yen gains versus the dollar, Kuroda said.
 Stumpf, 60, mostly left investment banking and trading to Wall Street before the 2008 purchase of Wachovia Corp.
 North Asia LNG prices have rallied 54 percent since Japan shut nuclear plants and boosted gas purchases for power generation in the wake of the 2011 Fukushima atomic disaster.
 Kyushu Electric’s LNG purchases from October through December may drop by 500,000 metric tons, equivalent to about 10 cargoes, from a year earlier if the two reactors at the Sendai plant resume operations in October, Junzo Tamamizu, the managing partner of Clavis Energy Partners LLC, a Tokyo-based consulting and advisory firm, said by phone today.
 Proceeds will be used to repurchase bonds and amend indentures that will eliminate covenants and release liens on the collateral securing outstanding debt, according to a company statement today.
 The $16 billion of 2021 notes are being repurchased at 1114 cents.
 “In some ways that’s the pipeline activity starting to move after a period of low activity, and also a sign of the growing confidence of boardrooms” The second quarter of 2014 was the best period for takeovers since 2007, with companies agreeing to more than $900 billion of purchases.
 on sale, the company generated growth in both packaged games and online purchases.
 halted talks to purchase the company.
 Foreign investors have purchased a net $15 billion of Korean shares this week, versus inflows of about $648 million in Taiwan and $19 million for India.
 Northrop repurchased 61 million shares for $741 million in the quarter.
 Stocks rallied on June 5 after the central bank announced new measures to stimulate lending and said it would begin preparations for an asset-purchase plan.
 The payment-terminals maker would fund the 820-million euros ($112 billion) purchase of Amsterdam-based GlobalCollect with cash and debt, according to a statement late yesterday.
 The purchase of David Jones will allow Woolworths to “take a more serious share from our competitors in South Africa,” Moir said.
 hired banks to raise the equivalent of $56 billion, the most since the acquisition of Corus Group Plc in 2007, to refinance debt taken to fund the purchase of Europe’s second-largest steelmaker.
 Tata Steel, which purchased UK-based Corus for $129 billion, is seeking to benefit from a revival in demand in Europe, the company’s biggest market, and falling borrowing costs to refinance part of the $614 billion obligation taken to finance the Corus acquisition.
 economy as payroll gains and stable borrowing costs at historically low levels boost American confidence to purchase homes.
 Container lines are suffering from an oversupply of vessels after a boom in ship purchases coincided with the financial crisis, triggering the worst slump in carriage fees since containerization became global in the 1970s.
 Fed officials expressed concern about low volatility in equity, currency and fixed-income markets, according to minutes of their June meeting, when policy makers trimmed monthly bond purchases to $35 billion.
 The UK’s Daily Mail speculated British American Tobacco Plc may purchase the rest of the cigarette producer.
 The maker of Actimel yogurt has raised prices to offset an 18 percent increase in milk costs, leading consumers to pare back on dairy purchases.
 Realogy said it expects to complete the purchase in the third quarter.
 based on purchase volume of $94 billion last year, according to the filing.
 Wolfe joined in 2008 when Wells Fargo purchased Wachovia Corp.
 Wolfe also led the bank’s charge into credit-card lending, where the firm has sought to convince customers to choose their card above others when making purchases.
 Increasing prices may also deter purchases in emerging markets that are sensitive to higher costs, she said.
 have pending inversion transactions in which they would purchase a smaller foreign company and then move the combined corporation’s legal address outside the US.
 India surpassed China in 2010 to become the world’s largest arms importer and relies on purchases from abroad for 70 percent of its weapons, according to the Stockholm International Peace Research Institute.
 Citing the delays and cost increases, the Senate appropriations panel blocked the Navy’s $374 million fiscal 2015 request for the early purchase of production parts and cut $60 million from the service’s $498 million research request.
 Potential purchasers include private-equity firms and mid-tier pharmaceutical companies, Witty told journalists on a conference call today.
 The company also announced a reorganization of its divisions and said it would tighten control of Santiago-based power group Enersis through the purchase of the 606 percent owned by Endesa.
 The ICSC’s optimism is based on its own recently conducted survey that showed consumers plan to shop earlier, spend more, and purchase a wider array of items compared with recent years, said Jesse Tron, an ICSC spokesman.
 The net gain from the one-time tax boost amounted to 34 cents a share, while a lower share count after Boeing spent $15 billion on stock repurchases also bolstered earnings per share, according to Christian Mayes, an Edward Jones & Co.
 is committed to completing its C$132 billion ($123 billion) purchase of the stake it doesn’t own in the Dover oil-sands project in Canada soon, according to the Beijing-based company’s parent.
 to close the purchase of Athabasca’s 40 percent stake in Dover, Chen Shudong, the incoming director for China National Petroleum Corp’s Canadian unit, said in an e-mail.
 People in London and the southeast, where homes are higher than the national average, were the most negative about purchases.
 Policy makers continued to trim monthly bond purchases and reiterated that interest rates will likely stay low for a considerable amount of time after the quantitative-easing program ends.
 China, which is the biggest user of the metal, may import as much as 800,000 tons this year, compared with about 624,000 last year, based on the pace of country’s purchases so far, Saito said.
 The brokerage purchased Woori Asset Management in February, made a profit from stock underwriting last year for the first time and will move into a new building it bought from Deutsche Bank AG’s Korea unit in August, Kwon said in an interview at his office in Seoul.
 The purchase has boosted Kiwoom’s total assets under management to 21 trillion won from 11 trillion won, making it the country’s eighth-largest private money manager.
 With the purchase, expected to close this year, CNP will get “immediate scale in several European markets with strong fundamentals,” the insurer said.
 The Chinese conglomerate Fosun International Ltd, which had previously owned 75 percent of the stock, agreed to purchase an additional 133 percent, Bona said in a statement.
 The company, which says it wants to cut debt to $12 billion by 2016, is facing lower copper prices than when it announced the purchases.
 Both projects have power-purchase agreements.
 In another move to raise cash for the DirecTV purchase, AT&T agreed to sell as much as $2 billion in phone financing receivables to a group of banks led by Citigroup Inc.
 Bigger smartphones are also partly responsible for the drop and sales of larger iPhones could cut further into tablet purchases, Walkley said.
 CWCapital said in a statement today that it complied “in every way” with the underlying documents and that Centerbridge purchased its position after the deed-in-lieu agreement had been recorded.
 Walked Away Tishman Speyer and BlackRock purchased the complex for $54 billion in 2006, taking out $14 billion of mezzanine debt and a $3 billion senior mortgage that was carved up and packaged into bonds.
 “Ask yourself why poor Latinos would purchase overpriced nutrition products,” Ackman said in a March webcast hosted by his hedge fund, Pershing Square Capital Management LP.
 Canada Pension purchased its initial stake in the company in May 2012.
 Chesapeake will repurchase $126 billion of preferred shares of its CHK Utica unit that burned through $75 million a year in dividends, enough to drill more than a dozen shale wells, the Oklahoma City-based company said today in a statement.
 “This is an opportune time to repurchase the remainder of the CHK Utica preferred shares at a price that is accretive to net present value” Chesapeake fell 08 percent to close at $2706 in New York.
 will pay its first dividend since 1980 and repurchase $1 billion in stock, matching a buyback by United Airlines’ parent as the once-struggling industry returns more cash to investors.
 Shares Slip Airline shares retreated after rising early on optimism tied to the repurchase plans and record second-quarter profits.
 The shares, which would be purchased at 45 percent above the latest closing price, represent 67 percent of the Fabriano, Italy-based company’s voting stock.
 Whirlpool intends to finance its purchase of Indesit with cash on hand and debt, depending on the timing of closing and market conditions, according to the statement.
 Following acquisition of the stake, Whirlpool will start a mandatory tender offer on all remaining shares of Indesit in accordance with Italian law at the highest price per share paid by Whirlpool under the purchase agreements, currently expected to be 11 euros a share.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc, which had to resubmit its capital plan this year after falling below a minimum leverage ratio, used that experience as motivation to cut lending through repurchase agreements.
 “One of the significant inputs into the process obviously was CCAR” In a matched book, banks rely on repurchase agreements and securities lending to fund clients while using the same collateral and terms to borrow themselves, often overnight.
 This month, Twitter also agreed to pay almost $100 million to acquire TapCommerce, which targets people on mobile phones or tablets with ads for items they’ve expressed interest in buying around the Internet, urging them to complete the purchase.
 Imports of sunflower oil jumped 58 percent to 160,000 tons, while crude soybean oil purchases were little changed at 140,000 tons, the survey showed.
 While purchases dropped in June, weak monsoon rains are hurting oilseed crops in India and may spur imports later this year, according to Govindlal G.
 Vegetable oil purchases, including for industrial use, may climb 12 percent to 12 million tons in the year to October and rise further in 2014-2015, he said.
 in a $55 billion purchase of Shire Plc.
 Terms of the 20-year power-purchase agreement weren’t disclosed.
 Scheifele last year completed a three-year efficiency program, dubbed “FOX 2013”, which realized 12 billion euros in savings as he seeks to regain the investment-grade credit rating that the company lost in 2008 following the purchase of British cement maker Hanson for $18 billion.
 “It was cheaper to purchase energy on the open market than to produce it at Kewaunee,” said Mark Kanz, a company spokesman.
 The most-expensive of three brands in a refrigerated case, with others in cans or Tetra Paks selling for HK$14 or HK$16, Jax Coco was among the top picks for customers, with two purchasers in a 10-minute period.
 companies have sought or completed purchases of companies overseas and changed their addresses to gain lower tax rates, a move known as inversion.
 This “would be something like sovereign quantitative easing, which we don’t expect in the near term,” referring to purchases of government bonds by the central bank.
 Fed policy makers are paring their monthly pace of asset purchases and traders see about a 62 percent chance the central bank will increase its benchmark rate to at least 05 percent by July 2015, based on federal fund futures contracts.
 Apple in May said it would purchase Beats Electronics LLC for $3 billion, partly because of the streaming Beats Music business.
 The nation’s e-commerce purchases, auto sales and airline passengers have all been growing at double-digit rates, he wrote in a July 2 report.
 The purchase was funded by a loan Charney got from Standard General LP last week.
 Charney’s most recent share purchases didn’t trigger the plan because they preceded its adoption.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Bed Bath & Beyond Inc, the owner of Buybuy Baby in addition to its flagship chain, sold $15 billion of bonds in a three-part deal to fund share repurchases.
 Bed Bath & Beyond announced on July 7 that it’s planning to repurchase $2 billion of shares following its existing program, which had about $861 million remaining as of May 31.
 The company purchased about $66 billion of stock from 2004 through the first fiscal quarter of 2014, the Union, New Jersey-based company said in a statement at the time.
 The London-based company is the reason the deal came together: Rolls-Royce will fit more efficient engines under the wing of the A330s that AirAsia purchased, making the jet the hottest seller at the show.
 and Airbus Group NV, and the manufacturers of the power plants are playing a pivotal role pulling in purchases.
 The purchase would require so much borrowing it could sacrifice Fox’s credit rating, or use so much stock that existing investors’ holdings would diminish in value, said the people, who asked not to be identified because internal deliberations are private.
 Begley assumes 38 percent of the purchase is paid for in cash.
 The company also said it agreed to buy Swiss watchmaker Ulysse Nardin, without disclosing the price of the purchase, which is expected to be finalized during the second half of 2014.
 Infosys, which has installed 2 megawatts of photovoltaic capacity on its campuses, purchases 20 percent of its energy requirement from renewable sources, he said.
 A year later, India’s military is still waiting for its first new piece of artillery since its last purchase in 1986.
 companies see is a rapidly expanding economy in which the military standards are high enough to justify the purchase of world-class weapons,” he said.
 While India depends on imports for 70 percent of its weapons, many planned purchases have stalled.
 Corruption Concerns India lost half its fleet of 872 Soviet MiG fighter planes purchased between 1966 and 1980 due to crashes, former defense minister AK.
 In 1986, when India last purchased artillery, Sweden’s Bofors AB was accused by Indian police of paying $143 million in bribes to obtain the $13 billion contract.
 Apollo Global Management LLC’s purchase of Encana Corp’s Bighorn assets for about $18 billion through its Jupiter Resources Inc.
 Field Quip, which makes separation and grinding equipment for milling, needs Ex-Im loan guarantees so it can spend cash downpayments from overseas purchases to start work on orders, said President Andy Franko.
 Its option to buy 20 percent of Alstom from Bouygues only starts when GE’s purchase of most of the energy units is completed and Alstom has returned some of the proceeds to shareholders.
 Kunlun Energy Co, PetroChina’s natural gas business, had to put off purchase of assets after the graft investigation ensnared two of its chairmen in succession, according to people familiar with the situation.
 She’s preaching patience to investors, plying them with share repurchases to persuade them to wait for an inflection point where the new technology can propel the company back in the right direction.
 Before results were released yesterday, IBM shares had climbed 26 percent this year, supported by the company’s repurchases, which brought the number of shares in circulation under 1 billion at the end of June -- the first time they’ve been below that threshold at the close of a quarter since at least 1999.
 The company plans to use about $1 billion to pay debt, while the remainder will go toward stock repurchases in fiscal 2015.
 Concern the bull market is overextended has led some investors to purchase protection to guard against more pronounced declines.
 The remaining 29 turbines will need to be financed separately, after the company secures another power-purchase agreement.
 The 02 percent gain in purchases followed a 05 percent advance in May that was larger than previously reported, Commerce Department figures showed today in Washington.
 Chief Executive Officer Robert Palmer got his profit, $189 million -- roughly equal to what InterSystems paid for Digital’s Mumps business, Ragon says, confirming only that the purchase price was between $10 million and $20 million.
 Pressure is building on the government to remove restrictions on home purchases after data today showed prices fell in a record number of cities last month.
 Hohhot and Jinan became the first among about 40 Chinese cities to ease home-purchase restrictions.
 BNP Paribas submitted claims to the USDA as early as April 2005 for losses from Mexican buyers who had defaulted on purchases of the grain, the DOJ said.
 The A380 has fared best in the Middle East, where Emirates alone has purchased 140 units, almost half the total backlog.
 It sold 75 percent of its parking unit in June having earlier completed the purchase of airport operator ANA-Aeroportos de Portugal SA.
 and TPG Capital are among at least six private-equity groups exploring the purchase of Americana from the biggest shareholder, the Al-Kharafi family, people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- China is mandating that electric cars make up at least 30 percent of government vehicle purchases by 2016, the latest measure to fight pollution and cut energy use after exempting the autos from a purchase tax.
 Central government ministries and agencies will take the lead on purchases of new-energy vehicles, a term that China uses to refer to electric vehicles, plug-in hybrids and fuel-cell autos, according to a statement on the central government’s website yesterday.
 “This is a laudable aspiration,” said Yang Song, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Barclays Plc, who estimates that government purchases made up less than 10 percent of total new vehicle sales in China.
 “Government purchases are not growing as fast as private consumption.
 So just to rely on the government purchase would be a challenge” Last week, China announced the waiver of a 10 percent purchase tax for new-energy vehicles, excluding them from the levy beginning Sept.
 Electric Vehicles The measures announced yesterday by the National Government Offices Administration also direct agencies to give preference to all-electric vehicles in purchases, while cold-weather jurisdictions may consider plug-in hybrids.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee will scale back its monthly asset purchases to $25 billion from $35 billion on July 30, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg, keeping it on pace to end the program late this year.
 agreed to purchase the company for $35 billion.
 Including assumed debt, CME Group valued the purchase at about $820 million.
 CME Group said it expects the purchase of GFI and the sale of its wholesale division to be completed in 2015.
 It has signed power purchase agreements with six developers, including Moser Baer India Ltd.
 A ban on European purchases of bonds or shares sold by Russian state-owned banks is among options being weighed by the European Union, according to a proposal presented to member states.
 It has won no business from a new airline customer in two years, relying instead on repeat purchases by Dubai-based Emirates, by far the biggest operator.
 has put off the purchase of six units indefinitely.
 Kingdream, an oil and drilling equipment maker, is planning a private placement to raise funds for the purchase, the company said in a statement to the Shenzhen Stock Exchange today.
 The Federal Open Market Committee began a two-day policy meeting where they are expected to cut monthly purchases of Treasuries.
 “Five-year notes are pretty attractive at these levels versus the rest of the yield curve” Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 482 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 461 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Policy makers will reduce monthly purchases to $25 billion from $35 billion, based on a Bloomberg News survey of economists.
 Essentra has about 250 million pounds available for purchases, he said.
 In May, it completed the purchase of Kelvindale Products Pty, an Australian maker of plastic products.
 OCBC can partly fund the purchase through a S$3 billion ($24 billion) rights issue, Anand Swaminathan, a Singapore-based analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG, wrote in a note yesterday.
 Yue Xiu Group, controlled by the Guangzhou city government in southern China, completed in February a $15 billion purchase of a majority stake in Chong Hing Bank Ltd.
 Founding Family Macquarie Infrastructure will purchase the stake from the Colemans, the New York-based company said in a statement.
 are asking for higher fees in exchange for financing the purchase of T-Mobile, because they expect the deal to face a lengthy approval process, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Son, the founder of SoftBank, is pursuing the T-Mobile purchase even as regulators insist they want to preserve four competitors in the US.
 Facebook, which has 132 billion users, has already been working on new online commerce features, such as a trial “buy” button on browsers and mobile devices that lets users make purchases through advertisements.
 is also looking at ways to enable purchases, and introduced a joint service with Amazoncom Inc.
 “The more people buy online, the more people buy things they discovered through their mobile phones, the more people discover things from a News Feed and go on to purchase, the more important we are in driving e-commerce,” Sandberg said in a call with investors.
 Sturm Ruger, based in Southport, Connecticut, reported background checks for gun purchases, as measured by the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, fell 12 percent in the quarter and 18 percent in the first half of the year, hurting producers across the industry.
 The purchases, disclosed on the authority’s Bloomberg page, were confirmed by phone.
 Kennedy said many retail clients have shifted investments away from direct purchases of individual mutual funds and into target-date products, which spread money over multiple underlying funds.
 The property is 99 percent leased, New York REIT said in a regulatory filing disclosing the purchase.
 Global funds have purchased a net $15 billion of Thai stocks and bonds so far this month, exchange data show.
 Fed policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 The Fed said slack in the labor market persists even though the economy is picking up, as it continued to trim the asset-purchase program that has expanded its balance sheet to a record $441 trillion.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee reiterated at it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
 Indirect bidders purchased 532 percent of the debt at the auction, the highest level since the February 2006 offering of the securities.
 The central bank may conclude its debt purchases after its October meeting, she said.
 purchase its first Italian bad loan portfolio in May.
 AT&T Inc, operator of TV and broadband business U-verse, on May 18 announced a $485 billion purchase of DirecTV.
 ‘Have Fun’ Greenberg took over Bear Stearns in 1978, handed power to Jimmy Cayne in 1993 and remained chairman of the executive committee until 2008, when a run on the company led to its purchase by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Sibanye Gold Ltd, the world’s best-performing major producer of bullion in 2014, is doubtful it will make its first platinum-asset purchase this year as sellers such as Anglo American Plc are slowing the process.
 Shares of Chinese developers advanced after the China Times reported yesterday that Wuhan city plans to relax rules on local residents’ purchase of third homes.
 Cities such as Hohhot and Jinan have said they may consider easing home-purchase limits.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Imperial Tobacco Group Plc Chief Executive Officer Alison Cooper took a surprise step into the future as a five-year-old e-cigarette brand was included in the $71 billion purchase of assets from Reynolds American Inc’s takeover of Lorillard Inc.
 “It was probably the sweetener that convinced them to buy what is essentially a selection of third-tier brands” Market Leader The purchase failed to prevent a 37 percent drop in Imperial Tobacco shares yesterday as the extent of the Davidoff maker’s increased presence in the US.
 will rise to about 2 billion pounds, or 24 percent of the group, after the purchase from 500 million pounds, or 7 percent, according to Imperial Tobacco.
 “Ergen never had any intention to purchase LightSquared’s assets at even the highly distressed price,” Harbinger said in its complaint.
 While that’s created speculation that BAT could seek a full takeover, BAT’s returns are more attractive if it helps Reynolds purchase Lorillard instead, according to James Bushnell, a London-based analyst at Exane BNP Paribas.
 Imperial confirmed last week that it’s in discussions with Reynolds and Lorillard to potentially purchase certain assets that regulators may force them to divest.
 Proceeds from the Madrid sale could help fund a purchase of those divestitures.
 “That’s going to scare the market for what’s supposed to be a rapid growth Internet company” Larger companies are building services to compete with Pandora, such as Google Inc’s purchase of Songza Media Inc.
 The defendants reaped profits by making share purchases that helped drive up the price and then dumping the stock at its peak in a scheme that ran from October 2012 to this month, according to the government.
 Federal Reserve continued to trim monthly asset purchases, tapering monthly bond buying to $25 billion to stay on pace to end the program in October.
 Similarly, the market chose to ignore Martin Marietta Materials’ history of missing earnings forecasts, sending the shares up after the producer of aggregates for the construction industry agreed to purchase Texas Industries Inc.
 European industrial deals have risen more than 75 percent so far this year, led by the Holcim Ltd-Lafarge SA cement merger and General Electric Co’s purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets.
 China’s northern city of Hohhot became the first city to ease home-purchase restrictions last month.
 Residents of the provincial capital of Inner Mongolia, previously limited to how many properties they could buy, no longer need to show ownership proof of home purchases.
 “The only economic value of these purchases to Williamson is to frustrate MEC’s ability to execute its mining plans” Several Suits Closely held Murray is owned by Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Robert E.
 Murray said those purchases have forced it to pay more for its own acquisitions, caused it to relocate equipment and threaten its ability to meet production contract requirements.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- SunEdison Inc, the best-performing solar company this year, closed its purchase of AES Corp’s stake in the Silver Ridge Power LLC venture for $1786 million in cash.
 Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said last week he plans to extend subsidies of at least 2 million yen, while Aichi prefecture, where Toyota is based, may provide about 1 million yen for local purchases, according to Takashi Horibe, the area’s auto and environmental conservation specialist.
 In the past month, China has mandated that EVs make up at least 30 percent of state purchases and will waive a 10 percent purchase tax from Sept.
 In February, it completed the purchase of Newfield Malaysia Holdings Inc.
 The revenue figure represents a 35 percent gain since the KKR purchase, Turkey’s biggest-ever private equity deal at the time.
 A purchase by Copenhagen-based DFDS would add UN.
 ‘Viable Vehicles’ The government must address the differing stamp duties for purchase and sale of assets in India, which currently range from 5 percent to as high as 14 percent across the country, depending on the city, he said.
 The Reserve Bank of India’s benchmark repurchase rate is at 8 percent, the highest after Pakistan among 11 Asian economies tracked by Bloomberg.
 The Mortgage Bankers Association’s index of purchase-loan applications rose 37 percent in the week through July 4, while the refinancing gauge climbed 04 percent, the trade group said yesterday.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee reiterated that it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
 Minutes of the Fed’s June meeting, released yesterday, showed officials have agreed they’ll end their asset-purchase program in October if the economy holds up.
 Google has also made several smaller purchases this year, benefiting its advertising, cloud services and mobile businesses.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Produce Buying Co, Ghana’s largest purchaser of cocoa from farmers, delayed plans to borrow $30 million from France’s development agency as Africa’s worst-performing currency threatened to raise repayment costs.
 It’s targeting purchases of 35,000 tons in the light crop season that started July 4 and expected to end Sept.
 Data showed the number of contracts to purchase previously owned US.
 Longer-term Treasuries outperformed as Yellen pointed to “significant slack” in labor markets and reiterated interest rates are likely to stay low for a considerable period after bond purchases end.
 Federal Reserve officials, who are meeting this week to discuss the outlook for central bank asset purchases and interest rates, are concerned about the housing outlook as they wind down their stimulus program.
 In April, Cook said the company had purchased 24 companies in the prior 18 months, compared with two known acquisitions in all of 2009.
 executive Luca Maestri as chief financial officer, and the planned purchase of Beats to bring in longtime music-industry executive Jimmy Iovine.
 A ban on European purchases of bonds or shares sold by Russia’s state-owned banks is among options being weighed by the EU over Russia’s actions in Ukraine, according to a proposal presented to member states.
 Consent Solicitations It’s also offering to repurchase the $880 million of 7875 percent debentures due July 2020 for as much as 1105 cents on the dollar and $16 billion of 75 percent notes due February 2021 are being repurchased at 1114 cents, according to a second statement.
 The downturn in GDP reflected a slowdown in the pace of inventory growth, setting the stage for stronger production as consumer purchases pick up.
 A few days earlier, Elliott had raised its stake in Wing Hang to about 78 percent, also paying HK$125 for each share in its latest purchase.
 This week, Nestle completed its 26 billion-euro ($35 billion) acquisition of a stake in Galderma to gain full control, and the $14 billion purchase of rights to Dysport and other drugs in North America from Valeant Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Vegetable oil purchases, including for industrial use, may climb 12 percent to 12 million tons in the year to October and rise further in 2014-2015, he said.
 The airline has an option to purchase four more, according to the statement.
 MetLife in June announced its first stock buyback since 2008, saying it would repurchase as much as $1 billion of common stock.
 The Turkish lira weakened 1 percent after the central bank, led by Governor Erdem Basci, lowered the benchmark repurchase rate by 50 basis points to 825 percent, meeting the median estimate in a Bloomberg survey of 18 analysts.
 airline to post a loss in the first quarter, reported a second-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates and authorized a $1 billion stock repurchase.
 “The $1 billion share repurchase program we announced today demonstrates our progress and commitment to increasing value for our shareholders and the confidence we have in our plan” United rose 13 percent on July 10 after it said a benchmark revenue gauge, revenue per seat flown a mile, rose 35 percent in the June quarter.
 Verizon is seeking to refinance the debt just as the Fed holds its overnight interest-rate target near zero for a sixth year while it winds down a bond-purchase program that has suppressed debt yields.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The Monetary Policy Committee voted to keep the key rate at 05 percent and maintained the size of its asset-purchase program at 375 billion pounds ($641 billion).
 “Whether I owned it or not was totally irrelevant to me” Austin purchased a struggling ear-mold manufacturer named Starkey Laboratories Inc.
 Broz said the house has “nothing to do with anything political or professional” Hacker said it’s an investment property purchased entirely with personal finances.
 and opposition to the purchase by Cooper’s Chinese joint-venture partner caused the Findlay, Ohio-based tire company to run afoul of the sale contract and left it unable to close the deal, John Hardiman, the lawyer, told a judge today.
 The company extended its presence in the region last year with the purchase of three mines from Toronto-based Barrick Gold Corp.
 The investment also validates the Los Angeles startup scene after Facebook recently completed the $2 billion purchase of virtual-reality goggles maker Oculus VR Inc, which is based in Irvine, California.
 That appears to mark a shift from two months ago, when the company purchased apparel retailing rival Myntracom.
 It outpaces Chengdu Tianqi Industry Group Co’s C$673 million ($624 million) purchase last year of Australia’s Talison Lithium Ltd, owner of the world’s largest open-pit lithium mine.
 India’s rupee weakened 08 percent versus the dollar on concern capital inflows to emerging markets will slow as the Fed cuts bond purchases.
 Potential purchasers include private-equity firms and mid-tier pharmaceutical companies, Witty told journalists on a conference call today.
 Federal Reserve is on course to end its dollar-depressing bond purchases this year and, in London, Bank of England Governor Mark Carney has sought to temper bets on the higher interest rates that would make the pound more profitable for investors to hold.
 The RBI is expected to lower its benchmark repurchase rate by 25 basis points, or 025 percentage point, to 775 percent by the second half of 2015, according to a Bloomberg survey of economists.
 Stock Inflows Foreign investors have purchased a net $52 billion of Korean shares this year, versus inflows of about $11 billion in Taiwan and $12 billion for India.
 That means the central bank can keep interest rates low well into 2015 even as it continues to trim bond purchases.
 Exports rose 06 percent and imports climbed 17 percent, largely due to 12 billion pounds of aircraft purchases, the ONS said.
 The Bank of England kept its benchmark rate at a record-low 05 percent today, while its bond-purchase plan will stay at 375 billion pounds.
 Indirect bidders purchased 532 percent of the debt at the auction, the highest level since the February 2006 offering of the securities.
 That will keep the long end of the Treasury curve in a lower range than it would be otherwise” Fed officials said their bond-purchase program would end with a final reduction of $15 billion in buying at their October meeting if the economy progresses as they expect, according to minutes of the central bank’s June 17-18 meeting.
 The purchase, announced earlier this month, included more than 1,300 houses and was the landlord’s largest bulk acquisition so far.
 The purchase is for $26 billion with $400 million more that will vest over time.
 The fund’s actual withdrawals or deposits may differ from Morningstar’s estimates because of the timing of purchases and redemptions or dividend distributions.
 Germany should consider curbing Russian gas purchases in response to Putin’s actions in Ukraine, Michael Fuchs, a CDU deputy leader, told Deutschlandfunk radio.
 “We would have expected more from you based on your personal career track records up until this time” ’Grossly Inadequate’ Allergan responded with a statement saying that Ackman “is simply trying to distract Allergan stockholders from the fact that the Valeant proposal is grossly inadequate” At $54 billion, this would be Valeant’s largest deal, eclipsing its $87 billion purchase of eye care company Bausch & Lomb Inc.
 “We would be interested in considering the purchase of any additional interest that became available, through the right of first refusal provisions that are available to existing investors or otherwise,” he said in an e-mail.
 Deals such as Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since it was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout put together by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital at the peak of the last takeover boom in 2008.
 WellPoint said those buying Obamacare plans in the second quarter were younger than those who purchased coverage earlier in the year, an indication a late surge of enrollees could help profits.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Cable billionaire John Malone took another step to expand in TV programs and production with the purchase of a stake in ITV Plc, the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster with top-rated shows such as “Downton Abbey” Malone’s Liberty Global Plc acquired 64 percent of London-based ITV from Rupert Murdoch’s British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc for 481 million pounds ($824 million).
 The purchase gives Liberty Global, owner of UK.
 Jana also bought a stake in AerCap Holdings NV in a bet that the Schiphol, Netherlands-based aircraft-leasing firm will benefit from its purchase of American International Group Inc’s International Lease Finance Corp.
 The European Commission today presented a package of measures including the option of banning purchases of bonds or shares sold by Russia’s state owned banks.
(Corrects in third-to-last paragraph in story dated July 18 to show repurchases aren’t included in free cash flow) July 18 (Bloomberg) -- IBM shares are getting scarcer as the company acquires its outstanding stock, making each share of the company more valuable.
 International Business Machines Corp’s repurchases reduced the company’s share count to 998 million at the end of June, the first time it’s closed a quarter below 1 billion since at least 1999, when it last split its stock.
 With the second-quarter buybacks, IBM has surpassed the $50 billion in repurchases the company projected in 2010 that it would spend through 2015.
 Lower Rate In April, IBM had said it wouldn’t sustain its rate of share repurchases, which reached $82 billion in the first quarter, the most since 2007.
 The repurchases, meanwhile, have taken a toll on IBM’s balance sheet.
 will purchase the electricity, often at a premium to a utility’s grid price, for each plant’s ability to provide power locally with less pollution and more reliability than the grid, said KR Sridhar, Bloom’s co-founder and chief executive officer.
 In the final days of Ramadan, the nation’s shopping malls and bazaars are packed as people buy clothes or material for traditional outfits and purchase everything from pineapple tarts to flower arrangements as they prepare to welcome visiting relatives, some returning from abroad for the holiday.
 (BA)’s 787 Dreamliner, and while the plane doesn’t boast cutting-edge technologies such as a fuselage made of lighter carbon fiber, it is cheaper to purchase after being in service for 20 years.
 “It’s important to buy local-based producers as China will also shift to declaring these sectors key strategic industries,” which may limit opportunities to purchase them in the future.
 Concern that the French government would block a purchase of Danone damped takeover speculation back in 2005.
 won approval from France for a $17 billion purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets after the government initially opposed the transaction.
 The purchase follows an earlier injection of HK$23 billion ($300 million) into the city’s banking system.
 Air Lease Airbus’s decision to build the A330neo was followed by an agreement to sell 25 of planes to Steven Udvar-Hazy’s Air Lease Corp, part of a rush of purchases disclosed on the opening day the aviation industry’s biggest annual forum.
 Credit sales, or purchases funded by loans from the company, rose 5 percent, compared with growth of 9 percent in fiscal 2013.
 Reynolds has explored the purchase for several months and had been stymied by the complexity of a potential agreement, people with knowledge of the matter have told Bloomberg.
 The authority, known as the HKMA, made dollar purchases on July 1 for the first time since December 2012.
 Citic Pacific Ltd’s HK$53 billion share issuance for acquisition of its parent’s assets and Overseas-Chinese Banking Corp’s purchase of Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 Investor Alert “We have already asked banks to advise their clients to spread out their Hong Kong dollar acquisition to reduce volatility in the exchange rate caused by large amount of purchase of Hong Kong dollars to settle the deals,” Pang said.
 currency into Chinese yuan to purchase shares in Shanghai, without first buying Hong Kong dollars, he said.
 Vandaele, an economist at Navigant Economics LLC, 97 percent of Herbalife’s products are purchased for end-use consumption, the company said.
 It uses airwaves purchased on condition the company not limit the ability of end users to download and utilize applications of their choosing, Wheeler said.
 3 Lindt & Spruengli AG completes its planned purchase of Russell Stover Candies Inc, Nestle will fall even deeper into fourth place.
 Mars is private and has long said it’s not for sale, and Nestle shareholders would balk at a Hershey purchase because it wouldn’t be a good fit with the company’s push into higher-end, healthier products, Beck said.
 Lindt’s purchase of Stover, announced July 14, will give it 74 percent of the US.
 She said last month that the Fed will keep interest rates low for a considerable time after ending its asset-purchase program.
 in 2011 for about $24 billion, and this year it purchased a Novartis AG blood-transfusion diagnostics unit for about $168 billion.
 The loosening of home purchase restrictions alone may not spur a housing market rebound if monetary policy isn’t eased further, it said.
 Last year’s earnings were padded out by an agreement this February on pricing terms for Saudi Arabia’s purchase of 72 Typhoon warplanes under the so-called Salam contract, which the company included in the 2013 reporting period.
 BAE also said today that it has entered into an agreement for the bolt-on purchase of US.
 The company said it will repurchase as much as 32 percent of its shares between today and the end of August.
 Actavis has been the most active buyer of drug companies since January 2011, making $355 billion of purchases, including the Forest acquisition, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The companies are building a platform for collectors and first-time buyers to browse and purchase collectibles including art, jewelry and fine wine, according to a statement today.
 The firm bought additional stock in January 2011, ultimately spending $364 million to purchase a total of 98 million shares at an average price of $3697 each, according to filings with the US.
 The figures don’t reflect dividends received or interest paid on options used to purchase the stock.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 antitrust officials probing Comcast Corp’s planned purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 The Justice Department could extend those same terms as part of any approval for Comcast’s purchase of Time Warner Cable, one of the people said.
 The central bank will lower its monthly asset purchases to $25 billion from $35 billion, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg.
 That would put the Fed on track to halt all new bond purchases at its October meeting.
 It expanded abroad through deals including the purchase of Germany’s Madaus Pharma in 2007 and now operates in 90 countries.
 Separately, the BOE said foreign investors sold a net 42 billion pounds of gilts in June following net purchases of 88 billion pounds in May.
 Through the first quarter, the bank had booked more than $55 billion of costs tied to home loans, foreclosures or bonds backed by mortgages, mostly because of his predecessor’s 2008 purchase of subprime lender Countrywide Financial Corp.
 Investors have been demanding that the bank repurchase loans that were based on faulty information.
 “It made everything harder because it took a lot of energy and preoccupation around the brand” Another cloud hanging over the bank: In April, it suspended plans for higher dividends and share repurchases after finding an error in its stress-test submission to the Federal Reserve that inflated capital levels by $4 billion.
 The purchase is the biggest by Temasek so far, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, and gives the investment firm access to a business with more than 10,000 stores worldwide.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Policy makers trimmed bond purchases by $10 billion for the fifth consecutive gathering and said economic growth is rebounding and the job market improving.
 At a June 18 press conference, Chair Janet Yellen affirmed a plan by the FOMC to hold the benchmark rate near zero for a “considerable time” after $35 billion in monthly bond purchases end.
 signed two letters of intent for the purchase of the smaller, CS100 variant, according to a statement released yesterday.
 The purchase of Amsterdam-based GlobalCollect would be funded by available cash and debt, Ingenico said in a statement late yesterday.
 would be in addition to 500 previously purchased, of which about 400 have been delivered.
 “It will step up further in the second half” GKN bolstered its status as a primary contractor to Airbus with the 2008 purchase of the planemaker’s Filton wing-parts plant in the UK, doubling the airliner-structures order book to $10 billion and guaranteeing work through the lifetime of models including the A350.
 The purchase is set to be announced next week at the Farnborough International Airshow in England, the people said.
 The purchase price works out to $28,340 per square foot, according to Real Capital Analytics Inc.
 Wal-Mart agreed in February to purchase 1,783 fuel cells to be spread among six sites in North America.
 Deals Streak This month, Twitter also agreed to pay almost $100 million to acquire TapCommerce, which targets people on mobile phones or tablets with ads for items they’ve expressed interest in buying around the Internet, urging them to complete the purchase.
 Fed officials have said their bond-purchase program would end with a final reduction of $15 billion in buying at their October meeting if the economy progresses as they expect.
 At its June meeting, the central bank continued cutting the monthly pace of asset purchases, reducing it by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion.
 Regulations demanding brokers use such creditworthy notes as collateral when trading in derivatives and repurchase markets aren’t helping either.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- KeyCorp’s purchase of Pacific Crest Securities LLC will give the Cleveland-based lender a foothold in technology investment banking, Chief Executive Officer Beth Mooney said.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said July 29 that second-quarter profit increased to $153 billion as the company completed the spinoff of its business-travel unit.
 home loans, in its third and largest such purchase under a risk-sharing effort encouraged by its regulator.
 and Tata Power Co, which sell electricity in India’s capital of New Delhi, were allowed to increase tariffs, helping them purchase more power and invest in distribution networks.
 The tariff increase includes a power purchase cost surcharge of as much as 8 percent, approved by the regulator to compensate the three retailers for a combined revenue gap of 1367 billion rupees ($23 billion) till March 2013, according to the statement.
 AT&T can cancel its planned purchase of DirecTV for $66 billion if the satellite carrier can’t renew its NFL Sunday Ticket contract, which allows customers to watch out-of-market football games.
 The chairman said that while his company will consider what mode of acquisition represents the best value, it favors direct purchases from Airbus and Boeing.
 Sports has helped propel consolidation across the media and telecommunications industries this year and is one of the linchpins of AT&T Inc’s $458 billion proposed purchase of DirecTV.
 Slim saw an opportunity, creating a market for mobile-phone service modeled after the prepaid cards Telmex users purchased at convenience stores to use payphones.
 policy makers’ plan to hold their main rate near zero for a “considerable time” after ending monthly bond purchases that inject cash into the economy to stoke growth, Mexico’s benchmark rate is 3 percent, Colombia’s is 4 percent and Brazil’s key rate is 11 percent.
 Hearing their conversations might provide clarity on efforts to cope with the weather, while the recording could also contain alarm chimes and noises from the MD-83 jetliner, a model introduced by McDonnell Douglas before the company’s purchase by Boeing Co.
 The London-based company bought the assets as part of the A$39 billion ($37 billion) purchase of Riversdale Mining Ltd.
 The charge, part of $14 billion in writedowns on assets including the $38 billion purchase of Alcan Inc.
 housing market has turned around from the worst crisis since the 1930s after extraordinary Federal Reserve measures to revive the financial system, employment gains and purchases of thousands of houses across the country by institutional landlords.
 Some versions use a small tank that can be injected with nicotine liquid purchased in bulk.
 “What Liberty’s intentions are, are a matter for them” Crozier said the only contact he’s had with Liberty Global was a courtesy call from CEO Mike Fries the evening before the purchase announcement.
 Improper Servicing The accord sparked claims that JPMorgan and Bear Stearns Cos, which it bought in 2008, needed to repurchase mortgages whose quality was misrepresented, as well as pay for mishandling loans once they’re made.
 “This purchase passes on some security to the market and can open the door for other institutional investors,” said Juan Dieste, a trader at Orey iTrade in Lisbon.
 “A Baidu movie ticketing purchase can originate and be fulfilled all within the Mobile Baidu app,” said Robin Li.
 “Here, user snaps the photo of a movie poster, opens a lite app, choses a nearby theater, the movie, seats and purchases with Baidu Wallet, all without leaving the Baidu Mobile app” The company’s revenue surged 59 percent to 12 billion yuan, it said in a statement yesterday.
 Wing Hang shares traded as high as HK$127 on July 7 following Elliott’s purchase, exceeding OCBC’s bid price.
 Mideast Interest Krauss-Maffei won a 189 billion euro ($258 billion) contract from Qatar in April to modernize the country’s tanks and self-propelled howitzers, while Saudi Arabia is exploring the purchase of Leopard 2 tanks, considered among the world’s most advanced battle vehicles.
 “We need tax reform” Congressional Democrats, including Senator Levin and Representative Sander Levin, both of Michigan, have introduced bills that echo the administration’s approach of making it effectively impossible for a US-based company to purchase a smaller foreign one and take a foreign address.
 In inversions, US-based businesses purchase a foreign company, then switch the legal address to take advantage of the foreign jurisdiction’s favorable tax rules.
 The Obama administration has proposed making it effectively impossible for a US-based company to purchase a smaller foreign competitor and take that other company’s address.
 “A material amount of seaborne capacity will eventually have to close” The economy of China, which purchases about 70 percent of the world’s seaborne ore, is forecast to expand 74 percent this year, the weakest pace since 1990, a Bloomberg survey shows.
 A ban on European purchases of bonds or shares sold by Russian state-owned banks is among options the EU is considering, according to a proposal presented to member states last week.
 The largest was the 27 million-pound purchase of a stake in Eurofund V from a third party investor, the firm said.
 Zillow may pay about two-thirds of the purchase price with its own stock, one of the people said.
 GrubHub’s purchase of Seamless, which combined two of the top US.
 Perhaps Zillow is next -- after its Trulia purchase.
 “Multiplus doesn’t have that flexibility on the discount for ticket purchases” The better deal that Smiles is getting from Gol has helped fuel a 63 percent rally for the stock since it started trading on April 29 last year, compared with 62 percent for Multiplus.
 Reynolds explored the purchase of Lorillard for several months with its efforts stymied by the complexity of a potential agreement, people with knowledge of the matter said in May.
 The stake sale puts Imperial in a better position to purchase assets that Reynolds and Lorillard may have to offload, he said.
 Deals Boom Global acquirers made more than $913 billion of purchases last quarter, the busiest quarter for mergers and acquisitions since the third quarter of 2007, data compiled through June 27 show.
 While the Fed’s debt purchases are helping to lower trading volumes by suppressing volatility, that dynamic should change as the central bank finishes its buying later this year, he said.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 “We believe that this is a precursor of more activity in the M&A market as well” Deals postponed until next year include OAO Rosneft’s purchase from diamond monopoly Alrosa of gas assets for $14 billion.
 Impsa received $136 million from Eletrobras in December after suing the utility for back payments on power purchases from wind parks in Santa Caterina state.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- Airbus Group NV said it’s closely monitoring the financial health of customers for the flagship A380 and acknowledged that not all superjumbos on order will get built after it pulled a purchase accord with a Japanese carrier.
 He also said there would be “no impact” on Airbus’s purchase and loss statements from the Skymark planes.
 Barrack’s Colony American has made four bulk purchases this year.
 “There’ll be more and more transactions by us and others as time goes on” Private-equity firms, hedge funds and real estate investment trusts have amassed about 200,000 homes since the housing crash, largely through foreclosure auctions and purchases of individual properties.
 Blackstone Slowdown Blackstone Group LP -- whose Invitation Homes LP division is the largest single-family landlord, with about 45,000 houses -- has decreased spending on home purchases to about $15 million to $25 million a week, down from last year’s peak of $150 million, according to a person familiar with the strategy, who asked not to be named because the information is private.
 That’s the key to this long term, keeping the houses occupied and getting out bad tenants that aren’t paying” Getting Picky While big landlords are making bulk purchases, they also are getting choosier about the homes they buy from other operators, according to Jack Bevier, partner at Dominion Group, which purchases and renovates homes to rent in Atlanta and Baltimore.
 Progress Residential, which has more than 10,000 homes in 12 states, is shifting purchases to parts of the country where home values have seen fewer gains, and acquiring newly-constructed houses along with nonperforming loans, known as NPLs, according to President Curt Schade.
 Last year, investors fled from emerging-market debt amid panic over the Federal Reserve’s plan to curtail its monthly asset purchases.
 Chief Executive Officer Steven Kandarian, who last month announced the insurer’s first stock buyback since 2008, said it’s hard to commit to additional repurchases as he awaits clarity on US.
 We have to do that consistent with a regulatory environment in which we find ourselves, and as we learn more about that we’ll have more to say” MetLife said last month that it would buy back $1 billion of shares, a sum that Kandarian called “modest” The repurchase offsets the dilution of units that were converted into common stock as part of the 2010 purchase of American Life Insurance Co.
 Auction Detail Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 103 percent of the sale, the highest since November.
 Indirect bidders, a class of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 531 percent of the offering, the lowest level since March.
 Net purchases of the 12 ETFs that hold US.
 The central bank may conclude its debt purchases after its October meeting, she said.
 ‘The small cap area is going to be much more interest rate sensitive’’ Senate Testimony Yellen repeated comments from last month that the Fed will keep benchmark interest rates low for a considerable time after ending its asset-purchase program, even as it saw improvements in the economy and job market.
 was sued by a shareholder who said a proposed $57 billion purchase of the company by Dai-ichi Life Insurance Co.
 Dai-ichi’s purchase is the biggest foreign acquisition by a Japanese life insurer, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 As they agreed to more than $900 billion of purchases in the second quarter, acquirers turned to their rising stock prices to finance deals.
 “The equity rally over the last 12 months has helped facilitate large transactions” Drug companies, meanwhile, are using a third way to structure deals -- swapping assets and forming joint ventures as part of purchases.
 Global acquirers made $913 billion of purchases in the quarter, data compiled through June 27 show.
 European Shift European buyers have made the biggest shift away from cash, the data show, with all-cash purchases falling to just 28 percent of the $88 billion of takeovers announced by public companies during the quarter, compared with 68 percent from 2008 to 2013.
 buyers, all-cash purchases accounted for 31 percent of the $331 billion in deals announced, compared with 45 percent in the five years through 2013.
 The largest purchase by a European acquirer in the quarter highlights just how desirable shares can be: Holcim Ltd’s $40 billion merger with cement peer Lafarge SA was paid for entirely in stock.
 only secured its purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets when it offered its rail-signaling business, after rival joint bidders Siemens AG and Mitsubishi Corp.
 Two weeks ago, Alcoa announced the $285 billion purchase of UK.
 Potential Gains There are three main options for PetSmart: a leveraged buyout, a merger with Petco or returning cash to shareholders through more stock repurchases, said Daniel Johnson, of River Road Asset Management LLC, which oversees about $10 billion and owns PetSmart shares.
 PetSmart’s low leverage also leaves room to do debt-funded share repurchases, Seth Basham, a New York-based analyst at Wedbush, wrote in a July 7 report, noting that he sees an LBO as unlikely and a low probability of a deal with Petco.
 While Synchrony’s name is just months old, its predecessor traces back to the Great Depression, when Americans needed help financing purchases of their GE appliances, from air conditioners to washing machines.
 The company financed $939 billion in purchase volume last year, and as of March had 573 million active accounts.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s audit court fined four former top officials of Petroleo Brasileiro SA, including ex-Chief Executive Officer Jose Sergio Gabrielli, a combined $792 million for mismanagement in the purchase of a US.
 The executives of the state-run company allegedly mismanaged public funds in the purchase of a 100,000-barrels-a-day refinery in Pasadena, Texas, according to the ruling, which orders the executives to pay the money back to Petrobras, as the state-controlled oil producer is known.
 TCU cleared Brazilian President Dilma Rousseff, who was the chairwoman of the company’s board of directors in 2006, and all other board members of any responsibility for the purchase price.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, will average 35 percent in the July-September period, down from today’s 374 percent.
 Support from the central bank is necessary” Yuan Positions The increase in yuan positions at Chinese financial institutions accumulated from foreign-exchange purchases will amount to 200 billion yuan in the third quarter from 755 billion yuan in the three months through March, according to the median estimate in the survey.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- The Vermont, a newly built luxury apartment complex in the Koreatown area of Los Angeles, was purchased by Capri Capital Partners LLC and TruAmerica Multifamily for $283 million.
 With the Vermont purchase, it owns four multifamily properties in Los Angeles County.
 Yet for a buyer of a property worth more than 500,000 euros ($682,000), the kind Diallo helps build, a visa can come with the purchase deeds.
 A relaxation of home-purchase restrictions is yet to show any substantial impact, with sales in the seven cities that had eased the rules falling by a combined 11 percent in June from May, it said in an e-mailed report on July 18.
 The Chinese cities of Nanning, Hohhot and Jinan have announced a relaxation of local home-purchase restrictions, while another seven cities including Chengdu and Xiamen have loosened the implementation of such curbs without announcement, according to property data provider and consultancy China Real Estate Information Corp.
 Seventy-six percent of respondents said they expect China will probably roll out more measures to boost the property market after mainland cities have started to loosen their home purchase restrictions, the survey showed.
 ‘Downside Risk’ “We could see more removal of home purchase restrictions and an easing of Hukou policies, especially in cities with oversupply problems,” Lu Ting, head of Greater China economics at Bank of America Corp.
 The Fed is scaling back the bond-buying program it has used to drive growth, and it will reduce its monthly purchases to $25 billion from $35 billion after a two-day meeting starting today, based on a Bloomberg News survey of economists.
 Record Balance The purchases increased the central bank’s balance sheet to a record $441 trillion.
 “Accordingly, the board is in detailed discussions with AbbVie in relation to these terms” Inversion Deals AbbVie’s potential purchase of Shire, which comes at a time of increased merger and acquisition activity in the industry, would be a so-called inversion deal, allowing AbbVie to cut its tax rate to 13 percent from 22 percent by moving its legal address to the UK.
 “That’s going to scare the market for what’s supposed to be a rapid growth Internet company” Larger companies are building services to compete with Pandora, such as Google Inc’s purchase of Songza Media Inc.
 by purchases, and Minneapolis-based US.
 would be in addition to 500 previously purchased.
 Qatar Airways doubled its planned purchases of the upgraded 777 in yesterday’s transaction, after firming up a deal for the same number announced at the Dubai air show in November.
 Targeting CIOs Cupertino, California-based Apple also gains help from IBM reaching the senior decision makers in charge of making businesses’ technology purchases.
 The Federal Reserve will reduce its monthly purchases for the sixth time to $25 billion from $35 billion when it ends a two-day meeting after European markets close today, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Property stocks have been boosted by signs that local governments such as Hangzhou to Wenzhou are removing home purchase restrictions as well as prospects for reform of the household registration system, known as hukou.
 In December, 3M raised its dividend 35 percent and unveiled a five-year plan to spend as much as $10 billion on acquisitions and repurchase $22 billion of shares.
 The company returned $2 billion to stockholders during the quarter through a combination of dividends and repurchases, he said.
 “While the magnitude of the growth of the quarter wasn’t as good as we hoped or thought it would be, things still seem to be moving in the right direction” Zambrano, who was 70 when he died, built Cemex with a two-decade, $29 billion acquisition spree including the $142 billion purchase of Rinker Group Ltd.
 I want to establish us as the buyer of choice” XPO, based in Greenwich, Connecticut, said yesterday it agreed to purchase New Breed Holding Co, a closely held provider of supply-chain technology to large companies and government agencies.
July 26 (Bloomberg) -- Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s energy unit won Canadian approval for its planned purchase of SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink electric transmission business after committing to reinvesting in the country.
 Only 44 percent of 24,408 property purchases in Argentina’s Buenos Aires province this year through May were made with mortgages, the smallest share in data going back to 1998.
 Mortgage Share Last year, 20 percent of home purchases were made with mortgages, up from 17 percent a year earlier.
 Last year saw the biggest surge in demand in five years for foreign autos such as Porsche 911 Carrera S sports cars, sparking the government to clamp down on the purchases to stem an outflow of dollars.
 President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, who in July 2012 banned most dollar purchases outright after tightening controls in October 2011, this year authorized Argentines to buy foreign currency worth 20 percent of their average monthly salaries, with a limit of $2,000 per month.
 AG unit provided the financing for the Gherkin’s purchase, according to the bank’s 2007 annual report.
 LNG Prices North Asia LNG prices have rallied 54 percent since Japan shut nuclear plants and boosted gas purchases for power generation.
 The purchase may help SMBC Aviation grab a bigger share of the growing travel market in Asia.
 Chair Janet Yellen has said rates will stay low for a “considerable time” after the central bank stops its monthly bond purchases.
 China Overseas Land & Investment Ltd, the largest mainland developer listed in Hong Kong, rose 2 percent amid optimism for looser home-purchase policies.
 Easing home-purchase limits will boost mainland sales in the second half, UBS AG said.
 China will waive a 10 percent purchase tax on electric cars from Sept.
 investors that are taking advantage as sellers opt to offer bigger groups of loans, making it more difficult for smaller firms to make purchases, Cushman & Wakefield said.
 The Thai group will purchase Itochu shares via two companies, one of which will be a venture it plans to set up with the Development Bank of Japan.
 Property and casualty insurers are required to make terrorism insurance available to businesses, though companies aren’t required to purchase it.
 Tongyang Power Posco Energy Corp, rated AA+ locally, plans to sell 250 billion won of bonds, 190 billion won of which will be used for purchase of Tongyang Power Inc, according to a regulatory filing today.
 The company will pay 431 billion won for the purchase on August 24.
 Yield Cap Draghi said on July 3 that the ECB stands ready to embark on broad-based asset purchases if necessary to ward off deflation.
 Policy makers have cut the main refinancing and deposit rates, introduced targeted offerings of liquidity to banks and said officials will also start work on purchases of asset-backed securities.
 Offered by some banks in the southern province of Guangdong, across the border from Hong Kong, the trial program was introduced in 2011 for overseas property purchases and emigration and doesn’t constitute money laundering, Bank of China said in a July 9 statement.
 They need to provide documents showing how the money to be transferred was obtained, such as tax-payment receipts and proof of income, as well as a property-purchase agreement or proof of emigration, he said.
 Local Laws Customers deposit yuan with HSBC’s mainland unit or purchase its wealth-management products, and the bank’s overseas branch then issues a foreign-currency denominated mortgage using the China deposits as collateral, the person said.
 homes in the year through March, up 72 percent from the same period in 2013 and more than any other nationality, the National Association of Realtors said in its annual report on foreign home purchases.
 Chinese have become the biggest investors in Australia’s commercial and residential property, with purchases surging 42 percent to A$59 billion ($56 billion) in the year to June 2013, according to the country’s Foreign Investment Review Board.
 Corsa, which has a market value of C$90 million ($84 million) is raising funds for the purchase by selling 199 percent of its outstanding shares to Sprott Resource Corp, a Toronto-based investment company.
 These include an agreement to acquire Singxin Resources Pte, as well as plans to purchase as much as 60 percent of Starsmind Capital Pte, which has mining permits in another part of the province.
 He expects to finalize the purchase of Singxin by latest end of March.
 Steelmakers, who import about half of their requirements of coking coal, currently don’t pay any tax on overseas purchases.
 The higher levy on purchases has failed to dent demand for minicars, which have posted sales gains in 12 consecutive months.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- China will waive a 10 percent purchase tax on electric cars as part of expanded measures to combat pollution and cut energy dependence.
 “The exemption will help spur demand for electric cars and plug-in hybrids by lowering the purchase cost,” said Han Weiqi, a Shanghai-based analyst at CSC International Holdings Ltd.
 The central and local governments have funded purchases of new-energy vehicles since 2010, offering subsidies reaching as much as 114,000 yuan ($18,400) off the price of an EV in Beijing.
 purchased the complex for $54 billion in 2006, taking out a $3 billion mortgage and $14 billion of mezzanine debt.
 Smaller mobile takeovers the European Commission cleared recently include Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s purchases of Orange in Austria and of Telefonica’s Irish unit.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc, which had to resubmit its capital plan this year after falling below a minimum leverage ratio, used that experience as motivation to cut lending through repurchase agreements.
 “One of the significant inputs into the process obviously was CCAR” In a matched book, banks rely on repurchase agreements and securities lending to fund clients while using the same collateral and terms to borrow themselves, often overnight.
 American Express Co, the biggest card issuer by purchases, is scheduled to report earnings on July 29, with MasterCard following two days later.
 The company this month introduced Visa Checkout, which it said will allow consumers to make purchases faster online.
 The New Hampshire utility declined to disclose the amount of coal that it purchased from Russia.
 Foreign purchases tumbled to 89 million tons by last year as coal’s share of electricity consumption dropped to 39 percent while gas use gained.
 The company reported 12 adjustments to first-quarter earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization in a May 29 filing in part to “reflect the full period effect of our acquisitions” It purchased OnCure Holdings Inc.
 The purchase of IGT gives Gtech control of the world’s biggest slot-machine maker.
 The 28-member bloc is also considering a ban on European purchases of bonds or shares sold by Russia’s state-owned banks among the options for stepped-up measures against the Kremlin, according to a proposal presented to member states.
 The $472 million cost of the deal includes the purchase of shares and an $855 million loan consideration.
 After the purchase is completed, Tutor and the Princeton Review will be run by Mandy Ginsberg, the current chief executive officer of Tutor.
 The purchase gives Tutor a top college-admission services company that coaches millions of students through online resources and more than 150 print and digital books, the companies said in a statement yesterday.
 Japan Airlines ordered 31 Airbus A350 planes in 2013, its first purchase from the European manufacturer, with deliveries set to start in 2019, and it has options to purchase 25 more.
 The airline, the second biggest operator of the Boeing 787, has also purchased 45 of the medium-sized Dreamliners, and had received a third of them as of May, according to Boeing’s website.
 This year’s biggest acquisitions include Vantiv’s $165 billion purchase of Mercury Payments Systems Inc.
July 1 (Bloomberg) -- Retirees with 401(k) plans and individual retirement accounts will have more flexibility to purchase annuities that don’t start paying out until age 80 or 85, under final rules from the US.
 Instead, under the rules, they could use as much as 25 percent of their account balances up to $125,000 to purchase deferred annuities.
 The Treasury Department’s final rules give the government’s blessing to the concept of longevity insurance, which hasn’t taken hold in the market, in part because of the required distribution rules and because of relatively high fees that deter potential purchasers.
 A man who purchases a deferred annuity at age 60 for $50,000 can receive $17,614 in annual income for life starting at age 80, according to New York Life.
 Reynolds, the producer of Camel cigarettes, is closing in on a purchase of Lorillard and may announce a deal as soon as next week with the blessing of British American Tobacco Plc, the people said.
 The Fed reduced its monthly pace of debt purchases by $10 billion to $25 billion at a two-day meeting that ended yesterday.
 “Expectations for ECB purchases create sizable demand for ABS abroad and help to squeeze margins,” Kamil Sobolewski, the head of fixed-income at ING PTE SA, the largest Polish pension fund managing the equivalent of $122 billion, said by phone yesterday.
 787 Dreamliner, partly because it is less expensive to purchase.
 The Hong Kong Monetary Authority made purchases on July 1 for the first time since December 2012 and said demand for the local currency “increased lately,” partly driven by “commercial activities, including merger and acquisition activities and dividend distribution” The authority, known as the HKMA, said today it has no further comments to add to last week’s statement.
 The Hong Yuan purchase is the biggest takeover in mainland China’s financial industry, surpassing Ping An Insurance Group Co’s $43 billion acquisition of Shenzhen Development Bank Co.
 The regulator had earlier approved Guotai Junan Securities Co’s plan to purchase 51 percent of Shanghai Securities Co.
 Malaysia Weeps In the final days of Ramadan, the nation’s shopping malls and bazaars are packed as people buy clothes or material for traditional outfits and purchase everything from pineapple tarts to flower arrangements as they prepare to welcome visiting relatives.
 The company said the purchase will give it access to markets near the booming Marcellus and Utica gas-shale formations.
 The IIHS tests on gas-powered vehicles have been influencing consumer purchases and getting auto manufacturers to improve safety since 1995.
 The company also announced a structural reorganization of its divisions and said it would tighten control of Enersis through the purchase of the 6062 percent owned by Endesa by Enel Energy Europe.
 Milk Solids Even as China increases purchases of dairy from cheese to baby formula, the slowest expansion since 1990 may curb growth in demand.
 A purchase at that value will give Reliance Power, which currently operates 4,525 megawatts of generation capacity, ownership of cleaner hydro-based facilities at about 55 million rupees a megawatt.
 Ackman said the clubs are a front for an illegal recruiting scheme, designed to push large purchases of unsellable weight-loss powder.
 Less than five investors will be shortlisted to purchase the stake in ASR to enable it to make an offer for Reaal in the coming months, he said.
 in February and an additional $1 billion on other purchases in the first six months of 2014, the Mountain View, California-based Web company said in a filing yesterday.
 It completed its purchase of Tricontes GmbH, a customer services company based in Munich, on July 1.
 In May that year he wrote a letter to the board criticizing Tetragon for the incentive fees paid to Polygon, a lack of transparency and a failure to repurchase enough shares.
 After Tetragon bought Polygon Management LP for about $99 million in October 2012, Omega sued Tetragon’s officers and directors claiming they used the purchase to funnel company assets to themselves.
 The managers’ interests though are now more aligned with shareholders through increased equity from the Polygon purchase, Lakewood wrote in the letter.
 Atlanta-based Delta has said the bank’s charter should expire at the end of September unless the 80-year-old lender drops its support for such purchases of wide-body jets.
 “The bank devotes too much of its funds to finance wide-body jets purchased by foreign competitors of US.
 Delta spokesman Trebor Banstetter said in an e-mail today the company didn’t have a comment on Emirates’ purchase of the 777s.
 Financing Options It’s not known whether the bank will play a role in the purchase.
 He said Boeing’s customers usually finance most of their purchases by tapping private markets or by using their own cash.
 to double planned purchases of the 777-9X model.
 McFadden was appointed co-CEO of Goldsmith when it was purchased by Bermuda-based Lazard Ltd.
 “Sometimes it’s just hard to relate that to an independent investor” Rental demand is climbing as tight credit, slow wage growth and the lingering effects of the foreclosure crisis limit purchases.
 Those transactions were tied to purchases made by institutional investors, who have accumulated at least 200,000 properties after home prices nationally plunged as much as 35 percent from the 2006 peak.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- Zillow Inc’s purchase of Trulia Inc.
 Minutes of the Fed’s June meeting released last week showed officials have agreed they’ll end their asset-purchase program in October if the economy holds up.
 Policy makers cut monthly debt purchases to $35 billion at their last meeting, down from $85 billion last year.
 The French finance minister received support from Christophe de Margerie, head of French oil company Total SA, who said yesterday that he sees no reason for oil purchases to be made in dollars, adding that it makes sense to expand the use of other currencies in transactions outside the US.
 Lorillard shares slid to $6017 in New York, 13 percent below the purchase price.
 “There are a lot of factors involved” Including debt, the purchase is valued at $274 billion.
 The brand was the main selling point for Reynolds, and recent signals that the FDA won’t institute overly onerous regulations on menthols gave the company confidence to move ahead with the purchase, said a person familiar with the situation.
 Its biggest purchase so far, the more than $15 billion acquisition of Argentina’s YPF SA in 1999, ended with the Argentine government’s seizure of a 51 percent stake in the company in 2012.
 Investors deposited more than $16 billion into ETFs that purchase debt from high-yielding corporate notes to sovereign bonds, almost quadruple the amount in the same period last year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Just behind was the iShares JPMorgan $ Emerging Markets Bond UCITS ETF, which purchases debt from Russia to Argentina and amassed $12 billion in new money.
 Fixed-income clients are making fewer bets amid low volatility and the Federal Reserve’s move to slow bond purchases, Daniel Pinto, 51, JPMorgan’s investment banking chief, said that month.
 Sinacom reported today that Haikou has become the latest city to relax home-purchase restrictions.
 Foreigners bought a net $1395 million of local shares yesterday, a sixth straight day of net purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Solicitor General Donald Verrilli, the Obama administration’s top courtroom lawyer, had urged the justices to deny review, although he said the appeals court erred in deciding the purchasers could sue under state law.
July 28 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP agreed to purchase an office tower near the Bank of England in the City of London financial district from Brookfield Property Partners LP for 320 million pounds ($543 million).
 “Usually the only way a developer can get the deal to work is to go back to the landowner and renegotiate the purchase price,” said Sandhu, whose company rejects 98 percent of approaches for credit on predominantly residential projects.
 Group revenue in the second quarter increased by 7 percent to 233 billion kronor, helped by the addition of sales from British vacuum-pump maker Edwards Group, purchased by Atlas Copco for $15 billion.
 “This is affecting the region and affecting us also” Petrobras has been “optimizing” its inventory levels as part of a cost efficiency program and has adjusted the volumes of steel pipe purchases as a result, it said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 It respects contracts with suppliers and there isn’t a connection between its cash flow and the volume of purchases from Tenaris, Petrobras said.
 Stonex said he supports a merger between BSkyB, Sky Deutschland and Sky Italia as a joint pay-TV empire could more cheaply acquire rights for series and movies, purchase technology and reap other benefits from serving a market exceeding 200 million people.
 Merck is not interested in large scale purchases that are “very time consuming and distracting to what we’re here to do, which is invest in new medicines,” Ken Frazier, Merck’s chief executive officer said in an interview today.
 Frazier said he would look to do more bolt-on acquisitions like the purchase of Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Negotiations have centered on faulty loans the company inherited from Countrywide and Merrill Lynch & Co, which it purchased in 2008.
 The seven-day repurchase rate slid the most since July 3.
 “If you look at the valuations of SOEs, you’ll see that they are very cheap” The seven-day repurchase rate, which measures interbank funding availability, fell 41 basis points to 412 percent in Shanghai, according to a weighted average compiled by the National Interbank Funding Center.
 Facebook recently completed the $2 billion purchase of virtual-reality goggles maker Oculus VR Inc, which is based in Irvine, California, while Walt Disney Co.
 The bank and its rivals had the busiest first half since 2006 on merger-and-acquisition advisory as companies globally tap more than $4 trillion of cash and low interest rates to fund purchases.
 The biggest transaction by Temasek that DBS had advised on prior to Olam was the investment firm’s November 2009 purchase of a stake in Seoul Semiconductor Co, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The purchase, for an undisclosed sum, will enable Brookside to expand its product portfolio and its presence in Uganda and Tanzania, the Paris-based company said in an e-mailed statement.
July 30 (Bloomberg) --Schneider Electric SE, the world’s biggest maker of low- and medium-voltage equipment, reported first-half profit that beat analyst estimates and reiterated 2014 forecasts, helped by the purchase of Invensys Plc and cost cuts.
 That offset the purchase in January of Invensys, a UK.
 Deutsche Telekom AG this year bought out minority shareholders of its Czech unit for $11 billion and purchased GTS Central Europe for 546 million euros ($744 million) to expand fixed networks.
 The coin maker, controlled by Polish investor Zbigniew Jakubas, announced its first purchase of Netia shares in April.
 5, treats the purchase as a “purely financial investment,” CEO Tomasz Zuranski said on July 2.
 “I like the iPhone because it is small, light and very delicate,” said Ngoc, a 24-year-old accountant in Hanoi who purchased the device last week.
 and at least two other investors have purchased debt of Essar Steel Algoma Inc.
 It’s like bikers who are in a fight to be at the front of the pack” ‘Flash Boys’ Jump’s purchase and recent refurbishing of the tower in Houtem, Belgium, comes as high-frequency traders face added scrutiny engendered by Michael Lewis’s book, “Flash Boys,” in which he accused the industry of rigging markets.
 “Someone paid a lot of money for it” While Roose said he doesn’t know the identity of the buyer, he said Belgian government officials told him the purchase price was 5 million euros.
 Veurne land registry records obtained by Bloomberg News show Toren Navo Aansluiting owns the tower, without disclosing a purchase price.
 Within Brazil, consumers have slowed purchases because of tighter credit and a weakening economy.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee continued to trim asset purchases, reducing monthly bond buying to $25 billion from $35 billion and staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 Another C$647 million would be required to purchase the necessary spectrum, he added.
 Rates are likely to stay low for a “considerable period” after bond purchases end, which could happen following the Fed’s October meeting, she said.
 While demand for long-term debt could boost prices for a potential 50-year bond, it might displace purchases of the current 30-year security, said Justin Lederer, an interest-rate strategist at Cantor Fitzgerald LP in New York, a primary dealer.
 Although now isn’t the most ideal time, as the $264 billion appliance maker and wind turbine seller may not want to raise the ire of the government while it tries to close its purchase of France-based Alstom SA’s energy assets, said Nicholas Heymann, an analyst at William Blair & Co.
 LinkedIn will pay 10 percent of the purchase price in stock and the rest in cash, the Mountain View, California-based company said yesterday in a statement.
 “The global economy is strong enough to support the Fed’s decision to continue the taper and eventually raise rates by the middle of 2015” Fed policy makers, led by Chair Janet Yellen, have been paring their bond purchases since December and begin a two-day meeting today to discuss their exit strategy from a sixth year of near-zero interest rates.
 The $12 billion price tag values the Denver-based company at the “higher end” when compared to similar transactions including Cogeco’s purchase of Web-hosting provider Peer 1 Network Enterprises in 2013, Dvai Ghose, director of research at Canaccord Genuity, wrote in a note to investors.
 tax system that would stretch out deductions for equipment purchases and put the revenue toward reducing the corporate tax rate to 25 percent from 35 percent.
 The New York-based company said today in a statement that it plans to repurchase as much as $1 billion of its stock by the end of next year.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Christie’s International said sales of art and collectibles rose to a record 27 billion pounds ($46 billion) in the first six months of the year as purchases of contemporary works and demand from new clients surged.
 The companies are building a platform for collectors and first-time buyers to browse and purchase items including art, jewelry and fine wine, according to a statement.
 The law, a powerful anti-fraud statute that can be used by the New York attorney general’s office, is “limited to actions for fraud in the purchase or sale of ‘securities’ and doesn’t extend to all actions related to finance,” Barclays said.
 It also required users to confirm purchases twice before they went through, the company said.
 Taking Action “T-Mobile is NOT participating in any form of cramming, stuffing charges for un-purchased services, or trying to be anything less than totally transparent with each of our customers.
 The purchase brings Lindt’s golden foil-wrapped Easter bunnies together with a brand whose standing in the US.
 The Financial Times reported July 12 that a purchase price of $14 billion was under discussion.
 The Russell Stover purchase will produce similar benefits to when the Swiss company acquired California-based Ghirardelli Chocolate Co.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Tata Power Delhi Distribution Ltd, which lights up every third home in India’s capital, wants to surrender purchase contracts for 340 megawatts of electricity because of higher fuel costs passed on by producers.
 Of that, 578 purchases cost below $250 million, which is within the range Reach Energy plans to raise, it said.
 The move comes three years after Kuala Lumpur-based CIMB scrapped talks to purchase RHB Capital.
 “Returning that cash to the shareholders in the form of a repurchase or a dividend increase, or taking on more debt -- they could accelerate that,” said McGowan, who recommends holding the shares.
 “We have to remember that January and February came in quite weak, so some of what we are seeing could be purchases that were delayed at that time,” Gutierrez said.
 The companies, which have begun posting record profits as the housing market turns around, could create lease-purchase mortgages or shared-appreciation loans, in which the lender claims part of any gain in the home’s value.
 They now purchase about two-thirds of all new loans, so their underwriting rules have a broad impact on the market.
 The average credit score from the Fair Issac Credit Organization (FICO) on loans purchased by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac is now about 740.
 At least 40 percent of black applicants seeking loans for home purchases backed by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac were denied in 2012, compared with 14 percent of whites, Fed data shows.
 Bank of America and firms it purchased issued about $965 billion of mortgage bonds from 2004 to 2008, while New York-based JPMorgan and companies it bought issued $450 billion, according to analysts at Sanford C.
 Hence the sale of local currencies, and the purchase of dollars, that have pushed developing nations’ reserves to a record.
 There’s an opportunity, and a willingness, to pile up reserves” The bond purchases the US.
 A change of control that includes the replacement of a majority of the company’s directors followed by a reduction in the company’s credit below investment grade would have compelled Cliffs to repurchase its $29 billion of senior notes, according to a June 10 regulatory filing.
 On June 19, Cliffs’ board approved the Casablanca nominees purely to avoid triggering the change of control leading to the repurchase of the notes.
 Overseas purchases are estimated to increase to about 145 million metric tons this year from 135 million tons the previous year as prices hover around a five-year low, said Andrew Cosgrove, a Princeton-based analyst at Bloomberg Industries.
 He’s expanded Legg Mason’s offerings through two acquisitions this year, including the purchase announced last week of global stock manager Martin Currie.
 The Bank of England kept its benchmark interest rate at a record-low 05 percent and its asset-purchase target at 375 billion pounds ($642 billion) today, as predicted by economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 They play a key role in funding markets because they purchase short-term debt issued by corporations, governments and other borrowers which need cash to fund payrolls and other expenses.
 3 American Express Co, which is also the nation’s largest credit-card lender by purchases, are scheduled to report quarterly results next week.
 The purchase will create a media powerhouse that beams TV programs via cable and satellite to 20 million subscribers in five European countries.
 Today’s purchase is the culmination of years of deals to build the company, which doesn’t yet have an official name but that many in the industry are calling Sky Europe.
 Rules stipulate it must offer to purchase shares from all stakeholders under the same conditions, although it may not need to buy all shares for sale.
 On July 24, after Alfa raised its stake in the company to 141 percent, Conrads said it’s a “bit surprising they keep buying” Bolanos said he thinks the most likely outcome is for Alfa and Pacific Rubiales to form a joint venture, though the odds of a takeover have increased as share purchases mount.
 Atmel expects to complete the transaction in the third quarter, and the purchase will add to earnings in the second half of next year, the company said.
 Home purchases are accelerating after a slow start to the year.
 The group’s purchase measure decreased 07 percent, while the refinancing gauge advanced 01 percent.
 climbed 26 percent after the official Xinhua News agency reported that Jinan has become the latest city to scrap home purchase limits.
 “For the most part, they’re not making excessive share repurchases or acquisitions that would be considered in poor judgment” The surprise rally in corporate bonds has Wall Street analysts revising their return predictions for 2014.
 The Fed has been reducing its purchases in $10 billion increments and is buying $35 billion of securities each month, down from $85 billion in December.
 The slowdown came as Harper imposed limits in 2012 on oil-sands purchases by state-owned enterprises after having been pressured by Canadian oil companies to stop Chinese takeovers of local energy firms.
 The last major Canadian acquisition by a China-based company was PetroChina Co’s C$119 billion ($11 billion) purchase of a 499 percent stake in an Alberta shale formation one week after Harper’s state-owned enterprise ban.
 Nancy Southern, chief executive of Calgary-based Atco Ltd, has lobbied the federal and provincial governments to reject the proposed purchase of Alberta power utility AltaLink by Buffet’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 Beyond the direct construction jobs, new homebuilding spurs purchases of carpets, flooring, lighting, appliances and furniture.
 Steel Dynamics would purchase Severstal’s plant in Columbus, Mississippi, while AK Steel would get the factory in Dearborn, Michigan, one of the people said.
 Noah Reynolds, a former certified public accountant who lives in Winston-Salem, North Carolina, acquired a 63 percent stake in Crumbs through the purchase of 800,000 common shares, according to a filing yesterday with the US.
 While Synchrony’s name is just months old, its predecessor traces back to the Great Depression, when Americans needed help financing purchases of their GE appliances, from air conditioners to washing machines.
 The company financed $939 billion in purchase volume last year, and as of March had 573 million active accounts.
 billed parents for millions of dollars of unauthorized mobile application purchases made by their children, the US.
 The company, based in Seattle, said that it gave customers refunds for purchases children made without the account holder’s permission, according to the letter.
 Clicking Buttons The FTC cited as an example of parental complaints a consumer whose daughters spent $358 on unauthorized purchases.
 When Amazon introduced in-app charges in 2011, there were no password requirements for the purchases, according to the FTC.
 But once QE ends, they’ve got to telegraph some plan going forward” Policy makers cut monthly debt purchases to $35 billion at their June 17-18 meeting, down from $85 billion last year.
 as a possible purchase.
 Acquisition Funding Diageo has said it will fund the purchase with commercial paper and longer-term debt.
 Global funds bought $2 billion more of Thailand’s bonds than they sold in the last four days, set for the largest net weekly purchases since September.
 Startup Valuations Kabam has made six acquisitions over the last 18 months, including the purchase of a Vancouver-based company with rights to the “Fast and Furious” brand, Wakeford said.
 The Alibaba investment will allow the company to make more purchases in Asia.
 While the A330 lacks the cutting-edge technology of Boeing Co’s carbon-fiber 787 Dreamliner, the Airbus jet is cheaper to purchase after being in service for 20 years.
 Fed policy makers meet over the next two days to discuss the outlook for central bank asset purchases and interest rates.
 Economists consider pending sales a leading indicator because they track purchase contracts.
 Home Sales Sales of previously owned homes rose in June to an eight-month high, with purchases increasing 26 percent to a 504 million annual rate, led by gains in all four US.
 Oracle, the world’s largest maker of database software, sold $10 billion of notes Monday in the second-largest dollar-denominated corporate bond offering of the year to help finance its purchase of Micros Systems Inc.
 The announcement also follows directives for the government to bolster its purchase of electric cars and local branded vehicles.
 Minutes released last week from the Fed meeting in June showed officials agreed they’ll end their asset-purchase program in October if the economy holds up.
 The deal covers home loans on which the insurer took losses and also entitles it to a share of what Bank of America pays to investors as part of a Countrywide repurchase settlement, New York-based AIG said today in a statement.
 The Charlotte, North Carolina-based bank has pushed to resolve liabilities that have cost it at least $55 billion since the financial crisis, most inherited from its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 AIG took housing-related losses on bonds that it purchased for its investment portfolio and loans that it backed through its derivatives unit and mortgage-guaranty subsidiary.
 TapCommerce targets people on their mobile phones or tablets with ads for things they’ve already expressed interest in buying, urging them to complete the purchase.
 stocks were little changed as data showing better-than-forecast economic growth was offset by weaker earnings and the Federal Reserve’s decision to keep trimming asset purchases.
 Bond Buying Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10-billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 The company acquired the blood-cancer treatment Kyprolis in its $104 billion purchase of Onyx Pharmaceuticals last year, and has an experimental cholesterol drug the company will submit this year for regulatory approval.
 “There’s no walking through a big box” Internet-Proof? Dollar stores have also been immune to the disruption caused by the Internet for the most part because purchases often fill an immediate need, Perkins said.
 operator acquired it in 2012 for $55 million, occurred primarily at trade-association meetings before the purchase.
 Bank of America alone has paid more than $50 billion to resolve claims over shoddy mortgages, most tied to its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp, once the biggest US.
July 8 (Bloomberg) -- A Corpbanca SA minority shareholder, the International Finance Corp, plans to hire an investment bank to assess Itau Unibanco Holding SA’s $22 billion offer to purchase the Chilean company.
 Another Corpbanca minority shareholder, Cartica Management LLC, has filed a lawsuit in New York to halt Itau’s purchase.
 is raising money to repay part of a $4 billion loan that funded the biggest Chinese purchase of a US.
 agreed to purchase Trulia Inc.
 Earlier this month, Zillow purchased Retsly Software Inc, a Vancouver-based real estate company.
 Typical Americans lack the cash to turn gourmet cupcakes into an everyday purchase, even with celebrities like Oprah Winfrey touting them.
 “You’re not going to be buying these discretionary purchases unless you’re part of the 1 percent,” Riggs said.
 Filters can be included in the exchange system to block payment for pornography, purchase of illegal substances or for illegal acts such as money laundering, terrorism, smuggling and making purchases with stolen credit card numbers, MasterCard said in its application.
 While the patent holder argued that his purchase of the parts was for experimental use, the appeals court said that ordering 400 or more of the items covered by the patent from a manufacturer “could hardly qualify as anything other than commercial use” The appeals court also affirmed a lower court determination that New Orleans-based SnoWizard didn’t infringe a “Snoball” trademark held by two other companies.
 The purchase transforms the dollar-store market and fulfills the ambitions of billionaire investors Carl Icahn and Nelson Peltz, who had acquired major stakes in Family Dollar and pushed for a sale.
 Bill Ackman, founder of New York hedge-fund firm Pershing Square Capital Management LP, is part of an investor group that agreed to purchase one of the apartments, a duplex on the 75th and 76th floors, for more than $90 million.
 In April, CEZ canceled a tender for a $15 billion plan to build two new reactors as its Temelin nuclear power station after the government refused to provide guarantees on power purchase prices.
 Regulators rejected the firm’s request to quintuple its dividend and repurchase $64 billion of shares.
 Renovations at the 72-story building, purchased from MPG Office Trust Inc, are likely to be completed in the third quarter of 2015, said Richard Stockton, chief executive officer for the Americas at Overseas Union Enterprise.
 -- was purchased last October by Brookfield Office Properties Inc.
 Mainland Chinese buyers purchased a total 561 tons in June including scrap, compared with 672 tons in May and 1126 tons a year earlier, data from the Hong Kong government showed.
 Tumultuous Decade Whitworth turned his attention to Hewlett-Packard in 2011, acquiring a stake after the company’s disastrous purchase of software maker Autonomy Corp.
 Apotheker in 2011 presided over missed earnings targets, an ill-fated plan to spin off the company’s PC business and the Autonomy purchase, which resulted in an $88 billion write-down and shareholder lawsuits.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Portugal Telecom SGPS SA and Brazil’s Oi SA tumbled in trading today on concern that their merger will be undermined by its purchase of short-term debt from the troubled Espirito Santo group.
 Brazil’s state development bank, known as BNDES, on July 8 said that the debt purchase by Portugal Telecom lacked good corporate governance.
 Cost Savings The company, created by a series of acquisitions over the past decade, boosted its Ebitda margin by 157 basis points as revenue improved and slashed another $135 million in costs related to its $20 billion purchase of the rest of Corona-maker Modelo last year.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Charney’s Stake The fund also has warrants to buy back the shares Charney purchased as well as 10 percent of his original stake.
 Braintree’s new development kit is the first major upgrade since its purchase by EBay for about $800 million.
 and startups like Square Inc, is adding new tools as it seeks to reach consumers who are making purchases through smartphones and tablets.
 Intel also added $20 billion to its stock-repurchase program, including $4 billion planned for the third quarter.
 They also don’t have any so-called in-app purchases, functionality that games sometimes include that can lure kids into unwittingly plunking down mom or dad’s cash.
 agreed to purchase the company in a $35 billion deal.
 “Sentiment in the short term is a little more cautious” The Fed’s Open Market Committee will scale back its monthly asset purchases to $25 billion from $35 billion on July 30, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg, keeping it on pace to end the program late this year.
 The policy-making committee last month repeated it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 The last group, known as level three, contains the most illiquid asset-backed securities, collateralized debt obligations, repurchase agreements and derivatives.
 The brokerage said Imperial Tobacco’s purchase of brands from Reynolds American Inc.
 European Delivery And if I were to buy the Cayenne, I would surely opt for the European delivery, a little-known program that lets purchasers drive around Europe in their very own new car.
 The dispute stems from Tullow’s purchase in 2010 of Heritage’s 50 percent stake in a license to look for petroleum in parts of west Uganda for more than $135 billion.
 Danica Pension will use the funds to accelerate purchases in private equity and other assets less exposed to market froth, Chief Financial Officer Jacob Aarup-Andersen said in an interview.
 PFA purchased 2 percent in the same transaction.
 Kuwait’s sovereign wealth fund also helped finance the Rohm & Haas purchase and holds $1 billion of the securities.
 Dow has repurchased about 51 million shares for $24 billion as part of a $45 billion program aimed at reducing the impact of the preferred-share conversions, CFO Weideman said today.
 Buffett has responded by pursuing acquisitions, like last year’s purchase of the largest electric utility in Nevada.
 The Madrid-based company’s biggest purchase so far, the more than $15 billion acquisition of YPF SA in 1999, ended with the Argentine government’s seizure of a 51 percent stake in the company in 2012.
 jumped 61 percent after the government said electric cars will be exempt from purchase taxes.
 Hybrid Cars Authorities will exclude new-energy autos -- China’s term for electric cars, plug-in hybrids and fuel-cell vehicles --from the purchase taxes starting September 1 this year until the end of 2017, according to a statement posted on the central government website yesterday, citing a State Council meeting.
 The cost to protect Mexico’s bonds against default soared to 162 percentage points in June 2013 as Treasury yields climbed after the Fed signaled it would begin to reduce the pace of its asset purchases.
 There are some rumors about some hawkish comments” The Fed will publish minutes of its June 17-18 meeting, when officials trimmed monthly bond purchases to $35 billion.
 as well as growth in high-end SIM card purchases.
 said it is committed to completing the purchase of a stake in an oil-sands project.
 lessor signed letters of intent to purchase as many as 24 CSeries jets.
 Chen Shudong, the incoming director of China National Petroleum Corp’s Canadian unit, said in an e-mail that PetroChina is committed to completing its C$132 billion ($123 billion) purchase of the stake it doesn’t own in the Dover oil-sands project in Canada from Athabasca.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- Suez Environnement, Europe’s second-biggest water company, is targeting asset purchases this year, buoyed by profit that more than doubled in the first half because of a one-time gain from a stake sale.
 Minutes showed officials have moved closer to deciding on the main tool they will use to tighten monetary policy when the time comes, most likely next year, and agreed they’ll end their asset-purchase program in October if the economy holds up.
 First-time purchasers accounted for 28 percent of all sales of previously owned homes in June, compared with about 40 percent historically, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 For now, losses from real estate and the impact of currency declines in markets including Venezuela have weighed on profit, even as Chairman Francisco Gonzalez is betting on a Spanish recovery with the 119 billion-euro purchase of nationalized Catalunya Banc SA, announced last week.
 Chinese investment in Canada’s energy patch has tumbled following Cnooc Ltd’s $15 billion purchase of Nexen Inc.
 Consumers have increased butter purchases for five straight years, partly as some shift away from margarine.
 Fosun paid $725 million to buy 1 Chase Manhattan Plaza, the largest purchase of a New York building by a Chinese buyer.
 sought firm purchases for its embattled CSeries after getting commitments to buy the planes.
 Bridgeton, Missouri-based Trans States also has an option to purchase 50 more E-Jets.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Aecom Technology Corp’s $4 billion purchase of URS Corp.
 Maersk purchased stakes in three oil blocks in 2011 for $24 billion.
 The rest would go to the federal government, which helps state transportation departments purchase approved highway products, including Trinity’s end terminal.
 The company has struggled to revive growth as corporations and governments curb purchases of high-end storage computers, choosing cheaper software- and flash-memory-based systems instead.
 The most recent of these deals was the 72 billion-euro purchase of Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Skymark Airlines Inc, Japan’s third-largest carrier, said it’s at risk of going out of business should it have to pay Airbus Group NV a penalty after the planned purchase of six A380 superjumbos fell through.
 Oi SA fell the most on the gauge after the phone company said it wasn’t aware that merger partner Portugal Telecom SGPS SA had purchased debt issued by a holding company that’s selling assets amid speculation it may be unable to pay its bills.
 The Brazilian telephone company, is asking for more information about Portugal Telecom’s April purchase of 897 million euros ($122 billion) in commercial paper from Rioforte, according to a regulatory filing today.
 Anytime, Anywhere While the game is free to play, the goal is to get users hooked on in-app purchases such as clothing or a burst of energy needed for traipsing through Hollywood.
 Concentrated Sales The challenge for the free-to-play segment is to get users to make in-app purchases -- just 3 percent to 4 percent do, according to Creutz.
 Glu Mobile’s in-app smartphone purchases jumped 18 percent to $792 million in 2013.
 Because of privacy considerations, AmEx declined to say whether Liu’s is the biggest purchase on an AmEx card.
 said it has been contacted by Macau’s anti-corruption agency regarding the company’s land purchase for its new resort-casino on the Cotai Strip.
 Rights to the 2018 and 2022 tournaments were purchased by 21st Century Fox Inc’s Fox for $450 million to $500 million, according to Sports Business Daily.
 The company expects to buy back as much as $8 billion in shares in 2014 and 2015, of which it has already purchased $16 billion in the first half of the year.
 Fed Stimulus Minutes of the Fed’s June meeting released last week showed officials have agreed they’ll end their asset-purchase program in October if the economy holds up.
 The Kodiak purchase will give Whiting drilling rights across 855,000 net acres, surpassing Exxon Mobil Corp.
 The decision marked the first overseas purchase blocked by a US.
 Lufthansa canceled the ticket after more than a year and refunded the price, only for the man to purchase a replacement.
 Investors who bought stock in the Brazilian sugar and ethanol producer for 15 reais in April 2013 also had a chance to purchase a put option that allowed them to recoup their money, plus interest, if the stock dropped.
 Weidmann has been overcome in the past, both when Draghi introduced a bond-purchase plan in 2012 and cut interest rates last November to thwart the euro crisis.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Yellen told lawmakers that the Fed will probably keepinterest rates low for a “considerable period” after endingbond purchases, which may be announced in October.
 The government began introducing the housing-market curbs in 2009, with some of the strictest measures implemented in 2013, including a cap on debt at 60 percent of a borrower’s income, higher stamp duties on home purchases and an increase in real-estate taxes.
 ‘‘I would say two years ago diamond sales in China were dominated by very big purchases by very wealthy people,’’ Gannicott said.
 The purchase may be announced as early as next week’s Farnborough International Airshow in England, said two of the people, who asked not to be identified because the details are private.
 Those unable to get enough locally must purchase credits sold over power exchanges in monthly trading sessions.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Yellen told lawmakers that the Fed will probably keep interest rates low for a “considerable period” after ending bond purchases, which may be announced in October.
 China has implemented a so-called “mini-stimulus,” including loosening loan restriction on home purchases, easing banks’ reserve requirements and stepping up railway investment to help revive growth from the slowest in more than a decade.
 In a separate report released today and dated June 26, the fund said it expects capital outflows from Russia to increase this year because of the conflict in Ukraine and as the Federal Reserve tapers its bond purchases.
 Ferrovial, which is the biggest stakeholder in London’s Heathrow airport, also said it will spend as much as 350 million euros to purchase its own shares.
 Rorsted overcame a reluctance to meet sellers’ demand with the planned purchase of Spotless Group SAS, a Paris-based laundry aid, insect control and household-care company being bought for 940 million euros.
 The purchase was funded by a loan Charney got from Standard General LP last week.
 Charney’s most recent share purchases didn’t trigger the plan because they preceded its adoption.
 Yellen said today that rates are likely to stay low for a “considerable period” after bond purchases end, which she said could happen following the Fed’s October meeting.
 The ECB introduced a negative deposit rate in June as it announced new long-term refinancing operations and said officials will start work on an asset-purchase plan.
 The underlying equity gauge rose less than 01 percent in New York yesterday as data showing better-than-forecast economic growth was offset by weaker earnings and the Federal Reserve’s decision to keep trimming asset purchases.
 policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 Revenue is being hurt as some telecommunications carriers delay equipment purchases for the rest of 2014, Juniper said.
 Property Prices In Hangzhou, where home prices fell the most in May among 70 Chinese cities watched by the government, Shanheng Real Estate Group is giving homebuyers an option to sell back their apartments in five years for 40 percent above the purchase price.
 In Wenzhou, DoThink Group is offering to repurchase homes at three of its projects for 120 percent of the purchase price after three years.
 for $23 billion, its largest purchase since acquiring Berry Petroleum Co.
 “There was more hawkishness expected from the Fed minutes, and that’s not what we got” Bidder Participation Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 139 percent of the notes, the smallest share since January.
 “Direct bidders were more cautious ahead of the uncertainty of the Fed minutes and the better data we’ve seen of late” Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 396 percent of the securities, compared with an average of 442 percent at the past 10 sales.
 Other Wall Street-backed landlords are looking to the debt market for capital to purchase more houses and increase returns by adding leverage to the properties they bought with cash.
 The firm bought additional stock in January 2011, ultimately spending $364 million to purchase a total of 98 million shares at an average price of $3697 each, according to filings with the US.
 The figures don’t reflect dividends received or interest paid on options used to purchase the stock.
 Government funds will be allowed to continue pricing their shares at $1, although the rules include restrictions on assets they can purchase.
 Government funds will now have to invest 995 percent of total assets in cash, government securities or repurchase agreements backed by government debt or cash, according to a fact sheet released by the SEC today.
 Falling Returns Capitalization rates, a measure of returns derived by dividing a property’s net operating income by its purchase price, have tumbled as a result.
 Canada’s two biggest pension funds last month announced separate purchases of stakes in Manhattan office towers.
 “There’s a presumption that the panel will be more pragmatic and investor friendly” Vodafone has been embroiled in a tax dispute with India since its purchase of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Indian business.
 The purchase of Rockwood should hasten Albemarle’s effort to start up a second US.
 It outpaces Chengdu Tianqi Industry Group Co’s C$673 million ($626 million) purchase last year of Australia’s Talison, owner of the world’s largest open-pit lithium mine.
July 5 (Bloomberg) -- Total SA Chief Executive Christophe de Margerie said he sees no reason for oil purchases to be made in dollars, adding that it makes sense to expand the use of other currencies in transactions outside the US.
 One Canadian dollar purchases 9316 US.
 The Federal Open Market Committee repeated on June 18 that it expects the rate to remain near zero for a “considerable time” after the purchases end work.
 Minutes of the Fed’s June meeting, released July 9, showed officials have agreed they’ll end their asset-purchase program in October if the economy holds up.
 and Poly Real Estate Group Co, the nation’s two biggest developers, climbed at least 14 percent after Xinhua News Agency reported that Jinan has become the latest city to scrap home purchase limits.
 led gains for automakers after the company said it will purchase all the assets of its parent.
 Jinan canceled home purchase limits since yesterday after implementing them for more than 3 years, Xinhua reported on its official microblog, citing the local property management bureau.
 Hohhot last month eased home-purchase limits, while the China Times reported last week Wuhan city will relax rules on local residents third-home purchases.
 The private-equity and hedge-fund manager, which purchased policies on the secondary market, has proposed rules to make it harder to cancel insurance and to mandate the return of premiums if coverage is voided.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Textron Inc’s V-22 Osprey, the tilt-rotor craft that entered development almost 25 years ago, is poised to win its first export deals as Israel and Japan close in on purchases.
 “The foreign military sales process does take time so it’s always hard to forecast” The Pentagon notified Congress of a possible $113 billion sale of at least six V-22s to Israel in January, while Japan could purchase 17, according to a request for proposals.
 In great times you can leverage them together, but the risk is not just financial but also operationally very significant” While financing of condo purchases in hotel projects may be less risky than during the last housing boom, other risks remain, including the potential for overbuilding, according to Butler, the hospitality attorney.
 Policy makers trimmed bond purchases last month by $10 billion for the fifth consecutive time, saying the job market is improving.
 For now, losses from real estate and the impact of currency declines in markets including Venezuela have weighed on profit, even as Chairman Francisco Gonzalez is betting on a Spanish recovery with the 119 billion-euro purchase of nationalized Catalunya Banc SA, announced last week.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Google Inc’s purchase of a San Francisco waterfront property underscores the rising demand for commercial real estate in the city, with office-building sales on pace for their strongest year since the market’s peak.
 Blackstone’s purchase at One Market Plaza, at $823 a square foot, is the highest since it sold the same property to Morgan Stanley for a record $1,001 a square foot in 2007, according to Real Capital.
 She confirmed the purchase and lease transactions but declined to give details.
 A cap rate, a measure of yield for the real estate industry, is net operating income divided by purchase price.
 “Along with Silicon Valley, San Francisco has become a high-tech innovation capital,” Joe Schoendorf, a partner at venture-capital firm Accel Partners in Palo Alto, California, said in an e-mail following Google’s Embarcadero purchase.
 The agreement announced yesterday calls for AbbVie to pay Shire a breakup fee of 3 percent of the deal’s value, or about $16 billion, or reimburse costs of not less than $500 million, if the purchase falls through, according to the statement.
 The shares have benefited from Deutsche Bank AG’s consideration of a stake purchase before the Frankfurt-based lender decided against a deal in June, he said while he sees the true value “estimated conservatively at least 600 million euros” That compares to a market capitalization of 307 million euros.
 are still purchased in a store, according to researcher DisplaySearch.
 “It has come to our attention that Channel 7 purchased this footage unlawfully,” Pistorius’s lawyer, Brian Webber, of law firm Ramsay Webber Inc, said in a statement.
 That’s driving up purchases from countries including Australia, Indonesia and South Africa.
 Factories, Kilns Much of the stolen coal goes to factories and brick kilns that don’t have purchase contracts with Coal India.
 “Bond purchases are a possibility,” said Modi Shafrir, chief economist at Mizrahi Tefahot Bank.
 With space for further cuts running out, “in the event of a continued strengthening of the shekel, our assessment is that the Bank of Israel will step up its foreign currency purchases,” Klein said yesterday.
 “And then, only steps in the foreign currency market” Fischer, now vice chairman of the Fed, resumed foreign-currency purchases for the first time in almost two years in April 2013.
 AerCap, SMBC AerCap Holdings NV said it would buy 50 A321neos worth $514 billion, the first jet purchase since the world’s biggest independent aircraft lessor bought Hazy’s former company, International Lease Finance Corp, for $76 billion in May.
 An $118 billion purchase of A320-family planes by SMBC Aviation Capital Ltd.
 agreed to purchase A330s for $41 billion.
 The company’s purchase of a controlling stake in Bank of Ayudhya last year was its largest acquisition in Asia outside of Japan.
July 28 (Bloomberg) -- NRG Yield Inc, a spinoff of mostly renewable energy assets by NRG Energy Inc, plans to offer $400 million in bonds for its purchase of the Alta Wind farm.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said second-quarter profit rose 85 percent as the company completed the spinoff of its business-travel unit and customer spending increased.
 businesses that handle less than $1 million in AmEx purchases annually.
 “The treasury deposit auction result showed the interbank market is definitely not short of money, so it’s natural for the interest-rate swaps to climb a bit” The cost of one-year swaps, the fixed payment needed to receive the floating seven-day repurchase rate, rose eight basis points, the most in two weeks, to 387 percent as of 4:55 pm.
 Bonds Advance The central bank sold 20 billion yuan of 28-day repurchase agreements today at 4 percent, it said in a separate statement.
 Fed policy makers are expected to cut bond purchases for the sixth time while debating the preconditions for increasing interest rates at their two-day meeting that ends tomorrow.
 Fed policy makers will cut asset purchases by another $10 billion to $25 billion tomorrow, according to the median of 38 economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Fed’s bond purchases combined with demand from banks to meet tightened regulatory requirements is making it harder for traders to easily borrow and lend certain desired securities in the $16 trillion-a-day market for repurchase agreements.
 The central bank’s target for short-term rates -- held at almost zero since December 2008 -- is likely to stay low for a “considerable period” after the Fed ends its unprecedented bond purchases as soon as October.
 The bank purchased Coutts, which traces its roots to 1692, as part of its acquisition of National Westminster Bank in 2000.
 Zijin will seek overseas financing for purchases, she said.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- The selloff in global stocks and high-yield bonds this month was just a dry run for what will come after the Federal Reserve winds down its bond purchases, according to UBS AG.
 Bernanke said the central bank will begin scaling back its monthly asset-purchase program.
 Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes, including the Wotifcom purchase, according to a regulatory filing.
 and the Abu Dhabi Investment Authority to purchase the headquarters space at Time Warner Inc.
 The central bank has cut its purchases of government and mortgage bonds, its tools for quantitative easing, six times, bringing the amount to $25 billion a month from $85 billion.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- African Bank Investments Ltd, South Africa’s largest provider of unsecured loans, said its purchase of a furniture retailer waylaid management and hurt bank profit resulting in losses, resignations and writedowns.
 The purchase gives Cheung Kong 23,000 kilometers (14,000 miles) of Envestra’s pipelines supplying gas to customers mostly in the states of Victoria and South Australia.
 gas transmission business in 2012, with the 645 million pound ($11 billion) purchase of Wales & West Utilities Ltd.
 Jana, which is known for taking stakes in companies and then urging management to take steps designed to increase shareholder value, told investors in a letter summarizing its second quarter that it “took advantage of the collapse in volatility to purchase market protection” Put options represent the right to sell a set amount of stock at a set price to another investor in the future and become more valuable as the price of the underlying security declines.
 announced a similar-sized purchase of Tokyo Electron Ltd, RF Micro Devices Inc.
 His wife, Shelly Sterling, went to court to compel him to sell the franchise he purchased in 1981 for $125 million, and Ballmer’s acquisition became official last week.
 The increase was driven by the addition of NV Energy, Nevada’s largest electric utility, which Berkshire purchased in December.
 The purchase is expected to add more than 15 cents to earnings per share in 2015, Kansas City-based Cerner said.
 Driving Consolidation Today’s purchase comes as independent power producers, which don’t own regulated utility businesses, seek to expand holdings to capitalize on economies of scale.
 The purchases include plants that burn gas, coal and oil and are located in Massachusetts, Connecticut, Pennsylvania, Illinois and Ohio.
 advised on the purchase from Duke, Dynegy said.
 The media company controlled by billionaire Sumner Redstone raised its quarterly dividend earlier this month and doubled its share-repurchase program to $6 billion.
 CBS’s share repurchase program is “manageable and unlikely to weaken its credit profile,” the ratings company said today in a release.
 “Here’s a company who understands the customer doesn’t care about channels, the customer wants to get what they want, when they want it, however they want it” Designer Goods The acquisition is similar to the company’s 2011 purchase of HauteLook Inc, the flash-sales site that sells discounted designer goods for limited periods of time.
 Doerr is betting that companies seeking to cut facilities costs will flock to Enlighted’s products and will be able to fund purchases from their initial savings on energy bills.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 459 percent of the bonds at the sale, compared with an average of 44 percent for the past 10 sales.
 The company also said it expects to complete a 420 million-pound share repurchase program in the second half.
 Visiting the city during the final days of the summer sale season in July, he purchased a Loewe handbag for his wife, only to discover he could have paid less in Hong Kong.
 He also bet that agency MBS prices would increase even as government purchases of the securities declined because of less issuance.
 The investor’s contemporary art purchases have included works by Mondrian and Jasper Johns.
 Part of the dispute centers around financing for the purchase by Artie T, with the family asking him to pledge the company’s stores and real estate as collateral for funds -- something he has resisted -- two people said.
 The purchase was partly funded by loans that lenders now say must be guaranteed by Copeinca, according to S&P.
 Foreign purchases of Australian assets are on track this year to reach to the highest level since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 also invested; and the $309 billion purchase of casino operator Harrah’s Entertainment Inc, now Caesars Entertainment Corp, which Apollo co-led.
 Rather than falling back on share repurchases to boost earnings, Pfizer should have done a deal by now, SunTrust Banks Inc.
 Some shareholders say they’d rather see Pfizer use its cash to repurchase stock than make a bet on a large acquisition.
 Jefferies on March 27 maintained its buy rating and raised its price target on Citic Pacific to HK$1710 from HK$1390 after Bloomberg first reported the possible asset purchases.
 The Fed is on pace to wind down its third round of asset purchases in October after two years of buying Treasury and mortgage securities.
 Major stock purchases can boost shares of target companies, as happened last year when Buffett disclosed a $37 billion stake in Exxon Mobil Corp.
 While Alfa describes the share purchases as a “financial investment,” the San Pedro Garza Garcia, Mexico-based company’s actions boost the chances of a takeover, according to Monex Casa de Bolsa.
 Pacific Rubiales investment could be part of that structure” Share Rally Alfa’s purchase of Pacific Rubiales stock is a financial investment that may go up or down depending on markets, the performance of Pacific Rubiales or the economy, spokesman Enrique Flores said May 21.
 Caesars was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 debt sales purchased 448 percent of the notes, the least since February, as investors in a category that includes pension funds and insurers bought the most since June.
 Indirect bidders, a group of investors that include foreign central banks, purchased 362 percent of the notes, versus an average of 326 percent at the past 10 sales.
 Cutrale, a closely held juice maker controlled by Brazil’s Jose Luis Cutrale, is partnering with banks owned by Joseph Safra, the country’s second-richest man, to buy Chiquita and cancel its purchase of Fyffes.
 central bank remains on pace to wind down its monthly bond purchases in October.
 Axa sealed its purchase of a 50 percent stake in Shanghai-based Tian Ping in February to add about 4 million clients and sell auto insurance by phone or online nationwide in China, the world’s largest car market.
 The central bank remains on pace to wind down its monthly bond purchases in October.
 Draghi has said that while he doesn’t expect deflation, ECB officials are unanimous in their willingness to deploy additional measures such as broad-based asset purchases if needed.
 The purchase of Cabot Circus, about 115 miles (185 kilometers) west of London, also includes a stake in homes, a hotel and student accommodation, Paris-based Axa Real Estate Investment Managers said in a statement today.
 The Finance Department has tightened rules around mortgage insurance in a bid to cool a housing market that the International Monetary Fund called “a key vulnerability” There’s been no similar government intervention in the auto market, where longer-term loans are fueling purchases, according to Equifax Canada Co.
 India represented 25 percent of global demand last year andoverseas purchases fell 43 percent in the first half of 2014because of the curbs, World Gold Council data showed Aug.
 Ocwen’s purchases of servicing rights includes a deal with a bankrupt unit of Ally Financial Inc, in which it still needs to bring on 250,000 Ginnie Mae-related loans.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- A ruling on freezing the assets of Petroleo Brasileiro SA’s chief executive officer in connection with a probe into the purchase of a refinery in Texas was delayed after a report she transferred apartments to family members.
 Petrobras’s purchase of a refinery in Pasadena, Texas, has come under increasing scrutiny months before an October presidential election amid overpricing allegations.
 Hitachi Metals Hitachi Metals advanced 32 percent to 1,790 yen after announcing plans to pay $13 billion for Waupaca Foundry, the largest-ever purchase for the Japanese specialty metals producer.
 technology companies excluded from some state purchases as tensions between the countries escalated over assertions of hacking and cyberspying.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 “If you’re not in the installed base it’s hard to get it in, because no one takes stuff out and puts your stuff in, there’s just too much at risk” Dresser-Rand would give Kaeser the largest system of compressors in America and complement Siemens’ pending $13 billion purchase of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy aero-derivative gas turbine and compressor business, said Bergner of Gabelli, a unit of Gamco Investors Inc.
 Plastic Prices “Increased purchase prices were linked to higher costs for metals, plastics and timber,” Markit said.
 Barrera collected about $2,453 a month on the bank’s insurance policy, which was purchased through Gallagher Bassett, a subsidiary of Arthur J.
 The Stoxx 600 rallied 21 percent this week as investors bet that industrial slowdown in the euro area will increase pressure on the European Central Bank to introduce asset purchases known as quantitative easing.
 The central bank reiterated that it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
 “The expectation for tomorrow is that Yellen is not going to say anything dramatic that’s going to be different from what she’s said before” Among other data today, purchases of previously owned US.
 Under the plan, Hertz issued one preferred share purchase right for each share of common stock as of the close of business on Jan.
 The Fed is on pace to wind down its bond purchases in October, and intends to keep the benchmark interest rate low for a “considerable time” after that.
 television network, reported second-quarter profit that topped analysts’ estimates, buoyed by share repurchases.
 Loss Forecast Goldman Sachs Group Inc, which is one of the six senior banks managing Alibaba’s IPO, advised the company on its purchase of the ChinaVision stake, according to a March filing.
 in revenue, including last year’s purchase of Kayak Software Corp.
 With the purchase of the convertible bond, Priceline has the right to name an observer to Ctrip’s board.
 A report yesterday showed retail sales were little changed in July, the worst performance in six months, as purchases at department, furniture and electronics stores fell.
 Disney also is in the second year of a rollout of electronic wristbands that make purchases easier in the parks.
 For Brummels, the confusion means he worries the cane varieties he purchased from LSU may no longer qualify.
 In 2008, Berkshire agreed to help finance the chemical maker’s purchase of Rohm & Haas, paying $3 billion for preferred shares that can be converted into common stock.
 The 58-year-old billionaire said opportunities to buy real estate in the region won’t last much longer and that he’s looking to purchase sites that can be developed to serve people he expects to move there because of the legislation.
 Borrowing in dollars to fund purchases of lira debt lost 13 percent this month, second only to the ruble in developing Europe and Africa.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The panel decided to reduce monthly bond buying by $10 billion for the sixth straight time, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 The company, the region’s largest express shipper by sales, built the multifloor building and complex, called Haneda Chronogate, with about 200,000 square meters (22 million square feet) of sorting space, more than double the size of its next-biggest site, to enable same day delivery of Internet purchases in most parts of the country.
 The cost of sales rose 38 percent to 53 billion rand ($501 million) in the year ended June 30 after operating expenses, purchased metal concentrates and refining costs increased, Northam said.
 “We’d like to see further concessions from the current levels” Auction Demand At the previous auction of the maturity on July 10, investors submitted orders to purchase 24 times the amount of debt available, in line with the average for the past 10 offerings.
 Indirect bidders, the investor class that includes central banks outside the US, purchased 532 percent of the securities, the most in more than eight years.
 Chinese and Indian refiners bolstered purchases of West African crude to the highest in at least three years, a Bloomberg News survey of traders indicates.
 For Starwood Waypoint, the loan purchases are a “great channel” for acquiring homes at a discount, said Gary Beasley, the company’s co-chief executive officer.
 The purchase was primarily funded through the company’s $500 million credit facility with Deutsche Bank AG, according to the statement.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Etihad Airways PJSC signed a 176 billion-euro ($24 billion) deal to purchase 49 percent of Alitalia SpA, giving the Gulf company access to one of Europe’s biggest travel markets and providing a lifeline to Italy’s unprofitable former flag-carrier.
 The accord forms the biggest in a string of equity stakes purchase by Etihad in carriers spanning Australia to Ireland which have seen the Gulf airline pitch itself as a “rescue investor” for ailing operators.
 The Italian purchase will let Hogan tap a major European economy with a large population that’s recently attracted new flights from airlines spanning low-cost operator EasyJet Plc to Emirates, the biggest carrier on international routes.
 We are finally starting to see the payoff of that” The company’s strategic shift is changing the way its users make purchases.
 In May, the company expanded its in-store payments business with a new service called Gnome that helps merchants identify customers with the company’s coupons and let them pay for purchases using Apple Inc’s iPad mini.
 Earlier this year, the company completed its purchase of South Korean e-commerce marketplace Ticket Monster Inc.
 The burden would be on the company to demonstrate that it is not material” Alibaba, which has been on an acquisition spree of late, has cautioned that integration of its new purchases could cause problems.
 inflation weakened to the slowest pace in five months in July, a report showed yesterday, holding below the Fed’s target and giving policy makers room to keep interest rates low well after the projected end of asset purchases in October.
 Consumer spending in the first three months grew at the weakest pace in five years and June purchases rose less than forecast, climbing 02 percent, Commerce Department data show.
 Sunrun agreed to purchase from 50 megawatts to 100 megawatts of REC’s panels next year, the San Francisco-based developer said today in a statement.
 Last year’s purchase of Kayak Software Corp.
 While the company moves forward with plans for an Australian coal sale, it will look at purchases of onshore oil acreage in Texas, Louisiana and Alaska, he said.
 The Wing Hang purchase will enable OCBC to offer banking services to Chinese companies expanding in Southeast Asia.
 India represented 25 percent of global demand last year and overseas purchases fell 43 percent in the first half of 2014 because of the curbs, World Gold Council data showed Aug.
 Overseas purchases may total 750 tons in the financial year that began on April 1 as traders boost shipments to meet festival demand starting next month, said Rajan Venkatesh, managing director for bullion at ScotiaMocatta India, a unit Bank of Nova Scotia.
 The company also announced a reorganization of its divisions and said it would tighten control of Santiago-based power group Enersis through the purchase of the 606 percent owned by Endesa.
 and Iraq” The Bank of Thailand kept its one-day bond repurchase rate at 2 percent on Aug.
 The proposal lays the groundwork for a market in which bond buyers’ contracts to purchase mortgage debt could be filled by either Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac notes, FHFA officials said on a conference call with reporters.
 No agreement on a purchase of the century-old unit has been reached, Stockholm-based Electrolux said in a statement.
 “The labor market continues to improve, interest rates are low, affordability is high” Survey Results The median forecast of 74 economists in a Bloomberg survey projected purchases would cool to a 502 million pace last month.
 “It’s jobs and wages, it’s traditional homebuyers and particularly first-time buyers” Existing home sales, which are tabulated when a purchase contract closes, are recovering from a 13-year low of 411 million in 2008 after reaching a record 708 million in 2005.
 Propelled by rising corporate profits, the purchases of short-haul planes follow a comeback for the roomy aircraft used for global flying by big companies including Exxon Mobil Corp.
 “Everyone was so traumatized by the events of 2007 to 2009, they’re being very conservative” Kimbrell Hughes, a spokeswoman for Ralph Lauren Corp, declined to comment on the Falcon 2000EX purchase.
 technology companies from publicly-funded purchases and reviewed reliance on foreign products as tensions escalate between the countries over claims of hacking and cyberspying.
 was excluded from a government purchase of energy-efficient computers.
 The company also shows video in convenience stores and in taxi cabs in cities like New York, offering advertisers a way to reach consumers in new places and to spur purchases.
 In February, Mubadala and commodities trader Trafigura Beheer BV completed the purchase of a controlling stake in Batista’s Sudeste port in Rio state for $400 million, gaining a foothold to export iron ore.
 Its purchases deepen its presence in the US.
 Dynegy will be adding about $5 billion in debt to fund its latest purchases, more than twice the company’s current level.
 Dynegy said the purchase will more than double its adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization and increase its free cash flow per share by 220 percent by next year.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases weekly schedule.
 A negative yield means investors who buy a security and hold it until it matures will receive less than they paid to purchase it.
 Snowden Residency Last month Russia’s Interior Ministry offered a 39 million-ruble contract to study how to crack the Tor anonymous network and get technical information on users and their equipment, according to an announcement on the government’s website for state purchases.
 The purchase turned into an albatross.
 BA’s purchase of L’Avion, which was completed in July 2008, gave the UK.
 The announcement of the purchase came less than two weeks after OpenSkies began flying in June 2008.
 OCBC Chief Executive Officer Samuel Tsien said this week that he’ll look to sell “non-core” assets following the Wing Hang purchase.
 Caesars was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 The Hungarian company, scheduled to report second-quarter earnings tomorrow, has risen 15 percent this year on bets its parent may offer to buy outstanding shares after a similar step in the Czech Republic and other purchases in eastern Europe.
 7, after large swings on contradictory government statements about a possible state purchase.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian Natural Resources Ltd, the nation’s largest heavy-oil producer, said second-quarter production surged after it completed the purchase of Devon Energy Corp.
 Canadian Natural closed on the C$313 billion ($286 billion) purchase of Devon’s conventional assets in Western Canada in April, boosting the amount of natural gas it produces.
 The company will use $50 million of the proceeds from the private sale to buy back shares from the note acquirers as part of a previously announced $150 million repurchase program, according to a statement yesterday.
 The proceeds will also fund hedge and warrant transactions to cover the AOL shares underlying the notes, and could pay for additional stock repurchases, acquisitions or other transactions.
 Motor vehicle purchases cooled last month, falling 02 percent from June, today’s figures showed.
 14 so it can analyze multiple purchase offers it received.
 Electoral Clash Washington’s dueling initiatives represent the only electoral clash over gun purchases in November.
 Indirect bidders, the investor class that includes central banks outside the US, purchased 563 percent of the notes sold.
 Mercedes also works to leverage its classic-car business: helping enthusiasts buy parts, arrange restorations and make purchases.
 He has said large-scale asset purchases, or quantitative easing, are an option for dealing with a severe economic shock.
 Infineon, based near Munich, expects to complete the purchase by early 2015, subject to regulatory approval.
 During the battle for Alstom, Kaeser bought the gas turbine business of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc, and he pledges more purchases.
 In Seoul, the Bank of Korea cut its seven-day repurchase rate to 225 percent from 25 percent on Aug.
 Yuan positions at Chinese financial institutions accumulated from foreign-exchange purchases, a barometer of fund flows, climbed 378 billion yuan ($61 billion) in July from a month earlier.
 Saras, based in Milan, was scheduled to start a trading joint venture in April with its partner, which was delayed to the summer following the purchase by Rosneft of Morgan Stanley’s oil-trading business.
 The curve is steepening as the Fed scales back its purchases of Treasuries, Bill Gross, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund at Pacific Investment Management Co, said in a post on Twitter.
 That brought purchases to $25 billion, from $85 billion last year, on pace to end the program by October.
 The Fed is on pace to wind down its monthly bond purchases in October, and intends to keep the benchmark interest rate low for a “considerable time” after that.
 The terms of the purchase weren’t disclosed.
 on its $159 billion purchase of US.
 Before the loss of Flight 370, the carrier had anticipated ordering as many as 100 jets and was considering a range of models from both Airbus Group NV and Boeing Co, a person familiar with the purchase strategy said in February.
 Birthday Calls He started ISI in 1991 after Germany’s Deutsche Bank AG bought the British investment bank that had purchased CJ Lawrence in the mid-1980s.
 Evercore may eliminate some jobs after the purchase, a person with knowledge of the agreement said.
 Relative Value Treasuries were supported yesterday as Mario Draghi said in a speech in Jackson Hole that the European Central Bank is ready to add more stimulus as pressure mounts on the euro region’s policy makers for radical measures such as bond purchases to spur a slumping economy.
 Those purchases were part of strategy to shift capital to regions with higher premium growth prospects including Brazil, India, Indonesia, Mexico and China.
 It sold 75 percent of its parking unit in June having earlier completed the purchase of airport operator ANA-Aeroportos de Portugal SA.
 Terms of the purchase of UN.
 KKR, run by Henry Kravis and his cousin George Roberts, purchased the roll-on, roll-off freight company for about 910 million euros in 2007 in what was the New York firm’s sole Turkish acquisition.
 The revenue figure represents a 35 percent gain since the KKR purchase, Turkey’s biggest-ever private equity deal at the time.
 The company also today said it’s increasing its share repurchase authorization to as much as $150 million until the end of fiscal 2016.
 “How do you make people decide to buy art? After all, it’s a discretionary purchase,” said Almgren, whose new online venture, Artfinder, allows customers to buy art directly from little-known artists.
 The purchase is expected to be completed this year and should boost earnings per share in 2015, Ingersoll-Rand said today in a statement.
 Now we’re seeing it in the headline retail data” While Brazil’s government in July began phasing out IPI excise tax cuts for appliance sales, it extended through year-end the reduction for the purchase of vehicles.
 The company has taken steps this year to bolster its online content as it seeks to compete with Alibaba, announcing plans to purchase stakes in Chinese online retailer JDcom Inc.
 Home Built “By the end of this year, there won’t be any more Cisco boxes in our offices,” said Sezer, who in previous years had purchased hundreds of products from Cisco for these jobs.
 The company has more than doubled its annual dividend during Rasulo’s tenure, while financing capital spending and earmarking as much as $8 billion for stock repurchases.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Wells Fargo & Co’s mortgage business, the largest in the US, is looking to halt a revenue slump by sweetening the payoff for employees amid a shift to new home purchases.
 “This creates that little extra incentive” Banks, facing the end of a refinancing surge that once propelled earnings, are now vying to fund purchases for new homes, a business that typically requires more effort, close ties to real estate agents and a referral network.
 Mortgages for new home purchases are increasing.
 “Some of the guys who were purchase-oriented could make 50 to 60 basis points at Wells Fargo or 120 to 140 at an independent shop” ‘Selling Yourself’ For Mike Rose, pay was a significant part of the decision to leave Wells Fargo in May.
 Lopez bought his first stake in Comcel in 1993 and increased his ownership to 45 percent after several share purchases.
 The agencies had an incentive to purchase insurance with high premiums because they earned higher commissions, according to the department.
 Overseas investors purchased a net $344 million of Thailand’s bonds and equities this week as of yesterday, exchange data show, as consumer confidence rose to an 11-month high.
 Foreign investors may increase purchases of US.
 “The buyer’s or seller’s only options are to 1) agree to this nightmare; 2) forgo the sale or purchase they wanted to consummate; or 3) fire their sales person,” Coldwell Banker’s attorneys said in a court filing.
 eventually won a bidding war for Hillshire, which backed away from the purchase of Pinnacle Foods.
 last week said it wasn’t going to use a purchase of Alliance Boots GmbH to move its legal address abroad.
 Schenker said it purchased “millions of dollars of US.
 A stronger ringgit makes palm oil purchases more expensive for holders of other currencies.
 banker Lloyd Pengilly, last month completed the $110 million purchase of AngloGold’s Navachab mine in Namibia.
 may announce a spinoff of assets estimated to be worth as much as $12 billion next week, as the world’s biggest mining company casts aside operations acquired in the 2001 purchase of Billiton Plc.
 ‘Viable Vehicles’ The government must address the differing stamp duties for purchase and sale of assets in India, which currently range from 5 percent to as high as 14 percent across the country, depending on the city, he said.
 The Reserve Bank of India’s benchmark repurchase rate is at 8 percent, the highest after Pakistan among 11 Asian economies tracked by Bloomberg.
 The company bought the projects as part of a $37 billion purchase of Riversdale Mining Ltd.
 Still, he doesn’t see GE’s purchase as an immediate threat as Alstom hasn’t typically competed with Siemens, Mitsubishi and GE in large-scale gas turbines.
 While GE beds down its purchase over 12 to 18 months he hopes to see Mitsubishi Hitachi Power Systems “rising smoothly” In terms of immediate expansion, Miyanaga said he expects additional work from Boeing as it produces more Dreamliner 787s and the new 777 series.
 Also, the economic management is quite likely to change after the elections and investors were quite happy with the current crew” Borrowing in dollars to fund purchases of lira debt lost 05 percent this month, second only to the ruble in developing Europe and Africa.
 In its proposal, the FDA asked whether it should exempt premium cigars such as Davidoff Cigars made by Oettinger Davidoff AG based on the industry’s argument that users don’t inhale and the products aren’t purchased by youth.
 The purchase adds consumer-health products as Meda seeks to double in size.
 Frustrated in their attempt to find a company to buy, the partners took a tip from an investment banker and purchased debt-laden soda maker Hansen Natural Corp.
 The pair raised more than $5 million from friends and family, bought a publicly traded shell company and spent two years looking to purchase a business to operate.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Kunoch Holdings, a private-equity firm, completed the purchase of a Diamond Bank Plc stake from Actis LLP and CDC Group Plc for an undisclosed price.
 finance chief Sushovan Hussain shouldn’t beallowed to challenge its deal with investors to sue him over an$88 billion loss tied to HP’s purchase of Autonomy.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP-controlled Albertsons boosted the interest rate it will pay on about $46 billion of loans by as much as 075 percentage point for its purchase of grocer Safeway Inc, among the biggest deals this year where funding costs have risen.
 The timing can hardly be worse for junk-rated borrowers that need to finance purchases in what stands to be the busiest year for deals since before the credit crisis.
 “An increasing number are offering wider spreads or larger discounts to lenders” Endemol, the Dutch television producer being purchased by Apollo in a debt restructuring, increased the discount on its loans.
 Sterling’s wife, Shelly Sterling, went to court to compel him to sell the franchise he purchased in 1981 for $125 million, and Ballmer’s acquisition became official last week.
 shut the Coffeyville refinery in Kansas after a fire July 29, reducing purchases from Cushing, Oklahoma, the delivery point for New York futures.
 The purchase will make Dallas-based ClubCorp, which already owned or operated 159 courses, almost five times the size of its next largest competitor in the US.
 Federal Reserve isn’t allowed to purchase stocks.
 The largest Chinese cities of Beijing, Shanghai, Shenzhen and Guangzhou are expected to maintain their home-purchase limits in the short term even after most “lower-tier” cities recently relaxed property curbs, according to four of five analysts interviewed by Bloomberg News last week.
 analyst Ryan Li said first-tier cities may retain home purchase restrictions, while easing implementation of some limits, while Citigroup Inc.
 The breakdown in talks follows comments two day ago by Deputy Prime Minister Ali Babacan, responsible for banking and the Treasury, that the government would welcome the purchase of Asya by state-owned TC Ziraat Bankasi AS.
 Toledo, Ohio-based Health Care REIT also agreed to acquire 17 rehabilitation communities under development by Mainstreet Property Group, the company that formed HealthLease in 2012, and entered a development deal that includes gaining purchase rights to 45 other projects.
 Health Care REIT’s purchase demonstrates the company’s “integral role in the health-care delivery continuum,” Chief Executive Officer Tom DeRosa said in a statement.
 China, which purchases 67 percent of the seaborne ore, is forecast to expand this year at the weakest pace since 1990.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Barclays Plc can keep about $6 billion of assets related to its 2008 purchase of brokerage operations from Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc, an appeals court ruled, as the fallout from the biggest US.
 The transfer of the brokerage’s margin assets was included in the purchase agreement and confirmed in a clarification letter to the sale contract, the US.
 “We need a strong international partnership” Air Namibia already has a code-share agreement with Kenya Airways Ltd, sub-Saharan Africa’s third-biggest carrier, a special purchase deal with Deutsche Lufthansa AG, the European No.
 A decision to skip a widely anticipated share purchase will disappoint investors, who had expected a $3 billion buyback, Citigroup Inc.
 Fetisov’s purchase of 02 percent of Altimo from the bank was legitimate, Pylayev said by phone from Moscow.
 Michaels said he sees a “strong possibility” Boeing will change its spare-parts strategy and may make a major purchase.
 The Atlanta-based airline bought 23 MD-80 aircraft last year from Sweden’s SAS AB for this purpose and has selectively purchased others, said Michael Thomas, a spokesman.
 BT transfered the longevity risk to an affiliated insurer, which then purchased the coverage from Prudential, according to a statement last month.
 Visteon Corp, the car-parts supplier, agreed last month to purchase an annuity from Prudential to cover $350 million of pension obligations.
 Terms of the purchase weren’t disclosed.
 That adds to the $839 billion it purchased in July, the most since at least October 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Rome-based utility completed the purchase of 66 percent stake in Slovenske on April 28, 2006, or 19 months after it won the tender for the stake, beating Czech Republic’s CEZ AS.
 He’s also been more active in acquisitions, including spending $3 billion to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 Selling expenses rose 53 percent in the quarter, primarily on the price increase in Argentine peso terms for crude oil purchased domestically, YPF said in the filing.
 The service, which also comes with early access aimed at competitive players as well as rebates on online purchases, will also be sold via GameStop Corp.
 The central bank remains on pace to wind down its monthly bond purchases in October.
 agreed to pay $315 billion to repurchase residential mortgage-backed securities to resolve federal claims tied to the sale of the bonds to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 While the idea was that the purchasers would be compensated by Argentina early next year, the talks also stalled because the government wouldn’t provide sufficient guarantees for an eventual buyback of the bonds, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the discussions were private.
 “Al Jazeera America wants to give itself a discount on the purchase price that was agreed to nearly two years ago,” David Boies, a lawyer for Gore, said in a statement.
 with the $16 billion purchase of American Life Insurance Co.
 A volley of measures introduced in June will take time to work, and policy makers have so far shied away from wheeling out a full-scale asset-purchase program.
 The ECB president has said that an external shock that derails the baseline scenario of a gradual recovery in prices would require broad-based asset purchases, or quantitative easing.
 Fellow council member Ardo Hansson told Bloomberg News on July 16 that there’s no immediate need for large-scale bond purchases.
 The Fed, ending a policy meeting the same day, trimmed the pace of monthly bond purchases by $10 billion for a sixth consecutive meeting.
 said it extended its offer to purchase Allergan Inc.
 It’s seeking to raise about $2 billion from four loans to fund plane purchases, people familiar with the matter said in March.
 Developers are responding with sales delays and discounts as well as incentives including no-down-payment purchases and buyback guarantees.
 Twenty-eight Chinese cities have eased home-purchase curbs through Aug.
 The purchases don’t signal a change in policy, it said.
 would consider purchases to maintain the issue size of current debt maturities sold in case revenue projections change.
 With the share repurchase, Fox’s earnings per share will climb to about $250, the person said.
 Fed Watch Limited price pressures give the Fed room to maintain an accommodative position as they scale back their monthly bond purchases, which are on pace to end in October.
 ‘Stay Connected’ “This is an opportunity to stay connected to a property after the initial purchase,” said Sharga, who now has the same title at Auctioncom LLC, the largest US.
 and the Abu Dhabi Investment Authority to purchase the headquarters space at Time Warner Inc.
 Unlike private-equity firms, which are under pressure to invest limited partners’ funds, Buffett has the benefit of Berkshire’s long-term shareholders who support his refusal to rush an acquisition or stock purchase.
 The purchase is the largest by Swiss Life in asset management, according to Frost.
 CLOs that purchased widely syndicated loans and were graded by Moody’s between January 1996 and May 2012 lost any of their principal at maturity, according to a report two years ago from the credit rater.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Last month, the company hired banks to raise the equivalent of $56 billion, the most since the acquisition of Corus Group Plc in 2007, to refinance debt taken to fund the purchase of European steelmaker.
 Online shopping may reach 16 percent of retail sales by 2017, driven by increased mobile purchases.
 They include Forrest’s May acquisition of Harvey Beef, Western Australia’s only licensed beef exporter to China, and Hancock’s purchase of a 50 percent share last month in two cattle stations, or ranches, in Western Australia’s West Kimberley.
 The fund’s actual withdrawals or deposits may differ from Morningstar’s estimates because of the timing of purchases and redemptions or dividend distributions.
 RetailMeNot provides online deals that enable users to purchase discounted goods.
 Jay Wintrob, who Hancock beat for the top job, joined AIG as part of its 1999 purchase of SunAmerica and runs the US.
 The purchase gives OCBC increased access to the Greater China region, enabling the lender to offer more banking services to Chinese companies in Southeast Asia and target Wing Hang’s customers for its private bank.
 The purchase reduces the capital ratio because the goodwill OCBC pays for the acquisition will be deducted from common equity and the lender will also have to absorb additional risk-weighted assets from Wing Hang.
 The Wing Hang purchase is the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS, OCBC’s biggest domestic rival, offered $54 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 It is seeking an order rescinding Pershing Square’s purchase of the shares.
 Parker joined Barclays through the British bank’s purchase of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 The slowdown in purchases followed a 02 percent advance in June, the Commerce Department reported yesterday in Washington.
 Larger Stake Coca-Cola has the right to purchase as much as 25 percent of Monster, whose directors would have to approve any larger investment.
 The bank “caused the church trusts to lose approximately $13 million in value as a result of JPMorgan’s decisions to purchase over 177 different investment products, mostly from itself, using church funds,” between July 2004 and December 2013, the plaintiffs said in the complaint.
 Selling expenses rose 53 percent in the quarter, primarily on the price increase in Argentine peso terms for crude oil purchased domestically, YPF said in the filing.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Edison International utility Southern California Edison agreed to purchase 457 megawatts of capacity from three 8minutenergy Renewables LLC solar projects in Southern California.
 No inflation and weaker activity data adds to expectations of a broad-based ECB asset-purchase program.
 The company purchased its 49 percent stake in the Philippines’ largest airline from Tan two years ago for $500 million.
 Tan would need about $1 billion to buy back shares and cover advances for aircraft purchases, the newspaper said, citing unnamed people familiar with the business.
(Corrects to show that government departments can continue to purchase some Apple computers in third paragraph of story originally published Aug.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 technology company to be excluded from Chinese government purchases amid escalating tensions between the countries over claims of hacking and cyberspying.
 was shut out of a government purchase of energy-efficient computers.
 Microsoft said in May it was “surprised” to learn that its Windows 8 operating system was excluded from government purchases.
 Announcing plane purchases amid Dobrolet’s flight suspension signals Aeroflot’s determination to return the discount carrier to the skies in the face of EU penalties over the Ukraine crisis.
 He said at the time that the carrier didn’t plan additional jet purchases until Russia further liberalized its air-carriage rules.
 Alipay Critical More than 78 percent of purchases made on Alibaba’s platforms last year were processed through Alipay, according to the prospectus.
 and European Union imposed sanctions blocking the purchase of new bonds or stocks issued by the lenders.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Symrise AG will harness technology acquired in the $18 billion takeover of Diana Group, its largest purchase ever, to expand further into nutritional supplements.
 Still, “there are hopes of buying on the downside” should GPIF begin share purchases before announcing its new portfolio around September.
 Nestle said the stock repurchases will start this year and run into 2015.
 Nestle outperformed its main European rivals Unilever and Danone in first-half sales growth and is increasing its distance from them by returning cash to shareholders through repurchases.
 Nestle said today the buyback is “subject to market conditions and strategic opportunities” In 2011, the company completed a 10 billion-franc repurchase program that it began in 2010.
 Earnings Scorecard The central bank remains on pace to wind down its monthly bond purchases in October, while Fed Chair Janet Yellen has said officials will keep its benchmark interest rate low for a “considerable time” after that.
 It would be the plane leasing industry’s third multi-billion-dollar deal in the past 2 1/2 years, following Aercap Holdings NV’s purchase of International Lease Finance Corp.
 Envestra, Italy So far this year, Li’s companies have announced a A$24 billion ($22 billion) purchase of Australian natural gas distributor Envestra Ltd.
 Barra’s Challenges Following a bankruptcy reorganization in 2009, the automaker in 2010 purchased Fort Worth, Texas-based AmeriCredit Inc, which it renamed GM Financial, for $35 billion to write loans for subprime consumers and boost car sales.
 In late 2012, GM announced a deal to purchase Ally’s international operations to help expand GM Financial’s efforts overseas.
 That adds to the $839 billion it purchased in July, the most since at least October 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Growth in the support business was helped by the acquisition of Gibb Tools last year, and the purchase of Belfast-based port agent Michael F.
 Fund, designed to purchase stocks that benefit most from accelerating economic growth, returned 73 percent in the past year to beat 93 percent of peers tracked by Bloomberg.
 Purchasers who are required to pay the foreign buyer’s tax will be given a 1175 percent rebate, while local buyers will get a cashback equal to 85 percent of the purchase price, according to the Twelve Peaks website.
 The highest July reading since 2008 comes after the central bank lowered its benchmark one-week repurchase rate by 50 basis points to 825 percent on July 17, its third cut in as many months.
 Fucata SA will purchase all of NII’s equity interest in the Chilean unit, according to a filing today.
 finance chief Sushovan Hussain shouldn’t be allowed to challenge its deal with investors to sue him and company founder Michael Lynch over an $88 billion loss tied to its purchase of the software maker.
 Lynch has denied the claims and said Hewlett-Packard mishandled the purchase.
 ‘Seller’s Remorse’ “Wang was having seller’s remorse because he believed he had agreed to sell the Islanders for a price too low after hearing the unrelated news that a $2 billion bid was placed to purchase the Los Angeles Clippers of the National Basketball Association,” according to the suit.
 An all-stock purchase of Yahoo and a spinoff of the less desirable assets, such as the US.
 completed the A$215 billion purchase of David Jones it announced in April.
 The purchase will cost Ramsay 429 million euros ($5743million), it said in June.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- After years of using purchases of US.
 Even with the Fed tapering its monthly bond purchases on a pace that will end them in October, the Citigroup analysts say it’s time for index creators to reconsider their approach.
 “Big companies such as Vanke are better positioned than peers amid the downturn” China’s four-year efforts to rein in property prices have included home-purchase restrictions and higher mortgage rates.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 244 percent of the bonds, the most since October 2011.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 459 percent, compared with an average of 44 percent for the past 10 sales.
 The slowdown in purchases followed a 02 percent advance in June, the Commerce Department reported today in Washington.
 Considerable Time The economic strength had created concern that the Fed may be forced to act on rates sooner than anticipated, as the central bank remains on pace to wind down its monthly bond purchases in October.
 Three-rounds of bond purchases and record-low interest rates have helped push stocks higher by as much as 194 percent from a bear-market low in 2009.
 Data during the week showed fewer Americans than forecast applied for unemployment benefits, while purchases of previously owned US.
 Housing starts surged in July to the highest level in eight months and purchases of previously owned homes rose as low borrowing costs and an increase in inventory drew buyers.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee reiterated that it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
 TRIG said it funded the purchase partly from cash and partly through using a revolving acquisition facility from which it has now drawn about 40 million pounds.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Temasek Holdings Pte, Singapore’s state-owned investment firm, purchased US-listed stocks in Chinese technology and consumer firms backed by the country’s billionaires as it diversifies away from bank holdings.
 It also purchased a net 603,764 ADRs in security software maker Cheetah Mobile Inc, valued at $128 million.
 Among Temasek’s other transactions in US-listed companies in the second quarter was the purchase of 15 million shares in travel software and data company Sabre Corp.
 The clearance of the national-security review may also bode well for Lenovo’s separate $291 billion purchase of Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility unit.
 The breakup charge of about $200 million, according to one of the people, highlights the risk the Chinese company has chosen to bear for its largest-ever purchase.
 canceled plans to raise $42 billion in debt this week to finance its purchase of assets from Comcast Corp, according to a person familiar with the deal.
 Surpassing China India surpassed China in 2010 to become the world’s largest arms importer and relies on purchases from abroad for 70 percent of its weapons, according to the Stockholm International Peace Research Institute.
 Jaitley, the defense minister, approved 210 billion rupees ($34 billion) rupees in defense procurement last month, including naval ships, helicopters and transport aircraft, in an effort to expedite purchases.
 AT&T is eager to show it is bringing broadband competition to Google’s home turf, especially while its proposed $485 billion purchase of satellite carrier DirecTV is under review by regulators to determine how the deal will affect competition.
 The cable operator confirmed it aims to close the purchase of SFR by year-end.
 While farm purchases represent a fraction of the country’s $31 billion stock market and $64 billion of domestic government bonds, they ranked as the most attractive investment in a survey of 197 Czech and Slovak millionaires published by J&T Banka AS in June.
 I can reoffer it the day after at Christie’s or Sotheby’s and nobody should know it didn’t sell before” At Paddle8’s 10-day “Currency” auction, the seven purchased pieces tallied $14,950, a fraction of the $264,700 high target set by the auctioneer.
 The companies said they are building a platform for collectors and first-time buyers to browse and purchase items including art, jewelry and fine wine.
 equities are transitioning out of a recovery rally and into a period of lower returns as the benefits of margin expansion and share repurchases prove to be already priced in,” Glionna at Barclays wrote in an Aug.
 Mexico’s most acquisitive company over the last decade has reversed share declines this year amid another spate of purchases and joint ventures.
 The purchase of Time Warner Cable would give Comcast “an incredibly dominant position” because of its control of programming and subscribers, Cardenas said.
 “Sports is one of the largest cudgels Comcast has, and they just use it every way they can,” said Susan Crawford, a former White House aide and a Bloomberg View columnist whose book “Captive Audience” uses Comcast’s purchase of NBC Universal as a lens to examine the telecommunications market.
 The Fed is on pace to end its monthly bond purchases in October, and plans to keep rates low for a “considerable time” after that.
 Improvements in ROE were “driven by steady organic growth, accretion from recent M&A and pension closeout transactions, and ongoing share repurchases,” Jimmy Bhullar, an analyst at JPMorgan Chase & Co, said in a research note, using the company’s ticker symbol.
 “They are better priced than what they were two years ago, and we’ll take a long and hard look at those opportunities” While competitors concentrate on North America, state-owned oil companies have scaled back purchases, creating a more rational market, Coleman said, reiterating that the company is looking for investments of about $5 billion.
 Liberty Global, which owns cable operators from Hungary to the UK, and is waiting for European regulators to clear its purchase of Ziggo NV in the Netherlands, has been expanding into TV production and programs to drive growth as the number of worthwhile cable assets for acquisition in Europe dwindles.
 In July, Liberty Global bought a stake in ITV Plc, the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster with top-rated shows such as “Downton Abbey” The 64 percent investment was purchased from Rupert Murdoch’s British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc for 481 million pounds ($811 million), with Liberty Global saying it doesn’t plan to make a full takeover bid for now.
 Liberty Global has been waiting for European Union regulators to clear its 49 billion-euro ($66 billion) purchase of Dutch broadband provider Ziggo after agreeing to buy the company in January.
 Diller, 72, has expanded IAC with bolt-on acquisitions such as in 2012 of Aboutcom in 2012 for $300 million and last year’s $80 million purchase of ValueClick Inc.
 “The notion that any investor would purchase bonds that would essentially provide OSG with an interest-free loan following a payment default defies logic,” Bank of New York Mellon Corp, as the 875 percent debentures trustee, said in court papers filed Aug.
 over the 2012 purchase of hedge-fund firm Polygon Management LP.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- West Texas Intermediate oil tumbled to a seven-month low as investors sold September crude before expiration and purchased cheaper contracts for future delivery.
 Financial terms of the purchase weren’t disclosed.
 and Israel” The world’s richest country per capita has used wealth from the world’s third-largest natural gas reserves to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, Volkswagen AG and purchase London’s Harrods department store.
 The agreement announced today revised the original accord to enable Walgreen to make the purchase between yesterday and Feb.
 The company, which boosted its monthly property purchases by $40 million to $100 million last quarter, expects to buy more mortgages than homes this quarter, according to Beasley.
 Three years from now, will anybody be able to do that? My guess is probably not” Beasley’s Waypoint Homes was a pioneer in the rental-home industry, starting to purchase houses through distressed sales in 2009, several years before Wall Street-backed firms began aggressively buying in bulk.
 He also rejected a call to institute a dividend and rarely repurchases shares.
 will make a C$49 million ($45 million) payment to PetroChina Co, lowering the purchase price of the Dover oil-sands project in a bid to help complete the deal.
 And then there’s the many shareholders of Bank of America, who continue to suffer from that company’s disastrous purchase of Countrywide in 2008.
 The London-based petrochemical company said yesterday it will stop purchasing Iraqi crude after an ownership dispute arose associated with the recent shipments it purchased.
 “We have canceled further purchases and will not accept delivery of any of the affected crude until the matter is appropriately resolved,” the company said in a written statement.
 The policy-making Federal Open Market Committee announced July 30 that it would trim monthly asset purchases by another $10 billion, to $25 billion.
 The central bankers repeated that they’ll probably reduce purchases in “further measured steps” while keeping interest rates low for a “considerable time” Fed Chair Janet Yellen has highlighted uneven progress in the labor market in making the case for further accommodation.
 Valeant Pharmaceuticals International dropped 22 percent to C$11959 after extending its offer to purchase Allergan until the end of the year.
 Dynegy expects to sell $5 billion of new senior notes to help finance the purchase of power plants from Duke Energy Corp.
 Pressure is mounting on the euro region’s policy makers for radical measures such as bond purchases to spur a slumping economy.
 Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes, including the Wotifcom purchase, according to a regulatory filing.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 151 percent, versus an average of 178 percent at the past 10 auctions.
 Job growth has yet to stoke the type of wage gains needed to boost household purchases, a sign the economic expansion will probably not sustain the pickup in the second-quarter, when US.
 Much of Abil’s troubles stem from the purchase of furniture retailer Ellerine Holdings in 2008 for 92 billion rand, a move intended to help it find new clients and boost lending.
 Northern Star Resources Ltd, which has agreed deals worth $166 million since December, expects to extend the life of the Jundee mine purchased from Newmont in May and beat production forecasts at Australian operations acquired from Barrick.
 The Reserve Bank of India kept the benchmark repurchase rate at 8 percent as retail inflation slowed.
 The Anglo American unit put greater emphasis on buyers’ track records in making purchases at previous sales events, known as sights.
 The bank “caused the church trusts to lose approximately $13 million in value as a result of JPMorgan’s decisions to purchase over 177 different investment products, mostly from itself, using church funds,” from July 2004 to December 2013, the plaintiffs said in the complaint filed yesterday.
 Salesforce has acquired companies including the purchase in July of data management startup RelateIQ Inc, and e-mail marketing provider ExactTarget last year, and has struck partnerships including an agreement with Microsoft Corp.
 Limited price pressures give the Federal Reserve room to maintain an accommodative position as they scale back their monthly bond purchases, which are on pace to end in October.
 The index now includes prices received for services, government purchases, trade and construction.
 is no longer seeking to raise $42 billion of loans this week as part of an $89 billion financing to back its purchase of assets from Comcast Corp, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Charter, based in Stamford, Connecticut, has been seeking a total $89 billion of bank debt to back the asset purchase, including a $500 million revolving credit line and $84 billion of term loans, according to data compiled by Bloomberg and a Standard & Poor’s report on July 31.
 “Only when central banks start to discuss, in earnest, plans to reduce their asset holdings will we see a significant re-pricing of the bond market” Fed Minutes In minutes of the Federal Open Market Committee’s July meeting published this week, “many” officials said they may raise interest rates sooner than they had anticipated “if convergence toward the committee’s objectives occurred more quickly than expected” Officials trimmed monthly bond purchases to $25 billion at last month’s gathering.
 The deal will give Oceanwide access to the international capital markets and “facilitate sustainable development,” the Beijing-based purchaser said in a separate e-mailed statement dated yesterday.
 also invested; and the $309 billion purchase of casino operator Harrah’s Entertainment Inc, now Caesars Entertainment Corp, which Apollo co-led.
 Crescent, which owns 1908 percent of the Sharjah-based company, has won a Final Award for the merits phase of proceedings in relation to gas sales and a purchase contract with Iran’s NIOC, according to a Dana statement posted on Abu Dhabi stock market.
 Including debt, the purchase is worth $97 billion.
 Sweeney, citing the purchase of the Washington Post last year by Jeff Bezos, said there are many billionaires who could acquire the Los Angeles Times.
 Apollo Global Management LLC purchased Sprouts in 2011 and combined it with Henry’s Marketplace, another grocery chain that Boney had started in the 1960s and sold to Wild Oats.
 Radian purchased half of the protection in August 2013 and the rest in June, Chief Risk Officer Derek Brummer said today in an interview, after his Philadelphia-based firm disclosed the hedge on a conference call with analysts.
 Berkshire in November 2008 purchased $300 million of USG convertible notes, which were turned into stock on Dec.
 and European Union measures barring purchases of new bonds or stocks from Moscow-based lenders.
 The EU on July 31 blocked purchases of new equity and bonds issued by the banks.
 The policy-setting Federal Open Market Committee, which has held the main rate near zero since December 2008, said at its July 30 meeting it still sees “significant underutilization of labor resources” The FOMC also repeated it’s likely to cut the size of a bond-buying program in “further measured steps” and to keep rates low for a “considerable time” after purchases end.
 Policy makers continued to trim purchases that pumped up the Fed’s balance sheet to $441 trillion, tapering monthly bond buying to $25 billion in a sixth consecutive $10-billion cut and staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 “An overnight reverse repo facility could also play a useful part in setting a floor under money market rates’ Most FOMC participants agreed the interest rate on excess reserves that banks deposit at the Fed ‘‘should play a central role’’ Another tool, the overnight reverse repurchase facility, ‘‘could play a useful supporting role,’’ minutes show.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Japan, dependent on imports for almost all its fuel, is pursuing natural gas projects and energy purchases in Russia despite new sanctions last week designed to punish Vladimir Putin and his associates.
 home prices rose to a record last month, helped by Chancellor George Osborne’s loan program to make first-time purchases easier.
 HeidelbergCement shares have slumped about 40 percent since the purchase of the UK’s third-biggest cement maker.
 economy grew faster than forecast in the second quarter and the Fed trimmed the monthly pace of bond purchases for the sixth consecutive policy meeting, while saying the threat of deflation is easing.
 Policy makers reduced the Fed’s monthly pace of debt purchases by $10 billion to $25 billion, on pace to end the stimulus program this year.
 and Deutsche Bank AG are nearing an agreement to purchase the buyout arm of National Bank of Greece SA, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Jackson Hole Policy makers at the Fed’s July 29-30 meeting trimmed monthly bond purchases to $25 billion while keeping the benchmark interest-rate target in a range of zero to 025 percent, where it’s been since December 2008.
 Bernanke signaled new rounds of bond purchases that have pumped up the Fed’s balance sheet to a record $44 trillion.
 Stock Buyback Fox, which instead authorized a $6 billion stock repurchase yesterday, rose 38 percent to $3221 as of 12:06 pm.
 The company also recently purchased LiveRail to help distribute video ads across the Web.
 While talks between Argentine officials and the holdouts broke down last week, triggering a second default in 13 years, Reuters cited yesterday anonymous sources in reporting that international banks may come to an agreement with the holdouts as soon as next week to purchase their securities.
 By contrast, no merchandise from Levi’s, which has a deal to distribute its apparel on Amazon, can be purchased from a reseller.
 In total, Amazon accounts for about one in four e-commerce purchases in the US, so its merchandising decisions have widespread implications for the consumer-goods market, according to L2.
 Amazon collects a roughly 15 percent commission on each purchase from a reseller, according to Forrester.
 Ahold is open to purchases in the US.
 The Fed is poised to end its bond purchases by October and futures contracts show that traders anticipate the benchmark rate will rise to 064 percent at the end of next year.
 will let advertisers know where a promotion was first viewed and when it led to a purchase by tracking users between their electronic devices, a tool that may reignite privacy concerns.
 With the new cross-device service announced today, Facebook is aiming to prove that mobile ads can lead to purchases, even if those purchases aren’t necessarily made on a smartphone.
 “Data continues to be quite weak, and this in turn is fueling quantitative-easing expectations,” said Felix Herrmann, an analyst at DZ Bank AG in Frankfurt, referring to a central-bank policy of asset purchases to kickstart growth and fuel inflation.
 Shenzhen will stick to its home-purchase limits, the Shenzhen Urban Planning, Land and Resources Commission said on its microblog yesterday.
 That may result in the purchase of more than 100 restaurants in 2014, he said.
 Trafigura’s Puma Energy last year purchased two companies that will give it more than 200 pump stations in Australia.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- African Bank Investments Ltd, South Africa’s largest provider of unsecured loans, said its purchase of a furniture retailer waylaid management and hurt bank profit resulting in losses, resignations and writedowns.
 “In the second quarter we shall hopefully have applied for and received an investment grade rating” McConville and Chief Executive Officer Clive Bannister, hired in 2011, are seeking to reduce debt and refinance at lower cost after Phoenix’s purchase of Resolution Plc for 5 billion pounds in 2007.
 FleetCor plans to finance the purchase with about $24 billion of new debt and issue about 73 million of its shares to Ceridian LLC, which owns Comdata, the Norcross, Georgia-based buyer said yesterday in a statement.
 In May, the New York-based company announced an initiative to purchase buildings including industrial, office, retail and restaurant properties.
 sold $700 million of bonds, boosted from a previously marketed $600 million, Bloomberg data show, with the proceeds to help fund share repurchases according to a regulatory filing.
 Economic Data Draghi has said large-scale asset purchases are an option for dealing with a severe economic shock, leaving investors seeking clarification on what the trigger could be.
 The incident is another setback for UPS, which missed some promised Christmas deliveries in 2013 when the company couldn’t keep pace with a surge of last-minute online purchases.
 Management and owners of OAO Lukoil, the country’s biggest non-government oil producer, are also increasing stock repurchases, regulatory filings show.
 The company repurchased $130 million through April, or one-fifth of the total, according to a May 27 statement on the company’s website.
 Management and owners of Lukoil are intensifying stock purchases, regulatory filings show.
 He declined to say if the company plans to purchase more.
 One of the reasons Burbank, California-based Disney purchased Marvel for more than $4 billion was to bolster its products for boys and young men.
 South African retailers are struggling as high unemployment and inflation force shoppers to cut down on major purchases.
 climbed to an all-time high as purchases of big-ticket items like appliances helped second-quarter profit top analysts’ estimates and led the company to raise its annual earnings forecast.
 Rising home prices are encouraging consumers to spend more on renovations while improved weather spurred purchases of yard merchandise that shoppers passed up earlier in the year because of a late spring.
 Home Depot’s mention of more orders for expensive purchases such as counter-top installations bodes well, she said.
 The increased guidance stems from last quarter’s results surpassing expectations and the company boosting share repurchases to $7 billion this year from a previous forecast of $5 billion, Chief Financial Officer Carol Tome said on a conference call with analysts.
 Pent-up Demand A harsh winter and late spring this year delayed purchases of seasonal items such as landscaping materials, hurting Home Depot’s results in the first quarter, when earnings per share trailed estimates for the first time in six years.
 Big Purchases Sales of washers and dryers at Home Depot drove purchases of more than $900 to a gain of 84 percent while those below $50 rose just 31 percent.
 * BOE asset purchase target also announced; est.
 The Fed cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion for a sixth consecutive meeting last month to $25 billion as it considered when to raise its record low lending rate for the first time since 2006.
 The UBS real estate index comprises six sub-indicators tracking the relationships between purchase and rental prices, house prices and household income, house prices and inflation, mortgage debt and income, construction and GDP, and the proportion of credit applications by UBS clients for residential property not intended for owner occupancy.
 IMS Health forecasts the industry will grow by 10 percent annually through 2019, as government subsidies for drug purchases and financing for innovation from Brazil’s state development bank offset economic growth that slowed to 22 percent in 2013, according to Geraldo Biasoto, economist at Universidade Estadual de Campinas.
 The government’s Farmacia Popular program to subsidize medicine purchases is buoying growth for generics, said Pedro Bernardo, director at Interfarma, Brazil’s association of pharmaceutical research firms.
 Now that consumers can book a restaurant table, flight, or hotel room using Apple Inc’s iPhone or a device using Google Inc’s Android system, shoppers are seeking to replicate that experience across all their purchases.
 The purchase from US.
 The purchase gives Frasers -- which began trading independently from Fraser & Neave Ltd.
 In July, the Federal Open Market Committee repeated that the central bank is likely to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending bond purchases.
 It allows investors to hedge their positions or gain access to the credit market without having to purchase the underlying assets.
 The People’s Bank of China auctioned 20 billion yuan ($32 billion) of 14-day repurchase contracts at a yield of 37 percent today to drain funds from the financial system, according to a statement on its website.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, dropped four basis points to 339 percent as of 4:30 pm.
 The cost of one-year interest-rate swaps, the fixed payment needed to receive the floating seven-day repurchase rate, rose seven basis points, or 007 percentage point, to 376 percent, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The accord will cement Bank of America’s status as the firm punished hardest for faulty mortgage practices and put an end to woes stemming from its disastrous purchase of subprime lender Countrywide Financial Corp.
 The figure for resident households was 905 percent in 2013, up from 588 percent in 1980, according to government data, thanks to housing grants and a program that allows buyers to use accumulated government pension contributions for purchases.
 By matching KKR’s offer, TPG can study the finances of the world’s second-largest listed winemaker in detail without committing to a purchase.
 inflation accelerates and the Fed stops its bond purchases in October.
 American Water Works added about 700 customers through three acquisitions in the quarter, and an additional 430 customers from two purchases through Aug.
 Bernanke signaled new rounds of bond purchases that have pumped up the Fed’s balance sheet to a record $44 trillion.
 The Fed, in a statement July 30 after its last meeting, said “a range of labor-market indicators suggests that there remains significant underutilization of labor resources” Policy makers at the two-day meeting kept the benchmark interest-rate target unchanged and trimmed monthly bond purchases to $25 billion.
 OCBC Chief Executive Officer Samuel Tsien said this week that he’ll look to sell “non-core” assets following the Wing Hang purchase.
 Home Depot’s stock reached an all-time high earlier this week when the retailer said second-quarter net income rose 14 percent to $205 billion, helped by purchases of big-ticket items such as appliances.
 The banks are seeking investors willing to purchase bonds left over from the nation’s 2001 default held by firms led by Elliott Management Corp, said Eduardo Eurnekian, an Argentine billionaire who has been approached by bankers.
 Billionaire’s Money The banks may provide financing for a part of the debt purchases, according to the banker, who asked not to be identified because the discussions are fluid and subject to change.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Tyson Foods Inc, the largest meat producer in the US, is planning to issue $325 billion of notes to help fund its purchase of Hillshire Brands Co.
 “This announcement demonstrates the continued successful implementation of our asset-light strategy and the strength of our relationship with Constellation, following its recent purchase of InterContinental London Park Lane and its majority investment in InterContinental New York Barclay,” Chief Executive Officer Richard Solomons said in the statement.
 The insurer, which earns about three quarters of its premiums outside Australia and New Zealand, will sell $600 million in shares to institutions and raise about $150 million through a share purchase plan, it said in a regulatory filing.
 The measures will support “more predictable and sustainable earnings for shareholders” The insurer will also repurchase and cancel $500 million of convertible subordinated debt using the proceeds of the capital raising, it said in today’s statement.
 International investors have bought a net $2152 million of Vietnamese shares this year, heading for a ninth year of net purchases, as the economy stabilizes and inflation eases.
 technology companies excluded from some state purchases as tensions between the countries escalated over assertions of hacking and cyberspying, said it’s shifting mainland Chinese users’ data to servers run by and China Telecom Corp, a move that may address concern by government officials that the information could be a security vulnerability.
 6 that the government would welcome the purchase of Asya by Ziraat.
 Along with the purchase of his Brightstar stake, his hiring as Sprint’s CEO will give him the resources to expand his personal investments -- if he can find the time.
 sought regulatory approval for its purchase of a 76 percent stake in Istanbul-based Tekstilbank AS.
 Goldman Sachs Group Inc, which is one of the six senior banks managing Alibaba’s IPO, advised the company on its purchase of the ChinaVision stake, according to a March filing.
 Now, company values are so attractive it’s willing to become Iberia’s second-largest mall landlord as part of its proposed purchase of Corio NA.
 It doesn’t include lease signings, raw land purchases and non-public transactions.
 Moynihan, 54, had to suspend the dividend increase and $4 billion of planned share repurchases after the company said it incorrectly adjusted for losses on structured notes issued by Merrill Lynch & Co.
 Still, he said he expected a $2 billion share repurchase.
 Moynihan’s firm didn’t ask for a dividend increase in 2012 and got a $5 billion share repurchase program approved last year.
 While Genel’s purchase represents about 01 percent of its shares, “the intention signal is more important than the quantum,” Investec Bank Plc said today in a note.
 Imports of aluminum alloys tripled to 60,937 tons, bringing total purchases to 178,362 tons.
 At the time of the purchase, Li said he intends to help Volvo Cars “recover the ability to generate blood” instead of relying on successive blood transfusions.
 BAE acquired most of its South African land-systems assets via its purchase of Alvis Plc a decade ago.
 The purchase will help Intel provide more chips to mobile-phone service providers and expand its ability to win sales in what it predicts will be a $16 billion market, according to an online statement by Rose Schooler, a vice president of the company’s Data Center Group.
 S&T Mining Co, as the venture is called, is looking to acquire assets or sign a long-term purchase agreement with mines, except those located in Russia, Mongolia and Mozambique, the document said.
 The foreign currency loans taken for overseas purchases also bares the steelmakers to foreign exchange risks.
 New Residential purchased $500 million of nonperforming loans, or NPLs, from a bank in the second quarter and isn’t eager to buy more, Nierenberg said last week.
 “We’ll keep our eye on it, but it’s not something we’re going to jump in and buy a ton of loans, RPLs or NPLs, unless we think we can meet our return hurdles” While rising prices are squeezing potential margins, Wall Street-backed investors are able to increase their returns by using low-cost debt to finance their purchases.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo Televisa SAB completed its purchase of Cablecom SA, extending its lead over Mexico’s pay-TV business just as the nation’s regulator begins reviewing the market power of companies in the industry.
 AT&T is also selling the non-retina display iPad Mini for $19999 with a two-year contract and the purchase of an iPhone 5s or 5c.
 shale drilling boom opens up $15 trillion in potential purchases and expansion projects.
 In May, the company introduced a service that lets merchants identify customers with its coupons and enable them to pay for purchases using Apple Inc’s iPad mini.
 Deputy Prime Minister Ali Babacan, also in charge of banks, said earlier this month the government would welcome Ziraat’s purchase of Bank Asya.
 Foreign purchases may drop 15 percent to 700 metric tons in 2014, according to the median of estimates from nine analysts and jewelers including Gitanjali Gems Ltd.
 The incident is another setback for UPS, which missed some promised Christmas deliveries in 2013 when the company couldn’t keep pace with a surge of last-minute online purchases.
 television network, reported second-quarter profit that topped analysts’ estimates, boosted by share repurchases.
 Buyers entered a lottery for a chance to purchase renovated homes ranging from $315,000 to $499,000.
 The purchase of Denver-based Schrader will add as much as 21 US.
 ICE, which earns most of its revenue by owning one of the world’s largest derivatives markets, has recently expanded into new businesses such as equity trading with its 2013 purchase of NYSE Euronext and the administration of interest-rate benchmarks.
 “International companies in China are being put to higher standards now by consumers and society as Chinese customers mature and become more discerning with their purchases,” said Sam Park, a professor of strategy at the Shanghai-based China Europe International Business School.
 EnerVest Ltd, a private-equity firm that invests in oil and gas production, will purchase HighMount, Ron Whitmire, a vice president for the Houston-based buyer, said in a phone interview.
 Loews purchased HighMount in 2007 for about $4 billion.
 Loews hadn’t anticipated when it purchased HighMount that new technologies would boost supply and drive down gas prices.
 It didn’t disclose a purchase price.
 The bank said it delivered metal held in the Qingdao and Penglai ports as part of a sale-and-repurchase agreement, and that Mercuria Energy hasn’t paid for it.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Skymark Airlines Inc, Japan’s third-largest carrier, said it’s at risk of going out of business should it have to pay Airbus Group NV a penalty after the planned purchase of six A380 superjumbos fell through.
 The company is raising money to repay part of a $4 billion loan that funded its purchase of Smithfield Foods Inc, the biggest Chinese acquisition of a US.
 It also increased its share repurchase program to $65 billion from $4 billion.
 in revenue, including last year’s purchase of Kayak Software Corp.
 With the purchase of the convertible bond, Priceline has the right to name an observer to Ctrip’s board.
 The purchase more than tripled Rosneft’s output and became the foundation for its booming business today.
 So Morgan Stanley and three other banks arranged a $75 billion bridge loan in 2005 to Rosneft to fund the Gazprom share purchase.
 Morgan Stanley then began escorting Rosneft’s chief financial officer, Sergei Alexeev, to New York and London to introduce the company to western investors and persuade them that the Yukos purchase didn’t stain its image.
 In 2007, Morgan Stanley was among eight banks that organized a $22 billion syndicated loan to finance Rosneft’s purchase of most of the rest of Yukos’s assets.
 Energy private equity firm Rockland Capital LLC purchased Beacon’s assets in 2012.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- The London Stock Exchange Group Plc said it will raise 938 million pounds ($156 billion) in a rights issue of shares to fund part of the purchase of Frank Russell Co.
 LSE expects the Frank Russell purchase to help it expand its index and exchange-traded fund businesses.
 is considering a purchase of CSN Houston, the regional sports network that’s backed by Comcast Corp, according to people familiar with the matter.
 A negative yield means investors who buy a security and hold it until it matures will receive less than they paid to purchase it.
 We never wanted to do that at the beginning of the process for fear of leaving way too much money on the table” The expiration of leases from Merrill Lynch, which had its headquarters in the complex before its purchase by Bank of America Corp, left the Hudson River waterfront buildings only 59 percent occupied as of September.
 The system would allow consumers to purchase games online via smartphones, according to the report.
 “That’s what’s been happening to equity markets as the Federal Reserve has been accommodative” The S&P 500 added 03 percent to 1,99237 yesterday as data showed fewer Americans than economists forecast applied for unemployment benefits last week and purchases of previously owned US.
 Chinese purchasers overtook Americans to become the biggest buyers of real estate in Australia in the 12 months through June 2013, plowing A$59 billion into commercial and residential property, a 42 percent increase from the previous 12 months.
 But we’ve been able to provide them with statistics that less than 15 percent of all our purchasers cannot complete” their purchases.
 Overseas purchasers bought 102 percent of new properties in the quarter ended June 30, falling from a record 139 percent over the first three months of the year, according to surveys of real estate professionals by National Australia Bank Ltd.
 They accounted for 72 percent of purchases of existing properties, compared with 95 percent earlier.
 Lenovo still believes it can close the $23 billion purchase of International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit and the $291 billion purchase of Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility unit this year as planned, Chief Executive Officer Yang Yuanqing said in a phone interview today.
 Review of the latest IBM purchase, which was announced in January, comes amid heightened tension between the US.
 The server purchase would add a business with wider profit margins than PCs and give Lenovo about 14 percent of that market, the company has said.
(Corrects to show in fourth paragraph that government departments can continue to purchase some Apple computers) Aug.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 China Retaliation The procurement list affects government purchases and doesn’t apply to the consumer market.
 was shut out of a government purchase of energy-efficient computers.
 The company said it will use external loans to finance the purchase.
 The purchases bolster the family’s stake in Vitro 17 months after the company settled a legal duel with US.
 Still, the ECB said in June that it would “intensify preparatory work related to outright purchases” of asset-backed debt in a bid to stimulate the euro-area economy.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Retail sales rose 48 percent in June from a year earlier, driven by rising car purchases.
 The central bank is on pace to end its monthly bond purchases in October, and plans to keep rates low for a “considerable time” afterward.
 Investment Slows The cities of Nanning, Hohhot and Jinan have announced a relaxation of local home-purchase restrictions, while other cities including Chengdu and Xiamen have loosened the implementation of such curbs without announcement, according to property data provider China Real Estate Information Corp.
 Fannie Mae purchased 51 percent of US.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Al Jazeera Satellite Network manufactured claims to $65 million tied to its 2013 purchase of Current TV, the cable network owned by former US.
 Escrowed Money As part of the purchase, $85 million was put into escrow and $65 million of that figure is what is at issue in Gore’s case, according to court filings.
 The former Current TV partners said those costs weren’t covered by the purchase agreement.
 While Vivendi has been exiting phone businesses, including the pending disposal of mobile carrier SFR in a $23 billion deal, a purchase of Telecom Italia shares wouldn’t be completely against its focus on media assets such as pay-TV provider Canal Plus.
 and Morgan Stanley were among the companies that qualified to purchase the permits put up for sale Aug.
 “We haven’t actively tried to purchase stock.
 Google earlier this year purchased smart thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 Last year’s purchase of Kayak Software Corp.
 Cooperalso needs to revitalize traditional smokes -- including thefading Winston label -- picked up in the $71 billion purchasedesigned to help alleviate antitrust issues from the largerReynolds purchase.
 ended the second quarter with a record $555 billion in cash as the company moderated equity purchases and kept searching for large acquisitions.
 Bulut’sremarks “could increase investor worry over who’s going to bein charge of Turkey’s economy after Erdogan” Regulatory Investigation Bulut said in an interview with the Sky360 TV channel lateyesterday that he would ask the Capital Markets Board toinvestigate movements in Bank Asya shares in the past two daysto see who profited after Babacan said earlier that day that thepurchase of Asya by Ziraat would be desirable.
 The purchase will add a business with wider profit margins than PCs and give it about 14 percent of that market, the company has said.
 Diversify Currency The BWG purchase will also allow Spar to diversify its revenue streams and foreign currency, the company said.
 shut the Coffeyville refinery in Kansas after a fire July 29, reducing purchases from Cushing, Oklahoma, the delivery point for New York futures.
 The Federal Open Market Committee announced July 30 that it would trim monthly asset purchases by $10 billion, to $25 billion.
 “This year, we plan to restart Iran oil purchases,” Managing Director S.
 The purchase of the Yonghui stake, Dairy Farm’s largest deal ever according to data compiled by Bloomberg, comes as a slowing economy and increased competition prompts consolidation in China’s retail industry.
 ‘Seller’s Remorse’ “Wang was having seller’s remorse because he believed he had agreed to sell the Islanders for a price too low after hearing the unrelated news that a $2 billion bid was placed to purchase the Los Angeles Clippers of the National Basketball Association,” according to the suit.
 Aydin, who is also chief executive officer of TC Ziraat Bankasi AS, declined to respond to questions on the possible purchase of Islamic lender Bank Asya by Ziraat.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Chiquita Brands International Inc, owner of the namesake banana label, said it will continue with its planned purchase of Irish competitor Fyffes Plc after rejecting an unsolicited $611 million takeover proposal from Cutrale Group and Safra Group.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Turkish low-cost airline Atlasjet Havacilik AS plans to establish a unit in Ukraine aided by the purchase of new aircraft as it turns to the war-torn country for growth away from a crowded home market.
 will pursue more mergers and acquisitions after unveiling plans to pay $13 billion for Wisconsin-based Waupaca Foundry Inc, the largest-ever purchase for the Japanese specialty metals producer.
 The purchase from KPS Capital Partners LP will be financed with cash and debt, according to a statement today from Tokyo-based Hitachi Metals, a subsidiary of Hitachi Ltd.
 The move is a step toward Hitachi Metals expanding its iron castings business globally and follows announced purchases this year of two metals businesses in India and an alloy operation from Mitsubishi Materials Corp.
 He’s also been more active in acquisitions, including spending $3 billion to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 The purchase price implies a multiple of 117 times estimated 2014 earnings, Gannett said.
 The won strengthened 08 percent after the Bank of Korea cut its seven-day repurchase rate to 225 percent from 25 percent to revive economic growth.
 The planned purchase is the biggest among health-care REITs since Ventas bought Nationwide Health Properties Inc.
 “Al Jazeera America wants to give itself a discount on the purchase price that was agreed to nearly two years ago,” David Boies, a lawyer for Gore, said in a statement.
 Mobileye intends to use some of the net proceeds from the IPO to purchase inventory.
 Stronger employment and gains in home values are giving households the confidence to borrow and make big-ticket purchases such as cars and appliances.
 Some banks are showing a greater willingness to extend credit cards and finance car purchases amid growing demand and rising competition, according to a quarterly Fed survey of senior loan officers released Aug.
 Miami-based Fairholme Capital Management LLC has primarily invested in the two mortgage finance companies through the purchase of their preferred stock, holdings that remained unchanged and were valued at $12 billion as of May 31.
 “Abil and the Reserve Bank should have done that” Much of Abil’s troubles stem from the purchase of furniture retailer Ellerine Holdings in 2008 for 92 billion rand ($853 million), a move intended to help the bank find new clients and boost lending.
 The Cupertino, California-based company doesn’t have a big sales force targeting enterprises, or a services group that will help business get their devices up and running after they make a big purchase.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Santander Consumer USA received a civil subpoena from the Department of Justice about its subprime auto lending business, part of a probe into practices in the booming area of financing car purchases for people with spotty credit.
 Severstal, which in May repurchased $288 million of two Eurobonds, is considering using about $1 billion of proceeds from an asset sale to lower debt, including possibly a buyback, Chief Executive Officer Alexey Mordashov said on July 30.
 The systems may be installed in new cars, at a cost of about $100 a vehicle, or sold for installation after a car is purchased.
 Polysilicon imports under processing trade rules surged after China imposed duties on purchases from the US, South Korea and Europe, China’s Ministry of Commerce said in a statement on its website yesterday.
 Suez Environnement said in July that it’s targeting asset purchases this year, buoyed by profit that more than doubled in the first half because of a one-time gain from a stake sale.
 Central bank President Mario Draghi also unveiled a plan this month to purchase asset-backed securities and covered bonds in his bid to boost the ECB’s balance sheet.
 Visa has been expanding its digital and mobile products and services, and in July introduced Visa Checkout, which it said will allow consumers to make purchases faster online.
 It seems to be about privatization techniques and AFK Sistema will prove it’s a bona fide purchaser” Evtushenkov, the richest Russian to face criminal charges since Khodorkovsky, was charged with money-laundering on Sept.
 ECB Obstacles Next month, European Union judges will review oral arguments in a German challenge to a European Central Bank bond-buying plan called outright monetary purchases.
 14 served as a reminder that any broad-based ECB asset-purchase program would likely also run into legal problems” National benchmark indexes fell in all 18 western-European markets except Iceland.
 In 2012, a Delaware judge rebuked Goldman Sachs over its “incomplete and inadequate” handling of a conflict of interest in pipeline operator Kinder Morgan Inc’s $211 billion purchase of El Paso Corp, the investment bank’s biggest takeover assignment the previous year.
 Home Depot, which didn’t disclose how manycustomers may have been affected, said the continuinginvestigation is focused on purchases made since April.
 economy against speculation lower prices may attract purchases.
 18, taking this year’s purchases to $141 billion, the most among the eight Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 Visa handled 605 percent of global card purchases at merchants last year, followed by MasterCard, with 269 percent, according to the Nilson Report, a payments-industry newsletter.
 American Express’s market share of purchase transactions was 38 percent, the data show.
 Merrill Lynch client assets purchased from Bank of America Corp.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Gold premiums in India, the biggest user after China, may double by the end of October as the fourth straight quarterly decline in local prices spurs jewelry purchases before the nation’s main festival season.
 “Consumers have realized that the government will not take any measures to ease import restrictions soon, so they will stop postponing purchases.
 lost an order valued at almost $5 billion as Germany’s Air Berlin Plc, struggling with losses and dwindling traffic, scrapped aircraft purchases that included the 787 Dreamliner.
 Dimon trusted him with integrating the bank’s purchases of a foundering Bear Stearns Cos.
 After KKR purchased RJR Nabisco in 1989 for $313 billion, the biggest buyout up to that time, the firm was forced to prop up the company the following year to stave off bankruptcy.
 It purchased Clover four months before Bisignano arrived and the other companies under his watch.
The European Central Bank willstart its asset-purchase program with covered bonds becauselarge trades in the debt are easier than for asset-backedsecurities, according to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 ECB PresidentMario Draghi, who has made the revival of the ABS market a toppriority this year as he seeks to channel credit to businessesby freeing up bank balance sheets, mentioned purchases ofcovered bonds for the first time this month.
 “The ECB is likely to begin its purchase program in thecovered bond space as it is unlikely to be able to do meaningfulsize in the ABS market,” London-based Davies said in atelephone interview today.
 “If the ECB wants a strong sentimentchange by making large purchases it’s hard to do that in thesecondary or new-issue ABS markets as there quite simply aren’tenough bonds” The debt-buying plans have been greeted with skepticism byinvestors who suggest the central bank will struggle to buyenough securities after the market contracted more than 40percent since 2010.
 Covered bond purchases are being consideredto expand the amount of assets available to purchase.
 Europe’s public ABS market isn’t big enough to achieve thatgoal and purchases of the 635 billion euros of notes created andretained by banks to use as collateral for central bank fundingduring the financial crisis wouldn’t effect the ECB’s balancesheet, said Davies.
 climbed 37 percent after announcing a $2 billion plan to repurchase shares.
 17 over the Fed’s decision to retain acommitment to keep rates low for a “considerable time” afterasset purchases halt at the end of next month.
 Faster wage increases and more broad-based improvement in employment would help provide an additional boost for sentiment and spark bigger gains in the consumer purchases that make up about 70 percent of the economy.
 An incomplete jobs recovery is encouraging Fed policy makers to hold interest rates at record lows even as they plan to end the unprecedented monthly asset purchase program in October.
 central bank first signaled plans to phase out stimulus in May 2013, the Sensex slid for three straight months as foreigners ended 12 months of net purchases.
 “At the time, we felt overshadowed, but of course, we took two different paths after the merger” That Locke Lord had gone through mergers successfully was important to Levin, who said that “we knew how well they had integrated other mergers and we were excited by that” Deals Proskauer, Pittsburgh’s Sherrard Work on Buffalo Bills Sale Buffalo Sabres owner Terry Pegula reached an agreement to purchase the National Football League’s Buffalo Bills, the team said.
 In a telephone interview yesterday, Sherrard German shareholder David Lowe said his firm represented Pegula when he purchased the National Hockey League’s Buffalo Sabres in 2011.
 The Federal Open Market Committee retained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after winding down a bond-purchase program under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy.
 31 rose 55 percent to 2167million tons compared with a year earlier, with Chinesepurchases accounting for more than 57 percent, the agency saidlast week.
 Alibaba Stake He’s since been expanding, including the purchase of Sprint and acquiring a 34 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce company Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, which began trading in New York last week.
 SoftBank’s American depositary receipts fell 85 percent to $3635 yesterday, as investors who were buying the Japanese carrier as a proxy for Alibaba could purchase the shares directly.
 One popular strategy is when investors sell the weekly options to finance purchases of longer-dated ones, he said in an interview from Chicago.
 Ivanhoe Cambridge, the real estate unit of Caisse de Depot et Placement du Quebec, Canada’s second-largest pension manager, is using land it purchased at 45 Bay St, just south of the financial district, to build office towers above the busiest subway station in the city.
 Last month, Amazon said it would pay $970 million in cash to purchase video-game service Twitch Interactive Inc.
 18, as economic data improved and the Federal Reserve maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed in October.
 Data Watch A report today showed purchases of previously owned US.
 The purchase of Japanese rival Elpida Memory Inc.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Hidili Industry International Development Ltd, the Chinese coal miner at risk of defaulting on its debt, will buy back only 60 percent of its dollar bonds because banks won’t lend money to purchase any more.
 have also turned to bond repurchase programs to cut obligations amid a slump in commodity prices.
 “Everything about the transaction is crystal clear” Wynn Resorts, based in Las Vegas, said in July it’s cooperating with the government agency on inquiries into the land purchase for the company’s new casino resort on the city’s Cotai Strip.
 The so-called feed-in tariffs cover purchases of electricity generated from solar, wind, hydro, geothermal and biomass.
 and other banks, representing 83 percent of credit-card purchase volume in the US, according to Apple.
 That will bring about more policy support” New-home prices fell in all except two cities monitored by the government last month as tight credit prolonged a downturn even as local home-purchase restrictions were eased.
 Separately today, the central bank cut a rate it pays on repurchase agreements to the lowest level since January 2011, helping send interest-rate swaps down the most in five months.
 Yellen and policy makers are reducing the amount of bonds purchases to support the economy and are on track to end the program this year.
 Since January, the company has spent more than $5 billion on deals, including the buyback of 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA and the purchases of facial mask-maker Magic Holdings International Ltd.
 The 05 percent increase in purchases was more than forecast and followed little change in July, Commerce Department figures showed today in Washington.
 An index of contracts to purchase previously owned homes dropped 1 percent in August after a 32 percent gain the prior month, according to data from the National Association of Realtors.
 in New York, who projected a decline in purchase contracts.
 Vehicle purchases remain a source of strength for the economy.
 The firm gained expertise with its 2002 purchase of 5 million delinquent credit-card accounts, its first acquisition.
 acquisitions bigger than $10 billion, including others being scrutinized over competition concerns such as Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 To help ease antitrust concerns, Bristol, England-based Imperial Tobacco Group Plc will purchase the Kool, Salem, Winston, Maverick and Blu e-cigarettes brands from Reynolds and Lorillard.
 regulatory claims that it overstated its capital by billions of dollars after failing to report losses tied to its 2009 purchase of Merrill Lynch & Co.
 Bank of America misreported its capital from 2009 to 2013 because it didn’t realize losses on a portfolio of structured notes and other financial products it acquired in its purchase of Merrill Lynch, the Securities and Exchange Commission said in a statement yesterday.
 Thepremium for one-month options to sell sterling against thedollar versus those allowing for purchases tumbled for a secondday, falling to as low as 069 percentage points, the leastsince Sept.
 2 that Gol is planning a sale of as much as $500 million of bonds to repurchase notes due in 2017, 2020 and 2023.
 ‘Really Wrong’ Furniture and appliance sales fell 41 percent after slipping a revised 4 percent a month earlier, signaling consumers purchased such goods before the World Cup, according to Pedro Tuesta, senior economist for Latin America at 4Cast Ltd.
 “When you start cutting in supermarket purchases, then something is really wrong,” Tuesta said by phone from Washington.
 So, we’re optimistic that there is some upside in the second half” While Brazil’s government in July began phasing out IPI excise tax cuts for appliance sales, it extended through year-end the reduction for the purchase of vehicles.
 In its purchase of Covidien Plc, Medtronic plans to loan some of its untaxed profits outside the US.
 Policy makers meeting in Naples, Italy this week willdiscuss details of an asset-purchase plan designed to complementlong-term loans and record low rates to kick-start the economyIn a blow to confidence, growth in the 18-nation region stalledin the second quarter, with unemployment stuck close to a recordhigh, while inflation is running at a fraction of the ECB’smandate.
 Following US West’s agreement to be purchased by Qwest Communications International Inc, Trujillo in 2000 quit the merged company, citing differences with Qwest’s CEO and over management and operations.
 M&T completed its purchase of Wilmington Trust in 2011.
 The premium for one-month options to sell sterling against the dollar versus those allowing for purchases jumped to 377 percentage points yesterday, the biggest since May 2010, 25-delta risk reversals show.
 “The initial purchase price for our share would have to be reasonable, allowing us an opportunity to invest more into further growth,” Harebottle said in a telephone interview today.
 agreed to pay $315 billion, representing a premium of about $12 billion, to repurchase residential mortgage-backed securities.
 District Judge Charles Breyer in San Francisco, who earlier held up approval of the settlement over how much lawyers would be paid, today told company attorneys he’s concerned the deal would rob investors of the right to sue management over matters unrelated to the purchase.
 Foreign investors purchased a net $495 billion of Korean shares this quarter, the most among eight Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg, as valuations fell to the steepest discount since 2007 compared with the MSCI Asia ex Japan Index.
 A Colgate acquisition would overtake Procter & Gamble Co’s $57 billion purchase of Gillette Co.
 More customers also intended to buy higher storage capacity than purchasers of the iPhone 5S last year, with 22 percent yesterday choosing the 16-gigabyte version of the iPhone 6 or 6 Plus, 52 percent paying for 64 GB and 26 percent opting for 128 GB, the survey showed.
 earlier this year and Malone’s Liberty Global Plc on its 2013 purchase of Virgin Media Inc.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Japan Post Co, the state-owned operator of the country’s 24,000 post offices, agreed to purchase a 40 percent stake in Credit Saison Co’s asset-management unit and form a capital alliance.
 The managers accelerated their purchases after the shares were trading as much as 108 percent below the value of the underlying debt in November.
 Dixons Carphone, the London-based electronics retailer that agreed last week to take on 800 Phones 4u employees, is in negotiations to buy some Phones 4u stores and may announce the purchase as soon as today, people familiar with the matter said.
 Chairman Masayoshi Son, built Puzzle & Dragons into a huge hit in Japan by offering the title for free and charging users for in-game purchases like magic stones that extend life.
 “It’s common knowledge among game developers that Google Play users in general are not generating as much money for in-app purchases and for paid apps when compared to iOS,” said Toto.
 The three projects Duke plans to build have a combined capacity of 128 megawatts, and the Charlotte, North Carolina-based company signed power-purchase agreements for 150 megawatts of additional solar capacity, according to a statement today.
 The Fed seems to be hinting that they will tighten” The central bank yesterday reduced monthly bond purchases to $15 billion, keeping it on track to announce an end to the program in October.
 A gauge of the buying climate, which shows whether this is a good time to purchase goods and services, decreased to a 10-week low of 312 from 321.
 Household purchases fell 01 percent in July, the first drop in six months, after a 04 percent gain, Commerce Department figures showed last month.
 Yellen, at the press conference, declined to specify how quickly rates might rise after purchases end.
 It would then cease reinvesting maturing debt from its balance sheet, reducing asset holdings in a “gradual and predictable manner” Yellen said policy makers are in no hurry to shrink a balance sheet that has ballooned to $442 trillion after several rounds of asset purchases intended to hold down long-term interest rates.
 With purchases coming to an end, officials started debating how much longer to keep the guidance.
 In its purchase of Covidien Plc, Medtronic is loaning some of its untaxed profits outside the US.
 6 for property purchases.
 Cap rates are net operating income divided by purchase price.
 Thomas Sevang, a spokesman for the wealth fund, declined to comment on its real estate purchases.
 Glaxo acquired the vaccine last year as part of its $324 million purchase of Okairos AG, which has inoculations in more advanced stages of testing for hepatitis C and malaria.
 He oversaw acquisitions of Internet advertising firms with the purchases of Digitas, LBi International and Razorfish, and pushed the company to new business in emerging markets.
 Fed’s Pledge The Ibovespa gained as much as 15 percent earlier today after the Fed maintained its commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed, saying the economy is expanding at a moderate pace and inflation is below its goal.
 Bond purchases intended to hold down long-term interest rates have swelled the Fed’s balance sheet to $442 trillion.
 They offer customers enough to keep them occupied for more than a quick purchase, he said.
 Catz appears mostly at financial conferences and has helped drive the company’s aggressive acquisition strategy, including a battle to purchase PeopleSoft Inc.
 He has also kept his focus on sales, as companies have started buying more cloud-computing technology and slowed their purchases of licensed enterprise software that Oracle has specialized in.
 His largest transaction was last year’s $418 million purchase of Adaptv Inc, which matches advertisers and video publishers through an exchange.
 The strategy is to make AOL a company advertisers use to automate their purchases of placements on websites and online videos across the Web.
 The company sold $330 million in convertible bonds in August, giving it funding for acquisitions, share repurchases or other transactions.
 18, as economic data improved and the Federal Reserve maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed in October.
 A report today showed purchases of previously owned US.
 The purchase announced today, valued at $29 billion at list prices, is a boon for the program after Sweden’s Braathens Aviation AB last month backed out of being the launch operator and an engine fire halted flight trials for more than three months.
 Republic’s purchase agreement “remains fully in effect and there have been no discussions whatsoever with Bombardier about canceling the order,” Scott Thien, a spokesman for Republic, said today by telephone.
 At Crossroads The equity benchmark rallied last week as the Federal Reserve maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a considerable time after completing asset purchases in October.
 The SEC in 2012 obtained an emergency court order to freeze the assets of Waldyr Da Silva Prado Neto, the Wells Fargo employee, claiming he made illicit trades ahead of 3G Capital Partners Ltd’s 2010 purchase of Burger King.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s asset-management arm is the lead investor in a transaction to purchase stakes in two older distressed-debt funds overseen by a former unit of Carlyle Group LP’s TCW Group Inc, two people with knowledge of the deal said.
 California offers as much as $5,000 in rebates for the purchase or lease of new zero-emission and plug-in hybrid light-duty vehicles.
 The purchase, Electrolux’s biggest, brings together brands such as Hotpoint, Frigidaire and Zanussi, and creates a company with annual revenue of about $225 billion.
 Indesit Takeover The purchase by Electrolux comes only two months after Whirlpool increased its market leadership by acquiring a controlling stake in Italian appliance maker Indesit Co.
 Electrolux said it plans a rights offering to fund about 25 percent of the purchase.
 Electrolux and Quirky Inc, a New York-based startup specializing in crowd-sourced product development, emerged as potential purchasers for the GE unit last month, when Bloomberg News reported that talks were under way with GE.
 Overwhelming Attraction This growing demand from institutions explains why Wall Street is planning more than $85 billion in leveraged-loan offerings, including to fund acquisitions such as Burger King Worldwide Inc’s purchase of Tim Hortons Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Fed reduced monthly bond purchases to $25 billion on July 30, the sixth cut of $10 billion since November.
 Mitsubishi UFJ spent $5 billion to purchase Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya Pcl in 2013, helping boost overseas revenue to 165 trillion yen that year, a 26 percent gain from the previous year.
 Axa has focused on insurance in Greater China, completing its purchase of a 50 percent stake in Shanghai-based Tian Ping Auto Insurance Co.
 Buffett, chairman and chief executive officer of Berkshire Hathaway Inc, is helping finance Burger King Worldwide Inc’s purchase of Tim Hortons Inc.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 53 percent of the notes, the highest since December 2011 and compared with an average of 453 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Steel acquired its Canadian operations in 2007 when it purchased Hamilton, Ontario-based Stelco Inc.
 Encana gained 31 percent to C$2431 after making itslargest purchase since the Calgary-based company was formed in2002.
 Dollar Bets Household purchases in the US.
 among its largest shareholders, completed its purchase of Wilmington Trust in 2011.
 Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen will announce another $10 billion cut to its monthly bond purchases after this week’s meeting, economists forecast, as she steers toward gradual interest-rate increases.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta flight to Atlanta got canceled.
 Policy makers cut the monthly pace ofdebt purchases by $10 billion for the seventh consecutivemeeting, with the intention of ending them after October.
 The link, scheduled to start next month, allows the equivalent of $21 billion in daily net purchases of Shanghai shares and $17 billion for Hong Kong.
 Brokers should “remind their clients not to provide buy order instructions with an aim to ‘reserve’ or ‘hog’ the quota” The link, part of China’s effort to open up its financial system and promote wider use of the yuan, will begin with limits on both daily and aggregate purchases as policy makers seek to maintain some control over capital flows.
 Some purchases from six foreign companies, including Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc and two local businesses that earlier faced curbs are now permitted, according to the Vice Chief of the Indian Air Force R.
 ‘Legendary Name’ The payment was structured as a purchase by Omnicare of a Schron-owned entity that was worth far less than $50 million, the Justice Department claimed.
 “He always does what he says, so he is a little bit old school,” said Harmon, who brokered Schron’s $250 million purchase of the Monterey last year.
 The potential purchase fell into Microsoft’s lap after a call from Mojang founder Markus “Notch” Persson, said the people.
 Microsoft will use some of that overseas cash to fund the purchase, saving the taxes, a person familiar with the matter said earlier this week.
 “As a result, you’ll see us increasingly focus on usage as the leading indicator of long-term success” Any Mojang deal would in many ways be the mirror opposite of Microsoft’s most successful games acquisition, the purchase in 2000 of Bungie Software, the maker of the Halo games.
 Asset Volatility The benchmark index rallied last week as the Fed reaffirmed that its benchmark interest rate will stay low for a “considerable time” after the central bank ends a bond-purchase program intended to spur growth.
 For the past year and a half, the central bank has been using a combination of rate cuts and foreign currency purchases to try to invigorate an economy whose annual growth is slowing to its lowest rate since 2009.
 “If they’re struggling to qualify for loans or to afford home purchases, that has huge implications for their ability to accrue wealth over time” The narrowing of economic opportunity for Hispanics in California, who had a 92 percent unemployment rate in August, may become a political issue.
 headquarters, the Hispanic share of purchase originations fell to 9 percent last year from 25 percent in 2006, according to the Urban Institute analysis.
 Last year, lenders closed only 16 purchase mortgages in Camile Street’s census tract, according to the Urban Institute analysis.
 There were 123 purchase mortgages in 2005 and 112 in 2006, the peak selling years.
 Nationwide, cash purchases made up 38 percent of home sales in the second quarter, down from a record high of 42 percent in the first quarter, research firm RealtyTrac reported last month.
 BASF’s assessment of 50,000 product uses across five continents found that applications with about 200 million euros ($258 million) of total annual sales had a “sustainability concern” More and more end consumers are considering sustainability when making purchase decisions, prompting BASF’s customers to request chemicals that are biodegradable, non-toxic or emission-reducing.
 “And we have stuff you can’t find in other retailers” The push is part of an expansion of nonbook merchandise by Chief Executive Officer Michael Huseby, who is looking to squeeze more revenue from gifts and cafe purchases.
 Qatar Luxury Group, a company owned by the Qatar Foundation, which is controlled by the Emir of Qatar, purchased a majority stake in May 2011 and now owns about 86 percent of the shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The purchase agreement has been extended to Dec.
 Merck KGaA rose 44 percent after agreeing to purchase Sigma-Aldrich Corp.
 Bonds also rose on speculation banks boosted purchases as lending growth that trailed deposit increases left them with more cash.
 “Bonds with long maturities such as five, 10 and 15 years will be purchased more than the shorter terms,” said Long.
 The company in August 2012 announced plans to invest about$2 billion in Texas’ shale oilfields via the purchase of a stakein the assets from operator Devon Energy.
 OAO Rosneft, the state-controlled oil producer whose net debt exceeded $40 billion at the end of second quarter, and independent gas producer OAO Novatek may each get 80 billion rubles to 150 billion rubles from the state through bond purchases by the National Wellbeing Fund, Finance Minister Anton Siluanov said.
 Asked if the probe was over, he replied: “I think so” Wynn Resorts, based in Las Vegas, said in July it’s cooperating with the government agency on inquiries into the land purchase for the company’s new casino resort on Macau’s Cotai Strip.
 Policy makers have cut the benchmark repurchase rate three times since May after more than doubling it to 10 percent at an emergency increase in January to stem a slide in the lira.
 Adobe has been trying to persuade customers to buy online subscriptions for its design software, seeking to make sales more predictable by replacing periodic one-time purchases.
 There is a “big difference between a general framework agreement and actual contracts to build, finance and purchase power,” he said.
 “Considering that this is an attractive spectrum license, Oi’s decision could indicate its eagerness to purchase TIM,” a team of Bradesco BBI analysts led by Luis Azevedo wrote in a note today.
 If a swath of spectrum goes unpurchased in the auction, it will be divided into smaller pieces for a second round of bidding.
 The purchase of about $5 billion of jets, warships, helicopters and submarines from companies including ThyssenKrupp AG and BAE Systems Plc has been dogged by graft claims since it was agreed to in 1999, with allegations of wrongdoing going all the way to former President Thabo Mbeki and his successor Zuma.
 “The pause in acquisitions and asset sales can’t last forever” Gecina, the largest office landlord in the French capital, reduced its 2014 target for property purchases in July amid rising prices.
 Proceeds from FMC’s planned sale of its alkali chemicals business, the world’s largest maker of natural soda ash used to make paper and glass, will allow it to pay down some of the debt needed to complete the purchase of Cheminova, Brondeau said.
 The Cheminova deal follows Platform Specialty Products Corp’s purchase of Chemtura Corp’s agrochemicals business for about $1 billion earlier this year, in a further sign that makers of active ingredients and crop protection are being snapped up.
 executive, said in April that Mercuria was in discussions with the FCA to determine whether the purchase of JPMorgan’s European gas and power operations would require regulatory oversight by the UK.
 “Like me, there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket,” he said.
 Power purchase agreements and fuel supply agreements will have to be revisited” The ruling mirrors an order by the Supreme Court in 2012 to scrap airwave licenses forcing mobile-phone operators to pay 9408 billion rupees ($154 billion) to win permits.
 18, as economic data improved and the Federal Reserve maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed in October.
 The ECB, which unveiled its plan to purchase asset-backed securities last month, said it will buy “a broad portfolio of simple and transparent securities” and euro-denominated covered bonds.
 Chief Executive Officer John Stumpf has focused on credit-card lending for growth as the firm seeks to persuade customers to choose its card above others when making purchases.
 The risks prompted the ECB this month to say it’ll be more active in adding stimulus to the euro area by starting asset purchases.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- AbbVie Inc’s $545 billion purchase of Shire Plc to move its legal address abroad and lower its taxes could trigger significant capital-gains liability for shareholders, a Louisiana pension fund said.
 The Toronto-based lender posted some of its best earnings this year since entering the country in 1984 with the purchase of Chicago-based Harris Bank, while beating regional rivals in loan growth.
 purchases in the past decade, building a network of TD Bank branches stretching from Maine to Florida and now gets more than a quarter of its profit from US.
 The company will seek cash-generative deals like its $270 million purchase of three Barrick Gold Corp.
 “These would be typically bolt-on deals of in-production assets generating free cash” Increased output from the three former Barrick mines, known as Yilgarn, should cover the purchase cost within two years, he said.
 “Gross was a big supporter with his own personal purchases in them and coming out and making comments in the past about how they’re great investments, it certainly helped them trade at a premium,” Aaron Izenstark, chief investment officer and co-founder of Northbrook, Illinois-based Iron Financial LLC, said by phone.
 Structured like a private-equity vehicle, the fund will deploy capital over a five-year period and may purchase illiquid assets before distributing profits to clients while exiting holdings in the following five years, according to the person.
 Baek Youn Hyeong, spokesman for the military’s procurement agency, didn’t give the purchase price when he announced the final decision at a briefing in Seoul today.
 Korea had originally budgeted 83 trillion won for the program that initially sought to purchase 60 fighter jets.
 Users will see a customized screen with their recent purchases, bids and suggestions, as well as an additional box featuring an ad that takes users to another mobile destination, EBay said.
 Rakuten’s billionaire Chairman Hiroshi Mikitani is bettingthe purchase will help the Tokyo-based company push its globale-commerce strategy.
 The purchase will lift the proportion of Rakuten’s e-commerce transactions from outside Japan to 16 percent fromabout 6 percent now, he said.
 The company, founded by Mikitani in 1997, was an acquirerin three of the top 10 e-commerce deals in Japan before theEbates purchase was announced, the data shows.
 The all-cash purchase valuing VKontakte at about $3 billion was completed today, Moscow-based Mailru said in a statement.
 Product Focus Taking into account the purchase expense of the other 52 percent, Mailru’s total acquisition cost for VKontakte was $207 billion.
 Buyers werestuck paying installments for homes purchased at peak pricesbecause most were made with a series of postdated checks.
 At the time, everybody lost a lot of money andpeople wanted to see somebody fall” Dynasty Zarooni held more than 100 million dirhams inpostdated checks from buyers and by early 2009, checks from somepurchasers bounced and complaints were filed, Mulchandani saidThe buyers accused Mulchandani of selling nonexistent propertiesas well as illegally running an investment club with guaranteedreturns, according to court documents.
 The Fed last week maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a considerable time after completing asset purchases.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Warren Buffett, who is helping to finance Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned purchase of Tim Hortons Inc, discussed tax policy with US.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Mario Draghi is adding momentum to the longest winning streak for covered bonds in five years as the European Central Bank prepares to purchase the secured debt as part of efforts to boost the region’s economy.
 By pledging to purchase covered bonds, the central bank is further boosting returns for existing bondholders and has lifted new issuance of the debt to a three-month high.
 “The ECB purchase program is certainly positive for the market and the evidence of this is the significant tightening we’ve seen,” said Waleed El Amir, the Milan-based head of strategic funding at UniCredit SpA, Italy’s biggest lender.
 “New issues are over-subscribed, spreads are grinding ever tighter and now there is a big buyer looking for 100 billion euros or more” Third Time This will be the third time the ECB has created a program to buy covered bonds, with previous purchases starting in July 2009 and November 2011.
 “The ECB’s latest covered bond purchase program has a different objective to its previous efforts, namely increasing its balance sheet,” said Bernd Volk, head of covered bond research at Deutsche Bank.
 Then, customers who sign up can like the tagged postsand receive an e-mail with a page featuring the clothes in theimage and a link to purchase them.
 Drawing inspiration fromthe commission that personal shoppers make from boutiques whereclients purchase clothing, bloggers using RewardStyle get a cutwhen their followers buy something through their links.
 The company’s same-store sales grew faster than expected, and stock repurchases of $1 billion last quarter helped improve earnings per share.
 A 10-year power purchase agreement has been reached with SmartestEnergy Ltd.
 6 that the government wouldwelcome the purchase of Asya by Turkish state-run lender ZiraatHis comments, made while Asya was still in exclusive partnershiptalks with Qatari lender Qatar Islamic Bank, were latercontradicted by Yigit Bulut, the prime minister’s chief economicadviser.
 At the time of the purchase, an existing loan of about $50 million with Barclays Plc was renegotiated to cut the debt in half, he said.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, was the only credit card accepted at Costco stores.
 That’s how much the government bonds have earned for investors since the end of 2008, when the Fed dropped interest rates close to zero and embarked on the first of three rounds of debt purchases to resuscitate an economy crippled by the worst recession since the Great Depression.
 17, 2010, with their own letter to Bernanke, which questioned the need for more stimulus after the Fed’s first round of bond buying pumped $17 trillion into the economy and expressed concern any additional purchases could result in “hard-to-control, long-term inflation” The Fed was also criticized abroad, with German Finance Minister Wolfgang Schaeuble calling the stimulus “clueless” that same month.
 Gold Bug The slowdown in cost-of-living increases upended billionaire John Paulson, who began amassing gold in 2009 in anticipation the Fed’s extraordinary debt purchases would cause “very high rates of inflation” While Paulson & Co, his New York-based hedge fund, made $15 billion in 2007 betting on the collapse of the US.
 The company purchased Vivium Assurance in Luxembourg last year, while it has sold units in Austria, Serbia and Croatia.
 The sculpture, which had to be shipped from Zurich, was Tahir’s third Botero purchase from Tay.
 The agency is examining whether the Pimco Total Return ETF, an exchange-traded fund run by Bill Gross until last month, purchased small lots of bonds at discounts, then marked them up when valuing holdings to artificially boost returns, a person familiar with the probe said Sept.
 is outperforming other retailers as investors wager the Canadian convenience-store operator is gearing up for more acquisitions after absorbing its latest billion-dollar purchase.
 Its Statoil purchase added about 2,300 gas stations in Scandinavia, the Baltics, Poland and Russia and it’s the largest independent owner of company-operated stores in the US, where it has the Circle K brand.
 Its largest transactions include Statoil and the 2003 purchase of US.
 There’s “upside in their future acquisitions because normally they make accretive acquisitions” and a large purchase would boost the stock higher, said Kevin Chu, an analyst at Accountability Research Corp.
 Standard & Poor’s yesterday raised its rating for Couche-Tard’s debt to BBB from BBB- due to “robust earnings and free cash flow” with a satisfactory business-risk profile thanks to its “track record of integrating acquisitions, and its strong returns” Couche-Tard has used its consistent cash flow, which reached a record $8999 million in fiscal 2014, to both rapidly pay down debt and bankroll further asset purchases, Chu said.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, was the only credit card accepted at Costco stores, and has worked with the warehouse-club chain to issue co-branded cards.
 Bristol-Myers will purchase a group annuity to cover 8,000 US.
 “So I’m allowing that to happen” Sousa continued his pitch for investment in his speech, where he promoted Ontario’s Ring of Fire chromite deposit and used Burger King Worldwide Inc’s proposed purchase of Oakville, Ontario-based Tim Hortons Inc.
 Lower taxes in Ontario, lower taxes in Canada” Lower Taxes Miami-based Burger King’s C$125 billion purchase of Tim Hortons last month drew accusations it was being done to lower the company’s corporate tax rate.
 AbbVie, which is based in North Chicago, Illinois, hasn’t disclosed how much offshore cash it intended to use to finance the Shire purchase.
 S&P 500 companies repurchased $2 trillion of their stock during the bull market and there’s been $39 trillion in completed deals by American firms, according to data from S&P Dow Jones Indices and Bloomberg.
 Neither that nor idle cash are likely to be the main drivers of purchases, he wrote.
 “This leaves plenty of potential for downward market pressure as investors sell existing holdings in order to make room for their Alibaba purchases,” wrote El-Erian, the chief economic adviser at Munich-based Allianz SE.
 The company is “always open to acquisitions” and would not limit future purchases or joint ventures to only Mexico, Musalem said.
 In Spain, Botin built Santander into the country’s preeminent bank with the purchase of Banco Espanol de Credito SA in 1994 and Banco Central Hispano SA five years later.
 The purchase of Central Hispano was the first major bank merger after the creation of the euro.
 Botin pushed Santander’s expansion into Latin America in 1996, with purchases in countries including Argentina and Venezuela.
 Acquisitions in the region peaked in 2007 with the 11 billion-euro purchase of Banco Real from ABN Amro Holding NV.
 This diversification smooths out our earnings and improves our risk profile” The largest purchase Botin made was the 125 billion-euro acquisition of Abbey National in the UK, a transaction that anchored the bank in Europe’s second-biggest economy after Germany and widened Santander’s profit base beyond Spain.
 consumer spending rebounded in AugustThe 05 percent increase in purchases was more than forecast andfollowed little change in July, Commerce Department figuresshowed today.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Hong Kong is setting up a 10 billion yuan ($16 billion) intra-day repurchase facility and seeking to relax a cap on yuan purchases by the city’s residents before local investors gain access to Shanghai’s stock market.
 Efficient Payments Bank of China (Hong Kong) Ltd, the city’s yuan clearing bank, may expand the list of collateral it accepts for its intraday repurchase facility for loans in the currency, head of investment Chordio Chan said at today’s conference, which was organized by the Treasury Markets Association in Hong Kong.
 The central bank will probably reduce monthly bond purchases by $10 billion, to $15 billion, keeping it on track to announce an end to the program in October.
 Investors speculate that the central bank will maintain its pledge to keep its benchmark rate low for a considerable time after it completes the monthly bond purchases.
 Repsol is instead weighing the purchase of some of the Canadian company’s shale assets, the people said.
 The seller, who said he purchased the one-of-a-kind sweatshirt from Urban Outfitters Inc.
 even as it announced a $153 billion purchase of the rest of Switzerland-based Alliance Boots GmbH.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Bill Ackman, founder of New York hedge-fund firm Pershing Square Management LP, is said to be part of an investment group that purchased one of the upper-floor duplexes for more than $90 million.
 “That’s caused global asset flows to seek the dollar, boosting all dollar-denominated assets, and that’s what we’ve seen in stocks” Federal Reserve The Fed maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed in October.
 That purchase hasn’t yet closed.
 Bearish Options The premium for one-month options to sell sterling against the dollar versus those allowing for purchases reached 377 percentage points today, the most since May 2010, the 25-delta risk reversals show.
 will reap fees from banks when consumers use an iPhone in place of credit and debit cards for purchases, a deal that gives the handset maker a cut of the growing market for mobile payments, according to three people with knowledge of the arrangement.
 The people familiar with Apple Pay didn’t specify the size of the fee, which they said could vary, or whether it’s tied to the value of purchases.
 Merchants there typically pay fees totaling about 2 percent of the purchase price for credit-card transactions.
 Visa and MasterCard handled 634 billion purchase transactions in the US.
 card spending at American Express, which is a network and also the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, totaled $637 billion last year.
 The law, a powerful anti-fraud statute that can be used by the attorney general, is “limited to actions for fraud in the purchase or sale of ‘securities’ and doesn’t extend to all actions related to finance,” Barclays said.
 will meet with lenders next week to discuss $725 billion of bank debt backing its purchase of Tim Hortons Inc, funding that includes the largest loan of its kind since before the 2008 financial crisis.
 “We’re going to play unlimited, because we have the capacity to offer unlimited” Claure said only Sprint’s ownership of high-capacity spectrum, acquired last year with the purchase of Clearwire Corp, makes it possible for the company to offer unlimited-data plans, while AT&T Inc.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said, “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta Air Lines Inc.
 Last month, Berkshire said it would help finance Burger King Worldwide Inc’s purchase of Canadian doughnut chain Tim Hortons Inc.
 The central bank will maintain the repurchase rate at 8percent to shield the rupee from potential increases in USborrowing costs and sustain a fight against inflation, all 37analysts in a Bloomberg News survey predict.
 Rajan raisedthe repurchase rate three times in the past year.
 A group of state attorneys general recently decided to probe whether the takeover violates antitrust laws, adding to the work they were already doing with the Justice Department on a review of Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The Reserve Bank raised the benchmark repurchase rate by 75 basis points to 575 percent this year as a 25 percent drop in the rand since the start of 2013 fueled consumer prices, even as economic growth stalled.
 Italians were the biggest group of foreigners to purchase homes in London’s best districts from January through August, he said in a Sept.
 Comcast Corp’s $45 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 18 as the Fed maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a considerable time after completing asset purchases.
 The outlet mall deals give us “access to opportunities in new markets alongside proven partners” Highcross Stake The purchase of the 40 percent stake in Highcross will allow Hammerson to benefit from future rent increases at the mall, Atkins said.
 Idled Reactors Tokyo Gas, which purchased 118 million tons of LNG in the year ended March 2014, is Japan’s biggest gas supplier, and its third biggest importer of the fuel after Tokyo Electric Power Co.
 Korea and Japan together bought 123 million tons of LNG in 2012, more than half of the world’s total purchases, according to BP Plc data.
 Kogas and Tokyo Gas have been among the most active participants in LNG projects around the world, with the Korean company contracted to purchase 494 million tons between this year and 2037, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 and two affiliates approved a 1055 trillion won ($10 billion) land purchase that triggered enough investor concern to wipe out just as much off the trio’s market values.
 The boards at all three companies approved the property purchase after considering how the price was calculated, each company’s funding ability, and future value-creation possibilities, according to an e-mailed statement today.
 Workers at the companies didn’t welcome the purchase.
 Labor unions at Hyundai and Kia have said that the purchase is proof of problems with Chairman Chung’s “imperial management,” and called for a cancellation of the deal.
 The Indian government, for example, procures the cheapest and lowest quality drugs to combat tuberculosis among its citizens, while treatments bought by aid organizations are of much higher quality, even when purchased from companies in India, Dybul said.
 New York-based MetLife, which hasn’t authorized a share repurchase since 2008, has said regulatory uncertainty is the biggest challenge to meetings its profitability target.
 “In the same way that Lego makes building things easy, this is a thing that makes constructing physical spaces in a virtual, software, coded environment very easy,” said Fullerton, who called Minecraft “timeless” The Mojang purchase would be the biggest deal for Microsoft since Satya Nadella took over as chief executive officer in February.
 ‘Still Fun’ Since it’s not in the free-to-play class -- like Candy Crush or Glu Mobile Inc’s Kim Kardashian-branded offerings -- Minecraft doesn’t pester people with ads or pitches for purchases of tools or weapons, he said.
 Even a purchase at the pharmacy can land a shopper on a health list.
 The Acxiom list was compiled by various sources, including surveys, registrations, or summaries of retail purchases that indicated someone in the household has an interest in diabetes, said Ines Gutzmer, a spokeswoman for the Little Rock, Arkansas-based company.
 Others are sent by a company seeking customer feedback after a purchase.
 Purchasing Trail Acxiom said it uses retail purchase history or magazine subscriptions to make assessments about whether someone has a particular disease interest.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen and her colleagues yesterday stuck with a pledge to hold interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after they end asset purchases, probably next month.
 As they have at every meeting since last December, policy makers elected to reduce their monthly bond purchases by $10 billion, this time to $15 billion.
 In the run-up to this week’s meeting, a number of policy makers had voiced unease with retaining language suggesting that the Fed wouldn’t raise rates for a “considerable time” after asset purchases ended.
 Sovaldi, whose pricing has drawn criticism from health-care purchasers around the world, blocks one type of protein the hepatitis C virus needs to reproduce itself, while ledipasvir blocks another type.
 Kolkata-based Coal India sells a part of its output through auctions to customers that don’t have long-term purchase contracts.
 It maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed in October.
 Bond purchases intended to hold down long-term interest rates have swelled the Fed’s balance sheet to $442 trillion.
 That purchase hasn’t yet closed.
 “The stock’s price jump in trading is definitely a goodreward to investors who had the chance to buy,” said Tan Chiheng, a Boston-based analyst at Granite Point Capital Inc,which purchased some of the shares.
 Washington Prime, which has a market value of about $27 billion, needed to sell properties including Jersey Gardens to afford the Glimcher purchase, Ordan said.
 When Simon spun off the company, “they clearly envisioned that there would be growth opportunities for Washington Prime” The purchase of Glimcher is scheduled for completion in the first quarter of next year.
 Shoppers are given Canadian Tire moneybased on a percentage of most cash and debit purchases.
 The company issued convertible warrants in April, which it said may raise as much as HK$222 billion for land purchases in Hong Kong.
 The price, which wasn’t disclosed, is estimated to be HK$6 billion to HK$65 billion and is Sino’s largest land purchase in five years, according to a report this month by Jonas Kan, an analyst at Daiwa Securities Group Inc.
 Members get paid back a percentage of every purchase they make each quarter.
 Rakuten currently has a loyalty program that lets customers earn points when they shop and use them as discounts for future purchases.
 Policy makers have agreed on unprecedented stimulus in the past four months, and are set to unveil details of an asset-purchase plan that will help add as much as 1 trillion euros ($13 trillion) to the ECB’s balance sheet.
 “We expect the ECB to announce ambitious asset purchases at the meeting this week and to keep the door for outright quantitative easing, including the purchase of sovereign bonds, wide open” The euro fell to a two-year low against the dollar after the report.
 With the Fed scheduled to wind down its bond purchases inOctober, the market is now setting its sights on the firstlending rate increase, forecast to come in 2015.
 AT&T’s data-doubling promotion is for both contract customers and users who purchase their phones on the Next financing plan.
 The two drugs, Mekinist and Tafinlar, are part of the oncology business purchased by Novartis AG.
 You already own a Hawaiian island and the world’s fastest boat, so what’s left on your bucket list of purchases? For Larry Ellison, who stepped down as chief executive officer of software giant Oracle Corp.
 The impact of the purchase is “not significant” on the group’s shareholder equity, according to the statement.
 Brokerage clients who elected electronic delivery of documents can rescind purchases of mutual funds they bought from Nov.
 “By conducting the rescission offer,” the bank wrote, “clients should be precluded in the future from requiring us to repurchase fund shares or maintaining an action against Morgan Stanley” The brokerage offers more than 4,000 mutual funds from more than 300 companies, according to its website.
 “Morgan Stanley Wealth Management discovered this problem, corrected it, and is offering clients the opportunity to rescind affected purchases” Jockle declined to estimate the cost to cover client losses.
 In total, California, New York, Connecticut, Maryland,Massachusetts, Oregon, Rhode Island and Vermont want more thanthree million zero-emission vehicles purchased in the nextdecade.
 Wall Street Journal reporter Jon Hilsenrath said in a Web video that he thinks Fed policy makers will maintain the pledge to keep benchmark overnight rates low for a “considerable time” after the bank ends its bond purchases known as quantitative easing.
 She has said interest rates will remain low for a “considerable time” after it completes its monthly bond purchases.
 The S&P 500 rallied last week as the Federal Reserve retained assurances that its benchmark interest rate will stay low for a “considerable time” after the central bank ends a bond-purchase program intended to spur growth.
 Branches can adopt policies based on customer demand for home purchases, and need to be more efficient at approving loans, the nation’s No.
 AB InBev, the Belgian giant, has spent close to $100 billion over the past decade to purchase brews from Corona to Budweiser.
 “However, we view this as an extremely complex combination, which would require substantial disposals and where the executional and cultural challenges of merging these two companies would be immense” An offer for the world’s third-biggest brewer could rival the largest purchase of a beermaker ever -- InBev NV’s acquisition of Anheuser-Busch in 2008.
 2 via acquisitions from Colombia’s Bavaria to the 2011 purchase of Australia’s Foster’s.
 The Fed’s asset-purchase program and interest rates near zero pushed up inflows and valuations on the Johannesburg Stock Exchange.
 Foreign investors were net sellers of the country’s shares last week, the second period of outflows, reversing five weeks of net purchases, according to JSE data.
 The central bank is also cutting purchases of Treasury and mortgage-backed securities, which gave foreign investors more cash for emerging markets.
 is motoring towards the end of its assetpurchase program and the market is gunning for any sign as towhen the Fed funds rate will move,” Evan Lucas, a marketsstrategist in Melbourne at IG Ltd, wrote in a client notetoday.
 18 after the Fedmaintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a“considerable time” after completing asset purchases.
 The company will cut the same quantity of its remeltingproduction that needs standard ingots purchased from othercompanies, Hydro said in a statement on its website today.
 The purchase is the latest by Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund in the UK.
 Chinese Immigrant In the past two years, Chinese buyers have announced plans to acquire overseas-listed semiconductor companies valued at more than $51 billion, including the proposed purchase of Stats Chippac, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Better data access is a key source of revenue growth for the carriers as purchases of data-hungry tablets and smartphones is on the rise, while voice and text-messaging usage declines.
 currency reached the highest level in 14 months amid speculation the Fed will change its stance on keeping rates low for a “considerable time” after ending bond purchases.
 The Fed has said since March rates would stay low for a period after it completes a bond-purchase program under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy.
 The pharmacy chain is in the middle of its biggest deal ever, the purchase of the rest of European health beauty chain Alliance Boots GmbH for $153 billion after buying a stake in the company in 2012.
 “Marissa Mayer’s honeymoon with investors is over” Looking for Cash While Mayer has focused on making purchases to try to position the Web portal for future growth, shareholders would prefer to see the company’s cash returned to them, said Sameet Sinha, a San Francisco-based analyst at B.
 made a similar move last year by borrowing funds to repurchase stock instead of using its overseas cash hoard, which would have been taxed.
 “Tenders into the Dollar General offer will be meaningless since there is no way that Dollar General can purchase shares that are tendered” Dollar General, spurned twice in its attempts to buy Family Dollar, took its offer directly to shareholders in a hostile bid last week.
 The central bank has said that its benchmark rate will stay low for a considerable time after it completes the bond-purchase program.
 An oil discovery in Saskatchewan and four purchases set Crescent Point up for a potential dividend increase and production growth that some investors aren’t recognizing, said Chief Executive Officer Scott Saxberg.
 This year, it’s returned 74 percent including dividends, trailing the 19 percent gain in the Standard & Poor’s/TSX Energy Index and a 40 percent increase for Calgary-based Whitecap Resources Inc, which has spent $1 billion on purchases this year.
 Rejecting Sellers Vontobel, which has said for at least three years it would be interested in acquiring private banks in Switzerland or asset management firms in or outside the country, has declined potential purchases “a number of times” this year, Staub said, without disclosing more details.
 Some debtholders who have purchased credit-default swaps that would profit from a bankruptcy and others with multiple classes of Caesars securities may be unwilling to sign on to a restructuring that helps some of their holdings at the expense of others.
 The discussions may or may not lead to a purchase of the company and a further announcement will be made in due course, if appropriate, London-based UBM said in a statement today.
 The chain also affirmed that purchases made online and at stores in Mexico weren’t affected.
 “It’s a very natural fit” Endo said it will fund the purchase through existing cash on hand and debt financing.
 vicepresident isn’t entitled to $65 million held in escrow from the2103 purchase of his Current TV cable network.
 “We need to respect and understand the Canadian-ness of the icon, but I don’t know that we’re taking away from it by growing the company” Burger King applied last week for approval of the deal under Canada’s foreign-takeover law, which requires that purchases of companies worth at least C$354 million be of “net benefit” to the country, Industry Minister James Moore said yesterday from Washington.
 agreed to buy closely held Windsor Quality Holdings LP for about $800 million in its biggest purchase as the Japanese maker of seasonings and processed foods pursues growth in the US.
 “Why not simply enter into an asset purchase agreement? And how is it, assuming the allegations of the plaintiffs’ complaint are true, that Saacks never paid the $100,000 purchase price, never received the computer equipment, and apparently has never received any lease payments from FAS?” Sale Agreement These questions, “other than the one about why Saacks would enter into a stock sale agreement rather than an asset sale agreement -- are based on mere allegations at this point,” Williamson added.
 That includes the roughly $1 billion purchase of blogging-service Tumblr last year.
 “PE buyers will be interested in the potential CEO and CFO and may also be interested in an industrial partner -- the sector is not awash with good managers and running these long-term assets well will be key to generating healthy returns for a purchaser,” Cantor’s Osburn said.
 Policy makers have cut the benchmark repurchase rate three times since May after more than doubling it to 10 percent in an emergency increase in January to stem a slide in the lira.
 In May, it agreed to purchase a transmission company in Alberta, Canada.
 The billionaire purchased about $2 billion of bonds tied to Energy Future Holdings before it filed for bankruptcy.
 The last time the bank tapped the currency market to manage its oil revenue was in October 2013, when it purchased foreign currency.
 The purchase represents “a complete reversal of the central bank’s previous behavior,” Karl Steiner, senior currency strategist at SEB, wrote in a note before the announcement.
 The purchase, Electrolux’s biggest, brings together brandssuch as Hotpoint, Frigidaire and Zanussi and creates a companywith annual revenue of about $225 billion.
 Shunfeng agreed in May to purchase the insolvent German solar inverter producer Sunways AG for 22 million euros ($28 million) and is buying the assets of SAG.
 purchases totaling more than $100 million, according to a person with knowledge of the situation who asked not to be named because the targets haven’t been identified publicly.
 In recent years, the publisher has purchased legal-software companies to diversify.
 A group of banks including Toronto-Dominion Bank and Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, which co-led the IPO in May, will purchase Encana’s stake at C$3650 a share for resale to investors this month in a so-called bought deal, the Calgary-based company said in a statement today.
 The Fed raised by 25 basis points its median estimate for where the federal funds rate will be by the end of 2015, while maintaining a commitment to keep rates near zero for a “considerable time” after bond purchases are completed.
 today in Kuala Lumpur, 18 percent below Aabar’s purchase price.
 The Reserve Bank will probably keep its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 575 percent tomorrow, according to 17 of the 24 economists surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Muted inflation allowed the Fed room to keep rates low even as officials were on pace to end unprecedented asset purchases in October.
 The central bank has said that its benchmark rate will stay low for a considerable time after it completes the monthly bond purchases.
 The purchase isn’t done until all the computers on the network agree.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Pattern Energy Group LP, the closely held developer associated with Pattern Energy Group Inc, has signed a 20-year power purchase agreement for a wind farm in Ontario.
 Pattern today also signed a 22-year power-purchase agreement for a solar farm in Chile.
 bank had earlier expected a 50-basis-point increase in the benchmark repurchase rate this year followed by a reduction of the same magnitude in the second half of 2015.
 That’s down from $506 billion in 2013, and far less than the $144 billion of deals announced in 2011, which included Alpha’s $666 billion purchase of Massey Energy Co.
 One exception in the past year was closely held Murray Energy Corp’s December purchase of five coal mines and other assets in Northern Appalachia for $325 billion including debt.
 The company in August 2012 said it was investing about $2 billion in Texas shale fields via the purchase of a stake in the assets from operator Devon Energy.
 EasyJet Plc advanced after saying it will increase its dividend-payout ratio and exercise purchase rights for 27 Airbus Group NV A320 planes.
 Policy makers said the economy is expanding at a moderate pace and inflation is below target, while maintaining a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases end.
 won’t face a lengthy European Union antitrust probe of its planned $19 billion purchase of messaging service WhatsApp Inc, EU Competition Commissioner Joaquin Almunia said.
 The shifted money would help the Army accelerate its chopper purchases, according to the document.
 Analysts see other purchases ahead for a jet Ryanair Chief Executive Officer Michael O’Leary hailed as a “game changer” for promising an 18 percent gain in fuel savings over current narrow-body models.
 The Federal Open Market Committee this month stuck with apledge to hold interest rates near zero for a “considerabletime” after it ends asset purchases, probably in October.
 The cash purchase also ends a legal dispute between Vail Resorts and Powdr, allowing Park City to operate normally this coming ski season, the buyer said.
 Vail Resorts said it expects $35 million in incremental earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization in the 2015 fiscal year, excluding any transaction and transition costs, as a result of the purchase.
 The lawsuit is one of dozens filed by retailers allegingthat MasterCard profited from unlawful “interchange fees” onconsumer purchases.
 partner Richard Ong, will purchase a 36 billion-yuan stake in the unit, while white-goods maker Haier Electronics Group Co.
 As part of its mission to support American jobs and businesses overseas, Ex-Im places conditions on its loan guarantees, such as not allowing more than 15 percent of loan funds to be spent on items other than the purchase of US.
 As a result, a review of SABA’s records shows that by the end of the project, it received $288 million in Ex-Im guaranteed loan funds from Deutsche Bank for just $16 million in goods actually purchased, the government said.
 The purchase will give Tan, 80, full control of the airlineat a point when it’s expanding flights after the US.
 Investors using the euro to fund purchases of the Brazilian real, for example, would have made a 153 percent return this year through 6:30 pm.
 Chief ExecutiveOfficer Steve Ballmer’s $2 billion purchase of the Los AngelesClippers last month.
 17 and fund thepurchase with cash, according to data compiled by BloombergThat implies a takeover price of almost $48 a share.
 19 as investors who were buying the Japanese carrier as a proxy for the Chinese company could purchase Alibaba shares directly.
 Subtracting the value of those stakes, along with Supercell Oy that was purchased for $15 billion last year, implies that investors who buy SoftBank shares get the company’s Japanese wireless operations for free, Goyal said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA will receive more than 180 million euros ($233 million) of financing from Canada’s export agency to help purchase goods in the country made by suppliers such as Alcatel-Lucent SA.
 Panama, Guatemala Bancolombia SA, which closed its purchase of HSBC Holdings Plc’s Panamanian unit last year, has spent more than $3 billion in Central America since 2007, buying stakes in lenders from Guatemala to El Salvador.
 Grupo Aval has spent about $3 billion in the region since 2010, including the purchase of Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA’s Panama subsidiary in 2013.
 “The vast majority of bond ETFs do not have any creations or redemptions -- and thus do not trigger any purchase or sales of underlying bonds -- on a daily basis,” Rochelle Antoniewicz, a senior economist at ICI, said in an e-mailed statement.
 When the Fed eventually tightens credit, it risks causing financial-market turmoil similar to the “tantrum” that occurred last year after the central bank said it was considering trimming its bond purchases, according to the paper, which was also written by Anil Kashyap of the University of Chicago, Kermit Schoenholtz of New York University’s Stern School of Business and Hyun Song Shin of Princeton University.
 Italian and Portuguese securities also advanced after demand for the European Central Bank’s first targeted-loan program came in below economist estimates, boosting speculation policy makers may resort to sovereign-bond purchases to avert deflation.
 26 told company attorneys he’s concernedthe deal would rob investors of the right to sue management overmatters unrelated to the purchase.
 Kvisle is trying to sell assets as he seeks to rein in debtand refocus a company with operations spanning six continentsRepsol dropped a plan to buy all of Talisman to instead weighthe purchase of some of the company’s shale assets, people withknowledge of the matter said in August.
 Under deflation, or falling prices, households may postpone purchases and companies may delay investment and hiring as demand for their products dries up.
 “The economy is crying out for much easier policy and the ECB will need to do more” Bond Purchases5 Dowding predicts that the central bank will start buying sovereign bonds under its quantitative easing program as early as the first quarter of next year as purchases of asset-backed securities alone won’t be enough to stimulate the faltering economy.
 The Reserve Bank of India kept its repurchase rate at 8 percent today, joining counterparts from Russia and Brazil in holding borrowing costs this month as it seeks to cool price pressures.
 “We wanted to keep some money here just to fall back on” The Lees are using a foreign-national mortgage, a loan for overseas buyers that required a 40 percent down payment, to purchase the five-bedroom house later this month for $423,000.
 Cash Sales Cash sales have been falling and in June made up the lowest share of total home purchases, at 33 percent, since September 2008, according to CoreLogic Inc, an Irvine, California-based property-data firm.
 One of FBC’s borrowers, Yoram Yahav, said he purchased a few houses in cash before deciding to get a $100,000 loan for a Florida property.
 While Canada was the top source of international buyers, China accounted for the largest sales dollar volume because Chinese purchased more expensive properties on average, the Realtors report said.
 It’s “almost designed to scare people away” Loan Dropoff Mortgage applications for house purchases are 10 percent below the level a year earlier, according to data from the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 While more financing for foreigners will boost property purchases in the US, smaller lenders who can’t hold as much debt are constrained by a limited secondary market for selling their loans, said Na of Mega Capital.
 Policy makers cut the monthly pace of debt purchases by $10 billion for the seventh consecutive meeting, with the intention of ending them after October.
 “The economy is grudgingly overcoming problems we’ve had over time” Fed Policy While more than $3 trillion of debt purchases by the Fed since 2008 helped the US.
 29, and the total purchase price is net of the target’s cash, the company said.
 Revenue Boost The purchase of Move will boost the company’s revenue from digital real-estate services by more than 50 percent.
 In the Justice Department investigation of Comcast’s purchase of NBC Universal, approved by regulators in 2011, the agency’s antitrust division interviewed more than 125 companies and individuals involved in the industry and reviewed tens of thousands of third-party documents, it said.
 Comcast, based in Philadelphia, is defending its proposed purchase of Time Warner Cable against opposition from Netflix, Discovery Communications and Dish Network Corp.
 The risks prompted the European Central Bank this month to say it’ll be more active in adding stimulus to the euro area by starting asset purchases.
 That’s stoking speculation debt investors stand ready to fund potential takeovers such as a purchase by Anheuser-Busch InBev NV of rival beermaker SABMiller Plc.
 Billionaire Patrick Drahi’s companies sold about $17 billion of euro and dollar bonds in April, the biggest junk-bond offering ever, to fund the purchase of Vivendi SA’s French phone unit.
 18 after the Fed maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a considerable time after completing asset purchases.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- M&T Bank Corp, the lender struggling to complete its purchase of Hudson City Bancorp, named Richard S.
 Ellerine has 940 stores and 8,000 staff and administrators trying to save the operations have been approached by “several potential purchasers,” the retailer said in an e-mailed response to questions today.
 Credit Suisse Group AG and VTB Capital Plc financed its purchase of tuna boats, then packaged the debt into bonds that they sold to investors.
 While OAO Gazprom last week joined OAO Alfa Bank in indicating it was making plans to sell bonds, some investors said they’d be reluctant to purchase debt issued by the state-controlled gas producer amid the tightening international sanctions against Russia.
 “Well,that situation changed around a little bit” Caterpillar, which acquired engine manufacturer Electro-Motive Diesel four years ago, had scrapped the new-model programthat was on the boards at EMD after concluding railroads wouldhold off on purchases.
 “With the volume growth we’ve seen this year, it’s justgoing to force us to get in the market” in 2015, Fritz said“We’re in the best of worlds right now in terms of lots ofdemand and trying to figure out how to handle it effectively” Union Pacific, which added 29 locomotives to its 2014order, is studying Tier 4 purchases and testing five of the newlocomotives’ prototypes, Fritz said.
 “The market is not taking a view on whether the PBOC intends to engineer weakness in line with the Asian performance” Exchange Link Shanghai’s exchange link with Hong Kong is set to start next month and allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases.
 sold $5 billion of bonds in a six-part offering to help fund the agreed purchase and refinance debt of US Foods Inc.
 This is a departure from last year, when investors disproportionately fled emerging-market debt amid hysteria that rates would soar as the Federal Reserve slowed its bond purchases.
 “We regret that errors occurred when our customers purchased credit-monitoring and identity-theft products from a third-party vendor,” Dana Ripley, a spokesman for Minneapolis-based US.
 The slow pace of purchases and the lack of a schedule for sale and allowing foreign investors to participate remains a concern and is limiting credit growth, Pham said.
 Encana’s $31 billion purchase in May of shale propertiesfrom Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc.
 A Chinese bank will consider buyers as first-home buyers if they pay off outstanding mortgages, and will ease restrictions on second-home purchases, the Shanghai Securities News reported today, citing an unidentified official from the bank.
 The Doha-based lender purchased an additional 11 percent stake in Ecobank for $283 million, according to a statement to the local Qatari bourse today.
 The company said it repurchased 53 million shares last quarter, capping a 32 million-share plan announced in October.
 Crosby, 41, co-founded Urchin Software Corp, a Web-analytics service purchased by Google in 2005.
 Lenovo’s $291 billion planned purchase of Google Inc.
 Ellison spent more than $50 billion to acquire about 100 companies in the past decade, seeking to bolster Oracle’s database, hardware and business-applications businesses, including the purchase of Micros Systems Inc.
 Oracle’s board also announced the buyback of $13 billion shares under the company’s share repurchase program.
 Benchmark 10-year note yields fell to the lowest in a week as billionaire Julian Robertson said there’s a bubble in bonds that will end “in a very bad way” Treasury market inflation bets dropped to a 14-month low and a decrease in investor purchases prompted an unexpected decline in sales of US.
 Just one year after the deal closed, HP said it would write down about 85 percent of the purchase price after discovering accounting improprieties that inflated Autonomy’s finances.
 Ideally any purchases would cost closer to $1 billion than $5 billion, according to Jayson Noland, a San Francisco-based analyst with Robert W.
 and Martin Marietta Materials Inc’s purchase of Texas Industries Inc.
 Sotheby’s purchased it at a charity auction in Las Vegas in 2008 after it was donated by the Bordeaux first growth chateau, Sleigh said.
 That included the 2005 purchase of PeopleSoft Inc.
 It would behoove a parent to expose their children to this changing world” Bitcoin Fanatic Brooke Mallers, a 51-year-old stay-at-home mom with six kids in Evanston, Illinois, first began spending bitcoins on purchases last fall, when she bought the kids’ Christmas presents -- Nike Inc.
 offered users $75 off purchases of $300 or more and $150 off orders of over $500.
 “Also various integration services do the purchases on your behalf even if the merchants have no idea what bitcoin is” CoinDesk’s new Bitcoin Market Potential Index ranks Argentina, Venezuela, Zimbabwe, India and Nigeria as the five countries most likely to see mass adoption, mainly owing to wild local currency fluctuations and the millions of people without bank accounts.
 Steinhoff purchased 218,187 shares for about 114 million rand ($104 million) on Sept.
 Chief Executive Officer Don Althoff has been seeking purchases as Veresen shares gained 38 percent in a year and its LNG export project gain traction.
 Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and Bank of Nova Scotia advised Veresen on the purchase.
 The USDA used credits and outright purchases to remove more than 1 million short tons of surplus sweetener at a cost of about $2587 million.
 The land is estimated to have been worth 127 billion yen,based on transactions in the neighborhood at the time of thepurchase registered with the land ministry.
 “Morgan Stanley is well positioned to benefit from an improving operating environment and a more favorable interest-rate backdrop” Morgan Stanley has boosted margins in its wealth-management division, which more than doubled in size from the firm’s 2009 purchase of Smith Barney from Citigroup Inc.
 Another high-profile inversion deal, Burger King Worldwide Inc’s purchase of Tim Hortons Inc, will proceed, the Canadian company said after the rule changes were revealed.
 Indirect bidders, which include foreign central banks, purchased 409 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 28 percent for the past 10 sales.
 “The elevated indirect interest is consistent with strong foreign demand, and that’s potentially what drove today’s result” Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 161 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 215 percent for the past 10 auctions.
 “A more natural juncture would probably be the October meeting” when “QE is projected to end” ‘Considerable Time’ The FOMC said last week that it expects to halt asset purchases after its next meeting, on Oct.
 “From about last year when interest rates started falling further, we could see a movement among investors to expand credit purchases,” said Nomura, whose company is the largest manager of Samurai sales so far this year and a co-manager of the Turkey sale.
 “Our retirees’ benefits are not changing, just who provides them” Motorola Solutions will purchase a $31 billion group annuity contract from Prudential under which the insurer will pay and administer retiree pensions starting in early 2015, according to the statement.
 The company then embarked on a series of acquisitions, including the $155 billion purchase of E-Tek Dynamics Inc.
 The purchase will be funded from a creditfacility agreement of up to 7 billion euros ($904 billion).
 12 (Bloomberg) -- GFI Group Inc’s directors were accused in a shareholder lawsuit of “engineering” the wholesale brokerage’s $580 million purchase by CME Group Inc.
 The proposed deal allows GFI directors to negotiate their own purchase of the company’s choice assets at “bargain basement prices,” shareholder Maurene L.
 India’s defense purchases from the US.
 Federal Reserve policy makers yesterday raised by 25 basis points their median estimate for where the federal funds rate will be by the end of 2015, while keeping a pledge to keep rates low for a “considerable time” after their bond purchase program has ended.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen, at a press conference, declined to specify how quickly rates might rise after purchases end.
 “We know thatlocal governments have started loosening home-purchaserestrictions.
 That was three yearsbefore former Premier Wen Jiabao imposed home-purchase curbs andraised down payments to prevent a housing bubble.
 Tuandai attracted 288of them, including Deng, to take part in the purchase of the656-square-meter (7,060-square-foot) townhouse on June 17.
 The little-supervisedplatforms pool money from small investors with as little as 50yuan to finance anything from wedding preparations, personalmedical expenses to car purchases.
 The central bank has been saying since March interest rates would stay low for a “considerable time” after it completes the asset purchases known as quantitative easing.
 The central bank may reduce monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $15 billion, keeping it on track to announce an end to the program in October, economists surveyed by Bloomberg predicted.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- EasyJet Plc, Europe’s second biggest discount airline, plans to boost dividend payouts and exercise purchase rights for 27 Airbus Group NV A320 planes to ramp up its position against struggling network competitors.
 “The continued strength and execution of our business model provides the platform to deliver sustainable growth” The deal will exhaust purchase options under EasyJet’s 2002 agreement with Airbus and means the airline will have 70 firm orders for current-generation A320s.
 borrowing costs sooner as it ends its asset purchase program, known as quantitative easing, next month.
 As part of the purchase agreement, Maxus retained liability for the plant and agreed to indemnify Houston-based OxyChem, Moses said.
 Prior to the purchase, Hyundai union spokesman Hwang had said negotiations on wages would be concluded “soon” The purchase is proof of “problems with Chairman Chung Mong Koo’s imperial management,” the Hyundai and Kia unions said in statements calling for a cancellation of the deal.
 The decisions underscored the new pressures facing PayPal, a Web-payments pioneer that EBay purchased in 2002 to smooth transactions on its marketplace.
 Bombardier jumped the most since April after signing a firm purchase agreement with Macquarie AirFinance to sell at least 40 C-Series aircraft.
 The company said it will “take all appropriate actions” against the report’s authors, and that its controlling shareholders may make purchases of its stock in the market.
 A last-minute rush of online purchases and harsh winter weather snarled UPS’s service just before Christmas in 2013, delaying some packages until after the holiday.
 The LME, purchased by Hong Kong Exchanges for $22 billion in 2012, is awaiting regulatory approval to add three yuan-denominated contracts and LME Clear is due to accept collateral in the Chinese currency when it starts up this month.
 Paramount, based in New York, purchased the property at 50 Beale St.
 The Paramount deal follows recent office transactions including Columbia Property Trust Inc’s $309 million purchase of the 33-story 650 California St.
 Any such purchases would be “small things: content businesses, retail opportunities,” Chief Marketing Officer Kenny Jacobs said in an interview in London today.
 Chief Executive Officer Michael O’Leary’s only deal beyond the 201 million-euro ($26 million) purchase of Buzz from KLM Royal Dutch Airlines NV has been a minority investment in Irish rival Aer Lingus Group Plc, with the executive instead preferring to enter markets after the demise of local airlines rather than bail them out.
 More than 90 percent of the 2,200 cars RK Motors has sold since its 2010 launch have been purchased online, and almost a quarter have ended up overseas.
 InApril, Apple said it would expand its shareholder payoutprogram, increasing its share repurchase authorization to $90billion from $60 billion and announcing a 7-for-1 stock split,as well as a bigger dividend.
 In May, Apple agreed topay $3 billion to buy headphones and streaming-music serviceBeats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 21, 2008, days after the bailout, by a New York Fed lawyer who wrote, “I am trying to keep this moving because of a concern that there will be a shareholder action” Alvarez testified that regulators were concerned shareholders would “do things that would not be in the interest of repaying the loan” Referring to other documents in which regulators express misgivings about the extent of their powers, Boies asked Alvarez, “Did you agree the New York Fed didn’t have authority to purchase equity?” “It depends what you mean by purchase,” Alvarez replied, saying he couldn’t respond because “purchase” is too ambiguous a word.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 503 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 471 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Policy makers have also said they may end the central bank’s purchases of Treasury and mortgage debt in October, concluding the program known as quantitative easing the Fed has used to support the economy.
 At yesterday’s sale of two-year notes, indirect bidders, a class of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 409 percent of the notes, matching the most since November 2011.
 Privacy Critics Last month, Facebook introduced a tool that lets advertisers know when a promotion was first viewed and when it led to a purchase by tracking users between their electronic devices.
 In July, the company completed the purchase of Oculus VR Inc.
 The purchase consists of about 4,950 rooms at properties including Hyatt Place and Hyatt House hotels, Chicago-based Hyatt said in a statement today.
 Limited Supply Limited supply has helped the $54 trillion market for government-backed mortgage securities withstand the Federal Reserve’s reduction of its bond purchases this year, contributing to lower interest rates on new mortgages.
 The creation of additional bonds comes with the Fed poised to end its new asset purchases, probably next month.
 At the same time, corporate repurchases reached $275 billion in the first half of the year, the second busiest since S&P Dow Jones Indices began tracking the data in 1998.
 Share purchases by executives are becoming rarer after seven straight quarters of advances pushed valuations in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index to a four-year high.
 are among companies whose executives have done less buying even as corporate repurchases increased.
 “Share repurchases represent other people’s money, which is much easier to spend Corporate cash is exploding” The S&P 500 slipped 08 percent to 1,99429 at 4 pm.
 “That’s, first and foremost, the benefit of this upgrade” The new GM Financial was formed out of the $35 billion purchase in 2010 of subprime lender AmeriCredit Corp.
 He has long recognized the link between climate change and emissions from the transportation sector” China Sales In China, the country that most closely trails California in year-to-date zero-emission-vehicle sales, 24,460 electric cars were purchased in January through July, according to Alan Baum, an auto analyst at Baum & Associates in West Bloomfield, Michigan, citing industry figures.
 California Rebates California offers as much as $5,000 in rebates for the purchase or lease of new zero-emission and plug-in hybrid light-duty vehicles.
 Fed Statement The Federal Open Market Committee retained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after winding down a bond-purchase program under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy.
 The Swiss currency climbed as the nation’s central bank maintained its 120 per euro cap on the franc and vowed to deploy unlimited purchases to defend it.
 The purchase will be financed by new bonds and hybrids, the company said Sept.
 “The proposed purchase has made me somewhat more cautious of the credit because of the change in gearing policy and rating concerns,” Simensen said.
 “It would be included if perhaps there was a market demand for it” TDC has said it will cut its dividend to shareholders by a third to maintain its investment-grade rating after the Get purchase.
 Investors who had purchased Treasuries as a hedge againstfinancial market turbulence during the vote on independence areunwinding the trade, said Kazuaki Oh’e, a debt salesman at CIBCWorld Markets Japan Inc.
 Policy makers cut the monthly pace ofdebt purchases by $10 billion for the seventh consecutivemeeting, with the intention of ending them after October.
 They’re looking at volume numbers and they know it’s a serious problem” FHA insured 420,709 purchase loans in the nine months through June 30, compared with 516,588 mortgages during the same period a year earlier, according to HUD data.
 A purchase of Mojang would be the biggest deal struck since Satya Nadella took over as Microsoft’s chief executive officer in February, succeeding Steve Ballmer.
 The targeted amount of the capital increase is guaranteedto be reached because Telefonica, which owns a 77 percent stake,will buy all the new shares to which it is entitled, and thebanks managing the offer agreed to purchase any shares notacquired, Telefonica Deutschland said.
 The central bank has said that interest rates would stay low for a “considerable time” after it completes the asset purchases.
 The exchange link with Hong Kong is set to start next month and allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases.
 The total IPO size increased to $25 billion the company said today, after the underwriters exercised the option to purchase 15 percent more shares.
 Clothing Sales While customers are opening their wallets for school supplies and electronics, they may be putting off more discretionary purchases like apparel.
 In August, retail purchases increased 06 percent, the biggest rise in four months, according to the Commerce Department, with 11 of 13 categories strengthening.
 Shoppers are making fewer trips to stores, and when they do buy, they aren’t going for impulse purchases.
 She expects to order the majority of her holiday purchases on the Web as well.
 That sparked speculation among economists and investors that the ECB could be forced to resort to large-scale sovereign bond purchases to reach its goal.
 Total take-up will be “significant,” with purchases of ABS and covered bonds making a smaller contribution, he said.
 The ECB’s ABS component includes purchases of mortgage-backed securities, an asset class whose reputation suffered during the financial crisis.
 Household debt, including loans and goods purchased on credit, stood at a record 1,0248 trillion won ($990 billion) at the end of March, including 422 trillion won in mortgages extended by banks and other depository institutions, according to the Bank of Korea.
 The German company is considering further purchases for all its divisions, including its energy and building-technology unit, he said.
 The deals are helping Bosch’s partners as they pursue larger purchases.
 Siemens will gain cash for the planned $76 billion purchase of oil-and-gas equipment maker Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 The microblogging company is testing a “buy” button soconsumers can purchase directly from tweets posted on itsservice.
 Twitter is partnering with payments company Stripe Incto save a person’s credit-card information so users can make apurchase with just a couple of clicks, Nathan Hubbard, Twitter’shead of commerce, said in an interview.
 The purchase is projected to close late this year, and will break even in fiscal 2015, Microsoft said today in a statement.
 The purchase gives Nadella a game that is popular across consoles, computers and mobile devices made by Microsoft and rivals like Apple Inc.
 In 2012, a Delaware judge rebuked Goldman Sachs over its “incomplete and inadequate” handling of a conflict of interest in pipeline operator Kinder Morgan Inc’s $211 billion purchase of El Paso Corp, the investment bank’s biggest takeover assignment the previous year.
 Danaher will pay 1710 Swiss francs a share in cash, and the purchase will make it the world’s largest maker of such implants, the Washington-based company said in a statement today.
 Danaher said its annual sales from the dental industry will approach $3 billion after the purchase, giving it an “unmatched position” in dental implants as Nobel Biocare will expand the company’s presence in the premium segment of the market.
 The purchase values the company, including net debt, at about 174 times earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, compared with a median valuation of 144 times for comparable deals, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 16, and expects to complete the purchase late this year or in early 2015, the company said.
 The purchase brings the value of announced acquisitions of health-products companies this year to $81 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, led by Medtronic Inc’s agreement to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion.
 While acquirers in many of this year’s deals plan to lower their tax bills by moving their tax domicile outside of the US, Danaher’s purchase of Nobel Biocare isn’t a so-called tax inversion.
 In the US, Federal Reserve policy makers signaled yesterday they won’t be raising rates anytime soon, sticking to a pledge to stay near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases end.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- India’s rupee slumped to a seven-week low as a report showing a surge in new-home purchases in the US.
 Rupee losses deepened amid speculation local oil importers stepped up dollar purchases, according to United Overseas Bank.
 “Even if you don’t download the album, it’s sitting there in your purchases, pissing you off” Critics’ Opinions Is the music that bad? Depends on your perspective.
 It will remain among a list of purchased items, meaning it can be re-downloaded later.
 18 as the FederalReserve maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zerofor a considerable time after completing asset purchases.
 “We supply gum seed with all tobacco seed purchases and strongly urge farmers, no matter how small or large, to make use of them in order to avoid a deforestation crisis,” Andrew Matibiri, chief executive officer of the TIMB, said in an interview.
 “There is more and more attention on the exposure to carbon assets” Deforestation Pledge Separately, environmental advocates have pulled together a group of companies that are set to announce tomorrow their pledge to make sure their purchases of palm oil or soy products don’t lead to deforestation.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said, “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta Air Lines Inc.
 regulators are struggling to control increasing use of drones that can be purchased in hobby stores and online.
 Apple said today on its website that once the album has been removed from a user’s account, it will no longer be available to re-download as a previous purchase.
 13, when it will be available for purchase after that.
 Some stores have limited the number of iPhones that can be purchased by each shopper, so groups who aim to bring large quantities to China have to assemble recruits to vie for the stores’ limited stock.
 government debt even as forecasters anticipated the economy will strengthen enough to enable the Fed to end its monthly debt purchases.
 The central bank has been saying since March that interest rates would stay low for a “considerable time” after it completes the asset purchases known as quantitative easing.
 The purchases are expected to close next year.
 The deal brings Dominion’s solar capacity to 274 megawatts, and follows its purchase of EDF’s 20-megawatt project near Corcoran, California, in June.
 Power from the Cottonwood project will be sold to regional electricity provider Marin Energy Authority under a 25-year power-purchase agreement.
 After the purchase, Eaton Towers will own 5,000 towers in seven African countries, according to the press release.
 Prem Subedi, a spokesman for Bharti Airtel, and Eaton Towers Chief Executive Officer Alan Harper declined to comment on the exact purchase price.
 issued $225 billion of notes to help fund its about $11 billion purchase of coffee-and-doughnut chain Tim Hortons at the high end of its proposed yields as demand for speculative-grade debt slumped for a third day.
 The Moscow arbitration court froze Sistema and Sistema-Invest’s shares in Bashneft in connection with alleged violations during Sistema’s 2009 purchase of the oil producer from the state, the prosecutor’s office said on its website.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Lars Rohde, the governor of Denmark’s central bank, said asset purchases by the European Central Bank that he characterized as “quantitative easing” will probably drive interest rates lower in the Nordic country.
 “We’re not able to take into account the ECB asset purchases in our models,” Rohde said yesterday in an interview in Copenhagen.
 However, it’s obvious that if you are to guess if rates will go higher or lower from some quantitative easing program, we would guess they would go lower” ECB President Mario Draghi unveiled his plan to purchase asset-backed securities earlier this month as part of a series of policy measures designed to revive growth in the euro area.
 The Fed increased itsestimate this month for the benchmark rate and is on track toend bond-purchases in October.
 16-17 raised theirmedian estimate for the federal funds rate to 1375 percent atthe end of 2015, compared with a June forecast of 1125 percentThey cut bond purchases to $15 billion a month in a seventhconsecutive $10 billion reduction, staying on course to end inOctober the program known as quantitative easing, which the Fedhas used to support the economy.
 Shipping aircraft on schedule is crucial because buyers usually pay most of the purchase price upon delivery.
 lender, which had expected a 50-basis-point increase in the benchmark repurchase rate this year followed by a reduction of the same magnitude in the second half of 2015, now sees the RBI staying on hold through the end of next year, it said in a report.
 and aimsto automate half of its ad purchases by 2016.
 Justice Department’s antitrust division in a review of Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 That’s the lowest level of purchase consideration since December 2013, YouGov BrandIndex said.
 The number of items purchased per basket declined 32 percent from a year earlier in the second quarter, an improvement on the previous quarter’s 59 percent drop.
 These purchases have “given us a really good diversified geographical base, so we are sitting with a very good spread in terms of revenue around the globe,” Saad said.
 said the purchase by Qatar National Bank SAQ of a 235 percent stake will help the Togo-based lender’s potential access to north African markets.
 This followed the purchase of 125 percent stake valued at about $230 million on Sept.
 At almost $130,000per square meter, it’s more than triple the most expensivecommercial block deal, on a square-meter basis, in Hong Kong:Agricultural Bank of China Ltd’s 2012 purchase of an officetower on the outskirts of the Central business district.
 Expensive Deal The transaction would be the world’s biggest single assetreal estate deal, beating the $54 billion purchase of PeterCooper Village and Stuyvesant Town in New York by Tishman SpeyerProperties LP and BlackRock Realty LP in 2006, according to RealCapital Analytics Inc, which began compiling data in 2000.
 The BOE policy aligns with that of the Federal Reserve, which is stepping down its bond purchases and is projected to end them next month.
 Wintrob, who came to AIG as part of its 1999 purchase ofSunAmerica, will “pursue other opportunities,” AIG said.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- South Sudan is using a $250-million Qatar National Bank credit line to fund food and fuel purchases after civil war cut crude output, a key source of state revenue, the governor of the central bank said.
 Brookstone, meanwhile, filed for bankruptcy this year and was then purchased by Chinese buyers.
 Inflation above the bank’s 3 percent to 6 percent target band has led the Monetary Policy Committee to raise the benchmark repurchase rate by 75 basis points to 575 percent this year, even as Africa’s second-largest economy will probably expand at the slowest pace in 2014 since the 2009 recession, according to forecasts from the central bank.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Zesco Ltd, producer of most of the electricity used by Zambian copper mines, signed a power-purchase agreement with the local unit of EMCO Resources BV, the African nation’s Mines Minister Christopher Yaluma said.
 SouFun started a promotion last week offering buyers who purchase houses through its website as much as 150,000 yuan ($24,431) in assistance to cover their mortgage interest, renovation and management fees, details posted on the Beijing-based company’s website show.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index gained 01 percent after the Federal Reserve pledged to keep borrowing costs low for a “considerable time” after its asset-purchase program ends.
 That included the 2005 purchase of PeopleSoft Inc.
 The San Francisco-based microblogging company is testing a “buy” button so consumers can purchase directly from tweets posted on its service.
 to save a person’s credit-card information so users can make a purchase with just a couple of clicks, Nathan Hubbard, Twitter’s head of commerce, said in an interview.
 Higher Yields He said the proceeds from the sale of the government bonds can be reinvested in short-term corporate debt that yields 30 to 40 basis points more than lending out cash Treasury bonds through “repos,” or repurchase agreements.
 “We like financial futures and it’s been one of the reasons why Pimco has done so well for 20 or 30 years” Increasing Risk While Gross’s move may boost the amount of income flowing into the fund, the trade also increases risk, in part because the securities purchased by Pimco Total Return are lower rated and less liquid than Treasuries.
 The Fed today maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed, saying the economy is expanding at a moderate pace and inflation is below its goal.
 The increases were offset in part by a $2 billion reduction in repurchase agreements.
 Overseas purchases would increase Tata Steel’s iron ore costs at its India operations, which are currently half what it incurs at its European unit.
 Hungary purchased unprofitable MKB from Germany’sBayerische Landesbank AG in July.
 Crowd-funding investors will receive shares in the venture carrying potential tax incentives, and discounts on wine and beer purchased.
 The Fed is reducing the bond purchases it has used to support the economy and is on track to end them this year.
 SEC Settlement In 2009, Rakoff rejected a $33 million SEC settlement withBank of America over alleged misstatements about the purchase ofMerrill Lynch & Co, saying it suggested “a rather cynicalrelationship between the parties” He later signed off on thedeal when it was increased to $150 million.
 Ares, co-founded in 1997 by billionaire Tony Ressler, isnow buying less than 20 percent of new loan offerings -- theirlowest rate of purchase since the last peak -- because most ofit’s too risky for the yields being offered, according toMargolies.
 That includes the roughly $1 billion purchase of blogging-service Tumblr last year.
 and Amazoncom Inc, which were accused of failing to get parental consent for purchases made by children with mobile devices.
 Since the FOMC’s last meeting in late July, the number of open put options contracts that expire this year and grant the right to sell Eurodollar futures that expire in December 2017 has risen to the highest level of the year relative to that for call options, which allow for purchases of the money-market derivative.
 “You have to have interest rates lower to try and get people to spend rather than save” Fed officials are also debating a change to their pledge to keep rates low for a “considerable time” after they conclude a program of bond purchases intended to boost economic growth by keeping long-term rates low.
 The purchases are slated to end after the October meeting.
 shopping center landlord starting with the 2011 purchase ofreal estate from Australia’s Centro Properties Group.
 “The nature of this relaxation is to drill extra demand outside the pool of first home purchasers,” Venant Chiang, Hong Kong-based property analyst at Jefferies Group LLC, wrote in a note.
 2 via acquisitions from Colombia’s Bavaria to the 2011 purchase of Australia’s Foster’s.
 The purchase shows Fredriksen’s commitment to Seadrill, his most valuable asset, after the company fell more than 20 percent in the past three weeks.
 “We aren’t afraid to reinvest in the business to drive yields and to drive revenues” Today’s report showed consumer purchases, which account for almost 70 percent of the economy, increased an unrevised 25 percent at an annual rate.
 Final sales to domestic purchasers, which exclude inventories, increased 34 percent in the second quarter, the most in four years, compared with a previously reported 31 percent increase.
 Jana will use the positions to push for more of Walgreen’s capital to be put toward repurchases, said the person, who spoke on condition of anonymity because the discussions are private.
 Jonas said investors had expected $5 billion to $10 billion in share repurchases.
 That fell short of the $228 million it said it would repurchase in a Sept.
 The buyback follows similar repurchase programs by other cash-strapped companies including China Forestry Holdings Co.
 He built a sprawling Japanese-inspired home in Silicon Valley, scooped up swaths of land in Malibu and, in 2012, purchased Lanai, the sixth-largest Hawaiian island.
 Lenovo also agreed to purchase International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion, a deal that cleared a US.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Chinese purchases of Hong Kong stocks through a planned exchange link may exceed estimates as individual investors buy casino and technology shares unavailable in Shanghai, according to Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 The link, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38billion) of daily cross-border purchases, will make it easierfor investors to move money between the two markets.
 The link, part of China’s effort to open up its financialsystem and promote wider use of the yuan, will begin with limitson both daily and aggregate purchases as policy makers seek tomaintain some control over capital flows.
 ETP purchases expect long-term growth to spur industrial demand for silver in everything from solar panels to electronics.
 They are worried that there could be a recession, but they think that industrial demand will remain fairly robust” Solar Panels Industrial demand will rise this year, with the most ever being used in solar panels, while jewelry and silverware makers increase purchases by 43 percent, according to CPM Group, a New York-based researcher.
 Coin sales at Australia’s Perth Mint last month rose to the highest since January, while purchases at the US.
 The Mojang purchase wouldgive Microsoft a game that’s popular across consoles, computersand mobile devices including those made by rivals like Apple.
 Criminals sometimes buy numbers, then manufacture fake cards they use to purchase gift cards and goods that can be resold.
 The Reserve Bank of India will maintain the repurchase rateat 8 percent to shield the rupee from potential increases inUS.
 These borrowers, whose share of the purchase mortgage market has been shrinking since the collapse of subprime lending, continued to lose ground to white borrowers through 2013, according to federal data released this week.
 Minorities Drop The share of mortgage lending to blacks for home purchases slipped to 48 percent in 2013 from 51 percent in 2012, according to data collected under the Home Mortgage Disclosure Act, which requires lenders to report the race and income of loan applicants.
 population, reached a high of 87 percent of mortgage borrowers for home purchases in 2006.
 And rather than typical fixed or adjustable-rate loans, the government-backed agencies should encourage lenders to offer shared appreciation mortgages, where lenders benefit from price appreciation of homes, or lease purchases, which enable renters to buy their homes, he said.
 Redlining Enforcement Today most property transfers in those neighborhoods are cash sales to investors rather than mortgage purchases by owner-occupants.
 Distressed deals skew the data in neighborhoods, making it more difficult to get a loan sufficiently large for a standard purchase.
 “Fannie lenders are going to have to fashion some type of program that will allow owner-occupants the ability to purchase the homes they live in.
 Sales, excluding purchases of motor vehicles and gas, may climb to as much as $986 billion in November through January, Deloitte, a New York-based consulting firm, said today in a statement.
 Shoppers using devices make a purchase at a 40 percent higher rate in stores than those who don’t, the firm said.
 Cirrus Logic Inc, a maker of audio components that gets 73 percent of its revenue from Apple, purchased rival Wolfson Microelectronics Plc, which has been adding non-Apple customers after getting dropped from the iPhone.
 Rakuten’s billionaire Chairman Hiroshi Mikitani is betting the purchase will help the Tokyo-based company push its global e-commerce strategy.
 The purchase will lift the proportion of Rakuten’s e-commerce transactions from outside Japan to 16 percent from about 6 percent now, he said.
 The company, founded by Mikitani in 1997, was an acquirer in three of the top 10 e-commerce deals in Japan before the Ebates purchase was announced, the data shows.
 Longstanding Provision Under the SEC rules, institutional prime funds -- whichcater to large investors and purchase corporate debt -- have twoyears to switch to floating-share prices.
 Bosch will purchase ZF’s half of a steering-systems manufacturer for an undisclosed amount, the Stuttgart, Germany-based auto-parts producer, the world’s largest, said today in a statement.
 Proceeds from the sale are expected to help Friedrichshafen, Germany-based ZF finance an offer for TRW, while unraveling the Bosch partnership would allow ZF to avoid antitrust issues in a purchase of the US.
 The Bloomberg Dollar Spot Index climbed earlier amid bets the Federal Reserve will change its stance this week on keeping rates low for a “considerable” time after ending bond purchases.
 The purchases are on track to end this year.
 Meanwhile, the Federal Reserve cut monthly bond buying by $10 billion for a seventh time yesterday and pledged to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases end, probably in October.
 The divergence signals a growing preference for mainland shares before the start of a trading link next month that allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases.
 The offer, which can be purchased on its app and covers injuries suffered under the influence of alcohol, is a “test to see how this is being accepted as a sales channel,” said spokesman Wolfgang Zdral.
 The same goes for purchases made on the Internet, where offers are typically limited to simple products such as motor and liability insurance.
 “The yield curve is flattening as the Fed cuts quantitative easing and there’s less pressure on super-long yields to rise” Fed policy makers have said they may end the central bank’s purchases of Treasury and mortgage debt next month.
 The purchase will be funded from a credit lineof as much as 7 billion euros ($9 billion), SAP said.
 Chevron “has decided to engage an investment banking firmto identify potential parties interested in the purchase of ourassets in Hawaii,” Reddall said.
 The purchase will accelerate Merck’s shift away from developing pharmaceuticals at a time when its Serono biotechnology business has struggled to create new products.
 The purchase values Sigma-Aldrich, excluding net debt, at about 199 times earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization for the past 12 months, compared with a median multiple of 95 times in specialty chemicals acquisitions of $100 million or more in the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The purchase eclipses the 2007 purchase of Serono, which was valued at about $135 billion at the time, as the largest ever by Merck.
 Doyen typically helps finance the purchase of a player, in some cases the entire cost, and in return gets a percentage of the future transfer fee as well as its original investment back.
 Imports rose by 14 percent to 935 billion rand as purchases of mineral products climbed 11 percent.
 Machinery and electronics purchases advanced 49 percent.
 The company reiterated that monthly wireless subscriber defections were 1 percent or lower in the third quarter and that about 50 percent of customers are opting for phone financing to purchase new phones.
 “That’s what makes this combination of TriZetto and Cognizant so strategically competitive” The takeover will be paid for with a combination of cash and debt, and Cognizant said it has arranged $1 billion in financing to back the purchase.
 Large M&A On a conference call today, Cognizant Chief Financial Officer Karen McLoughlin said the company won’t make any other large acquisitions until the TriZetto purchase closes and is integrated.
 “We regret that errors occurred when our customers purchased credit-monitoring and identity-theft products from a third-party vendor,” Dana Ripley, a spokesman for Minneapolis-based US.
 Banks have warned that a draft of the Basel group’s NSFR proposal published earlier this year would drive up the cost of equity trading, unfairly penalize them for carrying out repurchase agreements and underestimate the stability of operational deposits.
 Icahn, Peltz In June of this year, Icahn said he had purchased a 94 percent stake in Family Dollar and would seek talks with management.
 Policy makers decreased the monthly pace of debt purchases by $10 billion for the seventh consecutive meeting, with the intention of ending them after October.
 Direct bidders, non-primary dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 10 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 206 percent at the previous 10 auctions.
 They purchased 483 percent of the seven-year notes sold, compared with an average of 433 percent for the past 10 sales.
 The notes were purchased at a yield of 18 percent.
 The company has made several small acquisitions, including the purchase of social-data provider Gnip Inc.
 In the short term, convertible debt offerings tend to send a company’s share price down as buyers hedge their purchases by taking short positions in the stock.
 Particularly, “the larger farms and estates that overseas buyers would traditionally purchase -- they seem to be hesitant, waiting to see the outcome before they buy anywhere,” he said.
 Auction Results Indirect bidders, a class of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 425 percent of the $61 billion of 3-, 10- and 30-year securities sold this week, according to Treasury Department data compiled by Bloomberg.
 CF completed its purchase of Terra in 2010.
 Today’s purchase will be Boeing’s biggest-ever in Europe from its No.
 purchased Nanostim Inc.
 That’s what skeptical bankers started calling Igor Marich after he introduced yuan trading in Moscow in 2010, when Russia became the first country outside China to offer regulated renminbi purchases.
 Last year, for example, the Moscow Exchange moved yuan-ruble trading to the so-called basic regime, meaning settlement is “next-day” instead of “today” and banks need only 4 percent to 45 percent of the value of their purchases on deposit with the bourse instead of 100 percent.
 With trade-financing costs in yuan and dollars now “absolutely comparable,” Sportsmaster is able to cut its purchase costs on Chinese goods by as much as 4 percent, a considerable amount for a low-margin, high-volume business, said Sergey Agibalov, the company’s managing director.
 Peter Low, another four-decade veteran of the NYSE who became a managing director at Griswold Co, wrote in 2006 that Robbins “became the architect of an elite and well-respected floor-based business catering to investment advisers as well as to corporations involved in share repurchase programs” Like any agent of change, Robbins met resistance.
 The company said today it will repurchase an additional$500 million in common stock.
 is pushing for a sale of its wireless network towers by year-end, according to people familiar with the situation, in a deal that may raise about $6 billion for spectrum purchases.
 was the second-largest transaction in North America’s oil and gas industry in more than five years, trailing only Exxon Mobil Corp’s $35 billion purchase of XTO Energy Inc.
 The loans, which let the borrower pay interest with more debt, were issued in 2007 to fund the purchase of shares in Codere’s initial public offering.
 The Fed maintained a commitment to keep the benchmark interest rate near zero for a “considerable time” after the asset purchases are completed, saying the economy is expanding at a moderate pace.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- EBay Inc’s PayPal is tying up with three bitcoin-payment providers to enable online purchases of music, movies and other digital content as it adds more tools to transact using the virtual currency.
 “They’re looking for other ways to use capital” Stock Falls Investors punished the company for the repurchase decision.
 It’s another thing if you see the world’s main locomotive of commodity purchases really slowing down in domestic demand” The kiwi touched a more than one-year low of 7869 US.
 Retirement System The Virginia suit focuses on the retirement system’s purchase of 220 packages of securities.
 Treasury Purchases Treasury was authorized to “purchase any obligations and other securities issued by” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, a provision which also allowed it to “exercise any rights received in connection with such purchases,” Lamberth wrote yesterday.
 The Murray Hill investor group’s purchase price works out to about $427 a square foot.
 The purchase price includes net debt, which was about $198 million as of Aug.
 Indirect bidders purchased 425 percent of the $61 billion of 3-, 10- and 30-year securities sold, according to Treasury Department data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Fed is reducing the monthly bond purchases it has used to support the economy, cutting the amount at its previous meeting in July by $10 billion to $25 billion.
 The central bank reiterated it will probably keep the target for its benchmark interest rate in a range of zero to 025 percent for a “considerable time” after the asset purchases end.
 Singapore trading rules allow investors three days to pay for their stock purchases.
 As CEO, starting in 2003, he expanded the firm through purchases in countries including the US, Italy, Turkey and Belgium, and navigated the global financial crisis with only one quarterly loss.
 Germany’s largest lender was also hired this week to helpunderwrite about 125 billion euros of debt backing ZFFriedrichshafen AG’s purchase of TRW Automotive Holdings Corp, aperson familiar with the deal said Sept.
 Lennar has boosted earnings by raising prices and using its large size to save money on materials and land purchases as demand for new houses remains uneven.
 While Lennar still sells about 30 percent of its homes to first-time buyers, many would-be purchasers are discouraged because loan-qualification procedures have become “invasive,” Miller said on the call.
 ECB Stimulus The euro has tumbled almost 10 percent from a two-and-a-half year high reached in May as the ECB unveiled unprecedented stimulus, including purchases of asset-backed securities, to arrest a slide in inflation.
 Investment Asset Manduca’s view of gems as an investment asset jars with the outlook of De Beers, the biggest diamond company, which promotes the stones as an emotional purchase rather than a commodity.
 “Acting could risk terror attacks back in Turkey, and across its long border with both Iraq and Syria” Turkey’s central bank, under pressure from Erdogan to prioritize the economy, has lowered its benchmark one-week repurchase rate to 825 percent in three steps starting in May.
 The company said today it agreed with lenders to amend a credit facility, allowing the company to proceed with the stock repurchases.
 “It was never our intention to allude to the tragic events that took place at Kent State in 1970 and we are extremely saddened that this item was perceived as such” Urban Outfitters said it removed the item from its website “to avoid further upset” EBay Auction A seller on EBay, meanwhile, claimed he was able to purchase the sweatshirt and attempted to resell it on the auction site for $2,500.
 “The NSO pools had far superior results” HMC, which buys loans as Corona Asset Management, has rehabilitated dozens of abandoned homes in North Las Vegas, Nevada, from a portfolio of 217 mortgages purchased this year, many of which have become rentals for families serving at Nellis Air Force Base, he said.
 Most Profitable In addition to lacking capital to compete at auction, nonprofits often don’t have the analytical capability and resources to manage large portfolios of delinquent loans after purchase, Ahmad said.
 Credit Suisse First Boston was under pressure to cut more costs after already firing 2,600 workers since its purchase of Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Inc.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Many of the people rushing to buy an iPhone 6 tomorrow will fund the purchase with a currency that’s growing in value: old iPhones.
 AT&T already offers two deals that also will be extended to the new versions of the iPhone: get a $100 credit on your bill when you purchase any iPhone and add a new phone line to an AT&T Next account; or buy an iPhone for no money down with AT&T Next and get a $200 discount on any iPad.
 is seeking to purchase control of The Hub from partner Hasbro Inc.
 will purchase the $200 million backed by the private funds, and the rest will be offered publicly, said Steven Kantor, an adviser to Olympia Development.
 A strengthening job market also is giving households the means to sustain their purchases, which make up about 70 percent of the economy.
 Auto Sales Some of the wealth is going toward vehicle purchases.
 Policy makers, who finished a two-day meeting yesterday, maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases are completed, saying the economy is expanding at a moderate pace and inflation is below its goal.
 israising $174 billion for its purchase of Bally TechnologiesInc.
 Last month, Stamford, Connecticut-based cable-televisionoperator Charter postponed its bid to raise $42 billion ofloans that were part of an $89 billion financing to back itspurchase of assets from Comcast Corp, Bloomberg data show.
 andCredit Suisse Group AG would have been used to repay bonds andfund Ineos Group Holdings Inc’s purchase of a 50 percent stakein the Frankfurt-based company from BASF SE.
 is planning a lender meeting tomorrow todiscuss a $13 billion financing backing its purchase of VideoGaming Technologies Inc, Bloomberg data show.
 (FLT) plans a meeting with lenderstomorrow to discuss bank debt including a $105 billion termloan that will help fund its purchase of Comdata Inc, a personwith knowledge of the transaction said today, asking not to beidentified citing a lack of authority to speak publicly.
 Banks already said in April they had cut the proportion of gem purchases they were willing to finance.
 Arkema has found its formerparent company a rich hunting ground for assets and it purchasedcoatings resins and photocure operations from Total in 2011 forabout 550 million euros as it sought to add away fromcommoditised materials.
 Credit Suisse Group AG said the company would be the best fit for an acquisition by SABMiller after its attempted purchase of Heineken was rebuffed by the company.
 The central bank has said that its benchmark rate will stay low for a “considerable time” after it completes the monthly bond purchases.
 RBC Capital Markets polled 6,000 consumers and found that “an impressive 26 percent of respondents who intend to purchase an iPhone are new” to Apple’s ecosystem, with the majority coming from Android, Amit Daryanani, an analyst at RBC, wrote in a note to investors.
 Parkway, which focuses on buildings in the southern US, will purchase three buildings in Tampa, Florida, the Orlando-based company said in a statement today.
 If the deal doesn’t go ahead, the proceeds of the stock sale will be used to repay debt or to fund other purchases, the REIT said in separate statement.
 AB InBev, based in Leuven, Belgium, has spent close to $100 billion over the past decade to purchase brews from Corona to Budweiser.
 Yield Lure Bond buyers still purchase tobacco debt amid the default estimates because funds would flow to states and cities even after the securities’ stated maturities, meaning they’d eventually be fully repaid.
 That makes Taminco the second biggest acquisition for Eastman after its 2012 purchase of Solutia Inc.
 Eastman borrowed $35 billion to acquire Solutia and plans to finance the Taminco purchase with additional debt.
 “The purchase of Taminco will initially weaken debt protection metrics but we would expect swift restoration of the balance sheet with free cash flow, as with past acquisitions,” Gimme Credit’s Levenson said.
 The central bank has said since March that interest rates would stay low for a “considerable time” after it completes the asset purchases known as quantitative easing.
 Spanish and Portuguese bonds rose, indicating that investors are betting the ECB president may ultimately resort to large-scale purchases of government debt as he strives to avert deflation in the euro area.
 Draghi has left open the option of large-scale sovereign-bond purchases to achieve his balance-sheet target.
 Germany’s Jens Weidmann has spoken out against quantitative easing and opposed the rate cuts and asset-purchase programs this month.
 Home Depot, which didn’t disclosehow many customers may have been affected, said the continuinginvestigation is focused on purchases made since April.
 Adding Cricket products advances GameStop’s effort to expand beyond gaming, a business that is threatened as players shift purchases online.
 For AT&T, the move expands distribution of Cricket’s pay-as-you-go brand, acquired with the purchase of Leap Wireless International Inc.
 IBM has about $14 billion remaining in its current share repurchase authorization and said it will request additional funds for buybacks at its October board meeting.
 The Stoxx Europe 600 Index fell 06 percent to 3251 at the close of trading in London, paring a decline of as much as 11 percent as the European Central Bank said it settled more than 17 billion euros ($22 billion) of covered-bond purchases last week.
 The ECB began purchases of covered bonds on Oct.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said it will buy assets for at least two years, starting covered-bonds purchases this month and asset-backed securities this quarter.
 Germany’s biggest builder said it will repurchase as much as 10 percent of its share capital.
 pays programmers like CBS and ESPN? It’s a question that is tripping up the path to approval for Comcast’s $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, and AT&T Inc’s $485 billion purchase of DirecTV.
 The clock was stopped twice as the FCC weighed Comcast’s purchase of NBC Universal -- a deal it approved in 2011 after 234 days.
 The central bank has said it will keep rates low for a “considerable time” after asset purchases end, but any decision depends on the strength of the economy.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve said it sees further improvement in the labor market while confirming it will end an asset-purchase program that has added $166 trillion to its balance sheet.
 Chair Janet Yellen is completing two years of bond purchases that started under her predecessor, Ben S.
 The latest round was announced in September 2012, with monthly purchases of $85 billion in Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities.
 The Fed began a step-like reduction of purchases in January 2014, cutting them by $10 billion per meeting.
 Minneapolis Fed President Narayana Kocherlakota dissented, saying that with low inflation expectations the Fed should commit to keeping rates low “at least until the one-to-two-year ahead inflation outlook has returned to 2 percent and should continue the asset-purchase program at its current level” As the Fed winds down unprecedented stimulus, the European Central Bank is contemplating its own quantitative easing program to tackle the weakest inflation in five years, and Japan is continuing purchases.
 Balance Sheet Even after purchases end, the Fed’s record balance sheet will provide support to the economy by limiting the supply of government securities and suppressing long-term interest rates.
 When the third round of large-scale asset purchases was announced, the jobless rate was 81 percent, and most policy makers forecast it would fall to 6 percent to 68 percent by late 2015.
 The Singaporean lender’s private bank increased assets under management by about S$13 billion to S$88 billion following the purchase, Tan Su Shan, the bank’s head of wealth management and consumer banking, said in an interview on Oct.
 The top banks on Graber’s list were JPMorgan, Citigroup and Bank of America, which was under scrutiny for bonds it acquired through its purchase of subprime lender Countrywide Financial Corp.
 interest rates sooner as it ends asset purchases.
 While American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, would escape the full force of the measures, it would have to comply with the fee caps when it works with other companies to issue cards.
 Compliance Policy Indonesia Tax Boss Wants to See Bank Records in Revenue Push Indonesia’s tax chief is pushing for access to personal bank accounts and wants to track car and home purchases in his fight to catch evaders and boost revenue.
 It’s also awaiting regulatory approval for the $485 billion purchase of satellite-TV provider DirecTV and has been exploring expansion in Latin America.
 The Bank of Japan is buying debt and expanding its monetary base by as much as $650 billion a year, and the European Central Bank announced plans to purchase covered bonds and asset-backed securities.
 The purchase of Finansbank eight years ago was a rare success in Greece’s drive to make its banks supreme in southeast Europe, while also forging ties between two traditional enemies.
 At the time of the purchase, Greece’s economy was growing at a pace of more than 5 percent a year, while Turkey was recovering from a financial crisis that had led to more than 20 banks collapsing or being saved by the government.
 Shopping centers and other retail properties will make up 26 percent of the purchases compared with 18 percent last year.
 The mall purchase will give Wereldhave a net initial yield of 55 percent, according to a presentation to investors today.
 The yield is the rent expressed as a percentage of the purchase price.
 Cushman & Wakefield LLP advised Wereldhave on the purchase.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable Group is raising 47 billion euros ($6 billion) by selling new stock to help finance a purchase of SFR, part of billionaire Patrick Drahi’s plan to combine the two companies into one cable and wireless provider.
 The company expects to spend $25 billion on stock repurchases this year.
 “The sheer volume of potential purchasing power must give them a huge negotiating advantage for price in new sales and purchase agreements, particularly as they are looking to new projects in Mozambique, Canada and now Alaska,” said Leigh Bolton, managing director of Holmwood Consulting Ltd, a Surrey, England-based energy consultant.
 The venture may purchase 35 million to 40 million metric tons a year, according to the statement, rivaling Korea Gas as the largest importer of the fuel that’s the dominant energy source in Japan.
 Alipay, which facilitates Web purchases from desktop PCs, tablets and smartphones, has more than 550 million registered users and processes about 85 million transactions a day, according to its website.
 The company handled more than three-quarters of the purchases made on Alibaba’s platforms last year, according to a regulatory filing.
 One option is for the central banks to boost purchases of platinum and palladium, he said.
 The purchase is likely to cause short term losses, UOB Kay Hian’s analysts Shi Yan and Terry Zhou said in an e-mailed research note.
 28-29, after indicating in September that it planned to end its own bond-purchase program this month.
 Market Reaction Treasuries fell yesterday after a report showed existing-home sales advanced and the European Central Bank purchased debt, damping haven demand.
 purchase and a $130 billion Verizon Communications Inc.
 He was a lead adviser on Comcast’s $587 billion purchase of AT&T Broadband in 2002, and worked on Time Warner Inc’s infamous $124 billion AOL Inc.
 Verizon’s purchase of Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in their wireless joint venture was the biggest acquisition in years, and made PJT one of 2013’s top 20 deal advisers.
 That implies a purchase price of about $257 billion, based on estimates for 2015 Ebitda of $214 million, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “You have to invest for this” Profits from Volkswagen, Audi and Porsche subsidize Bugatti, purchased in 1998 along with the Lamborghini and Bentley nameplates under the tenure of then-CEO and current chairman Ferdinand Piech.
 “The market’s a sugar addict and the sweet nectar of free money, any kind of incremental liquidity from a central bank, whether it’s Europe or China, is what the market’s looking for” The ECB bought Italian covered bonds as it returned to the market for a second day under its asset purchase program, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Debt issued by Intesa Sanpaolo SpA was included in the purchases, according to one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 16 that policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond purchases.
 He was the first Fed official to publicly suggest the central bank should extend its asset-purchase program when policy makers meet later this month.
 The purchases will increase Dynegy’s generating capacity almost twofold, as part of the company emerges from a 2011 bankruptcy.
 The ECB bought Italian covered bonds as it returned to the market for a second day under its asset-purchase program, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Capital LLC’s Surgery Partners’ purchase of health care facilities operator Symbion Holdings Corp.
 Officials said labor-market conditions “improved somewhat further,” and that a range of indicators suggests that “underutilization of labor resources is gradually diminishing,” modifying earlier language that referred to “significant underutilization” Bond Purchases Chair Janet Yellen is completing two years of bond purchases that started under her predecessor, Ben S.
 made a deal to purchase Move Inc, the owner of Realtorcom, for $950 million.
 GT Advanced was set to begin repaying the money in January, either as cash or a credit against Apple purchases of sapphire material.
 The Irving fund is seeking to represent all Tesco shareholders who purchased the company’s American depositary receipts, each representing one ordinary share, from Feb.
 KanAm sold the properties to IGIS Asset Management, which made the purchase on behalf of a group of Korean investors led by Hanwha Life Insurance Co.
 Google, based in Mountain View, has spent billions on property leases and purchases as it expands hiring and makes acquisitions.
 The properties Google purchased comprise about 934,200 square feet of Class A office space, as well as a 38,000-square-foot fitness center that includes a gym, pool and spa, according to two people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be named because the details are private.
 Blackstone Deal Blackstone in 2011 bought an $80 million junior loan on the office complex at a discount in an effort to gain ownership if Starwood Capital defaulted, two people with knowledge of the purchase said at the time.
 Outside of Silicon Valley, Google’s major real estate purchases include New York’s 111 Eighth Ave, a former industrial warehouse that takes up an entire block in the Chelsea neighborhood, which it acquired for $18 billion in 2010.
 Tapping Markets Chief Financial Officer Ute Wolf said that Evonik has the resources to execute a “sizable” acquisition and issuing equity to pay for a purchase is a possibility.
 to about $658 million, raising pressure on the banana producer to cancel its planned purchase of an Irish competitor.
 While Chiquita has continued to recommend the Fyffes combination, it adjourned a shareholder vote on the purchase and let Cutrale-Safra carry out due diligence so that the Brazilians could make another offer.
 Aside from WhatsApp, the company in July completed the purchase of Oculus VR Inc.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Japan’s two-year notes climbed, pushing yields to a record low, as a decline in domestic equities reinforced speculation the Bank of Japan will maintain its unprecedented debt purchases to sustain growth.
 The central bank couldn’t buy all 3 trillion yen ($28 billion) of bills it sought to purchase today, falling short of its goal for such an operation for the first time since at least April 2013.
 BOJ Governor Haruhiko Kuroda is under pressure to expand monthly asset purchases of about 7 trillion yen after the International Monetary Fund last week said his 2 percent inflation target won’t be reached next year.
 The central bank purchased a record 35 trillion yen on Oct.
 “The BOJ’s t-bill purchases were clearly big this month, and there’s little left in the secondary market,” Toshiaki Terada, Tokyo-based researcher at Totan Research Co, said by phone.
 The purchase, completed in July, would help Vodafone turn around its Spanish business, which has been chipped away by price wars and a sluggish economy causing revenue declines for the last four fiscal years.
 Junk Rout Junk bonds, for example, plunged 21 percent in September, the most since hysteria mounted in June 2013 that rates would rapidly rise as the Fed curtailed its asset purchases.
 retail sales of video-game players and software rose 2 percent from a year earlier to $11 billion in September, led by continued strong purchases of consoles from Sony Corp.
 Imports gained 14 percent to 937 billion rand as purchases of mineral products, which includes oil, rose 02 percent.
 Techint paid about 5 billion reais ($2 billion) for its277 percent voting stake in Usiminas, or 36 reais per shareThe stock closed at 651 reais yesterday, 82 percent below thepurchase price.
 The mortgages, insured by the federal government, require a waiting period of only three years following a foreclosure, while borrowers may have to wait as long as seven years to make a purchase with a Fannie Mae loan.
 FHA loans also come with down payments of as low as 35 percent of the purchase price, and their underwriting requirements, including credit scores, are more flexible than those associated with other conventional loans.
 Wouldn’t Qualify About 48 percent of FHA borrowers who purchased Phoenix-area properties from Meritage Homes Corp.
 Those able to make purchases are the lucky ones, they said.
 Korea’s $685 million deficit contrasts with a record $1 billion surplus for the UK, the global leader in exports of goods purchased on the web, data from the government in Seoul and OC&C Strategy Consultants in London show.
 In an effort to bring the country closer to one-click purchases using a credit card, the government said last month it would abolish regulations requiring the use of ActiveX by the end of the year.
 The number of visitors from China has jumped more than sixfold in less than a decade to more than 43 million last year, reflecting interest in Korea that could boost online purchases.
 Credit card purchases via websites and physical stores abroad increased 15 percent in 2013, outpacing a 32 percent domestic advance, Bank of Korea data shows.
 The communications of as many as 80 people were purchased and transcribed, according to one of the people.
 Honda already purchases more than 20 percent of driver-seat air bags from Autoliv and Nihon Plast, according to estimates from Morgan Stanley.
 Single Tenant The purchase announced today includes four independent office buildings.
 and the Abu Dhabi Investment Authority to purchase the headquarters space at Time Warner Inc.
 LSK made “totally unauthorized purchases” of Firstcaution stock in August and September last year with 309,200 euros ($390,000) of Insch’s funds held in VP Bank (Luxembourg) SA, Insch said in an e-mail sent on March 28 to the CSSF, which regulates Luxembourg’s financial industry.
 ‘Wider Operation’ LSK’s purchase of the shares with Insch funds were part of a wider operation that was “utterly outrageous and abusive” in nature, Christopher Cruden, Insch’s chief executive officer, said in an e-mail sent to Luxembourg’s regulator April 7.
 Dissent is increasing against the accommodative monetary policy, which has seen 60 trillion yen ($553 billion) to 70 trillion yen committed to annual asset purchases, as consumer prices remain depressed and growth is anemic.
 The purchase program is part of an easing plan the ECB president previously said would steer the balance sheet back toward levels seen at the start of 2012, signaling as much as 1 trillion euros ($13 trillion) in assets may be added.
 that finance its purchase of Bally Technologies Inc, leaving the lenders stuck holding the debt, according to four people with knowledge of the matter.
 The $51 billion Bally purchase would leave Scientific Games, where billionaire Ronald Perelman has the largest stake through his MacAndrews & Forbes Holdings Inc, with debt 8 times its earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, Moody’s Investors Service said in a Sept.
 Scientific Games proposes taking on nearly $539 billion in new debt to help fund the $32 billion purchase of Las Vegas-based Bally and refinance about $18 billion of Bally debt, according to a Sept.
 20 the purchase should be completed later this year after a Nov.
 and Cerberus Capital Management LP, to purchase property assets in the country.
 In July, the company acted as an adviser to the Qatar Investment Authority on its purchase of Credit Suisse Group AG’s Milan headquarters for an undisclosed amount.
 The Zurich-based bank may consider purchases.
 The Tokyo water-treatment company said today in a statement that the purchase of the APW business units includes German operations based in Ludwigshafen and Dusseldorf and additional sites in Europe and China.
 Treasury will have received 102 billion pounds in total for its purchase of Northern Rock.
 central bankers have been planning to end monthly asset purchases this month and have discussed raising overnight rates next year.
 Existing shareholders would own 20 percent of the company’s shares if none of them purchase stock in a rights offering that is part of the aid package.
 “With mills holding ample stocks of finished steel, buyers are unwilling to purchase significant quantities of iron ore” China’s economy will probably expand 73 percent this year, according to a Bloomberg survey of economists from Sept.
 Resilient motor vehicle sales, spurred by more employment opportunities, and a pickup in corporate equipment purchases are at the crux of the strongest rate of production in four years.
 16 on charges linked to the investment company’s purchase of shares in oil producer OAO Bashneft.
 ETF Gains Oil, which together with natural gas provides about half of Russia’s budget revenue, decreased 13 percent to $8112 a barrel in New York after the Federal Reserve ended its asset-purchase program and US.
 stocks declined after the Federal Reserve confirmed it will end its asset-purchase program, indicating the US.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Skymark Airlines Inc, Japan’s third-largest carrier, reiterated it’s at risk of going out of business should it have to pay Airbus Group NV a penalty after the planned purchase of six A380 superjumbos fell through.
 The purchase will add to Endo’s offerings of branded pharmaceuticals.
 Homebuyers had moving vans full of furniture and nowhere to put it because of delays in closing their purchases.
 Countrywide Financial Corp, the lender Bank of America purchased in 2008, has been blamed by regulators for using lax underwriting standards and predatory lending that fueled its rise to the biggest US.
 While power-purchase agreements for solar and wind power are typically confidential, renewable energy costs less, he said, according to data from the national power regulator.
 Fed Policy The Fed said last month it will end its bond-purchase program at its Oct.
 OCBC completed this year its $5 billion purchase of Wing Hang in Hong Kong.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of England Governor Mark Carney is facing scrutiny on the management of Britain’s payments system after the biggest disruption in at least seven years delayed bank transfers and house purchases.
 The RTGS system is the infrastructure for the Clearing House Automated Payment System, or CHAPS, used for high-value wholesale transfers and other time-sensitive payments such as house purchases.
 Federal Reserve ended its asset-purchase program because of an improving labor market.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen and her colleagues confirmed the central bank will end its asset-purchase program while maintaining its commitment to keep interest rates low after a two-day policy meeting.
 “The announcement on gas prices and diesel deregulation seem to be the beginning of something much larger” Investors and traders made ceremonial purchases of stocks in an hour-long trading session until 7:30 pm, marking Diwali, the festival of lights and the start of the Hindu new year, Samvat 2071.
 3, 2013, the best performer in the period among the world’s 10 biggest markets, buoyed by purchases by foreigners.
 There were 101 purchases within the first hour, said Thomas Lam, Henderson’s sales general manager.
 “The worse that situation gets the more likely it is that the ECB has to do some more aggressive form of QE,” he said, referring to government bond purchases, or quantitative easing.
 The state-backed auto association cut its forecast for full-year vehicle sales in July as the economy showed little signs of improvement and more cities consider purchase restrictions.
 Chinese brands gained 14 percentage points in market share to 385 percent in September from the prior month, as the government resumed subsidizing purchases of fuel-efficient vehicles.
 Treasury was authorized to “purchase any obligations and other securities issued by” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, a provision which also allowed it to “exercise any rights received in connection with such purchases,” Lamberth wrote in his Sept.
 To clear regulatory hurdles for the purchase of DirecTV, AT&T sold a minority stake in America Movil after about 24 years.
 Sales of pre-owned luxury goods are soaring as online marketplaces including the RealReal and Paris-based Vestiaire Collective allow brand-obsessed consumers to recycle their fancy clothes and purchase more for less.
 13 as investors speculated that the European Central Bank’s asset-purchase program is inadequate to revive the euro-area economy.
 The gauge extended losses after the ECB outlined details of its asset-purchases plans.
 Debt issued by Intesa Sanpaolo SpA was included in the purchases, according to one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 “When you don’t see any sign of an upward trend within durables or capital goods, you basically see that investment is very weak” Vehicle sales fell 44 percent in September from last year as purchases of buses and trucks plummeted 13 percent, Brazilian automobile association Fenabrave said in a report yesterday.
 carrier to employ biometrics for boarding passes and inflight purchases and could spur wider adoption across the industry.
 Under the new plan, fliers can join the elite club with 100,000 miles or points earned from purchases and 120 segments traveled.
 Lower-level elite status will receive the free upgrades on flights of 500 miles or less, and will have to purchase or earn upgrades for longer flights.
 Audible, which Amazon purchased in 2008, is the biggest audio content provider on Apple Inc’s iTunes store, according to the company’s website.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index plunged the most since April, erasing its biggest rally this year, on concern that slowing growth in Europe will hurt the American economy as the Federal Reserve ends its bond purchases.
 climbed 02 percent after investor Carl Icahn urged the company to accelerate share repurchases.
 Watt, 69, the director of the Federal Housing Finance Agency, outlined the flaws that will require lenders to repurchase bad loans from Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 The mortgage finance companies have forced banks to repurchase defaulted home loans with a balance of $812 billion from 2011 to 2013 alone.
 Watt said lenders who show a pattern of abuse and make a set number of loans that violate the terms will be on the hook for repurchases.
 Only if the mortgages would have been ineligible for purchase with the accurate information would the lender be responsible for repurchasing them.
 Lenders agree when they sell the loans to repurchase them if they don’t meet the standards they guaranteed.
 The company said the application will expand access to mortgages by providing lenders with more certainty that they won’t have to repurchase loans due to appraisal errors.
 Sales Falter Applicants approved for mortgages to purchase homes had an average FICO credit score of 755 in August, according to Ellie Mae, a company that makes software used to process mortgage applications.
 In the last 20 years, they have accounted for 41 percent of purchases, according to data from NAR.
 Financial terms weren’t disclosed, beyond specifying that Core Media -- known as CKX before it was purchased by Apollo in 2011 -- will retain its own capital structure.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond purchases to halt the decline in inflation expectations.
 28-29 and have said they expect to end asset purchases after that meeting.
 People really value that” One of her biggest challenges arose in the financial crisis when regulators pressured card issuers to reduce fees at the same time consumers were cutting back on purchases.
 Delays will also mean lost commissions from the net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border stock purchases allowed under the program.
 “This is one of the best places to come if you’re an African moving to the US,” Retta said as he rang up purchases.
 That’s more than the 25 percent gain in prices for food Americans purchased away from their homes in the year through August, according to the Bureau of Labor Statistics.
 Acquisitions could remedy that and would be a better use of cash than share repurchases, said shareholder HighMark Capital Management Inc.
 “It gives them more freedom to reinvest, to reposition, to restructure and to optimize their asset portfolio for this new paradigm” While IBM may not be up for a large, transformative purchase, it had $96 billion in cash at the end of September, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, and has stable investment-grade credit ratings.
 The fund follows a dozen exits in the past year, including Rakuten Inc’s $1 billion purchase of rebates service Ebates Inc.
 That could hurt the firm’s financial strength or force it to sell investments at a loss, though New York Life has purchased hedges, he said.
 At the same conference in 2012, then-CFO Michael Sproule said the company had purchased protection against rates shooting up.
 Bernanke mentioned the possibility of slowing bond purchases.
 The European Central Bank president has stopped short of large-scale sovereign-bond purchases as efforts to mollify Germany’s political elite do little to silence criticism of his ever-more expansionary measures.
 The debate over sovereign-debt purchases will be raised again on Oct.
 While he stayed away from sovereign-debt purchases this time, preferring asset-backed securities and covered bonds, the plan still triggered a flood of complaints.
 German Resignations Bundesbank President Jens Weidmann opposed both the OMT program and the latest purchase plan.
 In an interview published by the Wall Street Journal this week, he said that “what I cannot support or accept are measures that see the central bank straying into economic policy or fiscal policy” His predecessor Axel Weber and Germany’s Juergen Stark, a chief economist of the ECB, resigned over sovereign-bond purchases made under the now-defunct Securities Markets Program.
 2 that asset purchases will be prudent, and that action is needed because a prolonged period of low inflation is harmful to the economy.
 He left open the question of whether to carry out large-scale purchases of sovereign debt, or quantitative easing, to bolster the economy.
 The purchase program is part of an easing plan Draghi has said will steer the balance sheet back to levels seen at the start of 2012, signaling as much as 1 trillion euros ($13 trillion) in assets could be added.
 I expect you’ll see more of a feeding frenzy for what comes to market” Ace expects to complete the purchase this month of Itau Unibanco Holding SA’s high-risk insurance business in a Brazil deal announced July 4 for about $685 million, Greenberg’s company said yesterday.
 cable company with more than 8 million customers counting GreatLand’s and subscribers it gets in purchases and swaps with Comcast after the merger is completed.
 Investors are also awaiting the conclusion of the Federal Reserve’s asset-purchase program, which is on track to end this month amid an improving US.
 Editorial Direction Golding said the company said he ordered the purchase“without the necessary authority and mandate of the board,”according to the court documents.
 to buy Greece’s government bonds in April, last week said it has sold all its holdings of the nation’s debt on expectations that the European Central Bank won’t “launch a full-blown quantitative easing” program of securities purchases that will support the market.
 CNBC reported yesterday that Salix’s talks with Allergan had slowed and that the purchase of Cosmo Pharma is unlikely to proceed.
 It fell 18 percent for the month amid concern the European Central Bank’s asset purchases won’t be enough to revive the region’s economy.
 Niel is unlikely to revisit a deal with Bouygues, and Iliad isn’t interested in expanding into Spain with a purchase of wireless carrier Yoigo from TeliaSonera AB, the person said.
 That’s heightened their appetite to add cyber-insurance customers, especially among the small-and medium-sized businesses that hadn’t previously purchased the coverage.
 Fairfax acquired Valiant Insurance as part of its 2011 purchase of First Mercury Financial Corp.
 The ECB bought Spanish covered bonds in the third day of its purchase program, according to a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified because they’re not authorized to speak about it.
 The Frankfurt-based central bank also bought German bonds yesterday, according to a separate person familiar with the purchases.
 Cutrale, a closely held fruit juice company controlled by Brazil’s Jose Luis Cutrale, is trying to derail Chiquita’s planned purchase of Fyffes.
 Government bonds have rallied as the BOK cut its benchmark seven-day repurchase rate to match a record low.
 “Effectively duration is being added into the market” each month as the Fed’s bond purchases come to an end, Moffitt said today in a Bloomberg Television interview.
 Officials also cut monthly bond purchases to $15 billion in a seventh consecutive $10 billion reduction, staying on course to end the program in October.
 “We need to set asmany growth impulses as possible, but to set the course onanything other than fiscal discipline will not help Europe toprogress” Asset Purchases The planned asset purchases mark the ECB’s latest attemptto funnel money to companies and prevent the 18-nation economyfrom sliding toward deflation.
 The focus is on the fourth plenum to see whether there could be significant changes in the reform policy” Slowing Growth China’s leaders have relaxed home-purchase controls and the central bank has pumped liquidity to lenders as they seek to limit a property-induced slowdown.
 interest rates sooner as it ends asset purchases.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond purchases to halt the decline in inflation expectations.
 “This was not some smoke screen -- everyone, including Allergan and its bankers, fully understood that a tender offer was not a viable vehicle to complete an acquisition because Allergan would put in place a poison pill preventing additional stock purchases” Without an intended or contemplated tender offer, there can be no insider trading, Ackman said.
 He engineered Total’s purchase of Belgium’s Petrofina SA in 1999 and five months later began a hostile takeover of Elf Aquitaine SA, which was completed in 2000 after a counter-bid from Elf failed.
 6 when itcompleted that purchase.
 During his tenure, Sanofi ended some unpromising research projects, cut jobs and shut plants in France, and made acquisitions in the US, notably the $201 billion purchase of biotechnology company Genzyme Corp.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Danone’s $566 million purchase of a stake in a Chinese infant formula maker signals the French food company favors a gradual expansion in that market, which analysts say may cool speculation about a takeover of Mead Johnson Nutrition Co.
 “A purchase of Mead Johnson won’t be a first solution for Danone in the short- to medium-term,” Pierre Tegner, an analyst at Natixis in Paris, said by phone.
 Going Alone? “Incremental purchases like this in China make strategic sense as it’s the world’s fastest-growing market for infant milk formula,” Jon Cox, an analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux in Zurich, said by phone.
 “This points to Danone spending cash on smaller purchases, rather than one big purchase such as Mead Johnson” The investment in Yashili broadens Danone’s role in China’s baby-formula market, which is projected to more than double to 191 billion yuan ($31 billion) in the four years ending 2017, according to Euromonitor International.
 Lenders led by Bank of America sold the $13 billion loan backing Micro Focus’s purchase of Attachmate Group Inc.
 Jefferies may lose about $10 million on a $300 million loan that will finance Bain Capital LLC’s purchase of a stake in shoe retailer Toms Shoes, according to a person with direct knowledge of the matter.
 “We got some deals that are going to have a harder time finding a clearing level because they were structured and underwritten for a bull market” Credit Suisse led banks in boosting the discount offered on about $500 million of loans it arranged to back private-equity firm Apax Partners’s purchase of Answers Corp, the St.
 Bridge Postponed Banks led by JPMorgan put off syndicating $319 billion of bridge loans backing New York-based Scientific Games’ purchase of Bally Technologies Inc, leaving the lenders holding the debt after failing to attract enough interest from investors, according to people with knowledge of the deal.
 The lenders have already syndicated a $2 billion term loan backing the $51 billion purchase, and a potential bond sale may replace the bridge loan, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Tan, DBS’s head of wealth management, was under pressure to move the office in Hong Kong’s Central district, including client account documents, before a planned announcement at the start of the week that the purchase of Societe Generale’s Asian private bank was completed.
 DBS’s private bank increased its assets under management by about S$13 billion to S$88 billion ($69 billion) when it completed the purchase of Societe Generale’s wealth business in Asia, while it retained 80 percent of the French bank’s relationship managers, Tan said.
 Investors can purchase them in increments of $1,000 with rates from 2 percent, for debt that matures in one year, to 4 percent for seven years.
 The Fed will be ending its asset purchases next week, assuming all else being equal, and then the anticipation builds for the first rate increase.
 2011 IPO Oak Hill Capital Partners LP purchased Dave & Buster’s in 2010 and filed for an IPO in July 2011, eventually withdrawing the plan the following year, citing market conditions.
 labor market has strengthened enough to withstand an end to its unprecedented asset-purchase program and downplayed risks posed by declining inflation.
 Chair Janet Yellen is completing two years of bond purchases that started under her predecessor, Ben S.
 The latest round was announced in September 2012, with monthly purchases of $85 billion in Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities.
 In contrast to the previous two programs, so-called QE3 was announced without any limit on its duration or the amount of securities to be purchased.
 The Fed began a step-like reduction of purchases in January 2014, cutting them by $10 billion per meeting.
 Kocherlakota Dissents Minneapolis Fed President Narayana Kocherlakota dissented, saying that with low inflation expectations, the Fed should commit to keeping rates near zero “at least until the one-to-two-year ahead inflation outlook has returned to 2 percent and should continue the asset-purchase program at its current level” As the Fed winds down unprecedented stimulus, the European Central Bank is contemplating its own quantitative easing program to tackle the weakest inflation in five years, and Japan is continuing purchases.
 Balance Sheet Even after purchases end, the Fed’s record balance sheet will provide support to the economy by limiting the supply of government securities and suppressing long-term interest rates.
 When the third round of large-scale asset purchases was announced, the jobless rate was 81 percent, and most policy makers forecast it would fall to 6 percent to 68 percent by late 2015.
 is postponing its Treasury purchases until yields rise.
 Fukoku has put off its Treasury purchases until it can earn 250 percent, Suzuki said.
 As the Fed winds down unprecedented stimulus, the European Central Bank is contemplating its own quantitative-easing program to tackle the weakest inflation in five years, and Japan is continuing purchases.
 sales growth humming along at a time when consumers are pulling back on discretionary purchases and mobile-phone applications have trained them to seek more convenience.
 At Permanent TSB, borrowers need six months cash to cover periods without rental income, proof they can withstand a 2 percentage-point interest-rate increase and a down payment of at least 25 percent of the purchase price, said Richard Kelly, head of mortgages at the company.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Tesco Plc shares had their best day in almost six months amid speculation that buyout firm TPG Capital Management LP is considering a 2 billion-pound ($32 billion) purchase of the grocer’s Dunnhumby data analysis unit.
 He has previously said that he wanted IBM’s stock to decline in the short term so that the company could repurchase more of its shares.
 Alfa said yesterday it was studying a purchase ofColombia’s Pacific Rubiales Energy Corp.
 “Today the cool factor is pretty much passe,” Moreno said, adding that he would purchase more of the gadgets given the right features.
 Banks have stepped up their bond purchases as deposits have ballooned to $1037 trillion, the most since the Fed data starts in 1973.
 Bank of America alone may need to purchase as much as $65 billion of government debt to become fully compliant, according to report last month from Marty Mosby, a banking analyst at Memphis, Tennessee-based Vining Sparks.
 Ariel Bezalel, who helps manage Jupiter’s $51 billion of assets, said his fund started reducing its position in Greek debt “a few weeks ago” and disposed of the last portion yesterday, judging the European Central Bank won’t deliver a program of bond purchases known as quantitative easing.
 drugmaker reconsiders its tax-saving purchase of Shire Plc.
 More Cancellations AbbVie, spun out of Abbott Laboratories in 2012, is reconsidering the purchase of Shire after the US.
 restructured its purchase of Covidien Plc with more expensive financing, and Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 Wish lists can be shared via social media, allowing family and friends to purchase items at the mall.
 Charter more than doubled the size of its offering to $35 billion that will help finance its purchase of assets from Comcast Corp.
 “And we are in the middle of a comprehensive review of our processes for timely preparation of support for our tax accounting positions” Athene has also focused on integrating recently purchased businesses and the shift of more than 200 jobs to its West Des Moines, Iowa, operational headquarters from other US.
 While the company is returning money to shareholders via stock repurchases and dividends, activist investor Carl Icahn has been pushing the company to accelerate the buyback program, saying the shares are trading at half their value.
 economy has been improving enough for the Fed to reduce the debt purchases it has used to encourage growth by putting downward pressure on borrowing costs.
 in Washington after saying in September it will end the purchases this month if the economy keeps advancing.
 Policy makers repeated last month they plan to maintain the current target for their main interest rate for a “considerable time” after the asset purchases end, especially if projected inflation stays below the central bank’s 2 percent goal.
 Fraga, a Princeton University-trained economist, has been a force in Brazilian finance for the past two decades, having served as chairman of the country’s main stock exchange, founded a hedge fund that was purchased by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 won an appeal of an 11-year-old lawsuit in which they were accused of paying kickbacks to a medical benefits-management company in return for purchases and recommendations of drugs they make.
 “Now the only question is whether it’s Oi or Tim” that’s the purchaser, Piecyk wrote.
 Gas Natural has long-term contracts to purchase liquefied natural gas from Cheniere Energy Inc’s proposed Sabine Pass and Corpus Christi export facilities in Texas.
 They will begin due diligence with the aim of signing a “definitive” sale and purchase agreement early next year, according to the statement.
 Under auction rules, the state will sign 25-year power-purchase contracts for 500 megawatts of capacity with bidders submitting the lowest tariffs.
 The purchase price equates to about $56 for every barrel of proved reserves Athlon reported to the US.
 Cliffs also has announced a plan to buy back as much as $200 million of shares and agreed with lenders to amend a credit facility, allowing the company to proceed with the stock repurchases.
 The share-repurchase program signals that the board could signal “more aggressive financial policies than in the past,” S&P said today.
 growth “might be slower than they expected if foreign economic growth came in weaker than anticipated” In a statement following the September gathering, policy makers renewed their pledge to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after ending bond purchases this month.
 Spanish bonds were little changed after ECB President Mario Draghi yesterday failed to provide details on the size of its purchases of asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 The ECB will have to deliver a larger and broader asset-purchase program that includes government bonds next year as growth and inflation may continue to disappoint, HSBC Holdings Plc economist Janet Henry wrote in a client note dated yesterday.
 Carlyle will hold a 79 percent stake after the offering, excluding the underwriters’ option to purchase additional shares.
 In August, Alibaba and Ma’s Yunfeng Capital completed the purchase of a $12 billion stake in the video site, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Though government-controlled Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac will buy loans to borrowers with FICO credit scores as low as 620, the average score on mortgages they purchased is now about 740, well above the 660 level often considered subprime.
 Shellpoint Partners LLC’s New Penn unit, the lender backed by mortgage-bond pioneer Lewis Ranieri, in August began offering mortgages for home buyers with debt-to-income ratios up to 55 percent and interest-only loans when borrowers have “high disposable income” or “high income potential due to their line of work” Caliber said in June its new programs would offer new flexibility for foreign nationals or on purchases of condos without approval for government programs.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said the Fed should consider delaying the end of its bond purchase program.
 Now we have to deal with real economic problems, and that of course, for the markets is a totally different kettle of fish” In an interview with Bloomberg, Bullard said the Fed should consider delaying the end of its bond purchases to halt a decline in inflation expectations.
 The Fed has been winding down its $85 billion plan of monthly bond purchases since January and is poised to stop the final $15 billion this month.
 This followed the purchase of a 125 percent stake valued at $290 million earlier that month, QNB’s first acquisition in sub-Saharan Africa.
 “They could exacerbate existing, or generate new imbalances in the economy” The Monetary Policy Committee raised the benchmark repurchase rate by 75 basis points to 575 percent this year as a 24 percent drop in the rand since the start of 2013 fueled consumer prices, even as economic growth stalled.
 In May, Third Point applauded Dow’s tripling of a share repurchase program to $45 billion and the expansion of a plan to sell underperforming assets.
 The worker may have obtained social security numbers, driver’s license numbers and information on services they purchased from AT&T, the letter said.
 Lau controls about 297 percent of the company following QIA’s purchase, including a 1355 percent direct stake, according to exchange filings.
 Fed policy makers, who are preparing to end their latest asset-purchase program this month, also expressed concern a worldwide slowdown would weigh on the US.
 and AT&T Inc’s proposed purchase of DirecTV are at risk of taking longer to complete as regulators resolve disputes over who can see programming contracts.
 The clock was stopped twice as the FCC weighed Comcast’s purchase of NBC Universal -- a deal it approved in 2011 after 234 days.
 “Because our cost of generation goes up, we may see some reduced purchases by retailers, who’d seek cheaper options,” said A.
 Whole Picture China is counting on the success of bourse link, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) in daily cross-border purchases, to help liberalize its financial system and increase use of the yuan.
 Mercedes signed a long-term marketing and distribution partnership together with the stake purchase, the unit of Stuttgart-based Daimler AG and the Varese-based motorcycle maker said in a statement today.
 in June said it would purchase American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 The loans were used to finance 81 percent of all home purchases in the three months through September, an increase from 39 percent in the three months through May 2010, according to the Campbell/Inside Mortgage Finance HousingPulse Tracking Survey.
 Traders and investors traditionally make purchases of stocks during the so-called muhurat trading session.
 Dhanteras is considered auspicious for purchases including gold, motor vehicles and consumer goods.
 ‘Any Rights’ Treasury was authorized to “purchase any obligations and other securities issued by” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, a provision which also allowed it to “exercise any rights received in connection with such purchases,” Lamberth wrote yesterday.
 for the $15 billion Temelin project, which was canceled in April after the government refused to provide CEZ guarantees on the purchase power price.
 ‘Sizable Impact’ “These purchases will have a sizable impact on the balance sheet,” Draghi said, though shied away from a definitive goal for how much the ECB might buy, saying total stimulus may fall short of the 1 trillion euros he’d earlier signaled.
 The European Central Bank will start “within the next days” to purchase assets in the new program to support the economy, Benoit Coeure, an executive board member, said today.
 Pressure is mounting for ECB stimulus such as government-bond purchases as the 18-nation euro area struggles to rebound from a sovereign debt crisis and subsequent austerity measures.
 TDC is planning to sell about 12 billion euros ($151 billion) of bonds and 500 million euros of hybrids over the next two months to raise cash for its 138 billion Norwegian-krone ($206 billion) purchase of Get AS.
 Ellison’s ruling is “very significant because it means foreign investors who purchased foreign-traded securities and are pursuing English-law claims can do so in US.
 Ellison in 2012 limited the case to investors who held American depositary receipts in the US, finding that American laws blocked claims on shares purchased on foreign exchanges.
 courts as a “Shangri-La” where they could recover losses on shares purchased on overseas exchanges, if the Houston judge let the foreign funds go ahead.
 “Very few were looking for new initiatives from the BOJ today, so that’s the reason we see a much a weaker yen, and also a strong increase in Japanese equities” Narrow Vote In the first policy change since Governor Haruhiko Kuroda began record asset purchases in April last year, the board was split 5 to 4 on the decision.
 Kyprolis, acquired in last year’s purchase of Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc, has been approved for multiple myeloma and is in clinical trials that may expand its label to earlier-stage patients.
 ECB President Mario Draghi weighed into the debate last week, saying the country needs to remain in some kind of program for Greek banks’ junk-rated asset-backed securities to be eligible for the Frankfurt-based central bank’s liquidity-enhancing ABS purchase program.
 The purchase of the Royal York is the first major investment at InnVest since it was the subject of an activist campaign led by New York hedge fund Orange Capital LLC.
 Oi said at the time that it had no knowledge that Portugal Telecom had purchased the debt and was investigating.
 Still, the country “gets billions in aid” and “now has to earmark some of the funds for gas purchases” EU Funds Negotiators will discuss options for bridge financing to cover payments until an International Monetary Fund package for Ukraine is ready, by February at the latest, German Chancellor Angela Merkel said Oct.
 The chain also has attracted customers with a loyalty program that offers free drinks, food and refills after accumulating points from purchases.
 restructured its purchase of Covidien Plc with more expensive financing, and Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 Shorts bet against a stock by selling borrowed shares with the plan to repurchase them at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 The European Central Bank may outline its asset-purchase program when it reviews policy today, helping mitigate the impact from the forthcoming end to US.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA agreed to give Mexican financier David Martinez 30 months to complete a purchase of a stake in Telecom Argentina SA that has failed to win regulatory approval in almost a year.
 Fed officials have said they will end their latest round of bond purchases this month.
 are finding growth harder to come by as customers move from traditional software contracts and computer purchases to programs delivered from remote data centers online.
 dollar strengthened after the Bank of Japan unexpectedly boosted stimulus and the Federal Reserve ended asset purchases this week.
 The FHFA also is planning an effort that will allow buyers to make down payments as small as 3 percent of the purchase price, two people with direct knowledge of the matter said.
 Underwriters have a 30-day option to purchase as much as another 33 million shares from Old Mutual to cover any additional demand.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said third-quarter profit rose 81 percent, beating analysts’ estimates, as customer spending increased.
 28-29 and have said they expect to end asset purchases after that meeting.
 That proportion, which includes browsing sessions where shoppers don’t make a purchase, is the highest since at least 2006, when the NRF first asked the question.
 While shoppers still flock to stores for Black Friday deals, companies and shopping centers need to add more excitement to entice customers to visit throughout the season with the potential for making impulse purchases, NPD’s Cohen said.
 The agency is examining whether the Pimco Total Return ETF, an exchange-traded fund run by Bill Gross until last month, purchased small lots of bonds at discounts, then marked them up when valuing holdings to artificially boost returns, a person familiar with the probe said Sept.
 Pressure Stores While Apple is banking on its customers to pressure stores to accept the new payment technology, the retailers see an opportunity to change how people make purchases, said Gil Luria, an analyst at Wedbush in New York.
 Juniper has been hurt as some telecommunications carriers delay equipment purchases for the rest of 2014.
 metals trader as the Swiss trading house pares back its purchase of the New York-based bank’s commodity unit, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 In May, Cupertino, California’s Apple agreed to pay $3 billion to buy the headphones and streaming-music service Beats in the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 Icahn sees “nothing wrong” with a tender offer as large as $100 billion for Apple to repurchase its stock, he said in an interview with Bloomberg Television’s Trish Regan, where he reiterated his praise for Cook while urging him to buy Apple’s “undervalued shares” faster.
 In February, he dropped his campaign to spur Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 “We ask you to present to the rest of the board our request for the company to make a tender offer, which would meaningfully accelerate and increase the magnitude of share repurchases” Icahn had hinted in recent months that he might ramp up activity with Apple.
 “The more shares repurchased now, the more each remaining shareholder will benefit from that earnings growth,” Icahn wrote.
 In April, the company said it would increase its share repurchase authorization by $30 billion, boost its dividend and split its stock 7-for-1.
 Such bolt-on purchases allow his deputies to deploy part of Berkshire’s cash pile, which was more than $55 billion as of June 30, and free his time for larger deals.
 They’re also exploring other means to access the market, including taking advantage of a bourse link set to start this month between Hong Kong and Shanghai that will allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border equity purchases.
 The rate of purchases last month represented a new six-year high only because of the big August revision.
 Mortgage Rates Declining borrowing costs will help make big-ticket purchases such as homes more affordable.
 plans to raise about C$250 million ($223 million) in an equity sale to fund the cash-and-stock purchase and capitalize the company, it said in a statement today.
 Kinross, Canada’s third-largest gold producer by revenue, will receive $100 million to $190 million in cash, depending on the net proceeds of the financing, and the rest of the purchase price will be paid in Fortress shares, the Toronto-based miner said in a separate statement.
 The drugmaker walked away from a $114 billion attempt to buy London-based AstraZeneca, a purchase that would have boosted the company’s roster of medicines and moved its legal address overseas.
 Pressure is mounting for European Central Bank stimulus such as government-bond purchases as the 18-nation euro area struggles to rebound from a sovereign debt crisis and subsequent austerity measures.
 Watt said that Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, the mortgage giants he oversees, will be making a third attempt since 2012 at giving lenders more protection against loan repurchases.
 In the past nine months, JPMorgan has eliminated or reduced about 20 different overlays on Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac and Federal Housing Administration mortgages purchased from other lenders, said Greg Beliles, its mortgage unit’s correspondent channel executive.
 Banks’ lending remains far below last year’s levels as they struggle to increase home-purchase mortgages after imposing tough credit requirements.
 Wells Fargo had a decline in purchase loans in the quarter, and JPMorgan said it’s cutting another 1,000 mortgage jobs after eliminating 6,000 this year.
 “Lenders are hoping that by the end of this little revival in refinancing, the purchase market will be strong enough to take over” MBA estimated that refinancing volume grew 55 percent in the third quarter compared with 06 percent for purchase loans.
 The lender’s bigger business, providing home purchase mortgages, fell 34 percent to $336 billion.
 Refinance Rise Marianne Lake, the New York-based bank’s chief financial officer, said on a conference call that the bank gained market share in high-quality jumbo loans, or mortgages above $417,000 in most areas, and conventional loans, those purchased by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 He said lenders are trying to get clarity from regulators about when they have to repurchase a loan in default and when the risk transfers to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 “But if a default happens later and it’s due to a technical issue unrelated to the payment ability of the customer that could have been known, then risk should transfer” Stumpf said that getting more certainty from regulators on repurchase risk would change the way the bank looks at credit overlays.
 At the beginning of 2014, every major housing forecaster projected mortgage rates would continue to rise throughout the year as the Federal Reserve neared the end of its asset purchases.
 Growth in purchase mortgages should replace refinancing in the first half of 2015 as gains in home prices slow, she said.
 Chief Executive Officer Koji Nagai, who set the profit goals after taking the post in August 2012, has begun to expand headcount overseas after paring expenses that swelled following the 2008 purchase of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 The Federal Reserve, while confirming this week it will end its asset-purchase program, maintained a pledge to keep US.
 Among the assets not being purchased by Mercuria include a crude oil supply agreement to a refinery in St.
 plans to seek regulatory approval to include investment companies in the central clearing of government-related debt repurchase agreements to minimize the risk of fire sales, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Prodded by the Fed, industry groups with the support of dealers, banks and investors have been working to come to an agreement on a method to initially to guarantee the most-liquid types of collateral used to borrow money in repurchase agreements, or repos.
 The dealer agrees to repurchase the securities as soon as the next day for the principal value plus interest.
 With renewable-energy executives gathering for the Solar Power International conference that began yesterday in Las Vegas, some will be shopping their companies around and others may be evaluating potential purchases, said Michael Horwitz, who leads energy technology investment banking at Robert W.
 power producer, purchased three solar companies this year, most recently a deal this month for the online marketer Pure Energies Inc.
 The deal gives the San Mateo, California-based company a dedicated supply of gear, and follows its 2013 purchase of Zep Solar Inc, which produces racking equipment that reduces installation and labor costs.
 In February it purchased the residential installation and racking-system units of Mainstream Energy Corp.
 It’s a symbol of wealth or a form of investment, and the precious metal is deeply rooted in worship and culture” After import restrictions and a weak rupee led to a 34 percent drop in demand in the first half of 2014, purchases are set to improve in India, the world’s largest buyer as recently as 2012.
 Researcher CPM Group estimates the holiday generates about a fifth of annual purchases in India, more than any other time of year in a country with a long history of hoarding the metal.
 Jewelers in India, which represented 25 percent of global bullion purchases last year, are betting demand will be rekindled by four straight quarterly declines in domestic prices, the longest slump since 2004.
 Indians purchase gold at festivals and for marriages as part of the bridal trousseau and as gifts in the form of jewelry.
 He estimates average purchases for a wedding at about 200 grams.
 While China was the top buyer in 2013, demand in the three months through the end of June fell 52 percent to 1925 tons, less than the 2041 tons purchased in India, council data said.
 Policy makers meet tomorrow and are due to give more details of an asset-purchase plan.
 The market is positioning itself for ECB debt purchases known as quantitative easing, Danske Bank’s von Mehren said.
 With the purchase, Oddo & Cie plans to tap into Germany’s Mittelstand, small- and mid-sized companies that are the backbone of Europe’s largest economy.
 Network Owners Comcast Corp’s $45 billion plan to purchase Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Separately, the Bank of England today kept its benchmark interest rate and the asset-purchase target unchanged amid signs domestic growth is losing momentum.
 purchased a majority stake in Tranzact for $178 million as the insurer renews its bet on policy sales through the Internet.
 Tranzact completed a recapitalization after the purchase that allowed for the return of $44 million in capital to White Mountains, according to the White Mountains statement.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank bought Italian covered bonds as it returned to the market for a second day under its asset purchase program, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Debt issued by Intesa Sanpaolo SpA was included in the purchases, according to one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 “Covered bond purchases are a good means to apply quantitative easing in Europe and to increase the balance sheet of the ECB,” said Richard Schmidt, who helps oversee 220 billion euros of assets, including 55 billion euros of covered bonds, as a senior money manager at MEAG Munich Ergo Asset Management GmbH.
 “Politically, these purchases are much easier to accomplish than buying government bonds” Corporate Bonds The ECB’s Governing Council isn’t currently considering corporate-bond purchases, according to two euro-region central bank officials familiar with the matter.
 Bundesbank board member Joachim Nagel played down the significance of the ECB’s purchases in a speech in Munich late yesterday.
 An ECB official declined to comment on the covered bond purchases.
 reconsiders the 324 billion-pound ($516 billion) purchase of the UK.
 Bruce Berkowitz, founder of Fairholme Capital Management LLC, Sears’s third-biggest shareholder, reported the purchase of 49,200 shares of the retailer on Oct.
 Once known as the ground-breaking startup founded by the likes of Peter Thiel, Elon Musk and Max Levchin before it was purchased by EBay in 2002, PayPal is now facing new competitors from Square Inc.
 That would hand Apple Pay an immediate advantage in an area where PayPal has struggled to gain traction -- with in-store purchases.
 The FOMC last month retained its pledge to keep rates low for a “considerable time” after it concludes its two-year asset purchase program this month.
 central bank should consider delaying its completion of asset purchases.
 The Fed has been gradually winding down its $85 billion plan of monthly bond purchases since January and is poised to stop the final $15 billion at the end of its Oct.
 It seems that the market is interpreting Draghi’s words negatively and as not providing the salvation that was hoped for” Not Enough The euro rose as investors curbed bets the central bank’s purchases would expand the ECB’s balance sheet enough to weaken the currency.
 government’s crackdown on purchases that help companies shift their tax domicile abroad -- could have a lasting impact.
 Criminal background check requests for gun purchases, a gauge of interest in firearms, averaged 175 million a month in 2014 through July, down 38 percent from a year earlier, according to US.
 Earlier this month, EMC said it agreed to purchase Cloudscaling Group Inc.
 Aggregate Index includes the $17 trillion of government-backed mortgage bonds that the central bank purchased to bolster the economy, Pimco money managers Mike Cudzil and Daniel Hyman wrote in a commentary posted on its website yesterday.
 The Fed has been reducing its debt purchases and is on pace to stop adding to the holdings this month.
 Many investment firms supported Barclays’s decision to include Fed-owned mortgage bonds in its index when the central bank announced its first purchases in 2008 because the program was envisioned as “temporary,” the Pimco managers wrote.
 The investors may start buying a greater share as the Fed stops purchases, they wrote in an Oct.
 The program allows the equivalent of $17 billion in daily net purchases of Hong Kong shares and $21 billion for Shanghai.
 Consumers frequently look for deep discounts before making a purchase, and they already know what they want ahead of time.
 Since then, he’s been monitoring prices and making purchases.
 “Amazon doesn’t close,” said Bergen, who typically purchases the presents he needs before Thanksgiving.
 “Largely, it’s convenience, but it’s also economical” Online holiday browsing has become a new tradition for shoppers, including the 49 percent who will do research or make purchases on Thanksgiving morning, according to PwC.
 ‘Don’t Bleed Out’ Eric Dorman, 27, typically starts his shopping the week after Thanksgiving and makes 75 percent of his purchases online.
 Yahoo also accelerated share repurchases over the quarter with an unidentified financial institution, the company said today.
 17, resulting in 235 million shares repurchased for $933 million, Yahoo said in today’s statement.
 Monsanto said in June it will repurchase $10 billion of stock over two years as part of a plan to double earnings per share in five years.
 “The majority of companies have beaten expectations in the third-quarter earnings season to date and, if maintained, this could plot the course of markets for the remainder of the year” Federal Reserve officials are holding a two-day policy meeting and are expected to announce tomorrow an end to bond purchases that swelled the central bank’s balance sheet to a record.
 Yahoo has spent about $13 billion in acquisitions since Mayer became CEO, according to Smith, including its purchase of blogging-service Tumblr last year for about $1 billion.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- TUI AG said it’s making progress on pulling out of an Italian vacation-home project seven years after the owner of Europe’s largest tour operator purchased the property just before the start of the global recession.
 CEO Joussen, 51, said in May 2013 that Castelfalfi “will never make money in its current situation” The company has written off goodwill from the property’s 1056 million-euro purchase in 2007.
 The country’s prime minister might be thwarted by conditions for the European Central Bank’s asset-purchase program, as detailed by President Mario Draghi.
 said in a note that Greece’s banks and the debt-stricken country’s economy would benefit from ECB’s purchases.
 According to rulebooks released yesterday, Greek banks will have to provide increased collateral to the ECB for covered bond purchases.
 “This statement, ‘no program, no purchases’ from Draghi, is a direct warning to Samaras against an early exit from the bailout” said Andreas Koutras, an investment manager at SteppenWolf Capital LLC.
 The former mortgage-servicing unit of Ally Financial Inc, which filed for Chapter 11 protection in May 2012, won approval of a reorganization plan in December and started more than 80 lawsuits against so-called mortgage originators for breach of contract and other claims alleging that ResCap-purchased mortgages didn’t comply with advertised underwriting standards.
 The mortgage-purchase agreements called for disputes to be litigated in courts in Minnesota.
 He declined to comment on the identity of a potential purchaser of Film1 while the company is in negotiations.
 said it would need external financing for its purchase of Covidien Plc.
 And Medtronic is still proceeding with the Covidien purchase.
 “Despite the additional expense of the new financing, the strategic benefits of the transaction remain compelling,” Medtronic said in a statement about the purchase that would shift its tax residence to Ireland from Minneapolis.
 In Salix’s case, a purchase by Actavis would allow earnings stripping and would put future foreign profits outside the US.
 The firm’s quantitative alternative strategies grew by 28 percent in the quarter, led by the purchase of the Numeric assets and net inflows of $1 billion.
 KGHM’s 2014 production target of 700,000 tons, including metal purchased from third parties, will exceed last year’s 666,000 tons and a prior record of 677,000 tons in 2012, according to an investor presentation published in May.
 The proportion, up from 40 percent last year, includes browsing sessions where shoppers don’t make a purchase, the NRF said.
 Data on housing and consumer confidence showed acceleration in the American economy, while the European Central Bank added to bond purchases, quieting concern about a region whose economy is at risk of falling into a third recession since 2009.
 IBM has spent $19 billion buying back its shares in the past 12 months and Coca-Cola plans to repurchase between $25 billion and $3 billion of its stock this year.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Greek bonds rose this week with their Portuguese counterparts as speculation that the European Central Bank will extend stimulus to include purchases of corporate debt fueled demand for higher-yielding assets.
 21 that the ECB is considering corporate-bond purchases to fight the threat of deflation in the 18-nation currency bloc.
 Today’s decision comes almost 19 months after Kuroda unleashed his initial asset-purchase plan, with the intention of doubling the monetary base.
 The bank will purchase exchange-traded funds so their amounts outstanding increase by about 3 trillion yen a year, it said.
 Japanese real estate investment trusts will be purchased with a view to raising their amounts outstanding by about 90 billion yen annually, according to the bank.
 The average remaining maturity of the BOJ’s purchases of Japanese government bonds will increase to about seven to 10 years, three years longer than previously.
 Elliott filed the lawsuit to the Munich regional court, seeking a special auditor’s report that “apparently examined several statements and actions” of Kabel Deutschland concerning the purchase and the valuation of the shares during the takeover offer, New York-based Elliott said today.
 and CNPC’s purchase of 20 percent of an Arctic gas project from OAO Novatek for an undisclosed sum.
 The central bank lowered the seven-day repurchase rate to 2 percent from 225 percent, the second reduction in two months, and downgraded its estimates for growth and inflation.
 After imports jumped to a record 2453 million bales in 2012, the country will reduce purchases in 2015 for a third straight year to 8 million, the lowest since 2009, the USDA estimates.
 That leaves purchases of government debt as the last option.
 Last year, Mayer made her biggest deal with the purchase of blogging service Tumblr for about $1 billion.
 “After Juwi finalizes its restructuring it will add to our own activities and purchases when planning the further expansion of renewable energies,” MVV Chief Executive Officer Georg Mueller said.
 It’s MVV’s second purchase of a struggling clean-energy developer in just over two weeks.
 Buyers of the book frequently also purchase Tyvek suits and respirators, according to Amazon, which encourages customers to buy all three together.
 The market value of South Korea’s largest carmaker recently declined by 68 trillion won over seven sessions after Hyundai and two affiliate companies purchased land in Seoul at triple the property’s assessed value.
 The unions at Hyundai and Kia said the purchase was proof of “problems with Chairman Chung Mong Koo’s imperial management,” and called for cancellation of the deal.
 Getting Less Skrbec discounted the idea that purchasers are getting less for their money.
 Export Approval At the power systems arm, enlarged through the 19 billion-pound purchase of Tognum AG forced on Rolls in March when Daimler AG exercised a put option, orders for marine and land-based engines from an operation based in Friedrichshafen now need approval from Germany’s export authority, Rolls-Royce said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 central bankers have been planning to end their debt purchases this month and have discussed raising their benchmark next year.
 The software business has also been overshadowed by lawsuits and charges related to Autonomy, the company that former CEO Leo Apotheker purchased in 2011 and which Whitman later wrote down amid allegations of fraud.
 The company’s storage business, which is based largely on Hewlett-Packard’s 2010 purchase of 3Par Inc, makes the company the No.
 “We remain positive on carloadings and expect Canadian National to continue to see strong revenue momentum” The company said it will repurchase as much as 39 percent of the stock outstanding.
 The 05 percent increase in purchases exceeded forecasts and followed little change in July, Commerce Department data showed.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen and her colleagues are on course to wrap up their bond purchase program next month, while European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said Oct.
 Actavis has been linked to almost $70 billion worth of potential purchases: it could get in a bidding war and try to acquire Allergan Inc, which is looking to thwart a hostile takeover; gastrointestinal drugmaker Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd; or consumer-health company Omega Pharma NV, people with knowledge of the matter have said.
 last year for $87 billion -- and Actavis’s hunting expedition underscores a desire to create a more formidable competitor, which a purchase of Allergan would achieve in one move.
 Actavis has been the most active buyer of drug companies since January 2011, making more than $36 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The strategy was to use Actavis’s generic drugs business combined with Forest’s specialty drugs to be a one-stop shop for hospitals and other large purchasers of pharmaceuticals.
 President Vladimir Putin in August prohibited purchases of certain food products from the European Union and the US.
 The steps are part of a broader push to increase lending after banks had to repurchase billions of dollars of mortgages that were issued during the housing bubble.
 Watt will also discuss an effort that would allow borrowers to put down as little as three percent of the purchase price on loans backed by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, enabling borrowers with lower incomes to access the mortgage market, the people said.
 It’s also awaiting regulatory approval for the $485 billion purchase of satellite-TV provider DirecTV and has been exploring expansion in Latin America.
 The Bryn Mawr, Pennsylvania-based company said the purchase of the nine water and wastewater systems for $28 million by its Aqua Texas unit that serves 180,000 people in the state raises its number of regulated acquisitions to 11 this year.
 The exchange link, which will allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border equity purchases, is expected to start this month.
 The sales have helped free up funds that Hartford is using to pay down debt and repurchase shares.
 Hartford repurchased $845 million of shares in the quarter.
 The firm expanded its capital management plan to $39 billion in July, adding funds to pay down debt and boosting the repurchase authorization.
 purchased a retirement-plans operation, while AIG acquired Hartford’s Woodbury Financial Services broker-dealer network.
 Kreeger was appointed chief 21 months ago, four weeks after Delta agreed to purchase a 49 percent stake in Virgin previously owned by Singapore Airlines Ltd.
 and two affiliates said they will use cash to fund their 106 trillion won ($10 billion) purchase of a land site in Seoul, damping optimism that the companies will raise shareholder payouts.
 “The three companies involved in the property purchase hold enough cash to fund the deal, and therefore it won’t have an impact on the companies’ credit ratings” The three companies had cash, near cash and short-term investments amounting to about $38 billion at the end of June, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The declines came even as the slowdown boosted speculation the European Central Bank will eventually purchase government debt in a full quantitative easing program, after confirming today it began buying covered bonds.
 Clariant spokesman Kai Rolker added that the Swiss company is “convinced that we can create the highest value for all stakeholders as an independent company” Evonik Chief Financial Officer Ute Wolf said this month that the Essen-based company has the resources to execute a “sizable” acquisition and issuing equity to pay for a purchase is a possibility.
 The company is seeking growth through purchases for its consumer, health and nutrition unit, it has said.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 At that meeting, policy makers maintained a commitment to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after the central bank completes asset purchases.
 How Crown Castle aims to finance such a purchase attracted the attention of Corvex Management LP, one of Crown Castle’s top 10 shareholders.
 towers, most recently with a $48 billion purchase and lease deal with AT&T Inc.
 The purchase of Chiquita by Cutrale and Safra is expected to close by year-end or early 2015, the companies said.
 Acquisitions will be kept to a couple of hundred million euros at a time, he added in an interview, far removed from the $17 billion purchase of Imperial Chemical Industries that laid the foundations for today’s diversified Dutch group.
 Class Action The Irving fund is seeking to represent all Tesco shareholders who purchased American depositary receipts, each representing one ordinary share, from Feb.
 oil and natural gas wells, agreed to sell $23 billion worth of acreage and facilities in two separate deals to fund its purchase of Devon Energy Corp.
 “Today’s announcements largely accomplish this goal” Sale proceeds will finance Linn’s $23 billion purchase of the Devon assets, a deal that closed in August.
 in December 2013, a purchase that was partly funded with Shariah-compliant bonds.
 So spend $200 on a facial and one-hour massage in Manhattan, and the cashier can legitimately ask, “Do you want fries with that?” Make a large enough purchase, and you’ll never have to cook again.
 It then guided the company’s real estate purchases for new stores, developed its management team, upgraded its financial systems and improved margins, according to Sterling’s website.
 European shares rallied 21 percent today, extending gains after two people familiar with the matter said the ECB bought Italian covered bonds under its asset purchase program.
 Louis Fed President James Bullard said policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond purchases to halt the decline in inflation expectations.
 He was the first official to publicly suggest the central bank should extend its asset-purchase program when policy makers meet later this month.
 “The quarter reported may be tough because of the global and geopolitical uncertainty, but guidance will be crucial and that’ll have some tailwinds in terms of lower commodity prices and weaker euro” Currency Moves The euro declined today against the dollar as the ECB bought covered bonds for a second day as part of President Mario Draghi’s plan to boost lending, and Reuters reported the central bank is considering corporate-debt purchases.
 The ECB last week kept interest rates at record lows while failing to provide details on the size of purchases of asset-backed securities and covered bonds Draghi pledged in the latest round of stimulus.
 ‘Christmas Shopping’ The partnership announced plans to sell $13 billion of senior notes and 194 million units to help fund the purchase.
 A lack of money has delayed the purchase of the new aircraft, Brown said.
 7 amid speculation that buyout firm TPG Capital Management LP is considering a purchase of Tesco’s Dunnhumby data analysis unit.
 for the purchase of Glasgow and Aberdeen airports in Scotland and the Southampton terminal on England’s south coast, they said today.
 Ferrovial, a builder that also manages infrastructure such as toll roads, remains an investor in Heathrow Airport Holdings, having led the 101 billion-pound purchase of the company then known as BAA Ltd.
 BowMont Capital and Advisory is advising Concord on the purchase.
 Roche acquired the drug with the $83 billion purchase of InterMune Inc.
 Average consumer price-growth has eased from more than 10 percent last year as Rajan raised the benchmark repurchase rate to 8 percent from 725 percent since taking office 13 months ago.
 Caveats will be included so that purchases of debt such as asset-backed securities, or ABS, will be equivalent in risk to assets bought elsewhere.
 Lending Falls The higher costs and concerns about buybacks are driving the decline in mortgages for home purchases.
 Applicants approved for mortgages to purchase homes had an average FICO credit score of 755 in August, according to Ellie Mae, a company that makes software used to process mortgage applications.
 Initial fees and charges paid by consumers on agency fixed-rate purchase loans have increased 10 percent to 121 percent as of August compared with a year earlier, according to survey data from the Federal Housing Finance Agency.
 The CFPB provides some relief for lenders with less than $2 billion in assets and fewer than 500 purchase originations or refinancings a year.
 About 65 percent of the bank’s long-term loan guarantees last year supported the purchase of Boeing aircraft, according to the Congressional Research Service.
 Solar Power will use ordinary shares valued at $238 apiece to pay for the purchase, the Roseville, California-based company said in a statement today.
 Private Collector It was purchased by a private collector in Turin, Italy, in 1972, and was seen by the public once, at the Fondation Beyeler in Switzerland in 2000, Sotheby’s said.
 regulatory approval next year for lifitegrast, a treatment for dry eye disease it gained with its purchase in 2013 of SARcode Bioscience Inc.
 Besides IndiGo’s purchases, some of Airbus’s largest orders for single-aisle A320s have come from Asia.
 Amazon also spent $138 billion on purchases of property and equipment during the quarter, a portion of which goes to building AWS data centers, up from $104 billion a year ago.
 after leading the 101 billion-pound purchase of the company in 2006.
 Technology giants have recently made several purchases of cloud-computing startups.
 Boies presented Baxter with a summary of an interview in which he was quoted as saying, “We learned many things in September, and one was that we didn’t have the ability to own shares” Baxter told Boies he didn’t remember making the statement and “this is not consistent with my views” When Alvarez testified that he couldn’t say whether the government had the authority to purchase equity because “’purchase’ is too ambiguous a term, Boies pointed to a different answer Alvarez gave in a deposition.
 Stock Transfer In that earlier testimony, about the transfer of AIG preferred stock to the government for $500,000 shortly after the bailout began, Boies asked, ‘‘That stock was purchased on on September 22, 2008, correct?” “Correct,” replied Alvarez.
 “Now at that time you didn’t have any ambiguity about the word ’purchased’ did you,” Boies asked in court.
 Shifting Positions Just like AT&T’s deal, Comcast’s purchase needs approval from the FCC and the Justice Department.
 The options strategy, which involves the simultaneous purchase and sale of call options with different strike prices, would be profitable if Infosys shares post a short-term gain of about 7 percent as anticipated by Chaturmohta, head of research at the Mumbai-based brokerage.
 The purchase will increase Southwestern’s reserves by one-third to the equivalent of 890 million barrels of crude at a cost of about $24 per barrel.
 One example: Loans with “misrepresentations or data inaccuracies” won’t be automatically fodder for potential repurchases unless a lender exceeds a minimum number of mortgages with such problems, Watt said.
 The clarification is part of a broader push to unlock tight credit after banks had to repurchase billions of dollars of mortgages that were issued during the housing bubble.
 To increase lending to borrowers of modest means, the FHFA is working to let Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy loans with down payments as low as 3 percent of purchase price, Watt said.
 Treasury was authorized to “purchase any obligations andother securities issued by” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, aprovision which also allowed it to “exercise any rightsreceived in connection with such purchases,” Lamberth wrote inhis ruling.
 plans to seek regulatory approval to provide central clearing for government-related securities to contain risks in the $16 trillion-a-day tri-party repurchase agreement market.
 It linked various steps in the structured deal -- an asset swap transaction, a long-term repurchase agreement and a repurchase facility -- casting doubt on the managers’ claims that the ultimate goal was to hedge losses.
 The Antonveneta purchase left the lender short of capital when losses mounted during the financial crisis.
 economy as the Federal Reserve ends its bond purchases.
 The European Central Bank began buying bonds this week, according to people familiar with the purchases.
 The bank forced an undervalued sale so it could recover its loan” British Courts Credit Suisse denies the claims and said in its court filing that it received no credible or firm offers that were acceptable to Leshkasheli before the asset was purchased in a forced sale by a company related to Gutseriev.
 Credit Suisse had “no incentive” to allow BSG to purchase the asset at “anything less than it was prepared to pay,” the bank said in its defense.
   The purchase of Chiquita by Cutrale and Safra is expected to close by year-end or early 2015, the companies said in yesterday’s announcement.
 Share Buybacks The company announced a $5 billion share repurchase program.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said Oct.
 The gauge of personal finances increased to 524 from 50 a week earlier, while the buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, was little changed at 327 compared with 33 the prior period.
 The central bank said last month that asset purchases would probably end after its next meeting, on Oct.
 Huntsman is a net purchaser of those chemicals, which it converts into products such as insulation and gasoline additives, he said.
 Rockwood Holdings Driving the increase will be the integration of Rockwood Holdings Inc’s titanium dioxide unit, which Huntsman purchased on Oct.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Russian central bank set a ceiling of $50 billion for planned foreign-currency repurchase agreements as it seeks to counter the ruble’s record weakening.
 The move helped ease concerns that the 106 trillion won ($10 billion) cash property purchase by Hyundai and two affiliates would limit the prospects of increased dividends.
 and Kia Motors Corp, all part of billionaire Chairman Chung Mong Koo’s automotive group, won’t issue debt and will use cash to fund the purchase, Hyundai Motor said on behalf of the group on Oct.
 BGC disclosed the share purchases to the US.
 Dassault Aviation shareholders last month approved the purchase and cancellation of as much as 10 percent of total stock, at a maximum price of 1,200 euros a share.
 The European Central Bank will start “within the next days” to purchase assets in the new program to support the economy, Benoit Coeure, an executive board member, said today in Riga.
 “Generally we are seeing risk appetite and demand for the more liquid paper and obviously bunds are still the choice there in particular” Yields slid across the region yesterday as Germany cut its growth outlook and investor confidence fell to the weakest level in two years, fueling concern that Europe’s biggest economy is heading for a recession and increasing pressure on the region’s central bank to implement asset-purchase stimulus, or quantitative easing.
 Other data from repurchase agreements and the overnight indexed swap rate would only be included when a lack of data would otherwise force firms to rely on judgment.
 A total of 647 senior ranking and so-called mezzanine portions of debt were available for purchase, including notes backed by US home loans, European commercial real estate and collateralized debt obligations, according to Bank of America Corp.
 The lender is taking advantage of a rally in ABS prices spurred by the European Central Bank’s plan to buy the securities as part of its asset purchase program.
 The unit of the world’s largest money manager was hired by the European Central Bank in August to advise on the creation of its ABS purchase program as it seeks to boost the region’s economic growth.
 20 of the company’s plans to purchase the balance stake.
 Rising prices in London, the most popular Asian target in Europe, helped boost purchases in Germany, said Wolfgang Schneider, head of German research at BNP Paribas Real Estate.
 Pramerica Partnership Gingko Tree is negotiating the Munich purchase through its partnership with Pramerica Real Estate Investors, a unit of Prudential Financial Inc, according to the people.
 Credit availability for home purchases in May was about a third of what it was 16 years ago, according to Irvine, California-based CoreLogic.
 A purchase of Metroweb, which operates a network in the Milan area, would let Telecom Italia strengthen its broadband service.
 Phone Equipment Motorola Credit Corp, then the financial services unit of Motorola Inc, and Nokia Oyj had sued the Uzans in New York federal court over financing provided from 1998 to 2000 to the family’s Telsim Mobil Telekomunikasyon Hizmetleri AS, which sought to double its capacity through the purchase of equipment, phones and services.
 Louis Fed President James Bullard said policy makers should consider postponing the end of the asset-purchase program.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said Oct.
 Stevens said today that he doesn’t expect any share repurchases in the next 12 months.
 Kantar’s parent WPP Plc, the world’s largest advertising agency, will also purchase more shares from Rentrak for $56 million in cash, giving WPP a final ownership stake of 167 percent of Portland, Oregon-based Rentrak.
 “Rentrak can now integrate its products with Kantar services focusing on digital media, ad expenditures, and purchase data,” Matthew Harrigan, an analyst at Wunderlich Securities, said today in a note.
 and opposition to the purchase by Cooper’s Chinese joint-venture partner caused the Findlay, Ohio-based tire company to run afoul of the sale contract and left it unable to close the deal, Apollo lawyers argued in July.
 That’s down from $506 billion in 2013, and far less than the $144 billion of deals announced in 2011, which included Alpha’s $666 billion purchase of Massey Energy Co.
 One exception in the past year was closely held Murray Energy Corp’s December purchase of five coal mines and other assets in Northern Appalachia for $325 billion including debt.
 to help fund the purchase from the administrator, Cape Lambert said today in a statement to the Australian Stock Exchange.
 The funding takes the form of a 12-month $8 million loan and a $12 million royalty purchase, which gives Cape Lambert $2 for each metric ton of iron concentrate sold by the mine.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Truworths International Ltd, a South African clothing retailer, plans to boost its offering to children after completing the purchase of high-end chain Earthchild Clothing (Pty) Ltd.
 The European Central Bank will start “within the next days” to purchase assets in the new program to support the economy, Benoit Coeure, an executive board member, said today in Riga.
 “Any news coming from the ECB in terms of its asset-purchase program will be quite positive and supportive to equity markets, especially after the recent selloff,” Guillaume Duchesne, an equity strategist at BGL BNP Paribas SA in Luxembourg, said by phone.
 winds up asset purchases.
 ECB Stimulus Pressure is mounting for European Central Bank stimulus such as government-bond purchases as the 18-nation euro area struggles to rebound from a sovereign debt crisis and subsequent austerity measures.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Hochtief AG rose the most in more than four years in Frankfurt trading after saying it will repurchase as much as 10 percent of its share capital in a move that will increase Actividades de Construccion & Servicios SA’s control over Germany’s biggest builder.
 Hochtief aims to purchase as many as 69 million own shares by Dec.
 “Our thesis remains that a premium cash bid for minorities is unlikely” The buyback, announced in a statement last night, follows a 256 million-euro ($323 million) repurchase program by Hochtief last year that helped Madrid-based ACS increase its stake to 61 percent.
 The Match & More card will be automatically credited with points that can be redeemed for products or fuel if an equivalent purchase can be made cheaper elsewhere.
 The Financial Stability Board, a global group that brings together central bankers and government officials from the Group of 20 nations, yesterday published guidelines on discounts applied to collateral handed over as part of repurchase-agreement trades and other securities-financing transactions that aren’t processed through clearing houses.
 Andreessen was a co-developer of Mosaic, the first widely used Internet browser, and founded Netscape, a software producer that was purchased in 1999 by the former America Online Inc.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- James Bregenzer, a 31-year-old marketing strategist in Chicago, was rejected for a mortgage in May after successfully financing two previous home purchases.
 While federal programs for struggling homeowners have helped to boost refinancing, credit availability for home purchases in May was about a third of what it was in 1998, according to the index.
 Mortgage purchase applications last week fell 43 percent from October 1998, according to a Mortgage Bankers Association index released today.
 The Bregenzers provided a down payment of $60,000 for the $470,000 four-bedroom home, which they purchased in July.
 Today, about 10 percent of borrowers with purchase loans have a FICO credit score of 660 or below, on a scale of 350 to 850, compared with about 20 percent in 2001, according to Taz George, an Urban Institute researcher.
 Lenders have further tightened the availability of mortgages for purchases 22 percent in the first five months of this year, according to the index.
 J&J claims Guidant improperly shared information with outside companies during negotiations before the $25 billion purchase was announced in 2005.
 After a few months they dissipate” High Turnover The buyback index reviews its constituent companies everytwo months and generally only includes those that have announcedplans to repurchase shares during that period, Benzimra said.
 Ifthe number of eligible firms is less than 15, they keepcompanies previously in the index to fill the remaining spots,choosing the ones with the highest buyback ratios, or thepercentage of all shares that they said they would repurchaseIf more than 25 say they will repurchase shares in a givenperiod, those with the lowest ratios are left out.
 14 it would repurchase as much as 49percent of its shares.
 Shizuoka Bank announced share repurchases in Apriland June this year, the data show.
 Toyota Motor Corp, Japan’s largest company by marketvalue, said in March it would buy back as much as 360 billionyen of shares, its first such purchase in five years.
 This month, Archer-Daniels-Midland Co, the world’s largest corn processor, closed its deal to buy Wild Flavors GmbH for about $3 billion and announced an agreement to purchase Specialty Commodities Inc.
 Einhorn, 45, whose New York-based firm has been closed to new cash since the first quarter of 2012, said two months ago that he was having difficulty finding bargains after a five-year stock rally propped up by the Federal Reserve’s asset purchases.
 said it will borrow $16 billion to finance its purchase of Covidien Plc instead of using cash it keeps overseas, and Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 Glaxo acquired the Ebola vaccine under development last year as part of its $324 million purchase of Okairos.
 to pursue more purchases, Barron’s said, citing PT by Michael Binetti of UBS *Wal-Mart (WMT): Co.
 Fibra Uno is awaiting approval of the nation’s antitrust commission, known as Cofeco, to finalize the purchases, Robina told reporters in New York today.
 On a conference call, the CEO discussed Facebook’s $22 billion acquisition of mobile-messaging company WhatsApp Inc, as well as the purchase of virtual-reality goggles maker Oculus and the importance of getting more people onto the Web.
 Growth in Latin American imports to China outpaced the expansion of purchases from the Middle East crude in the first eight months of the year, according to data from the country’s customs bureau.
 German yields extended a decline that’s been driven by investor skepticism that the European Central Bank strategy to revive inflation and economic output will work without monetary expansion through a form of government-bond purchases, or quantitative easing.
 Qatar Airways also agreed to purchase up to 20 planes, including the new model.
 The purchase price includes about 42 million pounds of deferred stock for Quilter Cheviot’s managers, depending on the business’s performance.
 is exiting its investment through Old Mutual Wealth’s purchase.
 IPO done, the purchase of 20 percent of Ecobank Transnational Inc.
 “The won’s gains will depend on whether foreign investors continue to net purchase local stocks” The won appreciated 06 percent to 1,05975 per dollar at the close in Seoul, according to prices compiled by Bloomberg.
 Last year, Mayer made her biggest deal with the purchase of blogging service Tumblr for about $1 billion.
 “Gas prices have stabilized as a percentage of household income, or even gone down a little bit, which opens up that freedom to purchase” Low interest rates, extended loan terms and more subprime financing are also bringing in more buyers.
 Fitness Center The properties Google purchased comprise about 934,200square feet (86,800 square meters) of Class A office space, aswell as a 38,000-square-foot fitness center that includes a gym,pool and spa, according to the people with knowledge of thematter.
 Blackstone in 2011 bought an $80 million junior loan on theoffice complex at a discount in an effort to gain ownership ifStarwood Capital defaulted, two people with knowledge of thepurchase said at the time.
 We need more positive news for dollar bulls to put on new positions” Tepper Bets The euro snapped a four-day gain versus the yen as the ECB bought covered bonds for a second day and Reuters reported it is considering corporate-debt purchases.
 Quantitative Easing The ECB could make a decision on adding corporate bond purchases to its easing measures as soon as December, Reuters reported, citing several unidentified sources familiar with the situation.
 A spokesman for the central bank told Reuters “the Governing Council has taken no such decision” The central bank has already started charging lenders to park cash with it overnight, introduced a program of targeted cheap loans and pledged to expand its balance sheet through purchases of asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Open Market Committee is expected to end its bond-buying program after reducing monthly purchases to $15 billion in September from $85 billion two years ago.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Policy makers in September cut the monthly pace of Treasury and mortgage-bond purchases to $15 billion from an initial rate of $85 billion two years ago.
 towers, most recently with a $48 billion purchase and lease deal with AT&T Inc.
 2011 IPO Oak Hill Capital Partners LP purchased Dave & Buster’s in 2010 and filed for an IPO in July 2011, eventually withdrawing the plan the following year, citing market conditions.
 The publisher of the Financial Times is cutting jobs to counter declining earnings because of lower freshman enrollments and bookstore purchases in the US.
 Mispriced Offices Keystone Property Group, a Bala Cynwyd, Pennsylvania-based company with about 30 properties in the region, has purchased about 5 million square feet (465,000 square meters) in the area in the past couple of years.
 Investors are looking at Philadelphia as a safe, stable place to make purchases, he said.
 Capital Controls He was one of the businessmen with whom Prokhorov talked unofficially over the Uralkali deal and who rejected the idea of a purchase, the people said.
 It’s an excellent outcome” Only three of 32 economists surveyed by Bloomberg News forecast the BOJ would expand stimulus today, in what was the first policy change since Governor Haruhiko Kuroda began record asset purchases in April last year.
 ETF Purchases The central bank also said it would triple annual purchases of exchange-traded funds and Japanese real-estate investment trusts to 3 trillion yen and 90 billion yen respectively, and make ETFs that track the JPX-Nikkei Index 400 eligible for purchase.
 SABMiller, which is based in London, was rebuffed last month in its attempt to purchase smaller brewer Heineken NV.
 The acquisition could have helped SABMiller avoid being bought by AB InBev, people with knowledge of the matter said at the time, after the Leuven, Belgium-based maker of Budweiser and Stella Artois spent close to $100 billion in 10 years to purchase brews from Corona to Budweiser.
 is likely to renew its attempts to purchase Time Warner Cable.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Most Asian stocks advanced after the Federal Reserve said it will end its asset-purchase program amid signs of a strengthening economy and as investors analyzed earnings reports from some of the region’s biggest companies.
 The bank has typically repurchased equity in the open market as part of the program to avoid dilution.
 Italian Bonds The ECB bought Italian covered bonds as it returned to the market for a second day under its asset purchase program, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Investors should take the opportunity now to trade out of munis rated one to four steps above junk and purchase higher-grade debt, Zezas said.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan, who left the repurchase rate unchanged for a fourth meeting on Sept.
 The Fed, which is on course to halt its monthly bond-buying program this month, has maintained a commitment to keep rates near zero for a considerable time after completing asset purchases, while saying that future rate moves will depend on changes in the economy.
 expanded 35 percent in the third quarter, capping its strongest six months in more than a decade, as gains in government spending and a shrinking trade deficit made up for a slowdown in household purchases.
 said its $291 billion purchase of Motorola Mobility from Google Inc.
 The payment for Motorola included $141 billion in cash and Lenovo stock at the completion of the purchase, and $15 billion in a three-year promissory note, Lenovo said yesterday.
 In the first year after the purchase, Lenovo will sell 100 million devices, he said.
 1 completion of the $21 billion purchase of International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit.
 Still, the country “gets billions in aid” and “now has to earmark some of the funds for gas purchases” Negotiators will discuss options for bridge financing to cover payments until an International Monetary Fund package for Ukraine is ready, by February at the latest, Germany’s Merkel said on Oct.
 Net purchases of dollars by the PBOC, generated by selling the yuan to weaken it, amounted to about $21 billion in the six months through September, down from $106 billion in the first quarter, Nomura Holdings Inc.
 The ruble depreciated after posting its first gain in nine days yesterday as more than $9 billion in interventions and a central bank pledge to provide $50 billion of foreign currency through repurchase agreements failed to stem the rout.
 “We should” consider a fourth round of government bond purchases if the economy gets weaker, he said in an interview today on CNBC.
 That compares with purchases of $904 million in January, before the war started, and sales of $156 billion, according to the central bank.
 The foundation said it will release funds to United Nations agencies and international organizations involved in the response to enable them and national governments to purchase supplies and scale up emergency operations in affected countries.
 are studying a purchase of a stake in Oi SA’s African businesses, people familiar with the matter said today.
 The company has approached potential buyers to purchase the chain and keep some, or all, stores operating, Latacha said.
 for $351 billion in its largest purchase.
 Platform is in active talks to make more purchases as it targets eight high-margin segments ranging from oilfield services to coatings, Leever said.
 Chemtura Deal In October last year, Platform purchased closely held US.
 Norway also granted the managers an over-allotment option to purchase up to 163 million shares, selling as much as 66 percent of the company.
 Alfa purchased additional shares this month, boosting its stake to 18 percent, according to Canadian filings yesterday.
 “We thought those purchases were a little weird, because a joint venture could be more appropriate for what Alfa wants,” said Victor Benavides, a London-based Latin America analyst at Mirabaud Asset Management Ltd.
 Policy makers should consider delaying the end of their bond-purchase program to stem a decline in inflation expectations, St.
 The federal government helps state transportation departments purchase approved highway products, including Trinity’s end terminal.
 The company reduced its 2014 target for property purchases in July amid rising prices.
 Laws requiring people to purchase from dealer franchises promote price competition and customer advocacy, they say.
 Bonds declined following a meeting last week where Draghi failed to provide details on the size of its purchases of asset-backed securities and covered bonds, and the option of expanding the program to buy government bonds through a quantitative easing plan in the toolbox for now.
 Salus Capital Partners LLC is seeking to buy as much as$465 million of the $585 million of loans purchased byRadioShack’s largest shareholder, Standard General LP, said thepeople, who asked not to be identified because the discussionsare private.
 Standard General purchased the obligations fromGeneral Electric Co’s finance arm earlier this month in a dealthat helped the retailer stave off bankruptcy.
 To convince RadioShack and Standard General to sign off onits purchase of the new debt, Salus -- which already owns partof a $250 million second-lien loan it arranged for the retailerlast December -- would need to agree to store closings, thepeople said.
 Wearable Device Sony’s 2012 purchase of Gaikai Inc.
 The offering announced today consists of 8 percent senior unsecured notes due 2019 and warrants to purchase shares of common stock.
 Of all purchases, cash transactions accounted for about 24 percent, down from 33 percent 12 months earlier, the report showed.
 They accounted for 29 percent of purchases in September for a third month, below the historical average around 40 percent.
 22 led Medtronic to seek more expensive financing and unraveled three deals, including AbbVie Inc’s planned purchase of Shire Plc, which would have been the largest inversion in US.
 The Canadian-German dual citizen expanded the French drugmaker into biotechnology and rare diseases with the purchase of Cambridge, Massachusetts-based Genzyme Corp.
 “Any news coming from the ECB in terms of its asset-purchase program will be quite positive and supportive to equity markets, especially after the recent selloff,” Guillaume Duchesne, an equity strategist at BGL BNP Paribas SA in Luxembourg, said in a phone interview.
 15, OMAM said today in a statement, and underwriters have a 30-day option to purchase as much as 33 million more shares from Old Mutual.
 Marcato at the time criticized an error in which American Realty said that fees tied to a purchase of about 500 Red Lobster locations were $108 million.
 crude export restrictions and deliveries can be made on foreign-flagged tankers, so the refinery can now purchase US.
 All of those analysts recommend investors purchase shares.
 Buying Climate Today’s report on sentiment showed the buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, fell for a third week, to 316 from 327, while the gauge of personal finances was little changed at 522 from 524 the prior period.
 said purchases of appliances in the US.
 The current owners purchased the club’s training ground last year for 23 million pounds.
 and Martin Marietta Materials Inc’s purchase of Texas Industries Inc.
 Kyprolis, acquired in last year’s purchase of Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc, has been approved for multiple myeloma and is in clinical trials that may expand its label to earlier-stage patients.
 “Consumers who purchase cellular data plans should be able to use them without fear that their personal Internet connection will be blocked by their hotel or conference center,” FCC Enforcement Bureau Chief Travis LeBlanc said in the statement.
 Cultivating the list gives Amazon insights into items that people are likely to purchase so it can stock appropriate inventory.
 Toys, along with video games and books, are also among the few products that holiday shoppers prefer to purchase online as opposed to brick-and-mortar stores, according to a survey of 1,000 people conducted by research firm Market Track in Chicago.
 She hasn’t purchased a device yet and said she hopes to win a free one by taking more surveys.
 Chief Executive Officer Aaron Regent, isn’t finished hunting for acquisitions after announcing its first mine purchase today.
 There’s finally some focus back on company fundamentals after concerns at a macro level” Federal Reserve officials are expected to announce today an end to the bond purchases that boosted the central bank’s balance sheet to a record and helped drive an equity rally.
 “Markets are now prepared for the Fed’s final month of bond purchases,” Baring said.
 China’s central bank cut the interest rate it pays lendersfor 14-day repurchase agreements for the second time in a monthyesterday, spurring a bond rally.
 Cautious View “The impact of the home purchase restriction loosening maybe felt towards the end of the year or early next year,” saidAgarwal.
 That’s even true for premium beans purchased for high-end products at Jacques Torres.
 “Improving disposable incomes over the last five years generally helped discretionary purchases such as chocolate,” said Amal Ahmad, an industry analyst for IBISWorld, Inc.
 The Reserve Bank kept its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 575 percent last month even as a weakening rand threatened to keep inflation above the regulator’s 3 percent to 6 percent range.
 20 and plans to purchase asset-backed securities before the end of the year in an attempt to boost growth and prices in the region.
 shale gas industry, adding to the May purchase of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy operations.
 16 in relation to a money laundering investigation linked to Sistema’s purchase of Bashneft shares.
 The European Central Bank may outline its asset-purchase program when it reviews policy today, while the Federal Reserve is on course to end its stimulus this month and raise interest rates in 2015.
 Banks had warned that a draft of the Basel group’s NSFR proposal published in January would drive up the cost of equity trading, unfairly penalize them for carrying out repurchase agreements and underestimate the stability of operational deposits.
 This refutes critics of the Federal Reserve’s monetary policies who say the central bank’s almost $4 trillion of bond purchases since 2008 will cause runaway inflation.
 Accelerated Buyback To address investor scrutiny over return of cash, Yahoo said today it accelerated share repurchases with an unnamed financial institution.
 17, resulting in 235 million shares repurchased for $933 million, Yahoo said in today’s statement.
 The ECB bought Italian covered bonds as it returned to the market for a second day under its asset-purchase program, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 “There’s no funding available to make purchases for the time being and the debt acts like a poison pill to any prospective buyers,” he said.
 in 2008, and NeXstar Pharmaceuticals Inc, which was purchased by Gilead Sciences Inc.
 It has room to take on more debt to repurchase stock, according to Mark Kalinowski, a New York-based analyst at Janney Montgomery Scott LLC.
 Consumers anticipating falling prices may postpone discretionary purchases.
 The company said the purchase will give it access to markets near the booming Marcellus and Utica gas-shale formations.
 Niel is unlikely to revisit a deal with Bouygues, and Iliad isn’t interested in expanding into Spain with a purchase of wireless carrier Yoigo from TeliaSonera AB, the person said.
 It made money on American private student loans it purchased from a Swiss bank last year.
 Google, based in Mountain View, has spent billions onproperty leases and purchases as it expands hiring and makesacquisitions.
 The properties Google purchased comprise about 934,200square feet of Class A office space, as well as a 38,000-square-foot fitness center that includes a gym, pool and spa, accordingto two people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to benamed because the details are private.
 Blackstone Deal Blackstone in 2011 bought an $80 million junior loan on theoffice complex at a discount in an effort to gain ownership ifStarwood Capital defaulted, two people with knowledge of thepurchase said at the time.
 Outside of Silicon Valley, Google’s major real estatepurchases include New York’s 111 Eighth Ave, a formerindustrial warehouse that takes up an entire block in theChelsea neighborhood, which it acquired for $18 billion in2010.
 The Armonk, New York-based company now has $64 billion available in its stock repurchase program.
 The company has already repurchased $19 billion worth of stock in the past four quarters to satiate investors and to reduce the number of shares in circulation, which helps boost earnings per share.
 The Pegulas reached an agreement to purchase the team last month, beating out other bidders that included billionaire Donald Trump and a group that had rock musician Jon Bon Jovi as a member.
 A takeover of PepsiCo may have a better chance of adding to AB InBev’s earnings than a purchase of SABMiller, said Withagen at Kepler Cheuvreux.
 He’s expanded Legg Mason’s offerings through two acquisitions this year, including the purchase last quarter of global stock manager Martin Currie.
 are studying a purchase of a stake in Oi SA’s African businesses, according to four people familiar with the matter.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 An improving labor market has helped fuel recent gains in consumer purchases, which account for about 70 percent of the economy.
 The SoHo store has the company’s hallmark retro look, with bookshelves, exposed-pipe ceiling, and long glass display counters with memorabilia like a copy of Allen Ginsberg’s “Howl” Nonprescription glasses can be purchased onsite, and a desk in the back offers $75 eye exams and the chance to place online orders.
 Schwartz noted an increase in failures to deliver in the Treasury market, making it harder for traders to easily borrow and lend desired securities in the repurchase market.
 agreed to pay $55 million to purchasers of freight shipping services to resolve claims of price-fixing, according to a court filing.
 The PBOC cut the interest rate it pays lenders for 14-day repurchase agreements for the second time in a month this week.
 Most economists surveyed by Bloomberg News anticipate Fed policy makers will end those purchases as planned while reiterating interest rates will stay low for a “considerable time” “If you’re going to commit capital, you’re better off waiting a bit,” he said.
 Motor-vehicle purchases slowed to an annualized rate of 163 million, the weakest since April, from 175 million in August, according to data from Ward’s Automotive Group.
 “I think the purchase for kids is greater in Brazil than any other country I’ve seen in Latin America and sometimes even more so than the US,” she said.
 Equities pared losses earlier as the European Central Bank said it settled 1704 billion euros ($22 billion) of covered-bond purchases last week as it started its latest effort to revive the region’s economy.
 28-29, when they are expected to end monthly asset purchases as the US.
 Micron advanced 4 percent to $3230 for the biggest gain in the S&P, after the company reported a $1 billion stock repurchase authorization.
 The decisions underscored the new pressures facing PayPal, a Web-payments pioneer that EBay purchased in 2002 to smooth transactions on its marketplace.
 Both stock and junk-bond managers tend to deploy more leverage when markets are booming, and more than ever is being used to purchase US.
 The company, which has a market value of $111 billion, is seeking to purchase more cement plants in India and abroad, he said in an interview with Bloomberg TV India in September last year.
 Under SolarCity’s current model, the company owns the equipment and the customers make monthly payments for power, an arrangement typically called a power purchase agreement or PPA.
 Banks’ lending remains far below last year’s levels as they struggle to increase home-purchase mortgages after imposing tough credit requirements.
 Stake Buyout Speculation Yashili fell today because traders who’d purchased the shares on speculation of a stake purchase sold them to lock in gains, Nicolas Wang, an analyst at Haitong International Securities Group Ltd, said in an interview today.
 The train station service, which guarantees products will be available within 24 hours of purchase, adds to CDiscount’s network of 17,500 pick-up points in France.
 Lenovo, the world’s biggest PC maker, followed by Hewlett-Packard, is adding International Business Machines Corp’s server business to its earlier purchase of IBM’s PC division.
 The purchase of London-based AstraZeneca would have reduced New York-based Pfizer’s tax bill by moving its legal address overseas and given the drugmaker a greater roster of medicines.
 The $11 billion buyback, to be utilized over an indefinite time period, is in addition to the $13 billion remaining under the company’s existing share repurchase program, Pfizer said in a statement.
 “This is creating for us a pension funding holiday,” Tanner said, freeing cash for share repurchases and acquisitions.
 Lockheed said it repurchased 26 million shares for $446 million during the third quarter, after halting stock buybacks during the second quarter as it assessed pension obligations.
 The company, which approved a $2 billion increase to its share repurchase program last month, said it has $39 billion available for future stock repurchases.
 15 amid better-than-expected earnings and signs of a strengthening economy even as the Fed prepares to end its bond purchases.
 Intellectual property, purchased by the company from parent Ultura Inc.
 Invitation Homes, which snapped up foreclosed properties after values fell as much as 35 percent from the 2006 peak, has slowed purchases this year as prices surged.
 17 in Riga that a program to purchase covered bonds will start within days.
 Lada accounted for about 80 percent of sales in the last cash-for-clunkers program, in which the government subsidizes purchase of a new car if the customer hands in an old one.
 “If I had more money, I would probably think of something different, but still I am pretty happy with the purchase.
 “SaskPower has already learned from our experience at Boundary Dam Power Station and we can safely say that we could build a second carbon capture project on a coal plant for less” Some of the carbon dioxide from Boundary Dam near Estevan, Saskatchewan, will be purchased by oil producers and used in enhanced oil recovery or EOR, a technique to boost the amount of fuel recovered from reservoirs.
 The investment firm, with $21 billion under management, has agreed to take up any unpurchased shares in Postmedia’s $186 million rights offering to help fund the acquisition.
 ‘Look Cheap’ Last month, the ECB cut interest rates to record lows and pledged to purchase asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 The asset-purchase plan is part of a strategy intended to add as much as 1 trillion euros to the central bank’s balance sheet.
 The index has retreated 38 percent since its all-time high as the Fed remains on track to end bond purchases this month, trimming its gain for the year to 47 percent.
 If the company splits, the sports and media group doesn’t plan to purchase more teams, while the entertainment division might turn to acquisitions, he said.
 Sports franchises are looking especially valuable on their own after the $2 billion purchase of the Los Angeles Clippers by former Microsoft Corp.
 After adjusting for inflation, purchases climbed 05 percent in August, the biggest gain in five months, according to figures from the Commerce Department.
 ECB President Mario Draghi has pledged to start asset purchases this month as he seeks to ward off deflation and ignite the stagnant economy.
 Japanese investors boosted purchases of foreign stocks last week to the most since 2009 as bets the yen will weaken spurred buying outside their home market.
 30, 2009, and compares with an average of 463 billion in net weekly purchases this year, the data show.
 The Greater New York Taxi Association, which brought the lawsuit, said the program “has been flawed from the beginning” “The Taxi of Tomorrow as planned forces owners to purchase a single foreign-made vehicle, which is neither fuel-efficient nor wheelchair accessible,” the group said in a statement.
 2013 Lawsuit The operators sued again in July 2013, and a judge blocked the plan from going forward, saying the commission exceeded its authority under the city charter by requiring the purchase of a specific vehicle.
 Wall Street firms, which have spent more than $25 billion on about 150,000 homes since prices hit bottom in 2012, helped drive up values around the country before slowing purchases last year.
 Less Distress With fewer foreclosures and other discounted homes available, all-cash purchases in August fell to about 23 percent of the market from 33 percent, the National Association of Realtors reported last month.
 Amazon is offering a free 30-day membership to Prime with the purchase of a Fire TV Stick, and current Prime members can pre-order the stick for $19 for the first two days.
 2 chain, was purchased by China’s Dalian Wanda Group in 2012 and went public last year.
 economy as the Federal Reserve ends its bond purchases.
 There hasn’t been a major North American railroad takeover since Warren Buffett’s purchase of Burlington Northern Santa Fe in 2010.
 While NAK Naftogaz Ukrainy says it has $31 billion available to pay its debt, the state-owned energy company lacks money for new supplies and must rely on Europe to finance the purchases, Miller and Novak have said.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, said Oct.
 A European Central Bank board member said last week covered bond purchases would begin in the next few days.
 The company completed at least 20 purchases since its shares began trading through June, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In February, he dropped his campaign to spur Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 The Fed ended a bond-purchase stimulus program this week, moving a step closer to raising US.
 “Risk retention may become effective at an inopportune time as short-term rates are rising” CLOs typically purchase 60 percent of new issuance, Wells Fargo data show.
 The purchases by CLOs, which pool loans and slice them into pieces of varying risk and return, have helped offset the drop in demand from individual investors.
 This “will help ensure the quality of assets purchased by CLOs,” US.
 When Whitman took over three years ago, she inherited a company plagued by slowing growth and management missteps, as well as issues stemming from Apotheker’s Autonomy purchase.
 Some of the charges also related to Hurd’s 2008 purchase of Electronic Data Systems Corp.
 yesterday terminated its planned 32 billion-pound ($52 billion) acquisition of Shire Plc, saying the policy changes undermined the rationale for the purchase.
 The Competition Commission said yesterday it approved the purchase by Coricraft Group Pty Ltd.
 Buffett and 3G, co-led by Lemann, could make an equity investment of about $25 billion each, they said, in a deal not unlike their purchase of ketchup maker HJ Heinz Co.
 Rasulo, who ran the parks for eight years, has increased Disney’s dividends and stock repurchases, executed a cost-cutting initiative last year and recently took over supervision of Maker Studios, a creator of short-form videos for Youtubecom and other channels.
 He rebuilt Disney’s animation business with the purchase of Pixar and the production of hits such as “Frozen” at Walt Disney Animation Studios.
 “Standards may have to be revised for the program to be effective and equitable” A proposal by the ECB’s six-person Executive Board foresaw that existing requirements on the quality of assets accepted are relaxed to allow purchases of some Greek and Cypriot ABS, the Financial Times reported this week, citing unidentified people familiar with the matter.
 While Draghi pledged to start the program this month, initial purchases will probably be modest, according to two euro-zone central bank officials who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 The ECB president said last month that it’s “very difficult to assess the size” of purchases.
 One challenge is building the logistical operation to make the purchases.
 Balance Sheet An early proposal last month foresaw the ECB outsourcing purchases to external asset managers, with national central banks buying shares in a fund, according to two officials familiar with the proposal.
 Policy makers rejected the draft and decided that purchases would be made by the ECB, on the recommendation of outside advisers, and held on its balance sheet, the officials said.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said the Fed should consider delaying the end of its bond purchase program.
 The distributor of disposable tableware and food packaging also announced the purchase of De Ridder Groep BV and said it will make further acquisitions before the end of the year.
 State’s Boon The same month, New York-based Goldman Sachs agreed to pay $315 billion to repurchase residential mortgage-backed securities to resolve federal claims tied to the sale of the bonds to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 “Expectations seem very high for this program, which will represent one of the biggest steps in the process of opening the mainland China stock market to foreign investors” Stocks Climb China is counting on the success of bourse link, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) in daily cross-border purchases, to help liberalize its financial system and increase use of the yuan.
 9 it would miss its earningforecast after phone carriers delayed equipment purchases.
 About 8 percent of annual repurchases happen in October, compared with 14 percent in November, the biggest month of the year, and 10 percent in December, according to data from Goldman Sachs from 2007 to 2013, excluding 2008.
 EDT, and Media General holds a special shareholders meeting related to its purchase of LIN Media.
 The collection, spanning 1992 to 2010 with six bottles of the pinot noir red from each vintage, was purchased by an Asian buyer who wasn’t identified in a Sotheby’s list of sale results.
 “We supply gum seed with all tobacco seed purchases and strongly urge farmers, no matter how small or large, to make use of them in order to avoid a deforestation crisis,” Andrew Matibiri, chief executive officer of the TIMB, said in an interview.
 20, the first purchase in six days and the most since Sept.
 It agreed to a purchase of Grindrod’s banking unit in July to boost its financial-services business and expand its product base.
 Customers are cutting back on spending as they avoid purchases of large machines to store data, while others are paying companies such as Amazoncom Inc.
 IBM’s biggest shareholder, Warren Buffett, has said before that he wanted IBM’s stock to decline in the short term so that the company could repurchase more of its shares.
 The buying climate index fell to 33 from 338 as more people said now was a poor time to make purchases.
 cut its forecast for third-quarter same-store sales growth as purchases of full-priced items in September weren’t enough to make up for the effect of clearance merchandise.
 The Federal Communications Commission yesterday stopped the clock in its review and suspended deadlines for comments in this deal, as well as AT&T Inc’s agreement to purchase DirecTV.
 Through yesterday, Comcast shares had fallen 68 percent since the Time Warner Cable purchase was announced in February.
 rose the most in four years after its chairman bought stock and the company said its purchase of North American assets, which sent shares tumbling earlier in the week, won’t hurt earnings.
 The stock closed at 651 reais yesterday, 82 percent below the purchase price.
 The Hong Kong-Shanghai tie-up will begin with limits on both daily and aggregate purchases as policy makers seek to maintain some control over capital flows.
 Tight borrowing standards have made property purchases tough for young buyers, who often have limited credit histories and low-paying jobs, as well as the former owners of the more than 5 million properties lost to foreclosure since the housing crash.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Manulife Financial Corp, Canada’s largest life insurer, agreed to help develop a 27-story tower in Montreal as the company expands in Quebec with the planned purchase of a unit from Standard Life Plc.
 “The energy component could reduce some competitiveness” A rebounding Mexican economy led the national auto dealers trade group, known as AMDA, to raise its sales forecast for the year to 112 million units earlier this month from 109 million after purchases rose 14 percent in September.
 QKR has agreed to finance Epangelo Mining Co’s purchase of the stake, and the state-owned mining company plans to use some of its dividends to pay off the loan.
 Slowing Growth China’s leaders have relaxed home-purchase controls and the central bank has pumped liquidity to lenders as they seek to limit a property-induced slowdown.
 SoftBank is Japan’s biggest corporate bond issuer for the second year, raising 152 trillion yen ($14 billion) to fund purchases including US.
 Son will have to balance future purchases with the increasing cost of servicing SoftBank’s record 94 trillion yen debt pile, as the Federal Reserve ends its bond buying program this month and analysts surveyed by Bloomberg expect Japan’s benchmark yield to almost double by the end of 2015.
 In an open letter today to Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook that focused on the need for more share repurchases, Icahn also said there’s “good reason to expect” Apple to introduce an UltraHD television in fiscal 2016.
 went bankrupt before investors could collect on such promises to repurchase bad loans.
 Comerci, as the Mexico City-based seller is known, would keep the real estate and lease it to Chedraui, which would use its own brand for the stores it purchases, the person said, asking not to be identified because the negotiations are still private.
 Comerci’s decision to sell the supermarkets comes less than two months after Grupo Gigante SAB agreed to purchase most of its Restaurantes California and Beer Factory eateries for 11 billion pesos ($80 million).
 “It could be driven by desire to have more products for the hospital” Pricing pressures on hospitals have led them to crack down on outside purchases, with many turning to bulk orders to cut costs and increase volume.
 The company will suspend its $400 million in annual share repurchases until its debt level is reduced, Forlenza said.
 Two-thirds are unhappy with the lack of details for an asset-purchase program that will start this month.
 Only three of 32 economists surveyed by Bloomberg News forecast the BOJ would expand stimulus today, in what was the first policy change since Governor Haruhiko Kuroda began record asset purchases in April last year.
 5 MetLife in June announced its first share buyback since 2008, saying it would repurchase as much as $1 billion of common stock.
 18 as the Federal Reserve remains on track to end bond purchases this month.
 The S&P 500 nearly tripled during a 5 1/2 year bull market fueled by better-than-estimated corporate earnings and three rounds of Feb bond purchases.
 Greybull will purchase 90 percent of Luton, England-based Monarch from the Mantegazza family, the parties said in a statement late yesterday.
 9, 2011: Hewlett-Packard unveils the TouchPad tablet computer, which runs the WebOS software it acquired in its purchase of Palm Inc.
 for $103 billion, a purchase aimed at making HP a leader in information management, and says it is considering a spinoff of its PC unit.
 April 4, 2013: Ray Lane departs as Hewlett-Packard chairman, underscoring shareholders’ dissatisfaction with the company’s performance and the Autonomy purchase.
 “There are other ways of having relationships with the people in Silicon Valley,” said Kraft, who has overseen the day-to-day operations of the Patriots since his family purchased the team in 1994 and developed the private financing strategy for the $325 million construction of Gillette Stadium.
 Mahindra’s spending on the project will total 28 million euros, including the equity purchase and 15 million euros in model development, he said.
 The $2 billion purchase of the Los Angeles Clippers by former Microsoft Corp.
 NBA Values Before the Clippers purchase, the most paid for an NBA team was $550 million for the Milwaukee Bucks.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Multimillionaire British collector Frank Cohen waited eight years for the Jeff Koons sculpture he had purchased to be completed.
 “The Bank of Japan news is positive for market sentiments” BOJ Stimulus The yen plunged to a six-year low while Asian equities jumped after the BOJ said it will boost holdings of government bonds by 80 trillion yen ($723 billion) and boost exchange-traded fund purchases to 3 trillion yen.
 shale drilling boom opens up $15 trillion in potential purchases and expansion.
 Buffett Deal There hasn’t been a major North American railroad takeover since Warren Buffett’s purchase of Burlington Northern Santa Fe in 2010.
 “A pro-competition, customer-friendly, safety-focused railway combination is one such solution that could not be ignored on its merits by regulators” Canadian Pacific will probably “continue to look for ways to streamline its operations in Chicago, and that could mean the company goes after rail asset purchases that would be much less likely to face major regulatory hurdles,” Jason Seidl, a Cowen & Co.
 15 after it said it was considering scrapping the purchase of the Dublin-based drugmaker.
 is backing the purchase, has said that the deal isn’t motivated by taxes.
 Tanker purchases are planned to increase from the seven requested this year to 12 in fiscal 2016 and 18 in 2017.
 The connect allows for a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) in daily cross-border purchases.
 The fund says it will be able to finance as much as $25 billion in plane purchases and will focus on the biggest models costing $30 million or more.
 The two countries accounted for about 20 percent of purchases in 2011, and that share will rise to 28 percent in 2016 as the market grows to $31 billion from $23 billion, according to De Beers owner Anglo American Plc.
 Frieda Purchase PanAust bought its 80 percent share of Frieda River in August from Glencore Plc, which had acquired the deposit through its 2013 purchase of Xstrata Ltd.
 At the hearing, some creditors pressed for Oncor to be sold as part of a new, as-yet-unfiled restructuring plan, saying bids would be higher in six months or a year if potential buyers were confident that they could go through with the purchase on the terms set today.
 “This is creating for us a pension funding holiday,” Tanner said, freeing cash for share repurchases and acquisitions.
 Lockheed said it repurchased 26 million shares for $446 million during the third quarter, after halting stock buybacks during the second quarter as it assessed pension obligations.
 The company, which approved a $2 billion increase to its share repurchase program last month, said it has $39 billion available for future stock repurchases.
 The flood initially anticipated by Oaktree, which set aside $102 billion for European purchases, is still more of a “trickle,” he said.
 credit card issuer by purchases.
 These will be completely different than the traditional approach to credit ratings, which are tremendously imprecise and ‘laggy’ PayPal can do a real-time credit score in milliseconds, based on your EBay purchase history -- and it turns out that’s a better source of information than the stuff used to generate your FICO score.
 on mortgages they purchased is now about 740.
 DeMarco had reduced the targets: In 2012, 23 percent of the home-purchase loans the companies bought had to be made to these borrowers, a four percentage point drop from the goal of 27 percent in 2010.
 Existing shareholders would own 20 percent of the company’s shares if none of them purchase stock in a rights offering that is part of the aid package.
 2 chain, was purchased by China’s Dalian Wanda Group in 2012 and went public last year.
 The notes were purchased at a yield of 1567 percent.
 “Investors who purchased units of the company as a retirement strategy will immediately owe taxes which they, if they had held the investment until death, would not have had to pay” Kinder, a Houston billionaire, is consolidating his pipeline empire as the US.
 shale drilling boom opens up $15 trillion in potential purchases and expansion projects.
 In the third quarter of 2013, GM repurchased $800 million of preferred shares, contributing to the large difference in the year-earlier results by the two measures.
 Washington Prime will gain 23 properties with its purchase of Columbus, Ohio-based Glimcher.
 “As the resolution of modification repurchase claims raised by Triaxx was the largest impediment to approving the settlement in its entirety, this event is a very positive sign for RMBS bondholders,” the analysts said.
 BofA Settlement The settlement is part of Bank of America’s push to resolve liabilities tied to faulty mortgages that have cost it at least $55 billion since the financial crisis, most inherited with its 2008 purchase of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 In August, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy most of the new loans for home purchases, began to study the feasibility of using VantageScore and other alternatives to FICO.
 winds down asset purchases.
 Chevron was already one of the top acreage holders in Texas’ prolific Permian Basin, so after a $32 billion purchase of an Appalachian shale operator in 2011, Watson pursued an alternative path, investing exploration dollars in Argentina’s vast Vaca Muerta shale field.
 Dassault Aviation Chief Executive Officer Eric Trappier held out that possibility yesterday, saying the family led by 89-year-old Serge Dassault would be able to purchase stock.
 Shareholders last month approved the purchase and cancellation of as much as 10 percent of Dassault Aviation stock, at a maximum price of 1,200 euros a share.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Damien Hirst’s formaldehyde fish and Piero Manzoni’s white canvas were among the top purchases during Frieze Week in London as the auction houses sold 2312 million pounds ($373 million) of art.
 Quite a few things have sold” Jeanne Greenberg Rohatyn, an art adviser and founder of the New York gallery Salon 94, declined to say whether her clients Beyonce and Jay-Z made any purchases.
 Founded in 1984, APCO went public in 1988 and was purchased 11 years later by Ford.
 “We’ve seen a lot of wealth generated there over the last decade, and we see see private investors diversifying their portfolio around the globe” The Waldorf deal follows such high-profile New York acquisitions as Shanghai-based Greenland Holding Group Inc’s purchase this year of a 70 percent interest in the Atlantic Yards project in Brooklyn.
 That $14 billion deal was the largest Chinese purchase of a US.
 Including Anbang’s purchase of the Waldorf from Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc, Chinese investors will have bought $27 billion of New York-area real estate in 2014, topping last year’s $26 billion, according to Real Capital.
 The surge in Chinese real estate investment overseas is reminiscent of the Japanese wave of property purchases in the US.
 Labor Day holiday could explain the see-saw as related purchases were pushed into August at the expense of last month, he said.
 Industry data showed purchases dropped to a 163 million annualized rate in September, the lowest since April, from a 175 million pace a month earlier that was the highest since January 2006, according to data from Ward’s Automotive Group.
 The category was probably boosted by purchases of more than 10 million Apple Inc.
 The lack of inflation pressures gives Fed policy makers room to keep interest rates near zero even as they’re on pace to end their unprecedented monthly bond purchases this month.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- PT Pertamina’s purchase of a stake in Murphy Oil Corp’s oil and natural gas assets in Malaysia for $2 billion may lead to more overseas deals for Indonesia’s state-owned energy company as it struggles to bolster domestic reserves.
 Petronas has increased output with foreign purchases from Africa to the Americas.
 The New York-based bank worked on Facebook Inc’s $18 billion purchase of WhatsApp Inc.
 and Rakuten Inc’s $1 billion purchase of Ebates Inc, the data show.
 merchants that already have technology in place to read the short-range wireless signals that enable customers of Apple Pay or similar services to make a purchase by waving their smartphones.
 Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook is trying to push Cupertino, California-based Apple into new businesses that further immerse users in the Apple digital ecosystem, which encourages repeat purchases over time.
 credit-card purchases, allowing the iPhone maker to piggyback on their checkout systems.
 Gold slumped to the lowest in four years as the dollar strengthened after the Bank of Japan unexpectedly boosted stimulus and the Federal Reserve ended asset purchases this week.
 Target, which now offers free shipping for customers who use its branded payment cards, is extending that to all purchases from today through Dec.
 Comerci, as the Mexico City-based supermarket operator is known, would keep the real estate and lease it to Chedraui, which would use its own brand for the stores purchased, the person said yesterday, asking not to be identified because the negotiations are still private.
 Comerci’s decision to sell the stores comes less than two months after Grupo Gigante SAB agreed to purchase most of its Restaurantes California and Beer Factory eateries for 11 billion pesos ($80 million).
 Nigerian Sale All of the Nigerian purchase agreements are in place, Shell Chief Financial Officer Simon Henry said on a conference call with reporters, and remain subject to ministerial approval.
 of Brisbane, California, for about $8 billion in cash, its largest purchase since 2009.
 11 that expanding the central bank’s balance sheet throughactions such as asset purchases is the last monetary tool leftto stimulate inflation.
 “It’s very much a mixed bag, but nothing that suggests the Fed is going to take away the punch bowl any time soon” Fed Policy The Fed last month tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the purchase program this month.
 claims that its $15 billion purchase of LIN Media LLC is anticompetitive, the government said.
 and a 2007 purchase of Sirius XM Holdings Inc.
 ‘Growth Opportunities’ Toronto-Dominion expanded under Clark with takeovers, starting with its 2005 purchase of 51 percent of Portland, Maine-based Banknorth Group Inc.
 Customer purchases in those countries rose 155 percent.
 Pressure is mounting for European Central Bank stimulus such as government-bond purchases as the 18-nation euro area struggles to rebound from a sovereign debt crisis and subsequent austerity measures.
 The ECB will start “within the next days” to purchase assets in the new program to support the economy, Benoit Coeure, an executive board member, said on Oct.
 Editorial Direction Golding said the company said he ordered the purchase “without the necessary authority and mandate of the board,” according to the court documents.
 to Comcast, Charter agreed in April to purchase cable-TV customers from the winning suitor.
 Comcast is awaiting regulatory approval for its Time Warner Cable purchase.
 Charter will use part of its offering proceeds to purchase cable systems serving approximately 15 million Time Warner Cable video customers, and will be held in escrow until the transactions between Charter and Comcast close, the company said in a separate statement.
 The company is taking advantage of relatively low borrowing costs to fund the proposed purchases.
 The exchange link will allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases, help to increase international use of the yuan and liberalize China’s financial system.
 completed the $175 billion purchase of BP’s Colombian assets in January 2011, forming a new venture called Equion Energia Ltd.
 The purchase will help NRG reach more solar customers at costs that are as much as 50 percent lower than traditional marketing efforts, Kelcy Pegler Jr, president of NRG’s Home Solar unit, said in an interview.
 That may help to focus end users on increasing purchases for long-term needs, to lock in current low prices” Wheat futures for December delivery climbed 11 percent to $4985 a bushel.
 The central bank is trying to combat anemic growth and inflation in the euro area with a combination of record-low interest rates, long-term loans and asset purchases that may expand the institution’s balance sheet by as much as 1 trillion euros.
 While Draghi has so far stopped short of committing to large-scale purchases of sovereign debt, more than half the economists in Bloomberg’s monthly survey predict he’ll eventually announce a quantitative-easing program similar to those carried out by the US.
 raised $725 billion of loanslast month to back its purchase of coffee-and-doughnut chain TimHortons, Bloomberg data show.
 The risk-retention rules also include a second option,which would allow risk for each loan purchased by a CLO to beretained by the lead arranger, according to the document.
 merchants that already have technology in place to read the short-range wireless signals that enable customers of Apple Pay or similar services to make a purchase by waving their smartphones.
 Shareholders of Atlanta-based Gentiva will receive $1450 per share in cash and $5 of Kindred common stock in the purchase, the companies said today in a statement.
 Federal Reserve ended its asset-purchase program.
 Federal Reserve’s monthly bond purchases this month had boosted the US.
 Mortgages for new home purchases may climb to $195 billion by next year’s third quarter, from $115 billion in this year’s first quarter, according to estimates from the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 The share repurchases, coupled with a pledge to maintain its dividend, is an attempt by the world’s No.
 The government asked utilities and miners to reduce overseas purchases by 40 million tons from September to December, China Coal Transport and Distribution Association said Sept.
 VLM, which aims to complete a management buyout from Germany’s Intro Aviation GmbH next week, will take two SSJ100s from Russian lessor Ilyushin Finance Co, with options for two more leased aircraft and purchase rights for a further 10.
 A purchase of aging Boeing Co.
 A combination of Glencore and Rio would be the largest mining deal ever completed, topping Rio’s purchase of Alcan Inc.
 “In virtually all other areas of commerce, consumers know the price and much about the quality of what they intend to buy ahead of the purchase,” said Uwe Reinhardt, a health economist at Princeton University, in an editorial accompanying the study.
 “Nomura’s retail segment will remain the main contributor to earnings, due in part to changes in government policy that encourage individual purchases of investment trusts, especially those that invest in equities,” Moody’s said on Oct.
 Led by Chief Executive Officer Koji Nagai, Nomura is rebuilding its overseas operations after cutbacks following its purchase of parts of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 “We’ve got the positive option upside, but in a downside scenario we’re limiting our risk” The company acquired Bloom Lake as part of its purchase of Consolidated Thompson Iron Mines Ltd.
 shale revolution has driven oil output to the highest in more than three decades, reducing America’s need for overseas purchases and sinking global prices into a bear market.
 Mideast Supplies Its purchases from other OPEC members are declining.
 and is seeking to purchase more, a company official said on Oct.
 “This in our view is a great business opportunity, right in the company’s wheel house” For MicroStrategy, Apex publicly filed a critical letter in February urging the company to reinstitute earnings calls, outline its plans, separate the CEO and chairman roles, strengthen its board and more aggressively repurchase shares.
 The planned purchase forms part of a shift into food-led establishments by Bury St Edmunds, England-based Greene King and would create the UK’s largest holder of directly-operated pubs with about 3,000 outlets.
 If Allergan can’t complete a transaction, the drugmaker would consider a share repurchase program, Pyott said on the call today.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 investors approved the $452 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc, with more than 99 percent of shareholders voting in favor of combining the two largest US.
 Alfa said yesterday it was studying a purchase ofColombia’s Pacific Rubiales Energy Corp.
 and Hyundai Mobis Co, all part of billionaire Chairman Chung Mong Koo’s automotive group, subsequently approved the land purchase on Sept.
 Federal Reserve confirmed it will end asset purchases.
 The purchase will bring Murdoch’s European TV assets under one roof, creating a media powerhouse serving programs via cable and satellite to 20 million subscribers in five European countries.
 Medtronic CEO Ishrak said from the Covidien deal’s outset that the decision to purchase Covidien was based on what it saw as a changing landscape in health care that has hospital and insurers demanding better pricing from suppliers.
 The gauge slumped the most since January yesterday as investors speculated that the European Central Bank’s asset-purchase program is inadequate to revive the euro-area economy.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- A surge in purchases of personal protective equipment in the US, where one person has died from Ebola, is prompting the World Health Organization to ensure health workers in West Africa get access to the gear.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan, who left the repurchase rate unchanged for a fourth meeting on Sept.
 President Mario Draghi will eventually announce a program of government-debt purchases similar to that carried out by the Federal Reserve and the Bank of England, according to more than half the economists in a Bloomberg survey.
 Even as households tempered their purchases in the third quarter, the world’s largest economy expanded faster than previously forecast in the third quarter as the trade deficit shrank and government spending rebounded, yesterday’s figures showed.
 Kao, which also makes detergents, diapers and sanitary towels, extended a foothold in Europe about a decade ago with the purchases of Molton Brown and John Frieda shampoos.
 The Federal Reserve meets next week amid speculation it will end its bond-purchase stimulus program.
 15 amid better-than-expected earnings and signs of a strengthening economy even as the Fed prepares to end its bond purchases.
 In a statement following the September gathering, policy makers renewed their pledge to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after ending bond purchases this month.
 Buyout firm TPG Capital Management LP is considering a 2 billion-pound purchase of Dunnhumby, Sky News reported last week, without citing anyone.
 14 it is reconsidering its endorsement of the purchase -- is almost certain to rescind that backing when it meets Oct.
 Fed policy makers are expected to end monthly asset purchases tomorrow as the US.
 In their view, that precludes the chance of purchase offers maximizing value on their side of the company.
 “All he is, is a disgruntled losing bidder” Brookfield Property was spun off last year from Toronto-based Brookfield Asset Management Inc, Canada’s largest manager of alternative assets, to pursue purchases beyond its traditional focus on office and retail real estate.
 The BOJ, which buys about 7 trillion yen ($65 billion) of government bonds a month, kept its asset-purchase stimulus program unchanged after a meeting today.
 He said Banco BTG Pactual SA approached America Movil in August to discuss a plan to work with a competitor, Oi SA, to jointly purchase parts of rival Tim Participacoes SA.
 Schlosstein, 63, said in August that the purchase of ISI, which specializes in equity research and trading, would help Evercore gain more business underwriting stock offerings.
 That deal was followed by a series of acquisitions, including the $155 billion purchase of E-Tek Dynamics Inc, and SDL Inc.
 “We lost our way in relation to our acquisition ability,” Walsh said in December, reflecting on Rio purchases in previous years.
 The central bank left the one-week repurchase rate at 825 percent today, in line with the median estimate in a Bloomberg survey of analysts.
 The link, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38billion) of daily cross-border purchases, will also help HongKong strengthen its status as a gateway to mainland markets asthe government tries to end pro-democracy protests that haveblock some streets in the business district for three weeks.
 Treasury Purchases Treasury was authorized to “purchase any obligations and other securities issued by” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, a provision which also allowed it to “exercise any rights received in connection with such purchases,” Lamberth wrote yesterday.
 Japan’s finance ministry is scheduled to release data on net purchases by the nation’s investors of overseas debt and stocks last week.
 Investors purchased 7739 billion yen of foreign bonds and notes in the week ended Sept.
 “It’s related to the mechanisms that have been built through currency shifts and the phasing in of oil income in kroner” The euro has tumbled about 10 percent versus the dollar from a 2 1/2-year high reached in May as the ECB unveiled unprecedented stimulus, including purchases of asset-backed securities, to combat a slide in inflation.
 The Fed is on track to end a bond-purchase stimulus program this month.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Iger rebuilt Disney’s animation business with the purchase of Pixar and the production of hits such as “Frozen” at Walt Disney Animation Studios.
 It also said it would exercise purchase rights for 27 Airbus Group NV A320 planes, bringing flexibility to operate a fleet of between 204 and 316 aircraft by 2019, according to demand.
 rose in Tokyo trading as the company said it’s negotiating to reduce a penalty this month for the collapse of a planned purchase of six Airbus Group NV A380 superjumbo jets.
 Most government bonds across Europe ended the week higher, even after paring gains following ECB President Mario Draghi’s failure to provide details on the size of its planned purchases of asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 Better finances for consumers, very good jobs growth and you’ve got more money in consumers’ pockets because of lower gasoline prices” The lowest costs at the gas pump in four years and the biggest payroll gains in more than a decade are projected to lift buying power and household purchases heading into the holiday-shopping season.
 consumer spending data showed that after adjusting for inflation, which generates the figures used to calculate gross domestic product, purchases also dropped 02 percent last month after a 05 percent gain in August.
 ‘Base Scenario’ Yields slid across the region yesterday as Germany cut its growth outlook and investor confidence fell to the weakest level in two years, fueling concern that Europe’s biggest economy is heading for a recession and increasing pressure on the region’s central bank to implement asset-purchase stimulus, or quantitative easing.
 Enterprise Products bought a stake in Oiltanking Partners and offered to purchase the rest of the company in a proposal worth as much as $6 billion.
 where we have developed a solid pipeline of potential acquisitions” The purchase from Swiss Re involves annuities and life-insurance products with risks tied to interest rates, RGA said in a separate statement.
 oil and gas producer, said the $15 billion purchase price includes cash and an agreement to contribute to the venture’s capital costs.
 It built its Duvernay holdings last year with the purchase of 67,900 acres from Alta Energy Luxembourg Sàrl.
 economy is strong enough for them to end quantitative easing, its bond-purchase program.
 In ending its bond-purchase program, the Fed said in an Oct.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- A unit of Bayer AG sold $7 billion of notes in the company’s largest dollar-denominated bond issue to help fund the purchase of Merck & Co’s consumer-care business.
 With the purchase, Bayer will gain rights to over-the-counter medicines such as the allergy drug Claritin, which generated $471 million of revenue in 2013, Bloomberg data show.
 To help fund the purchase, Bayer obtained a $122 billion bridge facility and $2 billion term loan in June.
 said it will borrow $16 billion to finance its purchase of Covidien Plc instead of using cash it keeps overseas, and Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 The proportion of cash flow used for repurchases has almost doubled over the last decade while it’s slipped for capital investments, according to Jonathan Glionna, head of US.
 Buybacks have helped fuel one of the strongest rallies of the past 50 years as stocks with the most repurchases gained more than 300 percent since March 2009.
 At the same time, he said, “If management can’t unearth future opportunities for growth, as a shareholder, I lose confidence” Earnings Barrier S&P 500 companies will spend $565 billion on repurchases this year and raise dividends by 12 percent to $349 billion, based on estimates by Howard Silverblatt, an index analyst at S&P.
 That compares with total buybacks and dividends of about $235 billion, assuming repurchases estimated by Silverblatt are evenly divided between the third and fourth quarters.
 ‘C Suite’ Stock repurchases worth almost $2 trillion have helped buoy the bull market since March 2009.
 The Memphis, Tennessee-based shipping company authorized a repurchase program of as many as 15 million shares last month while keeping its capital spending for the fiscal year at $42 billion.
 The carrier’s international unit will probably earn closer to half of its sales from local purchases and half from overseas as the Australian dollar weakens, Chief Financial Officer Gareth Evans said at a conference in Sydney yesterday.
 Fund Outflows The Bloomberg Dollar Spot Index, which tracks the greenback against 10 major currencies, rose to the highest level since 2010 after the Fed decided to end its asset-purchase program and Japan unexpectedly added monetary stimulus.
 in 2012 and he also purchased smaller companies in areas such as battery materials and biological crop-care.
 Almost six years after the purchase of Ciba, a deal that made BASF the biggest supplier of paper chemicals, the German company is now dissolving the unit with operations carved up and partly sold.
 Ingredion expects to fund the purchase with available cash and credit facilities, and the transaction may close this year.
 9 it would miss its earning forecast after phone carriers delayed equipment purchases.
 The equity benchmark dropped 18 percent in October, the most since June 2013, amid concern the European Central Bank’s asset purchases won’t be enough to revive the region’s economy.
 With the Federal Reserve ending purchases this month, investors are turning to Europe and Japan for sustained support.
 It puts Valeant at an advantage, unless Allergan breaks up those talks, finds another target or announces share repurchases or a dividend.
 -- after it completes its purchase of Shire Plc -- would be another possible tax-inversion candidate for Pfizer, according to Ken Cacciatore, a New York-based analyst at Cowen Group Inc.
 sales of existing homes, which account for about 90 percent of the domestic market, probably rose in September while purchases of new homes fell from a six-year high, data in the coming week may show.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 “I have been forced to resign and I will in due course be bringing a claim of unfair dismissal on the grounds that I have been constructively dismissed” Hosken suspended the chairman and co-founder for the purchase of shares in Ellies Holdings Ltd, which the company said was unauthorized.
 Hosken acted within the law when it suspended Golding last week and initiated an inquiry into the purchase of shares in television-equipment maker Ellies, Judge Anton Steenkamp said in the Labour court in Cape Town today.
 iPhone Issues That drop was part of a two-day, 46 percent retreat that came as purchasers of iPhone 6 Plus complained the device was bending.
 With renewable-energy executives gathering in Las Vegas for the Solar Power International conference that begins today, some will be shopping their companies around and others will be evaluating potential purchases, said Michael Horwitz, who leads energy technology investment banking at Robert W.
 power producer, purchased three solar companies this year, most recently a deal this month for the online marketer Pure Energies Inc.
 The deal gives the San Mateo, California-based company a dedicated supply of gear, and follows its 2013 purchase of Zep Solar Inc, which produces racking equipment that reduces installation and labor costs.
 In February it purchased the residential installation and racking-system units of Mainstream Energy Corp.
 With Huangpu Wenchong building military vessels, the purchase will also “deepen reform of military enterprises,” the company said.
 Guangzhou Shipyard plans to use the money to pay for the Huangpu Wenchong purchase and expand the target’s marine-engineering equipment manufacturing facilities.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Indonesia’s tax chief is pushing for access to personal bank accounts and wants to track car and home purchases in his fight to catch evaders and boost revenue.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Lenovo Group Ltd, the world’s largest maker of personal computers, can close its $291 billion purchase of Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility unit this year, Chief Strategy Officer Zhou Qingtong said.
 “We are confident that we can close the deal by the end of the year” Lenovo this month completed the $21 billion purchase of International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit, even as the Motorola Mobility purchase remains pending.
 The clearance of the IBM purchase came amid heightened tension between the US.
 Chief Executive Officer Yang Yuanqing said in August that the company was dealing with multiple government agencies to close the two purchases.
 The purchase price wasn’t disclosed.
 In September, the company agreed to be purchased by Norwegian for $3 billion.
 District Judge Charles Breyer in San Francisco, who earlier held up approval of the settlement over how much lawyers would be paid, in September told company attorneys he was concerned the deal would rob investors of the right to sue management over matters unrelated to the purchase.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- DirecTV reached a $12 billion agreement to continue airing National Football League games on Sundays, removing a potential obstacle to the company’s purchase by AT&T Inc.
 German landlords are taking advantage of low interest rates and favorable stock market conditions to raise money for apartment purchases.
 Under the deal, Haitong puts up HK$148 billion of the purchase price and HK$620 million comes from a Hong Kong company called Huge Group Holdings Ltd.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Scientific Games Corp, the slot-machine maker whose banks were unable to syndicate initial funding for its purchase of Bally Technologies Inc, has found $30 million of annual savings that may help woo investors to a $29 billion junk-bond sale for more permanent financing.
 The company also said it would have a similar increase from its $15 billion purchase of WMS Industries Inc.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 labor market and a pickup inpurchases ahead of the holiday-shopping season.
 Visa may seek third-party financing or sell debt to help pay for the purchase, the Foster City, California-based firm said today in its annual regulatory filing.
 As part of its investigation, the government is also examining a practice known as parking, where traders seek to skirt capital regulations or internal trading rules by selling bonds to accomplices with an understanding that they’ll repurchase them later, one of the people said.
 He’s used acquisitions, including the $13 billionpurchase of Chemlogics of the US, to expand in high-performance chemicals and additives for the oil-and-gasindustry, including shale operations.
 The engineering graduate andcurrent president of the European Chemical Industry Council, whowas CEO of Rhodia when it was purchased by Solvay in 2011 for $6billion, said at the time of his appointment that cyclicalbusinesses would be improved and run for cash before anystrategic decisions are taken.
 The purchase of the Seattle properties gives Ivanhoe about 13 percent of the class A, or top-quality, office space in that city’s central business district, according to today’s statement.
 The central bank is using the new index to guide its purchases of exchange traded funds.
 The purchase of the third-largest mobile-phone operator in Mexico places the Dallas-based company in direct competition with America Movil.
 With its purchase of Iusacell, AT&T is taking advantage of new Mexican telecommunications laws that are promoting competition in the wireless market.
 To clear regulatory hurdles for the purchase of DirecTV, AT&T sold an 8 percent stake in America Movil.
 The New York-based firm said it had purchased stakes in storage computer-maker EMC Corp.
 Local shortages have driven many of the producers to more expensive purchases from overseas, raising cost for them and proving a drain on India’s foreign exchange reserves.
 Coal India, under pressure to double its output in four years to meet rising demand, has failed to meet production targets as slow approvals, lack of transport infrastructure and difficulties in land purchases impede the opening of new mines.
 The ECB will start buying asset-backed securities this week as part of stimulus plans that already include covered-bond purchases, long-term loans to banks and record-low interest rates.
(Corrects numbers of planes purchased in 1st paragraph) Nov.
 The purchases “will constitute a meaningful platform to further develop the aircraft ownership and leasing business for the group” Cheung Kong is mainly a real estate investor and developer.
 in two purchases, of $2133 million and $2787 million, and will pay $5842 million to Jackson Square Aviation LLC for 14 planes, according to the filing.
 The planes that will be purchased are currently leased to airlines for an average six to nine years.
 Today’s consumption data showed that after adjusting for inflation, which generates the figures used to calculate gross domestic product, purchases rose 02 percent in October after being little changed the month before.
 Bernanke unexpectedly signaled the Fed could soon start reducing bond purchases.
 Fed officials last week ended monthly asset purchases that bloated the central bank’s balance sheet to more than $4 trillion.
 Bank of France Governor Christian Noyer said a “paramount risk of very low interest rates is to entertain the illusion that governments can continue to borrow rather than make difficult and yet necessary choices and indefinitely put off the implementation of structural reforms” Even so, the ECB has told its staff to prepare further measures that can be used if needed to spur inflation, and the Bank of Japan is boosting its own bond-purchase program.
 He’s used acquisitions, including the $13 billion purchase of Chemlogics of the US, to expand in high-performance chemicals and additives for the oil-and-gas industry, including shale operations.
 The engineering graduate and current president of the European Chemical Industry Council, who was CEO of Rhodia when it was purchased by Solvay in 2011 for $6 billion, said at the time of his appointment that cyclical businesses would be improved and run for cash before any strategic decisions are taken.
 The company agreed to purchase 50 Fremont St.
 The 50 Fremont tower is Salesforce’s biggest real estate purchase and its second major property acquisition after land in the Mission Bay area of San Francisco, Norton said.
 Since April, the company has sold or agreed to sell the 14 acres (57 hectares) that it purchased in 2010 for $278 million with intentions to build a new headquarters, according to filings.
 There’s no need for the Fed to consider another round of bond purchases under quantitative easing as slowing growth in Europe, China isn’t affecting the US.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said officials would expand debt purchases if the inflation outlook weakens.
 The Fed concluded a program of bond purchases last month, citing economic improvement.
 Draghi said at the European Banking Congress in Frankfurt that policy makers “will do what we must to raise inflation and inflation expectations as fast as possible, as our price stability mandate requires of us” Euro-region bond yields dropped amid speculation the ECB will add purchases of sovereign debt to its stimulus program.
 The banks failed to force WaMu to repurchase defective loans as required, the investors said.
 The real-estate investment trust agreed to take the first 1 percent of losses on $11 billion of loans that will be purchased by Fannie Mae this quarter, according to a quarterly report for shareholders posted today on the Mill Valley, California-based company’s website.
 The REIT expanded in December past jumbo mortgages and into the market for so-called conforming loans small enough to be purchased by Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac.
 Bidder Participation Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 447 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 454 percent for the past 10 sales.
 central bank concluded a bond-purchase program.
 Japan’s biggest brokerage has been rebuilding its international operations after cutting them back following its purchase of parts of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 Levy responded by saying the Publicis staff was committed to the merger, while Omnicom probably “didn’t believe very much in the merger” This week, Publicis announced the Sapient purchase, saying it will help the company reach a target of generating half of its sales from digital offerings three years ahead of schedule.
 Latest, Largest The Sapient purchase is the latest -- and largest -- in a series of acquisitions Publicis has made as agencies look to capitalize on the growth in digital ads amid falling demand for traditional print and television campaigns.
 It then purchased Rosetta Marketing Group LLC for about $575 million in 2011.
 It also licenses technology, giving it more flexibility than an outright purchase, said Tullo of Albert Fried.
 Buybacks, Dividends As Publicis pursues takeovers, Omnicom has resumed using much of its cash on share repurchases and dividends.
 That transaction and its purchases of Saatchi & Saatchi and Digitas rank as the three most expensive acquisitions larger than $1 billion made by an advertising company, based on deals for which the prices were made public.
 have become accustomed to minimal service and snack food for purchase, Qantas’s global network requires the airline to feed passengers multiple meals on day-long journeys on planes as big as the A380 double-decker.
 “Under the circumstances, the independent members of the ARCP board of directors and ARCP had no choice but to file this litigation in order to preserve and protect the interests of ARCP’s shareholders under the purchase agreement,” the New York-based company said today in a statement.
 RCS’s “deliberate, precipitous and improper actions in attempting to improperly terminate the purchase agreement appear to be the product of a concerted effort by RCAP to distance itself from ARCP in order to prop up its own flagging stock price,” according to the lawsuit.
 Schorsch owns a significant interest), and not with the breach of any representation or warranty made by ARCP in the purchase agreement concerning the acquired companies,” American Realty said in its complaint.
 “Settling this matter, however, is in the company’s best interest as it allows us to put it behind us and focus on the future growth of the company” Former distributor Dana Bostick sued in April 2013, claiming he couldn’t sell his products because distributors who are higher up the chain receive a bigger discount than he did on the products they purchased from Herbalife.
 As the Judiciary panel’s top Republican, Grassley used hisstaff to investigate the Justice Department’s Operation Fast andFurious, which allowed illegal gun purchases in the US.
 The browsing is set to spur more mobile purchases, with 28 percent of all online spending on Thanksgiving Day coming from smartphones and tablets, up from 26 percent last year, according to IBM’s forecast.
 At EBay’s PayPal electronic payments unit, Thanksgiving Day purchases on PayPal’s mobile app increased 90 percent in 2013 compared to the previous year and the company projects the trend will continue, said Anuj Nayar, PayPal’s senior director of global initiatives in San Jose, California.
 The top cities for PayPal mobile purchases on Thanksgiving last year were Houston, Chicago, Los Angeles, New York and Miami, areas where traffic and weather prevented people from going to stores, he said.
 The Resolution purchase comes from Fund II, which raised $400 million in August.
 The link, which permits a net 235 billion yuan of daily cross-border purchases, will expand access to the Shanghai exchange from a limited number of institutions to anyone with a Hong Kong brokerage account.
 The figures now include spending on research and development, employee stock options and purchases of weapon systems, according to the agency.
 Two Suits One of the actions is on behalf of drivers of vehiclespurchased after the bankruptcy that were recalled for variousdefects.
 The other action filed last month is for recalled vehiclesthat were purchased before GM emerged from bankruptcy.
 Expected to close in the first quarter, the purchase will consist of a $19 billion upfront payment and $510 million dependent on First Wind completing backlog projects.
 The purchase of First Wind is expected to be immediately accretive to TerraForm Power, delivering $725 million in unlevered cash available for distribution next year, according to the statement.
 The rates of actual purchases also declined from Thursday, perhaps because consumers were more selective or finding hot items out of stock, Morrisville, North Carolina-based ChannelAdvisor said.
 Hearts on Fire Chow Tai Fook is very cautious with mergers and acquisitions, and is only exploring the mine purchases, Cheng said.
 One-quarter of the purchase will be funded with stock, and the rest will be paid for using cash and debt, it said.
 The completed purchases “will constitute a meaningfulplatform to further develop the aircraft ownership and leasingbusiness for the group” Cheung Kong is mainly a real estate investor and developerIts unit Hutchison Whampoa Ltd.
 in two purchases, of $2133 million and$2787 million, and will pay $5842 million to Jackson SquareAviation LLC for 14 planes, according to the filing.
 Apache will use the proceeds to fund its 2014 purchases of drilling leases, Farris said in the statement.
 Google purchased Nest Labs, a maker of connected thermostats and smoke detectors, earlier this year for $32 billion.
 The SEC has been scrutinizing the stock purchases,disclosures and acquisition offers since at least May, courtfilings show.
 Merrill Lynch & Co’s 2005 purchase of Advest spelled the end of the Lebenthal brand name, which the Lebenthals, father and daughter, revived the following year with Lebenthal Holdings LLC, a wealth-management firm, and in 2007 with Lebenthal Asset Management in 2007.
 Investors are looking for more evidence the world’s largest economy can sustain growth after the Federal Reserve ended bond purchases last month.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- In five years, Actavis Plc has reshaped itself from just another generics drugmaker to one of the top 10 pharmaceutical companies in the world by market value, capping off a blistering pace of dealmaking with the $66 billion agreement to purchase Allergan Inc.
 purchased Actavis Group hf and changed its name in 2013, then buying Warner Chilcott Plc to move its tax address overseas and reduce its tax rate.
 Shares got a boost at the end of October when the Bank of Japan unexpectedly decided to expand asset purchases to spark inflation.
 The project has a 20-year power-purchase and interconnection agreement with a buyer that Dominion didn’t identify.
 announced a $346 billion purchase of Baker Hughes Inc.
 Emirates canceled its order for the aircraft this year, though Clark has said he’ll revisit a possible purchase once the model has proven its efficiency in service.
 According to Clark, Emirates will have “holes appearing in our fleet planning” after 2018, requiring a follow-up purchase of wide-body airliners, though Airbus has said the A350 is sold out until the end of the decade.
 The banks underwriting Scientific Games’s $51 billion purchase of Bally committed to provide financing for the deal.
 The Shanghai-Hong Kong exchange link, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases, will begin on Nov.
 Seven involved advising energy companies, a practice largely built around the 2005 purchase of Houston-based oil and gas boutique Randall & Dewey Inc.
 More than half of the economists surveyed by Bloomberg News predict the ECB will eventually embark on large-scale sovereign-bond purchases.
 The yield on Japan’s benchmark 10-year government bond dropped 1 1/2 basis points to 042 percent today, the least since April 5, 2013, when it briefly plunged to a record 0315 percent, a day after the BOJ launched its unprecedented debt purchases.
 I also think that the euro weakness pushes optimism higher, especially in Germany where exports are very important” The Stoxx 600 rose 05 percent yesterday as Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank’s expanded purchase program could include government bonds.
 Federal Reserve ends a record bond-purchase program, according to Nomura’s Montalto.
 to look at protecting funding such as repurchase agreements with a system similar to one announced last month that will delay termination of derivatives contracts during a US.
 China is counting on the success of the bourse link, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) in daily cross-border purchases, to help liberalize its financial system and increase use of the yuan.
 “We will respond to the claims in detail through legal filings to be made at the appropriate time” According to the complaint, Europe’s third-largest oil producer took advantage of its role as an exclusive supplier of natural gas to the program and passed along increased prices from the point of purchase to the sale to retail customers.
 Williams-Sonoma has benefited from consumers making big-ticket purchases and investing more in their homes.
 Songbird’s suitors may have to raise their bid to more than 350 pence to succeed with a purchase that would be the biggest UK.
 A purchase would offer “exposure to arguably the best large-scale developer in London as well as a unique part of London which is just starting to see rental growth,” Oriel Securities Ltd.
 GE doesn’t plan further big purchases, he said.
 Major Influence A focus of Levin’s examination is Goldman Sachs’s purchase of Metro, with the Senate report saying the acquisition allowed the bank to exert a major influence on aluminum trading.
 “There’s no Monday-morning quarterbacking” The South Texas Syndicate Trust has 275 beneficiaries, who either inherited or purchased some of the 30,000 shares of mineral rights underlying range land accumulated by six Minnesota businessmen who came to Texas in 1906.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Woolworths Holdings Ltd’s annual general meeting was disrupted by shareholders demonstrating against the South African retailer’s purchase of pretzels, figs and pomegranates from Israel.
 He’s a real quick study, and he’s made billions of dollars for his investors” The purchase by a Werner-led group of the Times Square tower, the headquarters for accounting firm Ernst & Young LLP, was the biggest of a single building in New York since Google Inc.
 Werner made no public announcement of either purchase.
 7, while Blackstone Group LP, the biggest private-equity real estate investor, ranks 10th, according to Real Capital data showing only completed purchases.
 The purchase, from Blackstone, would bring Ivanhoe’s acquisitions to $24 billion, compared with $237 billion for Werner.
 He would still outrank China’s Anbang Insurance Group with its pending $195 billion purchase of the Waldorf Astoria hotel.
 Schron led a group including Werner that earlier this month completed a $285 million purchase of the land beneath Carnegie House, a 324-unit co-operative apartment tower at West 57th Street and Sixth Avenue in Midtown.
 If tenant demand in the market slackens, Werner’s purchases of properties such as 5 Times Square and the Socony-Mobil Building may prove risky, according to Barbara Denham, a New York economist.
 The firm similarly has been selling some assets from another major investment, Equity Office, purchased in 2007.
 In Europe, Draghi strengthened his pledge of stimulus for the euro area by saying the ECB can’t hold back in its fight to revive the economy and that it may broaden its asset-purchase program as part of efforts to accelerate inflation.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- As the Bank of Japan’s decision to triple purchases of exchange-traded funds brought smiles to investors in Tokyo, nobody was happier than clothing billionaire Tadashi Yanai.
 will gain the most from the central bank’s 3 trillion yen ($258 billion) in annual ETF purchases.
 31, unveiling plans to expand the monetary base by 80 trillion yen a year and make annual purchases of 3 trillion yen of ETFs and 90 billion yen of real estate investment trusts.
 Twitter said in a regulatory filing today that a September convertible bond offering it held “could deter or prevent a third party from acquiring us even when the acquisition may be favorable to our stockholders or holders of the notes” Debtholders can require the company to repurchase their holdings if something goes wrong, and Twitter can’t agree to be sold unless the acquirer assumes the liability, the company said.
 European Central Bank policy makers are watching for signs that additional stimulus may be needed and have expert committees examining further measures to help boost near-stagnant growth to add to long-term loans and asset-purchase programs.
 and the purchase of a nontraded REIT started by AR Capital.
 The purchase also lets Mailru better compete with Google Inc.
 Even before a boost to its monetary easing last month, the BOJ’s purchases of government bonds and other securities had made it Japan’s biggest bank by assets.
 Cliffs is also offering to repurchase portions of its $500million of 395 percent notes maturing in 2018, the $400 millionof 59 percent securities due 2020, the $500 million of 48percent bonds due in 2020 and the $700 million of 4875 percentnotes maturing in 2021.
 For Rosneft, the timing of sanctions couldn’t have been worse because it has to repay almost $30 billion in loans by the end of the next year, debt racked up in the 2013 purchase of competitor TNK-BP.
 Penney has mostly arrested its slide since Mike Ullman returned as chief executive officer in April 2013, retailers of all stripes are struggling to boost sales as consumers limit discretionary purchases.
 Penney also cleared out slow-moving merchandise purchased under Johnson that failed to attract the younger, wealthier shoppers he’d sought.
 Guangzhou Shipyard said it would also purchase shipbuilding assets from Yangzhou Kejin Shipyard Co.
 The purchase of Huangpu Wenchong will help “deepen reform of military enterprises” since the company builds military vessels, Guangzhou Shipyard said.
 Regulators said yesterday the program allowing a net 235 billion yuan of daily cross-border purchases will begin on Nov.
 has seen purchase new home-loan securities without government backing since the financial crisis aren’t enough to foster a recovery in the market because they haven’t included many of the biggest bond buyers, according to Marc Simpson, an executive director at the bank.
 Half of those surveyed forecast the same result for Hong Kong purchases.
 Mainland traders with at least 500,000 yuan in their accounts are eligible to purchase Hong Kong shares through the connect.
 Most of Conn’s purchases are funded through the cards, Magee said.
 have purchased retailers in the past.
 Morris, who has a hold rating on the stock, said Discovery’s share repurchase of $298 million also trailed his forecast of $400 million.
 Clarkson, which is based in London, said in a regulatory statement that it’s in talks to purchase all of the Oslo-based firm’s issued share capital.
 Baker Hughes would be Halliburton’s largest acquisition, topping a 1998 purchase of Dresser Industries Inc.
 Foreign investors purchased 2 trillion yen ($173 billion) of Japanese equities in the two weeks ended Nov.
 31, unveiling plans to expand the monetary base by 80 trillion yen a year and make annual purchases of 3 trillion yen of ETFs and 90 billion yen of real estate investment trusts.
 * Oracle Corp’s $10 billion offering in June, which raised cash to help finance the purchase of Micros Systems Inc.
 6 to help finance the purchase of the part of Alliance Boots it didn’t already own.
 policy makers ended the Fed’s third round of bond purchases under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy on Oct.
 Combined with the Vivendi shares Activision purchased, Kotick and Kelly now control the US.
 It purchased a one-third stake in the Signal Peak coal mine in Montana for $400 million in 2012, the same year it bought a refinery in Ingolstadt, Germany, for $150 million, and a refinery in Antwerp, Belgium for $79 million.
 Steinhoff will purchase a 923 percent stake in closely held Pepkor, South Africa’s biggest retailer, the Johannesburg-based company said today.
 “A vision of being in all facets of retailing and have a company that can tackle the world” The transaction, the largest purchase of a South African company in more than a decade, sent Steinhoff shares up as much as 61 percent in Johannesburg.
 In addition to African chains Pep and Ackermans, the purchase gives Steinhoff the largest non-food retailer in Poland and Australia’s Best & Less.
 The purchase multiples are “similar” to Shoprite Holdings Ltd, South Africa’s largest retailer, he said.
 The program to open up China’s $42 trillion stock market will allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases.
 Carrefour hasn’t had to cancel contracts with foreign producers as it doesn’t have fixed purchase accords, Vepierre said.
 The broader index fell as much as 98 percent from a September record on increasing signs that European growth was slowing at the same time the Federal Reserve was ending its monthly bond purchases.
 The company announced a $1-billion share repurchase plan.
 “Although Brookfield would have been a good fit for Atlantic City, we will continue to attract new investors” Revel had a contract to purchase power and other utility services for $3 million a month from ACR Energy Partners LLC, a joint venture between South Jersey Industries Inc.
 It fell 18 percent for the month amid concern the European Central Bank’s asset purchases won’t be enough to revive the region’s economy.
 A purchase of Metroweb, which operates a network in the Milan area, would allow an acquirer to strengthen its broadband service.
 Since then, he installed a monitor at the firm, blocked its purchase of some mortgage servicing rights, and sent five public letters to the company, raising issues such as possible conflicts of interest.
 Three days later, Ocwen announced it was no longer pursuing the purchase of $39 billion in servicing rights from Wells Fargo & Co.
 The UBS real estate index comprises six sub-indicators tracking the relationships between purchase and rental prices, house prices and household income, house prices and inflation, mortgage debt and income, construction and GDP, and the proportion of credit applications by UBS clients for residential property not intended for owner occupancy.
 The company said in the prospectus that its purchase of redIT last month positions KIO as “the preeminent infrastructure IT services provider in Mexico” At 772 percent, KIO’s notes now yield 022 percentage point less than the average for 369 junk-rated corporate bonds tracked by Bloomberg.
 East European securities are benefiting from speculation over bond purchases by the European Central Bank, which could create additional flows into higher-yielding assets on the currency bloc’s periphery.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan has kept the repurchase rate at 8 percent after raising it three times between September 2013 and January.
 A purchase of Metroweb, which operates a network in the Milan area, would allow an acquirer to strengthen its broadband service.
 Now Disney is broadening the service to Android-based smartphones and tablets, so people can watch the movies on those gadgets even if the films were purchased through Apple’s iTunes store, said Jamie Voris, chief technology officer of Walt Disney Studios.
 Revenue from digital options, including electronic purchases, video on demand and subscription streaming services, rose 24 percent to $65 billion.
 Users of the Disney Movies Anywhere service get points for purchases and access to special offers and content.
 The initiative “must be rejected” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which purchase about two-thirds of new home loans and package them into bonds, currently allow down payments as low as 5 percent.
 Borrowers are required to obtain insurance when they put less than 20 percent of the purchase price down on Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac loans.
 The purchase would add to its holdings in the Bohai Bay and give it a stake in another block scheduled to start producing at the end of the month, Hong Kong-based Brightoil said in a release today.
 Brightoil said if its bid is sucessful it expects to enter into a definitive purchase agreement next month.
 Instead, it looks for companies that purchase chemicals for blending to customer specifications.
 “New GM purchased old GM’s core assets in good faith” GM’s filing yesterday is the first step toward a 2015 decision by Gerber on whether his earlier rulings on immunity still apply after an investigator found that GM engineers and lawyers knew about the defect for at least a decade.
 One group suit is over cars made before the bankruptcy, and the other is for automobiles purchased afterward.
 A guarantee is a pre-sale agreement to purchase the art at a fixed price.
 The benchmark index gained 29 percent last week as Mario Draghi said the ECB needs to accelerate inflation and may broaden its asset-purchase program, while China cut key interest rates for the first time since 2012.
 “This is a good sign for their earnings, which suffered in the low interest rate environment” Spanish Yield As stocks advanced, the yield on 10-year Spanish government bonds fell below 2 percent for the first time, showing that investors are confident the ECB will expand its asset purchases to euro-area sovereign debt as soon as next week.
 The buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to purchase goods and services, rose to 328 from 319 the prior period.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 81 percent, compared with an average 87 percent at the past 10 sales.
 It ended a bond-purchase stimulus program at the October meeting, citing improvements in the labor market.
 Policy makers reiterated last month they’ll keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after concluding the bond purchases.
 “If we continue to get solid data, and warnings that inflation could be picking up, particularly with respect to labor costs, we’ll probably see the markets get ahead of the Fed” Treasuries pared gains after data showed purchases of previously owned US.
 Prudential said it repurchased $250 million of stock in the quarter at an average price of $8941 a share.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said last week policy makers must drive euro-area inflation higher quickly and will broaden their asset purchases if needed.
 Johnson’s History Johnson, 56, joined Foot Locker in 1997, when it purchased sports-equipment seller Eastbay.
 The BOJ raised its target for annual purchases of Japanese government bonds to 80 trillion yen ($706 billion) Oct.
 Last month, he agreed to purchase Van Tuyl Group, a network of car dealerships for an undisclosed price.
 Draghi said the ECB needs to accelerate inflation quickly and may broaden its asset-purchase program.
 That division includes Banco Azteca, which gives loans to Elektra customers that allows them to take as long as two years to pay off purchases of flat-screen TVs and motorcycles.
 Excluding the $2 billion purchase, sales increased 12 percent for the 20 weeks from a year earlier, the company said.
 Aggregate Index, typically purchase longer-term Treasuries as a month ends to align the interest-rate sensitivity of their holdings with the indexes.
 Fed, ECB The Fed, which ended a bond-purchase program last month, is considering when to raise interest rates next year from virtually zero.
 Rate-Cut Bets Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan has held the benchmark repurchase rate at 8 percent after raising it three times from September 2013 through January to curb living costs.
 “I don’t think we are going to invest much more in Europe” Enel is closing the sale of a 17 percent stake in Spain’s Endesa SA and earlier this year boosted its ownership of Enersis through the purchase of a 606 percent stake in the Santiago-listed company held by Endesa.
 The Toronto-based private-equity firm has only made one significant acquisition so far in 2014 with the July purchase of York Risk Services Group Inc, a provider of risk management, insurance claims and managed-car services, for $133 billion.
 The central bank more than doubled its benchmark one-week repurchase rate in January, as it sought to defend the tumbling lira.
 “There’s no Monday-morning quarterbacking” The South Texas Syndicate Trust has 275 beneficiaries, who either inherited or purchased some of the 30,000 shares of mineral rights underlying range land accumulated by six Minnesota businessmen who came to Texas in 1906.
 Money wasn’t withheld on the KC-46 tanker, a third aircraft produced by the unit, because its development contract was signed before the adoption of a Pentagon regulation requiring more rigorous enforcement of contractor compliance with systems to estimate costs for bids, purchase goods from subcontractors, manage government property and measure progress in meeting cost and schedule targets.
 In the past two years, Swedbank’s Latvian unit acquired Allied Irish Bank’s mortgage portfolio, bought retail, corporate and leasing operations from Latvia’s Mortgage and Land Bank and purchased parts of Italy’s UniCredit SpA’s Latvian lending portfolio.
 The lowest costs at the gas pump in four years may also help spur buying power and household purchases heading into the US.
 The bond rout that took place during two months last year - - prompted by concerns that the end of the Fed’s securities purchases would lead to a rapid rise in rates -- serves as a reminder of potential losses.
 The Fed is considering when to raise interest rates next year for the first time since 2006 after concluding a monthly bond-purchase program in October.
 That purchase is performing at the upper end of Solvay’s initial predictions, and there’s limited risk of lower oil prices curbing demand for its products, Clamadieu said.
 31 and that the company repurchased $34 billion of stock this year.
 The purchase makes Marchionne the fifth-largest shareholderin the auto manufacturer, according to data compiled byBloomberg.
 who purchased or leased one with defective Takata air bags, plus unspecified money damages and other relief.
 Nufcor Acquisition Goldman Sachs acquired uranium-trading company Nufcor International as part of a 2009 purchase of assets from Constellation Energy Group Inc.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said last week that policy makers must drive euro-area inflation higher quickly and will broaden their asset-purchase program if needed.
 Families have been waiting in line for up to five hours to see Santa and purchase “Frozen” products, including toys and dress-up items, said William Taubman, chief operating officer of Taubman Center.
 Shoppers at the mall’s luxury stores, including London Jewelers and Ralph Lauren, can direct 25 percent of their purchase amount to 70 different local charities during the week after Black Friday.
 Her purchases ranged from clothes and accessories to cosmetics and Pokemon figures.
 are studying a purchase of a stake in Oi’s African businesses, people familiar with the matter said last week.
 Should the current policy not be effective, the ECB will “broaden even more the channels” through which it intervenes, by adjusting the size, pace and composition of asset purchases, he said in Frankfurt.
 Rebel forces have been preparing for war in response to government arms purchase and mobilization, Machar said.
 “It is unlikely that increased asset purchases by the BOJ and the ECB will be able to provide a full offset to the end of Fed purchases,” says David Woo, head of global rates and currencies at Bank of America Merrill Lynch in New York.
 Finally, Japanese and German bond yields are already so close to zero that the effect of purchases by their central banks will be limited.
 The deal, the largest purchase of a South African company in more than a decade, will create a retailer with more than 6,000 stores across three continents.
 While the regulator is already expanding its range of asset purchases, it has yet to commit to broad-based bond buying, or quantitative easing.
 “We’ve weathered this growth scare correction and two other central banks in the world are ramping up purchases,” Andrew Wilkinson, the Greenwich, Connecticut-based chief market analyst at Interactive Brokers LLC, said in a phone interview.
 central bank said it would wind down its asset-purchase program that has helped triple American equity values since March 2009.
 The Texas lawyer said that several accidents occurred between the time the purchase order was made and the recalls were announced.
 The Chinese accounted for almost one in five foreign property purchases in Portugal during the first nine months, according to the Lisbon-based Portuguese Real Estate Professionals and Brokers Association.
 While wealthy Chinese have for years been picking up expensive real estate in markets including New York, London, Sydney and Vancouver, the new measures have encouraged individual investors and their families to purchase properties in markets such as Portugal, where there’s less competition for assets.
 Chinese bidders may be congratulating each other on their purchases for some time to come, unless Portugal’s economic recovery starts to pick up steam.
 31 unexpectedly raised its target for monetary-base expansion and extended the maturity of its debt purchases to defeat deflation, sending the yen lower.
 Payouts Preferred Dividends are preferable to buybacks for slow-growing, mature companies, so Western Union should scale back repurchases and instead raise its payout, said Susquehanna’s Stauff.
 The impact of buying sovereign debt would go “well beyond the direct effect on the yields of the purchased securities,” he said.
 The ECB’s Governing Council, on which the central-bank governors of the euro region’s 18 nations sit, isn’t united on either the need for further stimulus or the design of purchases.
 “Even less valid is the argument that sovereign-bond purchases, should these be deemed necessary, would ease the pressure on governments to do structural reforms,” Constancio said.
 “Why would transparency be less valuable to citizens in those places?” The company for example, wouldn’t have to disclose purchases of oil from countries like Angola, where Trafigura or related companies have joint ventures, Gilles said.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Government bonds across the euro region rose, sending yields from Austria to Spain to all-time lows, on speculation the European Central Bank will expand its asset-purchase program to include sovereign bonds.
 Chief Executive Officer Mingwang Lu announced the purchase of the collection, which he described as a rare set dating back to the Song Dynasty more than 1,000 years ago, as a good investment, saying it would “support our steel operations while the steel industry gains stronger fundamental balance” An investor who sued in the company in federal court in New York yesterday didn’t see it that way.
 The purchase was “all the more shocking because, in the years and months leading up to the announcement, CHOP had consistently and unambiguously,” told investors “its goals for growth included an expansion and diversification of its product lines, identification of overseas markets, and business combinations with competitors,” according to the complaint, referring to the company’s Nasdaq ticker.
 The announcement caused investors to lose confidence in the company and its share price to plunge after the purchase was disclosed, according to the suit.
 Cash Reserves Before to the purchase, the company in March touted significant cash reserves, including $2307 million in unrestricted cash, $186 million in certificates of deposit and $755 million in restricted cash, Pehlivanian said.
 After the company announced the purchase of the porcelain collection, without details, China Gerui’s share price dropped from $61 per share on Sept.
 Luring Foreigners Among the government’s curbs have been a cap on debt at 60 percent of a borrower’s income and higher stamp duties on home purchases.
 Homes larger than 2,000 square feet that cost between S$4 million and S$5 million have been hit the hardest by the stamp duties on purchases and sales, Han said.
 Homes purchased after 2006 and sold in the last 12 months lost between 5 percent and 21 percent of their value, Ng Wee Siang, a Singapore-based analyst at Maybank Kim Eng estimates.
 In October, Telecom Italia gave Martinez 30 months to complete the purchase of a 227 percent indirect stake in Telecom Argentina, a deal which has failed to win regulatory approval in about a year.
 The Bank of Japan set an inflation target of 2 percent and embarked on an open-ended campaign to expand the monetary base through asset purchases.
 “A consideration of the costs and benefits, and the opportunities and risks, of a broad purchase program of government bonds does not give a positive outcome,” Sabine Lautenschlaeger, one of the ECB’s six-member Executive Board, said yesterday in Berlin.
 As long as this is the case, the ECB’s purchase of government securities is inevitably linked to a serious incentive problem” The comments suggest she and Bundesbank President Jens Weidmann are united against ECB President Mario Draghi’s push toward expanding stimulus to measures that might require purchases of sovereign bonds.
 Bond Purchases With ECB interest-rate cuts exhausted and purchases of covered bonds and asset-backed securities already under way, Draghi explicitly cited buying government bonds as a possible measure when he spoke to European lawmakers on Nov.
 21 that inflation has to be returned to target “as fast as possible,” and named government-bond purchases as a possibility.
 26 that debt purchases could be conducted on the basis of the ECB’s capital key, roughly proportional to the size of each member state’s economy.
 Lautenschlaeger has previously already expressed skepticism over the ABS purchase program.
 “The rally has run its course for now as we face the first set of auctions on the table in a while that haven’t coincided with Fed purchases,” said Larry Milstein, managing director in New York of government-debt trading at RW.
 “We wish Justin the best in his future endeavors” FirstKey Lending, formed last year to finance investors’ purchases of rental homes, is expanding into the commercial-mortgage business as sales of bonds linked to the debt are at the highest level since 2007, the real estate industry’s prior peak.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Italy’s government bonds advanced for a second week, pushing the 10-year yield down to a record, amid speculation the European Central Bank will broaden its asset purchases to buy sovereign debt.
 Austrian and French 10-year rates also dropped to records as ECB President Mario Draghi said yesterday that policy makers would be willing to widen the scope of the central bank’s purchases should the inflation outlook for the region diminish.
 “If, on its current trajectory, our policy is not effective enough to achieve this, or further risks to the inflation outlook materialize, we would step up the pressure and broaden even more the channels through which we intervene, by altering accordingly the size, pace and composition of our purchases,” Draghi said yesterday at the European Banking Congress in Frankfurt.
 The Minneapolis-based company’s purchases helped boost sales almost fivefold to $47 billion while profit rose more than ninefold to $192 million during his tenure, according to a 1988 New York Times article.
 Only after a Delaware court gave its consent to the planned purchase did Pillsbury’s board begin to negotiate, according to a December 1988 article in the Times.
 While there’s general interest expressed in battery-powered vehicles, “people are delaying their purchases” Continental, Europe’s second-biggest maker of car components, wrote down 779 million euros ($974 million) of the venture’s value in the third quarter after discussions on the financial viability of the partnership, which also faces competition from consumer-electronics manufacturers.
 The company has undertaken eight deals worth $36 billionsince September 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg,including the purchase of Seara Brasil from Marfrig Global FoodsSA and poultry assets from Tyson Foods Inc.
 While investors placed purchase orders for the maximum 13 billion yuan ($21 billion) of Shanghai shares on Nov.
 Earlier this year, West Face led a group of investors to purchase the outstanding stake in Wind Mobile, the brand name of Globalive Wireless Management Corp, that was held by Amsterdam-based VimpelCom Ltd.
 gross domestic product data eased concern over the end of the Fed’s asset purchases.
 European Stimulus The scope for buying eligible asset-backed securities as part of euro-area stimulus “is rather large and purchases of senior tranches alone should make it possible to generate significant volumes,” ECB President Mario Draghi said in letters to European lawmakers.
 The purchase, expected to close this quarter, will boost Waypoint’s fleet to 80 helicopters valued at more than $1 billion, making the company the “clear No.
 Within four months of coming into power, Sata reversed the foreign investment deals struck by the previous government, including Johannesburg-based FirstRand Ltd’s purchase of a local lender.
 Should the current policy not be effective, the ECB will “broaden even more the channels” through which it intervenes, by adjusting the size, pace and composition of asset purchases, he said in Frankfurt.
 The four companies used inside information about client purchases and sale orders to profit from price movements for the metals, used in products ranging from jewelry to cars, according to a complaint filed Nov.
 Modern Settings LLC, a jeweler that buys precious metals and derivatives set on their prices, claims the companies “were privy to and shared confidential, non-public information about client purchase and sale orders that allowed them to glean information about the direction” of prices.
 expanded 35 percent in the third quarter, capping its strongest six months in more than a decade, as gains in government spending and a shrinking trade deficit made up for a slowdown in household purchases.
 The program permits international money managers to purchase a net 13 billion yuan ($21 billion) a day of Chinese shares, while also providing a route for mainland investors to buy Hong Kong equities.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Best Buy Co’s website was shut down for about an hour today, one of the biggest shopping days of the year, leaving some customers unable to make purchases.
 That’s the most since 2005, when Telefonica’s purchase of O2 was the industry’s top announced transaction of the year.
 Candlebrook joined with Lubert-Adler Partners on the purchase of buildings with about 3,400 beds near colleges in Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky and Virginia.
 They will analyze ECB President Mario Draghi’s speech for hints of further stimulus, including the purchase of government bonds.
 treasuries since the Fed dropped interest rates to almost zero and began three rounds of debt purchases in late 2008.
 Hancock in July purchased a 50 percent share in two cattle ranches in Western Australia’s West Kimberley, while Andrew Forrest, the billionaire founder of iron ore producer Fortescue Metals in May acquired Harvey Beef, Western Australia’s only licensed beef exporter to China.
 Securian previously struck deals to expand with the purchase of operations that didn’t fit with the main businesses at some of the world’s largest financial firms.
 The benchmark money-market rate fell the most since September after the government cut the yield offered on 14-day repurchase agreements for the third time in as many months.
 ECB Measures Even so, the European Central Bank has told its staff to prepare further measures that can be used if needed to spur inflation, and the BOJ is boosting its own bond-purchase program.
 The four companies used inside information about client purchases and sale orders to profit from price movements for the metals used in products ranging from jewelry to cars, according to a complaint filed yesterday in Manhattan federal court.
 Modern Settings LLC, a jeweler that buys precious metals and derivatives set on their prices, claims the companies “were privy to and shared confidential, non-public information about client purchase and sale orders that allowed them to glean information about the direction” of prices.
 Barratt approved the purchase of more than 310 million pounds of land for 5,146 homes during the period, down from 8,150 plots a year earlier.
 The trading link between the Hong Kong and Shanghai bourses, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of cross-border daily purchases, will start on Nov.
 Bookings, or the total value of services purchased by Priceline customers, will probably increase by 8 percent to 15 percent in the fourth quarter, slowing from a 28 percent increase in the third quarter, the company said.
 Priceline has been spurring global growth by pushing into new regions and markets, helped by the acquisition of a minority stake in Ctripcom International Ltd, China’s largest travel website, and the purchase of restaurant-reservation service OpenTable Inc.
 Additional jobs have given Americans confidence to take out loans on cars, and the cheapest gasoline in almost four years means one less thing to worry about when mulling a big-ticket purchase.
 “We may have another good year, but it’s hard to see us continuing at the rates we’ve seen the last few years” More incentives and increased purchases from young drivers would be needed for new-car sales to top 17 million next year, he said.
 As earnings gain momentum among lower-income households, purchases of clothing, autos and restaurant meals will also benefit, according to the Morgan Stanley economists.
 sued the bank in 2011 to try and block the agency’s loan guarantees for foreign carriers, including Air India Ltd’s purchases of Boeing Co.
 to acquire United Biscuits, it said yesterday in a statement, without disclosing the purchase price.
 “With the government measures in place, it has become very hard to do development of residential properties” The government’s curbs have included a cap on debt at 60 percent of a borrower’s income and higher stamp duties on home purchases.
 The biggest bank takeover in India prior to this was HDFC Bank Ltd’s purchase of Centurion Bank of Punjab Ltd.
 mutual funds that spread purchases among the largest value and growth companies had gained less than their benchmark measure as of Oct.
 on its $265 billion purchase of US.
 Deals on which Cornwell worked as an adviser include Terry Pegula’s $14 billion purchase of the Buffalo Bills, which NFL owners approved last month, and William Morris Endeavor Entertainment LLC’s acquisition in May of talent-management firm IMG Worldwide Inc.
 The Reserve Bank of India has maintained the repurchase rate at 8 percent after raising it thrice between September 2013 and January.
 Valeant, a serial acquirer, is known for cutting costs at the businesses it purchases.
 And given Allergan’s earnings growth, “I wouldn’t say it’s a particularly expensive stock” Three-quarters of analysts covering Allergan still recommend investors purchase shares at this level, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 For one, many of the acquirers today are moving or have moved their legal addresses overseas where the tax rate is lower, giving them more room to pay up for purchases.
 The $43 billion drugmaker estimates about $27 billion of savings from an Allergan purchase.
 Paul Cos, the insurer that purchased Travelers and took its name.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Spain’s 10-year bond yields closed below 2 percent for the first time, a sign investors are confident that the European Central Bank will expand its asset purchases to euro-area sovereign debt as soon as next week.
 Yields from France to Italy also touched record lows today as Credit Suisse Group AG, one of the banks that trade directly with the debt agencies in Madrid, Paris and Rome, said the ECB may expand its asset-purchase program, or quantitative easing, at its Dec.
 21 that officials would be willing to widen the scope of the central bank’s purchases should the inflation outlook for the region diminish.
 The boost that corporate PC purchases contributed to processor demand in 2014 will tail off next year, Smith said today.
 The purchase from Newfield would add to Hong Kong-based Brightoil’s holdings in the Bohai Bay and give it a stake in another block scheduled to start producing at the end of the month, the company said.
 “Investors are worried that Chinese banks have been chasing short-term profit by taking on too much risky shadow-banking activities” Ma added that some employees offered shares may feel obliged to purchase them to show their commitment.
 Virgin America and an employee stock vehicle are offering 133 million shares for $21 to $24 each, and PAR Investment Partners LP has agreed to purchase $521 million worth of shares in a private placement concurrent with the offering.
 Virgin America was forced to slow its growth in 2012, cutting one purchase of Airbus Group NV jets by two-thirds and delaying other deliveries.
 Even deals twice its size -- such as Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Much of the city’s new transport infrastructure was constructed in empty lots in former border areas dubbed “death strips” In the case of the two zoos, Zoologischer Garten in the west purchased the east’s animal park in 1994 and both are still in operation.
 -The ECB announces the amount of settled covered-bond purchases.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Only nine out of 68 sets of named plaintiffs across seven states “definitively assert that they purchased vehicles manufactured by New GM,” the company told Furman.
 yesterday sued to stop National CineMedia Inc’s planned $375 million purchase of its closest competitor to prevent it from controlling advertising for nine of 10 movie screens in the US.
 The sum was placed there by Papua New Guinea as part of the government’s purchase of a 15 percent stake in the project.
 “Some are returning cash to shareholders, some are saying the yields are very low, we’re going to have some use for it” Borrowing costs are falling as traders and investors speculate the European Central Bank will buy corporate bonds as part of its asset-purchase program to revive the region’s economy.
 In its August statement about the Hong Kong regulator’s concerns, Sunac said that in the company’s view its agreement to purchase shares in Greentown don’t trigger an obligation to make a general offer.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- With its $346 billion purchase of Baker Hughes Inc, Halliburton Co.
 in September 2012 for about $190 million, its third and largest purchase in Nigeria.
 The purchase points to a shift into food-led establishments by Bury St Edmunds, England-based Greene King and would create the UK’s largest holder of directly-operated pubs with about 3,000 outlets and combined revenues of more than 2 billion pounds.
 The Shanghai Composite Index has rallied 14 percent this year as funds flowed into mainland stocks before the start of the link, which will allow a net 235 billion yuan in daily cross-border purchases.
 The company, which holds more than 88 percent of its cash overseas, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, has been pushed by activist investor Carl Icahn to accelerate its stock repurchase program.
 Icahn Letter Billionaire Icahn wrote an open letter last month to Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook to increase share repurchases and boost the value of the stock, which he said was trading at half its value.
 The company, which had authorized a $90 billion share buyback program, has repurchased $679 billion of shares as of Sept.
 Montreal-based BCE will issue about 56 million shares to help fund the purchase, which includes C$78 million for net debt and minority interest.
 The company agreed to purchase Las Vegas-based Bally for $32 billion and to refinance about $18 billion of Bally’s debt, according to a Sept.
 The purchase of Stats ChipPac, the world’s fourth-largest provider of chip packaging and testing, would add to the $26 billion of semiconductor deals in the past year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Cross-town competitor Lenovo subsequently completed its purchase of Motorola in a combination that would have made it the third-largest vendor, according to IDC.
 The company also would let shareholders purchase stock in the trust.
 The shutdown will last “several weeks” and customers will be supplied from inventories and through purchases of crude on the market, spokesman Pius Rolheiser said by phone.
 Genting was authorized by shareholders to repurchase as much as 122 billion shares, or 10 percent of its outstanding stock, in April.
 Lee Sin Yee, spokeswoman for unit Resorts World Sentosa, declined to comment on the timing of the purchases, which were made at between S$1015 and S$115 apiece.
 IPhone purchases by Russians have also increased in recent weeks, said Maria Zaikina, a spokeswoman for Moscow-based Svyaznoy, which accounted for two-fifths of Russia’s iPhone sales last year.
 Prices for some Western products have already risen in Russia as they have become more expensive for wholesalers and retailers to purchase.
 Sharjah-based low-cost carrier Air Arabia PJSC obtained $230 million from Dubai Islamic Bank PJSC to fund the purchase of six Airbus A320s next year.
 Under the terms of the purchase and sale agreement, the property deed would not be listed under her name until she finished paying for the house, she said.
 Speculation the Fed will raise rates next year after ending its asset-purchase program in October has so far failed to keep the industry from advancing.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Boskalis Westminster NV’s purchase of a 148 percent stake in deepwater-oilfield surveyor Fugro NV may be the first step in a full takeover as the maritime-salvage operator adds offshore-energy assets, analysts said.
 Offshore-energy acquisitions by Papendrecht, Netherlands-based Boskalis have included the 125 billion-euro ($156 billion) purchase of Dockwise Ltd.
 and Deutsche Post AG’s DHL, plans to raise as much as $500 million in loans to help fund logistics purchases in emerging markets.
 Aramex is also looking at adding joint ventures to the 15 it has already, exploring local partnerships in central Africa and central Asia where a franchise model would be better suited than purchases, Hachem said.
 He forecasts sales will gain 10 percent this year and by the same rate in 2015, if purchases are completed.
 Fatter paychecks for lower-income earners would help households across all income brackets to make more purchases.
 It “offers hope to retailers heading into the holidays” Today’s sentiment report showed the buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to purchase goods and services, increased to 351, the highest since November 2007, before the last recession began, from 328 the prior period.
 Vedanta bought Skorpion from Anglo American Plc as part of a $134 billion purchase of its zinc assets including Gamsberg and the Lisheen operation in Ireland, completing the transaction in 2010.
 Meanwhile, Costco will attract customers with its own doorbusters, and its selection may still net additional purchases, she said.
 ‘Interesting Acquisition’ Irkutsk Oil could be worth about $2 billion, based on the $2 billion OAO Lukoil paid in April 2013 to purchase Hess Corp.
 The purchase increases New York-based Leucadia’s stake to about 22 percent, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the acquisition hasn’t been publicly disclosed.
 And in 2012, Crown Castle purchased the rights to 7,200 or T-Mobile US Inc’s towers for $24 billion.
 markets closed, to purchase towers from Tim Participacoes SA, the Brazil unit of Telecom Italia SpA.
 The BOJ’s 80 trillion yen ($677 billion) a year in debt purchases drove two-year yields below zero today for the first time on record in secondary market trading.
 ECMC, based in Oakdale, Minnesota, is making the purchase under the name Zenith Education Group Inc.
 The purchase includes 12 schools that are in the process of being closed as well as online programs.
 “The agreement provides virtually no relief to the Corinthian students” The purchase of a college by a debt collection company represents a conflict of interest, said Robyn Smith, an attorney with the Legal Aid Foundation of Los Angeles who works with the NCLC.
 Senate majority leader, said “there will be no government shutdowns” The Fed ended bond purchases under quantitative-easing stimulus last month.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank published the legal act for purchases of asset-backed securities, setting it up to start buying the debt as soon as tomorrow.
 The purchase plan is part of President Mario Draghi’s drive to expand the ECB’s balance sheet by as much as 1 trillion euros ($125 trillion).
 Policy makers are expanding stimulus to stave off the threat of a deflationary spiral of falling prices and households postponing spending, and Draghi has said they’re unanimous in their willingness to take further action such as government-bond purchases if needed.
 ABS purchases will “be implemented in a uniform and, exceptionally during the initial phase, centralized manner,” according to the legal act.
 Securities eligible for purchase may include bonds backed by residential or commercial mortgages as long as they fulfill the criteria listed in the legal act, the ECB said.
 It may take as many as five days to approve purchases of larger ABS while smaller transactions will be signed off in about 24 hours, people familiar with the matter said last week.
 By underwriting the share sale, banks agree to purchase any stock that investors don’t buy.
 About $165 billion of such purchases have been announced so far this year, data compiled by Bloomberg show, five times the amount struck last year.
 Yimin Ge bought bonds from other firms with “an understanding that her counterparty would repurchase the security within a short time frame,” and on at least one occasion engaged in the opposite practice, according to an agreement accepted by Finra on Oct.
 The biggest search engine is encouraging app makers in China to join its distribution system and generate sales abroad through in-app purchases and subscriptions, according to a post on the Android Developers Blog.
 They helped drive up values around the country before slowing their purchases this year.
 The Ranieri-backed firm, unlike many of its competitors, gives renters the option to eventually purchase the houses they occupy.
 6, GT Advanced called terms of a contract with Apple “oppressive” and “burdensome” GT Advanced was required to begin repaying the money in January, either as cash or a credit against Apple purchases of sapphire, according to regulatory filings.
 19 it purchased industrial shares at the start of the equity link between Hong Kong and Shanghai, which allows foreign investors greater access to China’s market.
 The purchase price is $165 million in cash, minus any debt not related to the acquisition of patents.
 A purchase would be more welcome in the area of central nervous-system afflictions than in immunology, he said.
 The Ivanhoe group signed a contract yesterday to purchase 1095 Avenue of the Americas, a 42-story building on Bryant Park, said the people, who asked not to be named because the transaction is private.
 They are calculated by dividing net operating income by purchase price.
 and DeutscheBank AG are offering a yield of as much as 12 percent on eight-year unsecured bonds they’re underwriting to help fundScientific Games’s $51 billion purchase of Bally TechnologiesInc.
 The underwriters may be unable to sell the bonds at facevalue because the interest investors are demanding is higherthan the 975 percent the company agreed to pay on the most-expensive part of the financing to ensure the Bally purchase,the people said.
 “It was a great night for Sotheby’s,” said collector Jim Grecco, who purchased a painting of clowns and horses by Fernand Leger for $59 million.
 It was purchased by Wang Zhongjun, who, with his brother, runs Huayi Brothers Media Corp, a movie producer and distributor in China, The Wall Street Journal reported today, citing a spokesman at Huayi.
 Governor Haruhiko Kuroda also led the board to decide to triple the pace of purchases of exchange-traded funds and Japanese real estate trusts.
 The third-largest economy in the euro region is becoming more attractive as the European Central Bank moves closer to sovereign bond purchases.
 Economic Data Canadian retail sales rose 08 percent to C$428 billion ($38 billion) in September, faster than a 05 percent increase projected by economists, led by big-ticket purchases including cars, furniture and appliances.
 The Caisse’s Ivanhoe Cambridge real-estate arm this month agreed to purchase a Manhattan office tower from Blackstone Group LP for $225 billion, according to people familiar with the deal.
 Sabia declined to comment on the purchase.
 Jana also purchased about 842,000 shares of McDonald’s in the quarter valued at $799 million as of Sept.
 Proceeds from junior bond sales are used to purchase assets that are then put into the cover pools.
 The world’s second biggest economy purchased 255 million metric tons a month in the January-to-September period, heading for a record year.
 “If the rupee falls, even for a brief period, the RBI may stay away from a rate cut for the time being, breaking the market’s rhythm” Governor Raghuram Rajan raised the repurchase rate three times from September 2013 through January to rein in inflation.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Colt Defense LLC is seeking capital to stave off an “expected default” next month as gunmakers suffer from lower defense spending and as consumers purchase fewer firearms.
 Valeant has been a serial acquirer, using its advantageous tax structure to make purchases and then slash research and development and other costs to boost profits.
 Nutresa said it has enough funds and bank credit to pay for the purchase.
 In the wake of the infringement suit, the support companies claimed that Oracle was impermissibly tying updates to purchase of the company’s support services.
 and AT&T Inc’s proposed purchase of DirecTV.
 They agreed in April on the rights offering to revive the phone company’s prospects following a wireless-frequency purchase that pushed debt up.
 The purchases by Slim and OeIAG, which will buy almost 63 million of the new shares, will maintain the two main investors’ combined holding.
 ordered 50 wide-body jets from Airbus Group NV, opting for the European planemaker for a $14 billion purchase following a competition with Boeing Co.
 inquiry into its purchase of 10 percent of GFI’s stock without first informing the Financial Conduct Authority.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Aircraft leasing company Amedeo purchased an Airbus Group NV A380 superjumbo from Dubai-based Emirates, the model’s biggest operator, as it seeks to build up a portfolio of the double-decker jets.
 The A380 is the best solution on “routes where extra frequencies do not offer more connectivity and where there are peak time departures,” Lapidus said in an interview from Hong Kong, adding that “these trends will only manifest themselves more clearly and definitively in the future” Some 20 percent of the undisclosed purchase price of the plane acquired from Emirates was paid in the form of equity capital from Amedeo and New York-based Pine Brook.
 That distinguishes the transaction from others in which the equity portion was purchased by shareholders in funds listed by Amedeo -- previously know as Doric -- on the London Stock Exchange.
 Lapidus had said his leasing plan would focus on airlines that previously had shied away from the high purchase cost.
 Improving Economy The Fed’s purchases, the first round of which began in December 2008, helped support demand in the Treasury market.
 Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 377 percent of the notes, the most since July, compared with an average of 325 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 152 percent of the notes at the sale, the least since July, compared with an average of 192 percent for the past 10 auctions.
 with the purchase of American Life Insurance Co.
 A weaker euro will help them” ECB President Mario Draghi said last week the lender is willing to broaden its asset-purchase plan to include sovereign debt if current measures prove insufficient to speed up the region’s pace of inflation.
 ‘No Hesitation’ “There’s no hesitation when I want to make a purchase,” he said.
 Liberty Global, which also said it completed its tender offer for Dutch cable company Ziggo NV, has expanded through purchases across Europe and owns operations stretching from Hungary to the UK.
 “So we are still filling the same purchase but a little fast” United Launch Alliance’s relationship with its Russian supplier hasn’t frayed amid heightened geopolitical tensions between the US.
 Those purchases helped Centum post a 38 percent increase in first-half profit to 123 billion shillings, and a 19 percent return on shareholder funds, the main ratio targeted by the company.
 “This is not a deal where investors are going to give them the benefit of the doubt” He called LabCorp’s purchase a “major move with regards to diversifying its business into a broader testing model” Higher Valuation The deal values Covance at 27 times earnings, putting it above the trading valuations of competitors such as Quintiles Transnational Holdings Inc.
 More planned to purchase new appliances, including televisions, vacuum cleaners and washing machines, within the next six months.
 Cheap gas has emboldened many consumers to step up auto purchases, with the industry poised for an unprecedented sixth straight annual sales increase next year.
 Third Point purchased 72 million shares with a market value of $6397 million and Tudor Investment Corp.
 “Investors could view A shares as a potential risk diversifier as historically their returns have been uncorrelated with developed- and emerging-market equities” ‘Great Signal’ International investors purchased 13 billion yuan ($21 billion) of Shanghai shares by 1:57 pm.
 Chinese stocks have dropped for five days and net purchases of mainland equities through the Hong Kong exchange link fell to 26 billion yuan today, down from about 48 billion yuan yesterday.
 “You need to pander to where the consumer wants to shop and when” Online Sales More purchases also are taking place online instead of in brick-and-mortar stores.
 The Magyar Nemzeti Bank has set aside 300 billion forint ($12 billion) to purchase bad project loans from banks, it said in its Financial Stability report published today.
 He says he’s never invested with Secure, nor traded forex nor even purchased a share of stock.
 economy that’s strengthened enough for the Federal Reserve to end its dollar-debasing bond-purchase program and consider the timing of its first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 Central bank Governor Raghuram Rajan has kept the benchmark repurchase rate at 8 percent after three increases from September 2013 through January.
 Proceeds of the bond sale may help fund the purchase of the remainder of Alliance Boots and help refinance its borrowings, according to a regulatory filing.
 After quadrupling from 2009 through 2013, companies that make money from nonessential consumer purchases went nowhere for the first eight months of 2014 and then plunged almost 9 percent as markets buckled in September and October.
 The gas giant capped a year of asset sales and purchases worth more than $14 billion to focus more on crude, just as oil fell into a slump.
 “Losing 30 percent of your cash flow overnight is definitely going to impact you” Deep Panuke While asset purchases and sales are no longer a focus for Encana, there may be opportunities for it to buy parcels of land to expand in regions it’s trying to grow, Suttles said.
 The men encoded the data into magnetic strips of blank plastic cards and made credit-card purchases and withdrew money from automated teller machines, the US.
 A separate report by the Conference Board yesterday showed an unexpected decline from October, which was a seven-year high, while a gauge of consumers’ willingness to buy appliances rose to its highest level since at least 2010 and purchase intentions for televisions were at a two-year high.
 Underhis leadership, Smith & Nephew shares have gained about 60percent, bolstered by acquisitions such as the $17 billionpurchase this year of Austin, Texas-based ArthroCare Corp.
 It said today that it has notched up a total of 74 billion euros ($92 billion) of settled covered-bond purchases as of the end of last week.
 Economists at Nomura International Plc now predict a classic quantitative-easing program in the first half of 2015, while analysts at BNP Paribas SA expect a broadening of asset purchases to be announced next month.
 single-family rental-home landlord, said it’s making the purchase partly with its new Asia real estate fund.
 Yields Slide Yields from Austria to Portugal dropped to the least on record today amid speculation slowing inflation will prompt the European Central Bank to extend its asset-purchase program.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, was little changed at 326 percent, a weighted average compiled by the National Interbank Funding Center shows.
 While analysts have predicted retail sales would gain this month and next, many of those purchases are expected to shift online or be won with discounts that threaten retailers’ profitability.
 About 49 percent of consumers plan to research products and make purchases on Thanksgiving morning this year, up from 31 percent in 2013, PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP said in its 2014 holiday outlook last month.
 31, taking this year’s purchases to $14 billion, the most among eight Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 -The European Central Bank announces the size of settled covered-bond purchases.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The 03 percent increase in purchases was broad-based, with 11 of 13 major store categories showing gains, the Commerce Department reported today in Washington.
 As unemployment falls and energy costs continue to retreat, consumers will have the means to maintain purchases heading into the all-important holiday-shopping season.
 The country’s third-largest carrier said last month it’s at risk of going out of business should it have to pay Airbus Group NV a penalty after the planned purchase of six A380 superjumbos fell through.
 The company also announced an expansion of its capital return plan, increasing its share repurchases by $11 billion.
 The stock connect will allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases, marking one of China’s biggest steps toward opening up its capital account, increasing use of the yuan and turning Shanghai into an international financial center.
 Management Style Viehbacher’s focus on the US, the world’s biggest drug market, and his efforts to shift Sanofi’s center of gravity across the Atlantic following the 2011 purchase of biotechnology company Genzyme Corp, had led to resentment among some managers in Paris.
 Enel earlier this year announced a reorganization of its divisions and increased control over its Latin American unit Enersis SA through the purchase of a 606 percent stake held by Endesa.
 dollar strengthened, after the Bank of Japan unexpectedly boosted stimulus and the Federal Reserve ended asset purchases.
 Crosby’s office is on the second floor of SoftLayer’s Dallas headquarters, which bears little indication that the startup was ever purchased by IBM -- based some 1,400 miles away in Armonk, New York.
 That means adapting the technology that used to be ordered through IBM salespeople and installed in customers’ data centers, and instead letting customers purchase those offerings online and have it delivered via the cloud.
 “Prospective purchasers of the Bonds should make an investment decision based on their assessment of the ability of Revel to operate the hotel and casino and to generate sufficient revenues to meet its obligations,” according to offering documents for the power-plant bonds.
 These curbs would work by targeting banks whose purchases of shares and TLAC-eligible debt from another globally systemic lender exceed certain levels.
 The Federal Trade Commission, whose litigation led to the high court ruling, argues that pay-for-delay accords cost drug purchasers as much as $35 billion a year.
 Dave Goss of London’s Vape Emporium, a source of e-cigarettes, told consumers to buy equipment from trusted manufacturers and to check boxes carefully to make sure their purchases are authentic, according to the Guardian.
 Vermilion, based in Calgary, is considering purchases of assets in the US.
 The euro gained versus the pound as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said its asset-purchase program would last at least two years.
 The nation’s benchmark money-market rate fell the most since September as the central bank cut the yield offered on 14-day repurchase agreements for the third time in as many months.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of funding availability in the banking system, dropped 14 basis points to 336 percent.
 The company, which powers a third of the world’s ships, could fund purchases worth up to 400 million euros ($497 million), he said.
 Rosengren said he’s interested in any purchases that will help develop Waertsilae’s gas-engine arm, as well as so-called scrubber technology that minimizes pollution from ships that continue to burn heavy fuels.
 Further declines in the expected rate of inflation represent a risk to the outlook for demand should consumers hold back on purchases in anticipation of even lower prices.
 Yahoo expects the purchase, which is subject to customary closing conditions, to boost earnings before certain items.
 “I certainly encourage anyone in Europe to purchase their car soon because we probably will have to make an adjustment there,” he said.
 “A consideration of the costs and benefits, and theopportunities and risks, of a broad purchase program ofgovernment bonds does not give a positive outcome,”Lautenschlaeger, a former Bundesbank vice president, said at anevent in Berlin today.
 As long as this is the case, the ECB’spurchase of government securities is inevitably linked to aserious incentive problem” Lautenschlaeger’s comments signal she’s become ECBPresident Mario Draghi’s highest-ranking opponent in the debateover introducing QE to the euro area.
 After starting a long-term loan plan for banks and anasset-purchase program for covered bonds and asset-backedsecurities to boost the ECB’s balance sheet, policy makers havewrangled in recent days over what comes next should inflationfail to respond.
 21 that inflation has to be returned totarget “as fast as possible,” and named government-bondpurchases as a possibility.
 26 that debt purchases could be conducted on thebasis of the ECB’s capital key, roughly proportional to the sizeof each member state’s economy.
 In Mexico, Telefonica is unlikely to purchase assets that Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB is looking to sell, Chief Operating Officer Jose Maria Alvarez-Pallete said at the Barcelona event.
 Leucadia National Corp, already the biggest single owner of Harbinger Group, bought an additional 5 million shares, bringing Leucadia’s stake to about 22 percent, according to a person with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the purchase hasn’t been publicly disclosed.
 has said it will purchase Dial a Bed, valued at 200 million rand.
 “In its simplest form, a passenger purchases a ticket from city A to city B to city C but does not travel beyond city B,” according to the companies’ complaint.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Euro-area government bonds rose, pushing yields in Ireland and Italy to record lows, as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said officials would broaden debt purchases should the inflation outlook diminish.
 “Stressing that the ECB would broaden the purchases if the latest measures taken are not effective enough gave the market another boost” Italy’s 10-year yield fell nine basis points, or 009 percentage point, to 221 percent as of 4:38 pm.
 “If, on its current trajectory, our policy is not effective enough to achieve this, or further risks to the inflation outlook materialize, we would step up the pressure and broaden even more the channels through which we intervene, by altering accordingly the size, pace and composition of our purchases” Since June, ECB stimulus measures have been expanded to record-low interest rates, longer-term loans and asset purchases.
 The purchase price is about 71 times DSS’s estimated 2014 adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, the companies said.
 Unlike traditional jewelery, which is frequently purchased by men for their wives or girlfriends, the T collection is designed for women to buy it for themselves.
 “We’re delighted with the initial response to our new Tiffany T collection targeted to the style-conscious female self-purchase customer,” Mark Aaron, a spokesman for the company, said on a conference call.
 with the 13 billion-euro ($162 billion) purchase of Diana in mid-2014 that added pet-food ingredients and greater access to natural raw materials.
 Kolkata-based Coal India, under pressure to double its output to meet rising demand, has failed to meet production targets as slow approvals, lack of transport infrastructure and difficulties in land purchases impede opening of new mines.
 Electronic Auction The miner sells a part of its output through auctions to customers that don’t have long-term purchase contracts.
 31, including Fortis’s $25 billion purchase of Arizona-based UNS Energy Corp.
 The purchases from overseas contributed to an almost 13 percent jump in raw materials cost at the Indian unit.
 Consumer-price inflation eased to 552 percent last month from as high as 1116 percent in November 2013 also as Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan raised the main repurchase rate thrice from September 2013 through January.
 “With good economic performance and positive stories in the labor markets, we maintain a firm-footed position in how we engage risk markets” Central Banks Europe’s equity benchmark gained 31 percent this month, as Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank may broaden its asset-buying program to include the purchase of government bonds, while central banks in Japan and China stepped up measures to support their economies.
 17 low through yesterday as the Bank of Japan expanded bond purchases, China cut interest rates and speculation grew the European Central Bank will take more stimulus measures.
 The buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, declined to 319 last week from 327, while the gauge of personal finances was little changed at 539 compared with 541 the prior period, a two-month high.
 Rebel forces have been preparing for war in response to government arms purchases and mobilization, Machar said.
 Publicis plans to finance the purchase with cash and borrowings, without selling shares.
 The lenders, suing on behalf of a proposed group that includes every card-issuing financial institution whose customers made purchases last year, say the company wants to duck blame for failing to safeguard data.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The cost of feeder cattle, the young animals purchased to be fattened for slaughter on feedlots, are up 74 percent from a year earlier, after reaching an all-time high C$29550 per 100 pounds in October, the data show.
 The contract value is based on list prices and purchasers usually get a discount.
 Today’s agreement follows a July deal by SMBC to purchase $118 billion of aircraft from Airbus Group NV in the largest single-aisle plane order ever placed by a leasing company.
 Actavis has been the most active buyer of drug companies since January 2011, making more than $36 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 MetLife and its clients purchased 120 million euros of notes issued by the Elenia Finance Oyj.
 “With this clarity, lenders should have greater confidence in lending to Fannie Mae’s full credit standards and making mortgages available to more borrowers” Under the new rules, which are retroactive to January 2013, lenders won’t be asked to repurchase loans with data inaccuracies or misrepresentations of buyers’ qualifications unless the flaws are significant and apply to multiple loans.
 The $65 average monthly cable bill customers pay for 150 channels is a better value than if someone purchased the networks separately, Iger said.
 The PBOC last week confirmed it pumped 7695 billion yuan into select banks in the last two months and twice lowered the rate it pays lenders on 14-day repurchase agreements.
 The business development company said last week that it plans to repurchase as much as $75 million of its stock and may consider a sale, recapitalization, restructuring or liquidation, according to an Oct.
 The brands P&G is keeping are “leaders in brand equity, trial, purchase and loyalty with superior performance and innovation,” Paul Fox, a spokesman, said in an e-mail yesterday.
 That’s not what we do really well” BRAUN -- P&G acquired the maker of electric shavers, trimmers and toothbrushes as part of its $57 billion purchase of the Gillette Co.
 “We conduct frequent surveillance of trading in the municipal bond market and will penalize abuses that threaten retail investors” Protecting Individuals Minimum denominations help restrict trading of high-risk securities to investors who are capable of making sizable purchases and are more prepared to bear the higher risk than individual buyers, the SEC said in a statement.
 The outstanding amount of covered bonds purchased under the Frankfurt-based institution’s program rose by 3075 billion euros ($385 billion) last week to 4779 billion euros, data on the ECB’s website showed.
 The purchase plan, which is set to broaden before the end of the month to include asset-backed securities, is part of ECB President Mario Draghi’s extensive stimulus package that also includes targeted bank loans and record-low interest rates.
 These purchases probably aren’t included in today’s account because the standard settlement time for new bonds is five days, said Anders Vestergaard Fischer, a fixed income analyst at Danske Bank A/S in Copenhagen.
 The ECB doesn’t provide a breakdown of its bond purchases and doesn’t comment on the settlement period, a spokesman said.
 The Federal Trade Commission, whose litigation led to the high court ruling, argues such “pay-for-delay” accords cost drug purchasers as much as $35 billion a year.
 “I’m looking forward to the rest of the trial,” Thomas Sobol, a lawyer for plaintiffs including drug wholesalers and third-party purchasers, said outside court today.
 Oyak, the largest cement producer in Turkey, completed the purchase of Denizli Cimento from CRH Plc and Eren Holding AS for a price between $400 million and $450 million on Nov.
 17, allowing a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) a day in cross-border purchases, regulators said in a joint statement.
 “While everyone is in awe with Son’s fantastic purchases, and in the Internet space it’s been absolutely brilliant, you can argue that Sprint is going to give the company a lot of trouble for years to come,” BGC Partners’s Anvarzadeh said.
 The purchase for an undisclosed cash amount will add a network of 26 South African stores to Truworths’ 600 across the country, the Cape Town-based company said in a statement today.
 Truworths announced the purchase of high-end kidswear chain Earthchild Clothing (Pty) Ltd.
 ‘Early Days’ Treasuries trimmed gains as traders prepared for today’s auction, the first 30-year bond offering since the Fed ended its program of monthly bond purchases under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy at the end of October.
 Some stores will continue to make last-minute purchases even in December, Urner Barry’s Barton said.
 Governor Raghuram Rajan raised the main repurchase rate three times from September 2013 through January to curb retail inflation.
 Samsung Electronics surged in Seoul after saying it would purchase about $2 billion of its own stock.
 Overseas buyers are prepared to pay even higher prices for Japanese real estate than domestic purchasers because of the weakening yen, Mochizuki said.
 sued to stop the company’s planned $375 million purchase of its closest competitor.
 “We can also consider purchases in Italy, even if we aren’t in talks on any transaction,” he added.
 The bank would be interested in buying Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s Coutts private bank if the entire business, including the brand, were put up for sale, Messina said, adding that he doesn’t rule out a purchase of Coutts’s international arm.
 abandoned its agreement to purchase Shire Plc.
 “While Shandong appears to be holding African Minerals to ransom, perhaps in order to secure a larger stake of the asset for little cost, it needs to be careful what it wishes for” Benefiting Someone African Minerals Chairman Frank Timis, who owns 127 percent of the company, earlier this month struck a deal with the administrators of London Mining to purchase its Marampa iron-ore mine.
 AnotherHiga company still holds the deed to the home purchased by FirstLady Angelica Rivera in 2012, she said Nov.
 Under the terms of the purchase and sale agreement, theproperty deed would not be listed under her name until shefinished paying for the house, she said.
 “We expect a number of those will come through in the next six months” Acal, which also makes transformers for MRI scanners, has made eight purchases since Jefferies took charge of the company in 2009, benefiting from weak economic growth in the euro area, which depressed asset prices, the CEO said.
 Excluding the purchases, growth was 3 percent.
 Adjusted operating profit rose 83 percent to 55 million pounds ($87 million), boosted by the 69 million-pound purchase of Noratel Group in July.
 “Next year we expect organic growth to continue ahead of the market and we expect to continue to acquire” Acal had debt facilities of as much as 13 million pounds, which could support purchases over the next twelve months, he said.
 The Bank of Thailand held its one-day bond repurchase rate at 2 percent, with monetary policy committee members voting 6 to 1 in favor, it said in Bangkok today.
 Stock Connect Share purchases in both Shanghai and Hong Kong bourses have slowed since the a trading link started on Nov.
 It ended a bond-purchase stimulus program at its October meeting, citing improvements in the labor market.
 10-year notes yielded 154 percentage points more than comparable German bunds as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said officials would expand debt purchases if the inflation outlook weakens.
 The purchase by Royalty Pharma, which buys revenue streams from drugs, was financed with cash and a $27 billion loan from Bank of America Corp, New York-based Royalty said today in a statement.
 The real-estate investment trust, whose 74 percent total return over the past three years is almost double that of peers, recently told the lenders that have been selling it big, high-quality mortgages that it’s now also seeking to purchase non-prime loans and those with low down payments, Chief Investment Officer Bill Roth said today during a conference call for analysts and investors.
 Of course, he sees the timeline as “probably measured in years, not months” After firms such as Two Harbors and its manager Pine River Capital Management LP made a killing gobbling up at distressed values the bonds backed by subprime and other risky mortgages that fueled the 2008 financial crisis, higher prices for those so-called legacy non-agency securities are reducing potential returns on additional purchases, pushing the companies to look this year for ways to put money to work in riskier new loans.
 “But it’s much harder to buy the third deal, fourth deal, fifth deal if you’re already underwater on your first purchases” Rental Demand American Homes 4 Rent, the second-largest landlord, sold $5284 million of notes yesterday with a weighted average coupon of 4395 percent versus 4418 percent for a similar issue in September, the company said in a statement.
 Bourses in Hong Kong and Shanghai will begin trading through the program, which allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) a day in cross-border purchases, next week, regulators said in a joint statement.
 31 and tripling ETF purchases to 3 trillion yen a year.
 Central-bank buying also favors the Nikkei 225: more than half the BOJ’s ETF purchases will go into funds tracking the gauge, according to Tokai Tokyo Securities Co.
 Merck, based in Whitehouse Station, New Jersey, acquired MK-3682 with its $385 billion purchase of Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The Federal Reserve last week ended treasuries and mortgage-bond purchases that constituted its third-round of quantitative easing to help boost economic growth and investor confidence.
 “Consumers are increasingly relying on prepaid products to make purchases and access funds, but they are not guaranteed the same protections or disclosures as traditional bank accounts,” Richard Cordray, the consumer bureau’s director, said in a statement prepared for the hearing.
 The Stoxx 600 climbed 11 percent in the past two days as German investor confidence rose and Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank’s expanded purchase program could include government bonds.
 The monetary authority refrained from selling repurchase agreements today for the first time since July.
 on its $265 billion purchase of US.
 By 2015, every restaurantand gate seat in United’s Terminal C will have an iPad, lettingtravelers get flight updates, browse the web, buy food and makeretail purchases with a 15-minute delivery guarantee.
 The seven-day repurchase rate rose 30 basis pointsthis week to 35 percent, the highest since Sept.
 It concluded a bond-purchase stimulus program at the October meeting, citing improvements in the labor market.
 Foreign Buying Singapore’s efforts to prevent a property bubble, which started in 2009 and include stricter lending criteria and higher taxes on foreign buyers, have contributed to overseas purchases of residential real-estate dropping to 87 percent of total transactions last quarter from 18 percent in the same period three years ago, according to data from the Urban Redevelopment Authority.
 agreed in August to purchase 25 percent of the Singapore trader’s packaged-food division.
 18 when the company announced a real estate purchase for three times the property’s assessed value, and rallied the most in more than two years on Oct.
 and Deutsche Bank AG are offering a yield of as much as 12 percent on eight-year unsecured bonds they are underwriting to help fund Scientific Games’s $51 billion purchase of Bally Technologies Inc, according to a person familiar with the offering.
 The underwriters may be unable to sell the bonds at face value because the interest potential investors are demanding is higher than the 975 percent the company agreed to pay on the most-expensive part of the financing to ensure the Bally purchase, the people said.
 Management is not aware of a bid for the company” Bisha would be the second acquisition by QKR, funded by Qatar’s sovereign wealth fund and Poland’s richest man Jan Kulczyk, after its $110 million purchase of AngloGold Ashanti Ltd’s Navachab mine in Namibia in July.
 Indirect bidders, a category of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 50 percent of the notes sold today, compared with an average of 452 percent at the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 128 percent of the notes, compared with an average of 198 percent at the past 10 auctions.
 Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan has kept the repurchase rate at 8 percent after raising it three times between September 2013 and January.
 AT&T is gaining 86 million subscribers with the purchase of closely held Iusacell, the third-largest wireless operator in Mexico that has struggled to compete against Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB.
 Plans for further acquisitions, to add to the four purchases made in the first quarter, will predominantly support US.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Brooklyn Nets fans can now pay for game-day purchases with their smartphones, the first such initiative at a National Basketball Association arena.
 As part of the Barclays Center Round Up charity program, customers can round up purchases to the nearest dollar, with proceeds going to groups such as the Brooklyn Hospital Center and Brooklyn Nets Assist, a community support charity.
 The central bank didn’t drain funds from the financial system using repurchase agreements for the first time since July, according to a trader at a primary dealer required to bid at the auctions.
 Lexington will purchase all of the Tokyo-based lender’s stakes in the buyout funds for an undisclosed price, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 will buy back a combined 670 billion won ($616 million) of stock after their purchase of a Seoul property for three times the assessed price spurred a sell-off.
 Land Deal Last month, Hyundai said on behalf of the land-deal consortium that the three companies, all part of billionaire Chairman Chung Mong Koo’s automotive group, won’t issue debt and will use cash to fund the 106 trillion won purchase.
 credit-card issuer by purchases, was the only credit card accepted at Costco stores in Canada.
 The mine was purchased by Cliffs when it bought Consolidated Thompson Iron Mines Ltd, at a time when iron ore fetched more than $160 a metric ton.
 German 10-year rates dropped to a record alongside those from Austria to Portugal amid speculation slowing inflation will prompt the European Central Bank to extend its asset-purchase program.
 When the central bank boosted its already-unprecedented easing last month, it cited a risk that weak demand and cheaper oil could delay an end to Japan’s “deflationary mindset” No Limit The BOJ’s expansion of asset purchase plans was “totally incomprehensible,” and could only be seen as a move aimed at paving the way for Abe to give the final go-ahead to increase the sales tax next year, said Hideo Hayakawa, a former chief economist at the central bank.
 “The 2012 precedent suggests that the SNB might intervene and purchase euros at around 12010,” Beat Siegenthaler, currency strategist at UBS in Zurich, wrote in a note e-mailed to clients dated yesterday.
 “Many European banks are capital constrained, so I don’t see the ECB’s ABS purchase program necessarily as a game changer,” said Verri.
 Under the plan, shareholders could purchase stock in the REIT.
 The latest numbers show Pimco having amassed 251 million euros of Hypo’s bonds, most of it purchased before the nationalized lender was turned into a winddown vehicle and renamed Heta Asset Resolution AG this month.
 The data, derived from regulatory filings by Pimco and other funds, doesn’t reveal when exactly Pimco purchased the bonds or whether it still holds them.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Regulators weighing Comcast Corp’s proposed $452 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The smaller group suit is over cars made before the bankruptcy, while the larger one, which seeks $10 billion, is for automobiles purchased afterward.
 BT Chief Executive Officer Gavin Patterson needs to weigh the quality of the targets’ assets versus the difficulty of taking a deal to the finish line as he embarks on a potential purchase that could be worth $14 billion or more.
 Meanwhile, Vodafone Group Plc has purchased fixed operators Kabel Deutschland Holding AG in Germany and Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in Spain.
 Earlier this year, the company announced the biggest change to the way it sells diamonds in more than a decade, requiring more rigorous auditing of buyers’ accounts as it seeks to direct gems to the most financially sound purchasers.
 I would not touch oil and gas stocks as it’s far too risky now” Europe’s equity benchmark gained 31 percent this month, as Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank may broaden its asset-buying program to include the purchase of government bonds, while central banks in Japan and China stepped up measures to support their economies.
 Larrea’s post-spill purchases indicate the “fallout from the wastewater spill is manageable and already reflected in the share price,” according to Bokkenheuser at UBS.
 Larrea’s purchases show he has “faith that demand on a global scale is still pretty strong and that supply won’t be able to entirely catch up with demand,” Bokkenheuser said.
 Larrea’s Southern Copper purchases might be an attempt to convince the market the stock is cheap and encourage buying, Rohr said.
 “There is empirical evidence in finance for CEO purchases perhaps auguring more favorable results,” Rohr said.
 Fed officials cited further labor market progress last week, when they ended monthly asset purchases that have bloated the central bank’s balance sheet to more than $4 trillion in a bid to stimulate growth.
 Gains in employment in the US, and more recently a drop in prices at the gas pump, are helping to bolster consumer sentiment and underpin the household purchases that make up about 70 percent of the economy.
 Federal Reserve isn’t allowed to purchase stocks.
 That opens up opportunities for players like us who are committed to Asia” Apache is looking to sell its interest in an Australian liquefied natural gas venture, while Indonesia’s PT Pertamina agreed in September to purchase a stake in Murphy’s oil and gas assets in Malaysia for $2 billion in cash.
 The purchase followed PTTEP and PT Pertamina’s deal last year to buy Hess’s Indonesian assets for $13 billion.
 It hired Banco BTG Pactual SA in August to explore a purchase of Telecom Italia SpA’s local wireless unit, Tim Participacoes SA.
 private-equity firm with $66 billion in assets under management, agreed to purchase British restaurant chain Prezzo Plc in a transaction valuing the company at about 3037 million pounds ($486 million).
 indexes are extending gains from records amid signs the economy is weathering a global slowdown and the end of the Federal Reserve’s bond-purchase program.
 This makes the market perceive a perfect risk-on day for Friday” Speaking at the European Banking Congress in Frankfurt, Draghi said the ECB must drive inflation higher quickly, and it will widen its asset-purchase program if necessary.
 Any new action would follow measures including interest-rate cuts, long-term bank loans and covered-bond purchases, with buying of asset-backed securities said to have started today.
 He agreed in March to a three-year ban on serving as a public company’s officer as part of a $10 million settlement with New York’s attorney general on claims he misled investors about the impact that Merrill’s purchase would have on earnings.
 The latest $5 billion of stock repurchases brings its total buyback program to $95 billion, Dow said.
 In May, Third Point applauded Dow’s tripling of its share repurchase plan and the expansion of a plan to sell underperforming assets.
 31 it would raise its target for annual purchases of Japanese government bonds to 80 trillion yen, while tripling buying of real-estate investment trusts.
 While the proportion of men is typically 35 percent to 40 percent of total purchases, it can be as much as 70 percent online in gift-buying season, he said.
 It’s one of few acquirers to decline after announcing a deal this year -- most have gained because of the promise of growth or savings from making purchases.
 “Companion diagnostics is definitely an area of interest for the labs and an area of potential growth, but that’s going to take time to develop” Debt Burden LabCorp will also probably have to hold off on share repurchases for a while because of the added debt burden from the transaction, according to Jones.
 “The purchase of Covance and that contract-research organization does not fit in the traditional view of LabCorp’s core competencies,” said Wang.
 Since then, flows have fallen far short of thequota as concern about execution risks and ownership ofpurchased assets has deterred fund managers, according to Nick Ronalds, the managing director for equities at the AsiaSecurities Industry & Financial Markets Association, a tradeassociation for the biggest investors and brokers.
 Hong Kong investors are limited to daily purchases of 13billion yuan ($21 billion), while mainland traders can buy asmuch as 105 billion yuan.
 3, a 10th straight day of purchases.
 preferred shares, is pushing South Korea’s largest automaker to improve corporate governance after a real estate purchase for three times the property’s assessed value sparked a rout in the stock.
 The Norwegian fund firm met with Hyundai’s management after companies controlled by Korea’s second-largest family-run conglomerate agreed to the $10 billion purchase for a new headquarters, hotel, convention center and car museum in Seoul.
 “We’ve made it very clear that we disagree with the decision and we expect to see much better corporate governance and use of shareholder money going forward” Hyundai’s purchase has damped optimism that Korean companies will improve shareholder returns after the nation’s finance ministry said in July that it will use tax policy to encourage higher dividends, according to Gezelius.
 The exchanges agreed in April to allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 It’s also bringing forward purchases of attack helicopters, drones and missiles for Lockheed F-16 jets.
 Credit Suisse Group AG, one of the banks that trade with the debt agencies in Madrid, Paris and Rome, said the ECB may expand asset purchases at a Dec.
 The Fed concluded a bond-purchase program last month, citing economic gains.
 At today’s auction, indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 358 percent of the notes, the least since July, compared with an average of 314 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Draghi said today the ECB needs to accelerate inflation and may broaden its asset-purchase program.
 Since June, the ECB has cut interest rates and purchased covered bonds to boost the size of its balance sheet to early-2012 levels, signaling an increase of as much as 1 trillion euros ($125 trillion) to help revive the euro-area economy.
 Goldman Sachs said in May that it had started the process of selling Metro International Trade Services LLC, a metal-warehouse business purchased in 2010.
 Price Declines Home purchases rose 36 percent in the third quarter from a year earlier, the revenue agency said on Nov.
 Lending for home purchases climbed 62 percent in the first quarter from the same period of 2013, the most recent data available, CRIF said in June.
 A rebound in purchases is poised to help some of Italy’s big banks, which are suffering from bad loans backed by real estate that has lost value over 13 quarters of economic decline.
 The central bank will start buying asset-backed securities this week as part of stimulus plans that already include covered-bond purchases, long-term loans to banks and record-low interest rates.
 once it completes the purchase of Frank Russell Co.
 The company bought the 50 percent of FTSE International that it didn’t already own in December 2011, and completed its purchase of a majority stake in clearinghouse LCHClearnet Group Ltd.
 Dassault’s shareholders earlier this year approved the purchase and cancellation of as much as 10 percent of total stock, at a maximum price of 1,200 euros a share.
 Big Purchases Big-ticket items such as appliances drove sales, helping purchases over $500 gain 9 percent, executives said on a conference call.
 Crowded Field A few hundred thousand people have purchased with Vimeo On Demand since its March 2013 debut, according to Trainor.
 The company also announced an expansion of its capital return plan, increasing its share repurchases by $11 billion.
 Credit Risk The inspector general for FHFA, which oversees Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, said in a report in July that the nonbanks have relied too heavily on short-term financing to purchase MSRs.
 Soon after she joined the firm, O’Connor was purchased by Swiss Bank Corp, which in turn was acquired by Zurich-based UBS AG.
 To complete the purchase, it will need to overcome African explorer Ophir Energy Plc’s offer to acquire Salamander on the condition it doesn’t sell the Thai assets.
 Local Purchases Tata Steel said it’s coping with shortages through local purchases and imports of the material.
 JSW Steel has scaled up its target for overseas purchases to as much as 900,000 tons a month, from an earlier plan of 500,000 tons, Group Chief Financial Officer Seshagiri Rao said Oct.
 While the central bank is already expanding its range of asset purchases, it has yet to commit to broad-based bond buying, or quantitative easing.
 Earnings were hurt by a $95 million increase in pretax interest expense related to the financing of its 2013 acquisition of Vanguard Health Systems and share repurchases.
 and 73 million more customers as of August had purchased private insurance plans through the insurance exchanges created by Obamacare.
 $150 Billion In September, India made an 88-billion-rupee purchase of 262 Barak-I air defense missiles for warships, a deal that had been delayed for six years.
 Its return to growth is key to shore up a euro-area recovery that the European Central Bank supports with asset purchases and long-term loans.
 The decision came on the same day that European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said the regional monetary authority may broaden asset purchases, and three weeks after the Bank of Japan expanded its stimulus program.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Vornado Realty Trust agreed to sell a midtown Manhattan office building for $605 million and separately completed the purchase of retail space in New York’s most expensive shopping corridor.
 In a separate deal, the company said it completed the purchase of retail space along Fifth Avenue for $700 million.
 The purchase of the retail space, with 100 feet of frontage along Fifth Avenue at 55th Street, allows Vornado to defer taxes on the $483 million taxable gain from the sale of the office tower, the company said.
 Government debt has gained on speculation the European Central Bank will expand asset purchases to sovereign securities, and its Vice President Vitor Constancio said today that’s a prospect if current stimulus proves insufficient.
 Chief Executive Officer Yang Yuanqing has expanded in computer servers and mobile phones, including the $291 billion purchase of Motorola Mobility, to help combat a shrinking personal-computer market.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Fortress Investment Group LLC and Prelios SpA will probably reach an agreement with UniCredit SpA on terms to purchase the bad-loan unit of Italy’s biggest bank in a few weeks, according to people with knowledge of the plan.
 Yields are falling to new lows as the European Central Bank begins an asset-purchase program to stimulate lending while pledging to keep suppressing benchmark rates for an “extended period” The average yield on investment-grade bonds in euros declined 88 basis points this year to a record 119 percent, according to Bank of America Merrill Lynch index data.
 Monetary Policy Reserve Bank of India Governor Raghuram Rajan has held the repurchase rate at 8 percent after raising it three times from September 2013 through January to curb price pressures.
 Deals Wachtell, Sullivan & Cromwell Advise on BB&T-Susquehanna Deal Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz represented BB&T Corp, North Carolina’s second-largest lender, in its purchase of Susquehanna Bancshares Inc.
 The purchase price included $122 billion of stock issued to the pension plan, or an ownership of almost 11 percent.
 Soon after she sued in December 2009, Patricia was contacted by two FBI agents who were curious about her claim, made as part of the lawsuit, that Steve used inside information in advance of General Electric Co’s purchase of RCA Corp.
 “Selling stock into the market because you have inside information that the stock is likely to go down, and the purchaser doesn’t have that information, is fraudulent conduct, and that’s exactly what he’s accused of in this case -- fraud,” Lefcourt said in an interview.
 He didn’t say which other lenders his cabinet is negotiating with and declined to comment on a report by news website 444hu that the purchase of GE Capital’s Budapest Bank may be announced next week.
 Severing Ties To clear regulatory hurdles for the purchase of DirecTV, AT&T sold an 8 percent stake in America Movil.
 Overlapping Lines Halliburton expects to close on the Baker Hughes purchase in the second half of next year.
 Yildiz Holding AS plans to borrow 900 million pounds ($14 billion) to fund the purchase, a person with direct knowledge of the deal said Nov.
 “This acquisition is a great step for Yildiz Holding to go international in branding after the earlier purchase of chocolate maker Godiva,” said Yarkin Cebeci, an economist at JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Current Account Prior to United Biscuits, the largest foreign acquisition by a Turkish company was the $145 billion purchase of a 10 percent stake in the Caspian Shah Deniz gas project by Turkiye Petrolleri AO, a state oil company, from Total SA.
 The United Biscuits purchase will cause a foreign direct investment outflow of about $18 billion and increase Turkish companies’ external debt, said Ozgur Altug, chief economist at BGC Partners in Istanbul.
 That means investors who received allocations of those notes have lost $156 million of market value on their purchase.
 “Why delay telling customers that?” The Texas lawyer said that between the time the purchase order was made and the recalls were announced, multiple accidents occurred.
 It purchased AZ Electronic Materials SA in June.
 “Downward revisions to their inflation and growth forecasts will be key to justifying an expansion of their asset purchase programs” The Eurostat report showed that energy prices fell 25 percent in November from a year earlier.
 Syndicate The South Texas Syndicate Trust has 275 beneficiaries, who either inherited or purchased some of the 30,000 shares of mineral rights to 132,000 contiguous acres at the heart of the Eagle Ford shale, southwest of San Antonio.
 Chow Tai Fook is very cautious with mergers and acquisitions, and is only exploring the mine purchases, Cheng said.
 Transilvania, based in Cluj Napoca in western Romania, hasn’t taken a final decision on the purchase of Volksbank Romania SA, the bank said in a statement.
 MTS, as the company is known, intends to spend 5 billion rubles ($107 million) to rent satellite capacity and purchase equipment in an attempt to become one of the leading players in satellite TV in Russia in three years, the Moscow-based company said in a statement today.
 India may spend $20 billion on military aircraft alone in the next five to seven years, and the value of maintenance work typically is equivalent to about 40 percent of the purchase price, according to estimates from the MRO Association of India.
 The deal with Toulouse, France-based Airbus should close by the end of this year at the latest, and possibly this month, with the purchase price to be settled by cash from internal resources and bank borrowings, the lessor said in a filing to the Hong Kong stock exchange.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Warren Buffett’s purchase of Duracell yesterday may embolden acquirers to go after Energizer Holdings Inc’s battery unit.
 With a gauge of manufacturing and services activity pointing to sluggish growth at best, it is under pressure to add to long-term loans and already announced asset-purchase plans to prevent a spiral of price declines in the 18-nation currency bloc.
 He also is exploring the possible sale of some blocks of coverage or the purchase of reinsurance to limit risk.
 policy makers ended the Fed’s third round of bond purchases under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy on Oct.
 “Related authorities will announce a formal launch date in the near future” China is counting on the planned link between the two cities’ stock exchanges, which will allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) a day in cross-border purchases, to help liberalize its financial system and increase use of the nation’s currency.
 Adama, which was taken private by ChemChina in 2011 after it purchased a majority stake from Koor Industries Ltd, was marketing itself to investors amid a slump in grain prices that has sapped farmers’ appetite to buy the herbicides and fungicides that are the core of the company’s sales.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- India approved a 158 billion-rupee ($25 billion) purchase of artillery, the first acquisition of large-caliber guns since the 1980s as Prime Minister Narendra Modi seeks to modernize the armed forces.
 India has authorized $19 billion of weapons purchases since Modi swept to power in May and took a firmer line in border disputes with Pakistan and China.
 A history of corruption scandals slowed military purchases.
 Aside from authorizing weapons purchases, the government has loosened restrictions on procurement from defense manufacturers affected by graft allegations, and made it easier for private companies to maintain military equipment.
 The program will allow a net 235 billion yuan of daily cross-border purchases.
 “The operators wanted to pay in pesos at the official exchange rate and the government told them to bring dollars from abroad” In a document released by the communications secretary, Claro, America Movil’s local unit, said that the central bank doesn’t permit purchases of foreign currency to pay for the auction’s license fee and asked if it could be paid in pesos instead.
 When they make a purchase, the discount will show up on their credit card statements, the company said.
 Members of Amazon’s Prime fast-shipping program can purchase the gadget for $99 for a limited period.
 Shopping Too With Echo, Amazon can plant a voice-activated device in homes that lets users easily order things from the Web retailer by adding it to their shopping lists via voice command and later confirming the purchase through a companion app.
 Michael Pachter, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles, said he doesn’t understand why people might be tempted to purchase Echo.
 Among the executives at the meeting in Beijing yesterday was Lenovo Chief Executive Officer Yang Yuanqing, who last month closed $5 billion in asset purchases from US.
 Motorola Purchase The investments Lenovo completed last month include the $291 billion purchase of Motorola Mobility from Google Inc, and the $21 billion purchase of International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit.
 With the purchase of Motorola, Lenovo will look to expand smartphone sales in developed markets such as the US, Yang has said.
 Net purchases of mainland equities by global investors totaled 26 billion yuan ($425 million) today, down from about 48 billion yuan yesterday and the maximum 13 billion yuan on Nov.
 Negative Signal Today’s net purchases of Shanghai stocks, known as Northbound flows, amounted to about 20 percent of the 13 billion yuan daily quota.
 For Southbound purchases of Hong Kong shares, about 24 percent of the 105 billion yuan quota was taken up.
 Hong Kong stock purchases on the first day were within expectations, Charles Li, the chief executive officer of Hong Kong’s exchange, said at a Nov.
 While policy makers at their October meeting concluded a bond-purchase program designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and spur growth, they retained a pledge to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after the end of the buying.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank plans to take as many as five days to approve purchases of asset-backed securities when it starts buying the debt, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 The timeframe applies to larger transactions, while smaller purchases will be signed off in about 24 hours, said the people, who were briefed on the ECB’s asset-buying program and who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The definition of larger purchases is currently planned as those above 125 million euros ($156 million), one of the people said.
 The company is planning to get a secured asset-based revolving credit agreement of as much as $550 million and issue $11 billion of secured notes in order to repurchase as much as $600 million of its securities that don’t have liens on assets, Cleveland-based Cliffs said in a statement yesterday.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said last week policy makers must drive euro-area inflation higher quickly and will broaden their asset purchases if needed.
 Scheifele’s FOX 2013 three-year efficiency program, which ended last year, realized 12 billion euros in savings as part of a strategy to regain an investment-grade credit rating lost in 2008 following the $18 billion purchase of British cement maker Hanson.
 The Sheraton purchase allows Beijing-based Sunshine to diversify its holdings with a “trophy asset” in Sydney, an unnamed spokesman for the insurer said in the statement today.
 31 it raised its target for annual purchases of Japanese government bonds to 80 trillion yen ($706 billion), while tripling buying of real estate investment trusts.
 The BOJ’s salvo came 19 months after unleashing its initial asset-purchase plan and comes as the US.
 The Shanghai Composite Index has rallied 16 percent this year as funds flowed into mainland stocks before the start of the link, which allows a net 235 billion yuan in daily cross-border purchases.
 saying it would purchase about $2 billion of its own stock.
 The stock purchase from the market will be completed by Feb.
 A year earlier, the firmpurchased British brokerage Collins Stewart Hawkpoint Plc for$393 million.
 An Embraer or Bombardier purchase would be a departure for Chicago-based United, whose pilots only fly Boeing Co.
 Cheap gas has emboldened many consumers to step up autopurchases, with the industry poised for an unprecedented sixthstraight annual sales increase next year.
 The purchase won’t be funded from a 3 billion-rand program ADvTECH set aside for capital investments into existing and new facilities, Maasdorp said.
 All three shares extended losses today as Hong Kong stock purchases through the link have so far totaled about 26 billion yuan ($419 million), less than 15 percent of the amount bought by foreign investors in Shanghai.
 The Hang Seng gauge retreated 11 percent as Hong Kong stock purchases through the link today totaled 800 million yuan.
 International investors purchased the maximum 13 billion yuan of Shanghai shares allowed through the link by 1:57 pm.
 Hong Kong stock purchases were within expectations, Charles Li, the chief executive officer of Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd, said at a briefing after the bourse closed yesterday.
 Mainland traders with at least 500,000 yuan in their accounts are eligible to purchase Hong Kong shares.
 That deal was followed by a series of acquisitions, including the $155 billion purchase of E-Tek Dynamics Inc.
 29 the completion of its asset-purchase program, which has helped boost equity prices and kept bond yields subdued since 2009.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- DCC Plc, an Irish distributor of products from gas to gadgets, plans more acquisitions to expand across western Europe after spending its largest amount on purchases in a six-month period.
 DCC spent 148 million pounds ($240 million) on takeovers in the fiscal first half through September, including the purchase of Swedish technology company CapTech near the end of the period, the Dublin-based company said in a statement today.
 While the central bank is already expanding its range of asset purchases, it has yet to commit to broad-based bond buying, or quantitative easing.
 broadband provider so a purchase of O2, owned by Spain’s Telefonica SA, or EE, a joint venture between Deutsche Telekom AG and France’s Orange SA, would restore the former state telephone monopoly to a dominant position in the country.
 BT’s purchase of a mobile operator would change that in an instant, making it the biggest British company to offer the full “bundle” of all four services -- known in the industry as “quadplay”.
 The purchase volume of 22 card issuers in Canada reached $334 billion last year, according to The Nilson Report, a payments industry publication.
 With interchange fees ranging from 1 percent to 265 percent, according to Visa and MasterCard disclosures, annual revenue from those fees for financial firms surpasses C$5 billion, based on the Nilson Report purchase volume data.
 will take home the lion’s share of that, with roles on both the $346 billion purchase of Baker Hughes Inc.
 Indirect bidders, a category of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 50 percent of the notes, the most since August 2011, compared with an average of 452 percent at the past 10 offerings.
 Global sovereign-bond yields are dropping as central bankers in Europe and Asia try to fuel economic growth with stimulus while the Fed, which ended a bond-purchase program last month, considers when to raise interest rates next year.
 policy makers ended the central bank’s third round of bond purchases under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy on Oct.
 European Central Bank officials appeared divided over how far they should go in pursuing bond purchases as they tackle a slumping economy.
 BBVA, Spain’s second-biggest bank, is negotiating the potential purchase of as much as 149 percent of Turkiye Garanti Bankasi AS from Sahenk’s company Dogus Holding AS, the Bilbao-based lender said in a regulatory filing today.
 Shares of Garanti are almost unchanged since BBVA purchased the stock.
 The purchase of a 1489 percent holding by BBVA would reduce the total stake of Dogus Holding in Garanti to 934 percent, Hakan Aygun, an analyst at AK Yatirim in Istanbul, said in e-mailed comments.
 Federal Reserve’s end to asset purchases, sparked a selloff on Oct.
 That’s almost double 2013 purchases of 77 tons, International Monetary Fund data show.
 Central banks may increase purchases by as much as 22 percent in 2014, the World Gold Council estimates.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said yesterday that unconventional measures to stimulate the economy may include purchase of a variety of assets.
 Unseating Schlumberger The purchase of Baker Hughes would allow Halliburton to unseat Schlumberger Ltd, the world’s largest oilfield services company, in several key lines of business, according to oilfield consultant Spears & Associates.
 The company was discussing a structure that would have it use stock to pay for more than half the purchase, two of the people said.
 A measure backed by advocates of stricter firearm laws, including Michael Bloomberg, founder and majority owner of Bloomberg News parent Bloomberg LP, would require background checks for purchases at gun shows or online.
 Bernanke quipped that quantitative easing “works in practice, but it doesn’t work in theory” At the European Central Bank, President Mario Draghi may discover that when it comes to the euro area, large purchases of sovereign debt may not even work well in practice.
 Should Draghi decide sovereign-debt purchases are needed, he may struggle to win unanimous support in his Governing Council.
 “Unconventional measures might entail the purchase of a variety of assets, one of which is sovereign bonds” Too Long Any new measures would follow a flurry of activity since June that has included interest-rate cuts, long-term bank loans, and covered-bond purchases, with buying of asset-backed securities due to start as soon as today.
 Even if it falls further, the impact on inflation may be limited, said Janet Henry, chief European economist at HSBC Holdings Plc, who still expects government-bond purchases next year.
 She estimates only about 10 percent of goods and services bought by euro-zone households are purchased from outside the currency bloc.
 One impact of bond purchases by the Fed was to push investors into stocks, putting upward pressure on prices.
 As both a card issuer and network, AmEx earns fees each time Costco customers use cards to make a purchase and from extending credit.
 Aker is encouraged by the success of recent deals such as Det Norske Oljeselskap ASA’s $27 billion purchase of Marathon Oil Corp’s Norwegian unit, he said.
 In June, Altice sold 911 million euros in new stock and used part of the proceeds to fund the purchase of a 14 percent stake in Numericable from Cinven and Carlyle.
 It began trading in September 2011 at $1250 a share, raising almost $70 million, and from there went on a flurry of real estate purchases that made it the largest US.
 Red Lobster This year, the company purchased about 500 Red Lobster locations for about $15 billion as part of Darden Restaurants Inc’s sale of the restaurant chain to Golden Gate Capital.
 We’re not terminating our agreement but we’re suspending new purchases for the time being” Conference Call Schorsch told brokers on a conference call last week that the accounting errors at American Realty Capital Properties don’t affect AR Capital programs or those by Cole, according to a report in InvestmentNews.
 RCS may have broken off the Cole purchase because the issues at American Realty Capital Properties could spill over to Cole Capital, tainting efforts to sell shares of its nontraded real estate investment trusts, said BMO’s Adornato.
 International ad sales grew 33 percent following the May purchase of British broadcaster Channel 5.
 A private-equity deal with Apollo would top Blackstone Group LP’s $54 billion purchase of industrial-products maker Gates Global LLC in July, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Buyout firms have held off on making purchases this year, as valuations climb with stock benchmarks that have reached records.
 “Supply exceeds demand, giving purchasers an advantage over sellers in price negotiations.
 MVV expanded its clean-generation business by acquiring Windwaerts Energie GmbH in October and announcing the purchase of a majority stake in Juwi AG, one of Germany’s biggest developers of wind and solar plants.
 “In such a case, there would be another investment, and an acquisition of Mead Johnson can’t be excluded, it’s the most obvious target” Danone acquired the medical-nutrition unit through the 123 billion-euro purchase of Dutch baby-food maker Royal Numico NV in 2007.
 said China’s largest energy equity investment fund agreed to acquire 1 billion yuan ($161 million) worth of convertible bonds to fund the joint purchase of a 300-megawatt solar power project.
 Second-Biggest Banca Transilvania CEO Omer Tetik told journalists in Bucharest that the purchase price is “reasonable” and will be disclosed next year as it can still change in the meantime.
 Almost 90 percent of his wealth has disappeared this year, spurred by the investigation of his investment company AFK Sistema’s $25 billion purchase of Bashneft shares.
 2015 Financing It’s also planning to spend 401 million hryvnia next year to upgrade military hardware, 75 billion hryvnia to purchase weapons and equipment and 95 million hryvnia to call up 40,000 conscripts and train 10,000 contract servicemen, Poltorak said in parliament Dec.
 The hryvnia has lost 48 percent against the dollar this year, the biggest decline among all currencies tracked by Bloomberg, making purchases of materiel abroad even more difficult.
 That extended this year’s total purchases to $161 billion, the second-highest among eight Asian markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 “If we want to thrive in our industry, we need to be the best purchasers of the world,” as raw material and packaging represent 32 percent of sales, said the CEO.
 announced its decision to purchase ING Vysya Bank Ltd.
 The Udaipur-based lender was earlier in the year fined by the RBI for violating rules on the purchase of some property, deleting electronic records and failing to provide certain documents.
 The New York-based firm said it had purchased stakes in storage computer-maker EMC Corp.
 Up for consideration will be whether to drop their stated intention to hold short-term interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after they ended their asset-purchase program in October.
 The developer is looking for purchases in China and Australia, after spending $1 billion on overseas investments this year, he said.
 Tyco purchased the business in 1997.
 Before the 2008 financial crisis, banks purchased shares in thousands of private-equity and venture-capital funds.
 Possible Counterbidders As far as other potentially interested acquirers, Cowen’s Baral cited Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd’s recent investments in products for central nervous system disorders, as well as Actavis Plc’s purchase of Forest Laboratories Inc.
 SunEdison’s TerraForm Power project holding company will purchase up to 60 megawatts of the projects SunEdison builds this year and next year.
 Near-term one would expect there is room for a narrowing of periphery spreads as QE is fully priced,” he said, referring to quantitative easing, or central-bank purchases of government bonds.
 The FHFA developed the new rules for private guarantors like Radian to be eligible to insure loans purchased by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 “We suspect that the SNB will soon have to follow up the rate cut with further bouts of currency intervention” Jordan said today the SNB resumed purchases of foreign currencies in the past few days after a two-year hiatus.
 Policy makers there are set to consider expanding debt purchases beyond covered bonds and asset-backed securities to prevent a deflationary spiral.
 The bank has yet to purchase shares under its existing program that ends Jan.
 The company expects output of iron ore to climb to 340 million metric tons in 2015 including third-party purchases.
 Benchmark German 10-year yields are set for the biggest annual decline since 2008, propelled by speculation that the European Central Bank will extend its monetary stimulus to include euro-area sovereign-bond purchases.
 The prospect of government-bond purchases from the ECB has boosted securities from Austria to Spain as investors bet that the expansionary policy will push prices even higher.
 “I suspect that you’ll see a lot of purchases of gift cards in lieu of merchandise,” FedEx’s Smith said.
 He declined to elaborate on whether it would mean the replacement vessels for the navy’s six Collins Class submarines would be built in Australia or purchased from overseas.
 30, aiding efforts to reward investors, and the company also can still repurchase more than $10 billion of stock under its buyback plan.
 in 2009 over a possible purchase of Janus, two people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 Burger King Since being purchased by Brazilian private-equity firm 3G Capital Inc.
 Sales Jump Investors have purchased $188 billion of structured notes linked to the 10 most popular technology stocks so far this year.
 Oil prices have fallen by about half this year, dividing ECB officials as they consider whether to start large-scale sovereign-bond purchases, or quantitative easing.
 “It simply buys more time for Congress to forge a long-term agreement on these specific items –- some of which should not be extended in the future –- and, more importantly, on fundamental tax reform” In the Senate, Wyden has complained that the measure excludes tax breaks for the health care of laid-off workers and the purchase of plug-in electric motorcycles.
 Companies making capital purchases would have faster write-offs.
 Hearts on Fire Chow Tai Fook is very cautious with mergers and acquisitions, and is only exploring the mine purchases, Cheng said.
 Terms have been altered to ensure “the purchase price correctly reflects the true and eventual net asset impact of the aluminum exposure,” Standard Bank said in a regulatory filing today.
 Global equities slumped after the European Central Bank said policy makers will reassess stimulus next quarter, damping hopes for additional bond purchases this year.
 As inflation in the region is poised to turn negative, momentum is building for the European Central Bank to start a quantitative easing program of government bond purchases to boost growth.
 “We would expect the yield gap to widen in the first half of the year on expectations that the ECB will continue to pump cash into the system through the purchase of bonds and that the Fed will raise interest rates,” said Jonathan Pitkanen, the London-based head of investment-grade credit research at Threadneedle Asset Management Ltd, which oversees 926 billion pounds ($144 billion).
 It used proceeds to fund its purchase of lithium producer Rockwood Holdings Inc.
 Ultra-high-definition televisions, GoPro Inc’s cameras and video games also are popular gift purchases, Chukumba said.
 He doesn’t rule out a purchase of the international arm, he added.
 In Norway, for instance, 60 percent of Shell’s service-station revenue comes from non-fuel purchases while in the UK, the number is about 30 percent.
 food is purchased from gas station convenience stores, it’s only 27 percent in the UK.
 It scrapped the National Beef acquisition, completed the Smithfield purchase and turned JBS into a global food empire -- all with the help of state bank support.
 When JBS sold shares in a public offering in 2007, the bank’s investment arm approved 11 billion reais in equity to help purchase Swift, then the third-largest beef and pork company in the US.
 The ECB, which started purchases of covered bonds and asset-backed securities this year, will eventually extend its program into government debt, UBS Group AG, which previously forecast no QE, said yesterday.
 The ECB settled 368 million euros of asset-backed securities purchases in its first week of buying, the Frankfurt-based central bank said Dec.
 It’s a question of “when, rather than if,” the ECB starts sovereign-bond purchases, Mike Amey, a London-based money manager at Pacific Investment Management Co, said in a Bloomberg TV interview yesterday.
 The 07 percent gain in purchases matched the highest estimate of economists surveyed by Bloomberg and followed a 05 percent advance in October that was larger than previously reported, Commerce Department figures showed.
 The People’s Bank of China cut benchmark interest rates for the first time since 2012 and European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said the ECB will widen its asset-purchase program if necessary.
 Rights Management Apple was curious about how RealNetworks was able to get around Apple’s digital rights management software that prevented music purchased elsewhere from running on the iPod, Cue said.
 Deutsche Postbank offers 10-year mortgages with afixed rate of 15 percent for as much as 60 percent of thepurchase price, according to its website.
 Iamgold could make purchases valued at about $800 million alone or consider larger transactions with a partner, said CEO Steve Letwin, who said he recently met with companies and funds in China that showed interest in partnerships.
 Iamgold will get $500 million in cash next month after the pending sale of a Canadian mine and could use the money to help pay for a purchase or to develop a project it buys with shares.
 “If prices go up or the economy tanks, discretionary purchases like performance cars are the first to go,” she said.
 Bonds rated below AAA or sold by issuers graded lower than AA are no longer allowed for use as collateral in short-term loans obtained through repurchase agreements, China’s clearing agency said Dec.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- AVIC Capital Co’s plans to purchase aircraft lessor Avolon Holdings Ltd.
 “It would mean substantial economic benefits and technological development for Italy” Italy in February 2012 announced that its initial planned purchase of 131 jets would be reduced to 90.
 Bimbo, which has spent more than $5 billion since 2009 on acquisitions such as Sara Lee Corp’s North American bakeries and Hostess Brands Inc’s Beefsteak bread brand, purchased Saputo Bakery Inc.
 The Saputo purchase is expected to generate more than C$130 million in annual sales and C$155 million in adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, or Ebitda, according to the statement.
 “The ECB needs to see the effects of the current measures implemented and also assess the effect of the significantly lower oil price on the European economy” The Stoxx 600 rallied 13 percent from a low in October through yesterday amid optimism the ECB will eventually embark on government-bond purchases, while central banks in China and Japan boosted stimulus.
 Since June, the central bank has cut interest rates twice, offered cheap loans to banks to spur lending and started purchase programs for covered bonds and asset-backed securities.
 He expects Rio to take on debt to announce a $2 billion buyback in February followed by a larger share repurchase a year later.
 Poland became Raiffeisen’s second-biggest eastern European business in 2012 when it completed the purchase of Polbank EFG from Greece’s Eurobank Ergasias SA.
 “These two positions could be reconciled by a pre-announcement of an unspecified widening of the scope of the ECB’s asset purchases,” said Robert Kuenzel, an economist at Daiwa Capital Markets Europe Ltd.
 Those may include purchases of corporate or agency bonds, or full-blown quantitative easing by buying government debt.
 The BOE kept its key interest rate at a record-low 05 percent in London today, while its bond-purchase plan stayed at 375 billion pounds ($588 billion).
 “An asset-purchase program of 500 billion euros, in addition to existing policies, would increase the ECB’s balance sheet back to its early 2012 level,” he said in a note to clients, adding that government bonds should form the largest component of the program.
 “However, purchases of investment-grade corporate bonds, agency bonds, blue-chip stocks and gold should also be considered” QE Pushback While Draghi was able to announce last month that his council was “unanimous” in its balance-sheet stance, that accord splinters once sovereign debt is brought into the mix.
 She said the “purchase of government securities is inevitably linked to a serious incentive problem” by depressing borrowing costs for funding national budgets.
 Those who produced and purchased these bananas may not even know that drugs have been traveling in their container, he said.
 The argument goes like this: Declining oil will give consumers more disposable income that they can use to purchase more efficient vehicles, energy economist Philip Verleger said Dec.
 The central bankers in October ended an unprecedented monthly asset purchase program that inflated the balance sheet to more than $4 trillion.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Housing demand has been restrained by tight credit and sluggish wage growth, even as low borrowing costs make purchases more affordable.
 New-home sales will jump 16 percent to 510,000 and purchases of existing homes will climb 5 percent to 521 million, according to the median estimates.
 It follows Olam’s smaller purchase of US.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Fast-expanding Gulf carrier Etihad Airways PJSC has the option of taking a stake in unprofitable South African Airways as the latest in a string of purchases that included a multi-billion-dollar investment in Alitalia SpA.
 The Autorite des Marches Financiers is looking into trading activities in Amaya shares in relation to the company’s purchase of Oldford Group Ltd, according to a statement today.
 The Pacifico, Choluteca I and Choluteca II power plants will supply energy to the grid in Honduras under 20-year power purchase agreements with ENEE, the state-owned electricity company.
(Bloomberg) -- Etihad Airways, which owns stakes in nine airlines, said it’s planning no further purchases in the short term and will focus on consolidating existing partnerships.
 PTT’s exploration unit, PTT Exploration and Production Pcl, in April agreed to pay $1 billion in cash for Hess Corp’s stakes in oil and gas assets, adding to its 2012 purchase of Cove Energy Plc’s oil and gas assets in Mozambique for $16 billion.
 Policy makers ended bond purchases under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy in October.
 Bidder Participation Indirect bidders, a class of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 357 percent of the notes sold today, the least since July, compared with an average of 321 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 145 percent of the notes, compared with 183 percent at the previous 10 sales.
 To revive growth in the euro-area, ECB policy makers are considering supplementing their negative deposit rate and asset purchases.
 Languishing Inflation Inflation in Europe is already languishing below the ECB’s goal of just under 2 percent, and the central bank has already started purchases of covered bonds and asset-backed securities, and introduced a negative deposit rate.
 homebuyers will pay 12 percent tax on every pound they spend above 15 million pounds when they purchase a home under Osborne’s reforms.
 Investors sold a net 630 million yuan ($102 million) of Shanghai stocks, raising the daily purchase limit to 136 billion yuan from 13 billion yuan.
 The New York-based firm said it had purchased stakes instorage computer-maker EMC Corp.
 Enel completed the 840 million-euro ($105 billion) purchase of the 66 percent stake in Bratislava, Slovakia-based Slovenske in April 2006, 19 months after it won the tender.
 Watt last month announced that lenders won’t be asked to repurchase loans with inaccurate data or misrepresentations of buyers’ qualifications unless the flaws are significant and apply to multiple loans, or unless there’s clear evidence of fraud.
 Applicants approved for mortgages to purchase homes had an average score of 755 in August, according to Ellie Mae, a mortgage technology company.
 He estimates average purchases for a wedding at about 200 grams.
 Overseas purchases in the April 1 to Nov.
 The recent jump in uranium may take several years to reach consumers because the fuel is purchased well in advance and it can take six years to replace all the fuel in a reactor, he said.
 Japan has built up ‘‘substantial inventories” and won’t need to purchase fuel for several years, Entergy’s Rives said in Nov.
 Green Tree Servicing LLC, another purchaser of the ResCap portfolio, was pursuing corrective action after failing most metrics earlier this year.
 Trafigura has purchased stakes in pipelines, mines, smelters, ports and storage terminals to diversify its business and wring efficiencies from its trading operations.
 Trafigura, which trades about 25 million barrels of oil per day, said last month it would soon begin voluntarily disclosing some payments to foreign governments for oil purchases.
 Companies from Next Plc to Hennes & Mauritz AB have bemoaned mild fall weather across much of Europe, which has led shoppers to delay purchases of cold-weather items and left stores with high levels of inventory.
 As part of the probe, the government is examining a practice known as parking, where traders seek to skirt capital regulations or internal rules by selling bonds to accomplices with an understanding they’ll repurchase them later, one of the people said.
 The maker of the E6 electric car has benefited from Chinese government incentives to promote the purchase of alternative-energy vehicles and subsidies to build charging infrastructure.
 “I doubt the ECB will announce further easing on Thursday but Draghi is expected to be dovish, paving the way for an extension of central-bank private-sector asset purchases in early 2015” Italy’s 10-year yield fell two basis points, or 002 percentage point, to 201 percent as of 4:17 pm.
 ECB Purchases The ECB said today it settled 368 million euros in purchases of asset-backed securities as of Nov.
 is awaiting approval for its $452 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc, and AT&T Inc.
 ‘Hot Topic’ “It really is in the advertising industry’s interest to take care of this problem because their purchases will work better,” Tiffany said.
 The purchase of Rye Brook, New York-based IndexIQ adds $15 billion in assets under management, according to a statement today from the buyer.
 The link, started last month, allows a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases between Shanghai and Hong Kong.
 payments network, raised its quarterly divided 45 percent to 16 cents a share and announced a new stock repurchase program.
 The company may buy back as much as $375 billion of its stock after completing a current $35 billion repurchase program, the Purchase, New York-based firm said today in a statement.
 Last December, the company announced the current repurchase program as well as an 83 percent dividend increase and a 10-for-1 stock split.
 As of yesterday, the bank-card network had about $275 million remaining under its current repurchase program, the firm said.
 They’re making more frequent and modest purchases instead of saving up for one large status item like a designer handbag.
 Results were helped by growth in loans and deposits, as well as the purchase last year of a C$33 billion Visa Inc.
 LSE, which completed its purchase of Frank Russell this month, may fetch $13 billion to $15 billion for the investment-management business, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The event lets distributors renew expired power-purchase agreements and limits their exposure to the more-expensive spot market.
 The average price for energy sold in today’s auction was 19709 reais a megawatt-hour, below the 388-real price anticipated for spot-market purchases next year by Ricardo Savoia, director of the consulting company Thymos Energia.
 Utilities purchased energy at the maximum spot price of 82283 reais a megawatt-hour last week, according to CCEE’s website.
 Sports Cars The next three most satisfying vehicles in the Consumer Reports Survey, after the Model S, were sports cars: General Motors Co’s Chevrolet Corvette Stingray, with a 95 percent satisfaction rating, and Volkswagen AG’s Porsche Cayman and Boxster, which tied for third with 91 percent of buyers saying they’d purchase them again.
 APA, Australia’s largest gas pipeline owner, is interested in LNG pipeline sales after the purchase of the newly-built 543-kilometer (337-mile) network connecting gas fields to BG’s plant in Queensland state, Managing Director Mick McCormack said in a phone interview.
 Iron Mountain said in a statement it sees “little point in having further discussions with Recall regarding a purchase of the company” because its proposal “accurately reflected the value creation potential of the combined businesses” Better Offer Recall shares traded in Sydney at A$640 on Dec.
 China’s securities regulator this month cautioned investors on share purchases and started inspecting some brokerages’ margin finance businesses.
 export markets and purchase one-third of US.
 “That said there are a number of lingering questions regarding the strategic rationale for the purchase,” Freeman said.
(Bloomberg) -- Four men who admitted trading on insider information on IBM Corp’s $12 billion purchase of SPSS Inc.
 Topcu said about 50 percent of his airline’s oil purchases are hedged, and that these wagers have helped the carrier make “strategic budgets” Oil Hedging “We’re in line this year which shows we’ve done a good job,” Topcu said.
 bank, agreed to pay a $3 million fine after discovering that it failed to deliver paperwork on more than 250,000 customer purchases of exchange-traded funds.
 New York-based Citigroup also may have failed to deliver prospectuses on more than 15 million ETF purchases from 2009 through April 2011, Finra said.
 It hired Banco BTG Pactual SA in August to explore a purchase of Tim Participacoes SA, the Brazilian unit of Telecom Italia SpA.
 Broadcom also announced a $1 billion stock repurchase program for 2015.
 The carrier didn’t say how many people purchased hose tickets.
 “Singapore Airlines will be contacting affected customers and travel agents to advise that their business class bookings will be honored at the original fare purchased,” the carrier said in the statement.
 He led the 2012 purchase of aviation-equipment maker Goodrich Corp, a $165 billion deal that was United Technologies’ biggest ever, and reshaped the business around aerospace and building services.
 The solar facility’s purchase price wasn’t provided.
 “We said, ‘We can afford to pay that’” Backup Plan It was the second Long Island City purchase for Property Markets Group.
 When asked if Rockrose would consider condos on the site, Elghanayan said, “Totally, unabashedly, yes” The company’s last condo offering in Long Island City reached the market in September 2008 and took years to sell as buyer credit dried up and purchases stalled in the real estate slump.
 With $39 trillion in foreign exchange reserves in China and increasingly internationalized companies seeking to diversify incomes geographically, purchases abroad are on the rise.
 for $235 million, the first purchase of an overseas brokerage by a mainland securities firm.
 The appeals court, overturning that finding, said the suit failed to establish that Gagosian exercised control or dominance over Perelman’s MAFG Art Fund and MacAndrews & Forbes Group, limited liability companies that “frequently purchased, sold and exchanged works of art as investments” “We are gratified that the court unanimously dismissed this case,” said Gagosian’s attorney, Matthew Dontzin of Dontzin Nagy & Fleissig LLP.
 With a purchase, Madrid-based Santander could reclaim a stake it sold during Europe’s financial crisis as it sought to raise capital.
 auto-industry is on track to sell more than 16 million cars and trucks this year, the most since 2007, data compiled by Bloomberg show, as consumer confidence and low-borrowing costs spur purchases.
 30 that it may go out of business should it have to pay Airbus Group NV a penalty after the planned purchase of six A380 superjumbos fell through.
 Production capacity will climb 8 percent to about 65 million metric tons a year after the purchase, Mumbai-based UltraTech said in an exchange filing.
 The company is discussing the purchase of Jaiprakash’s cement plants in the states of Uttar Pradesh, Madhya Pradesh and Andhra Pradesh, people with knowledge of the matter said Dec.
 This will be Birla’s second purchase of Jaiprakash’s assets in 15 months.
(Bloomberg) -- China’s decision to lift an import ban on some genetically modified crops triggered an immediate jump in purchases of US.
 Rame also has signed a power purchase agreement with a Santiago school to install, own and operate a 25-kilowatt rooftop solar project.
 By November 2013, Mayer wanted more from the ad platform -- and pushed to create a marketplace where native promotions could be purchased together with mobile search ads.
 In August, Yahoo purchased Flurry Inc, a mobile analytics and advertising services company, for about $300 million.
 CP Group agreed to buy Itochu stock as part of the tie-up while the Japanese company said it will purchase a 25 percent stake in CP Group’s Hong Kong-listed unit.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Publicis Groupe SA is marketing 12 billion euros ($15 billion) of bonds in its first debt sale in five years as the world’s third-largest advertising company seeks to fund its purchase of US.
 The New York-based firm purchased foreclosed single-family houses to rent out, and has spent more than $8 billion buying and renovating properties to become the biggest single-family rental-home landlord in the US.
 Rents are climbing as many residents remain unable to buy properties, and banks’ reluctance to fund purchases of fixer-uppers offers institutions a niche that’s inaccessible to individual buyers.
 economy is strong enough to withstand a slowdown overseas and tighter monetary policy after the Fed wound up its asset-purchase program.
 ECMC’s planned purchase doesn’t give students the option of discharging their debt if they leave their programs, even though multiple federal and state agencies have alleged Corinthian inflated its job placement rates, according to a letter today from 46 advocacy groups.
 Saint-Gobain said the purchase should be completed by the second half of 2015.
 In October, de Blasio and Vance said they would use about $90 million of the city’s’s $440 million share of the settlement to purchase hand-held devices that would connect police squad cars to the department’s crime and counter-terrorism databases.
 Ten-year yields’ annual drop defied economists’ forecasts for an increase as the Fed ended its bond-purchase stimulus.
 It ended a bond-purchase program under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy in October.
 The oil-merchanting unit includes Morgan Stanley’s physical oil inventory and related purchase, sale and supply agreements.
 shareholders will vote on its proposed purchase of the remaining 55 percent stake in Alliance Boots GmbH that it doesn’t already own for about $153 billion.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 Individual homeowners and investors across the country are receiving more of these mortgages to purchase and renovate dilapidated multi-family buildings -- often in gentrifying areas where prices are soaring.
 Jeffrey Berger, the principal of a small real estate development firm, used a construction loan from the TD unit to purchase and renovate a 4,000-square-foot home in the Hamilton Heights section of Harlem.
 The gauge has risen about 175 percent during the five-year bull market that began in March 2009, propelled by better-than-estimated corporate results and three rounds of Fed bond purchases.
 The ECB will review its stimulus program early next year, with analysts predicting it will start large-scale asset purchases, including government bonds, as soon as January.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- TeliaSonera AB’s $687 million purchase of Tele2 AB’s Norwegian business may be blocked by the country’s competition watchdog in a boon to state-controlled market leader Telenor ASA.
 While 93 percent of consumers plan to do some online shopping this holiday season, 54 percent will primarily purchase gifts from stores, according to the Atlanta-based firm, which worked with IDG Research Services on the survey.
 Almost 90 percent of Web customers surveyed expect their online purchases to arrive in two to seven days without an extra charge.
 The investors are seeking a probe into several transactions, including the proposed C$118 million ($102 million) purchase of film studio Vision Globale that they said was “motivated by reasons other than good financial business sense” The shareholders said the deal is driven in part by the “political desires” of Quebecor’s controlling shareholder, Pierre Karl Peladeau.
 “The purchase price for its assets is grossly inflated and looks to have been calculated to make certain shareholders of Global Vision whole,” the investors said.
 added 27 percent as RBC Capital Markets analyst Michael Yee said the company should “aggressively” repurchase shares following an 18 percent drop earlier in the week.
 ‘Deal Machine’ Danaher, the maker of everything from dental equipment to water filters, has spent about $3 billion on takeovers since May, including the $2 billion purchase of Nobel Biocare Holding AG.
 22 amid speculation officials are preparing to consider sovereign-bond purchases to drive down borrowing costs and revive inflation.
 about a partnership to jointly purchase Visteon Corp’s 70 percent stake in Halla Climate, the tire company said in an e-mail.
 economy is strong enough to withstand a slowdown overseas and tighter monetary policy after the Federal Reserve wound up its asset-purchase program.
 Governor Raghuram Rajan, who left the central bank’s benchmark repurchase rate at 8 percent for a fifth meeting on Dec.
 They also include the 2003 purchase of US.
 and CarVal Investors LLC is poised to purchase about 1 billion euros ($125 billion) of real estate loans linked to the former Anglo Irish Bank Corp, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 This week, Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc agreed to sell Irish real estate loans with a face value of 48 billion pounds to Cerberus, while Blackstone Group LP purchased office buildings in south Dublin from a group of investors.
 They will be free to sample and $499 to purchase, Bob Chapek, head of Disney’s consumer products division, said in an interview.
 Had it been approved, it would have led to purchases of at least 1,500 metric tons.
 While analysts have predicted retail sales will increase in the final two months of the year, many of those purchases are expected to shift online or be won with discounts that threaten retailers’ profitability.
 economy is strong enough to withstand a slowdown overseas and tighter monetary policy after the Fed wound up its asset-purchase program.
 Imports rose on purchases of capital equipment including aircraft.
 The purchase is expected to be completed in the first half of 2015, after which Atos will provide IT services to Xerox.
 BYD has benefited from Chinese government incentives to promote the purchase of alternative-energy vehicles and subsidies to build charging infrastructure.
 Earlier this year, the Toronto-based newspaper publisher, in the midst of its 12th-straight quarter of declining year-over-year revenue, decided the key to turning itself around was the purchase of 175 more newspapers.
 Analysts have said that McDonald’s could purchase more stock and convert stores to franchised locations, where the franchisee pays beef and labor costs.
 Bonds rated below AAA or sold by issuers graded lower than AA are no longer allowed for use as collateral in short-term loans obtained through repurchase agreements, the nation’s clearing agency for exchanges said yesterday.
 New applications for repurchase agreements have been dropping over the past few weeks, and last week’s net increase amounted to only 5 billion yuan on the exchange market, it said.
 “Because low-rated bonds can’t be used for repurchases on the exchange, this will force many financial institutions to deleverage,” said Zhou Hao, a Shanghai-based economist at Australia & New Zealand Banking Group Ltd.
 “Once customers have the chance to experience how well the i3 fits into their daily life, the more likely they are to make the purchase decision,” said Bernhard Ederer, a BMW spokesman.
 Southern and Turner Renewable Energy LLC have jointly purchased seven solar projects since the start of 2010.
 Lending for non-purchase mortgages jumped 11percent this quarter to the highest level in a year, accordingto the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 Ocwen hasn’t made any deals since February when the NewYork Department of Financial Services blocked its purchase fromWells Fargo because of concerns that the servicer’s explosivegrowth put homeowners at risk.
 The Houston-based provider of hydraulic-fracturing services decided to delay the offering intended to fund the purchase of a unit of Nabors Industries Ltd.
 The Bank of Russia provided 31 trillion rubles in seven-day repurchase agreements at its latest auction on Dec.
 Since Tesla is selling cars that can top $100,000 to very wealthy people, the price at the pump is not a prime motivator in that consumer’s purchase decision, he said.
 “Although the recent decline in oil prices has caused concern about EV demand, we believe EV purchasers are focused on the long-term benefit of not being exposed to oil price fluctuations,” he said.
 The purchase is expected to close in the first quarter, Blackstone said in a statement today.
 The buyers of the mining operation didn’t purchase some of the equipment James River said is worth about $7 million.
 A purchase of Talisman is unlikely to be the first of a flood of deals in Canada’s oil patch, said Chris Feltin, an analyst at Macquarie Group Ltd.
 The performance defied predictions made a year ago, when strategists forecast a selloff as the Federal Reserve ended a bond-purchase program amid economic gains and discussed when to raise interest rates for the first time since 2006.
 “Interbank liquidity continued to improve” The PBOC, which has offered repurchase agreements that withdraw funds every Tuesday and Thursday for the past four months, didn’t conduct such operations today for the third time in a row, according to traders at primary dealers required to bid at the auctions.
 “In the worst case scenario, if people do not go to theaters to watch these movies and do not purchase DVDs, there will be 25 billion yen estimated loss” Sony Pictures has been pressing ahead with business as much as possible, the person familiar with the matter said.
 DBS completed its $220 million purchase of Societe Generale SA’s Asian wealth-management business in October, boosting its assets under management by about 15 percent to S$88 billion ($67 billion).
 Fredriksen’s purchased shares on the same day a class-action lawsuit was filed against Seadrill in New York by Robbins Geller Rudman & Dowd LLP on behalf of buyers of American Depositary Receipts, alleging the company has misled investors about the strength of its business and prospects.
 “They’ll need to scale back expansion plans or fully freeze them until the situation improves” The rate increase may also damp retail sales as loans become less affordable in the country where half the cars and about 30 percent of electronics were purchased with loans, according to Fedyakov.
 A year ago, China made its biggest ever purchase of US- made ethanol, which is added to gasoline to boost octane and reduce emissions, when it bought 84,000 barrels.
 In August, the country purchased another 79,000 barrels, EIA data show.
 after the $585 million purchase of PolymerLatex from TowerBrook Capital Partners in 2010.
 Kaltman’s law firm, New York-based law firm Wolf Popper LLP, seeks to represent other purchasers of Petrobras ADRs between May 20, 2010 and Nov.
 The cost of the swaps, the fixed payment to receive the floating seven-day repurchase rate, jumped 13 basis points to 338 percent as of 4:23 pm, the highest level in 10 weeks, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Claims that Apple “blew up” the iPods of customers who bought music from RealNetworks, to force them to purchase another iPod, were concocted by consumer lawyers who don’t understand iTunes technology, Apple lawyers said.
 The case was over versions of the iPod Classic, iPod Nano and iPod Touch purchased from 2006 to 2009.
 The digital music trial hit a snag when the consumer leading the lawsuit had to be disqualified as a representative for potential victims of Apple’s conduct because she didn’t purchase any of the iPods covered by the case.
 coal imports increased 37 percent to 122 million tons this year, led by purchases from Colombia, EIA data show.
 Another private equity firm, Clayton, Dubilier & Rice LLC purchased a landscape unit from Deere in 2013.
 Potential purchasers would include private-equity firms and mid-tier pharmaceutical companies, Chief Executive Officer Andrew Witty said at the time.
 He recently purchased 500,000 shares of the Oklahoma City-based shale producer, his biggest since joining the company’s board in 2012, according to regulatory filings compiled by InsiderInsightscom.
 Last week, Loews made another purchase of about 410,000 shares.
 Charles Cusack III, chief operating officer at Halcon, made two purchases last month adding a total of 70,000 shares, regulatory filings show.
 “But since I’m a homeowner, it’s really not” Foreign investors have poured into Mexico’s first mortgage real-estate investment trust, which is using some of the 8625 billion pesos raised in a share sale last month to fund purchases of inflation-adjusted mortgages.
 The average interest rate is about 9 percent for the 16 billion pesos of mortgages that the REIT has purchased so far.
 “The indication from the government is that this trend in decision-making will continue” The approvals add to Modi’s other steps, such as allowing more foreign investment in defense and trying to overcome a history of graft scandals that slowed purchases.
 The proposals include 190 billion rupees for submarines, a 158 billion-rupee purchase of artillery -- the first acquisition of large-caliber guns since the 1980s -- and a 32 billion-rupee deal to buy 8,356 Spike anti-tank guided missiles and 321 launchers from Rafael Advanced Defense Systems Ltd.
 The purchase price values Orange at 72 times 2013 earnings, said Christoph Wirtz, an analyst at Bank am Bellevue in Kusnacht, Switzerland.
 Societe Generale helped finance Darmstadt, Germany-based Merck KGaA’s $17 billion purchase of St.
 banks to a more stringent capital framework than our global competitors could be a misguided economic decision” Short-term wholesale funding would include repurchase agreements, securities lending, brokered deposits and short sales, among other forms of borrowing, according to the Fed.
 Interest Rates The world’s second-largest economy, which purchases about 67 percent of seaborne ore, cut benchmark interest rates in November for the first time in more than two years.
 Cliffs had also planned to repurchase portions of its $500 million of 395 percent notes maturing in 2018, the $400 million of 59 percent securities due 2020, the $500 million of 48 percent bonds due in 2020 and the $700 million of 4875 percent notes maturing in 2021.
 Market leaders include Amazon, which purchased the shoe site Zapposcom in 2009 for $119 billion, and Foot Locker.
 The region’s shares rallied and the euro reached a two-year low after Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank may broaden its asset-purchase program to include government bonds.
 Carillion announced the purchase of a 60 percent stake in Canadian Rokstad Power Corporation last week.
 Oil Prices Falling oil prices helped depress Europe’s inflation outlook, increasing demand for fixed-income assets and stoking bets that the European Central Bank may extend its asset-purchase plan to include government bonds in order to boost prices.
 Dronina said she will likely proceed with her purchase of the apartment, which may cost as much as 3 million rubles.
 The film opened in more than 300 locations after becoming available for rent and purchase at Google Play and other websites, according to Sony Corp’s Culver City, California-based entertainment division.
 New Entrant The prospect of further ECB support in the form of government-bond purchases, known as quantitative easing, has driven yields from Austria to Spain to record lows.
 The acquisition “is one of the largest transactions involving the purchase of a foreign business by a Polish company in recent years,” Adam Purwin, Cargo’s chief executive officer, said in the statement.
 BP’s participation in the development would reduce the risk of delays and ease the burden on Rosneft as it integrates other recently purchased assets and businesses, according to a research note by Sberbank analysts Alex Fak and Valery Nesterov.
 Such days with negative news about liquidity are more difficult to handle as there is hardly any safe haven” China Liquidity China’s clearing agency for exchanges said yesterday it won’t allow bonds rated below AAA or sold by issuers graded lower than AA to be used as collateral for short-term loans obtained through repurchase agreements.
 China will probably scrap housing purchase limits next year, adding to positive sentiment, she said in a note.
 economy is strong enough to withstand a slowdown overseas and tighter monetary policy after the Fed wound up its asset-purchase program.
 “It hasn’t happened in a long, long time” Somewhat mirroring that transaction, Lenovo this October purchased IBM’s low-end server business for $21 billion, making it the third-largest server vendor behind HP and Dell.
 “The purchase of government bonds is really what markets are waiting for, but it’s becoming too much of a consensus view,” Knuthsen said.
 Actavis acquired the experimental medicine when it purchased Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Shifting Allegiances The story of the alleged third version is one of industrial sleuthing and shifting allegiances among insiders in the guardrail trade, a business worth hundreds of millions of dollars in taxpayer-funded purchases.
 4 that “all assets but gold” are under consideration for purchase as officials seek to step up aid to the economy.
 Belgium, France Euro-area sovereign securities also advanced after the Wall Street Journal reported Coeure as saying large-scale asset purchases centered on government bonds may start early next year.
 The prospect of government bond purchases from the ECB has boosted securities from Austria to Spain, driving yields to the lowest on record as investors bet that the policy will push prices even higher.
(Bloomberg) -- European car sales increased at the slowest pace in a year in November as waning economic growth discouraged customers from making purchases, prompting automakers including Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV to cut prices.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer agreed in June to buy most of the assets for 124 billion euros ($152 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever, and the purchase should close next year.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- The Canadian government has approved Burger King Worldwide Inc’s purchase of Tim Hortons Inc.
 “With the government measures in place, it has become very hard to do development of residential properties” The government’s curbs have included a cap on debt at 60 percent of a borrower’s income and higher stamp duties on home purchases.
 So these are good times for them” As banks including JP Morgan Chase & Co, Deutsche Bank AG and Barclays Plc have exited or pulled back their physical commodity activities, trading houses have purchased assets such as storage tanks, pipelines and refineries.
(Bloomberg) -- NQ Mobile Inc, the Chinese mobile-security company accused by short seller Carson Block of overstating revenue, surged 33 percent after saying it plans to repurchase $80 million in shares.
 - Germany will help finance Israel’s purchase of warships.
 More than 90 percent of respondents in Bloomberg’s monthly survey of economists predict the bank will begin large-scale purchases of sovereign debt next year, up from 57 percent last month.
 Web Software Adobe has been shifting its business away from one-time purchases of software to subscriptions for cloud-based tools.
 Stock Photography Adobe will knit Fotolia into Creative Cloud, and customers will be able to view and purchase more than 34 million images and videos, the company said.
 The acquisition, Adobe’s third-biggest after the purchase of Omniture Inc.
 Kaltman’s law firm, New York-based law firm Wolf Popper LLP, seeks to represent other purchasers of ADRs from May 20, 2010, to Nov.
 Along with the cuts, it has purchased foreign currency to weaken the shekel and help exports that account for a third of the $274 billion economy.
 Bear Stearns Cos, which was subsequently purchased by JPMorgan, also settled then, as did Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc, UBS Warburg and US.
 Through the first three quarters of the year they spent $515 billion on repurchases, a rate that were it maintained would trail only 2007 for the highest level ever, Birinyi data show.
 Indirect bidders, a class of investors that includes foreign central banks, purchased 357 percent of the notes at today’s sale, compared with an average of 321 percent for the past 10 sales.
 Direct bidders, non-primary-dealer investors that place their bids directly with the Treasury, purchased 145 percent of the notes, compared with 183 percent at the previous 10 sales.
 FuelCell sold six fuel-cell modules with a total of 84 megawatts of capacity to Posco during the quarter, almost doubling the amount purchased by Korea’s largest steelmaker in the fiscal year ending at the end of October.
 That’s in addition to the 42 megawatts of complete fuel-cell kits Posco purchased from FuelCell during the year.
 (WAG) shareholders will vote on its proposedpurchase of the remaining 55 percent stake in Alliance BootsGmbH that it doesn’t already own for about $153 billion.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 personal spending probably climbed at a faster rate inNovember as rising employment and lower gasoline prices spurredpurchases at the start of the holiday-shopping season, accordingto a Bloomberg survey.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 The number of purchases by first-time buyers has fallen 123 percent in the three months through October, LSL Property Services Plc said last week.
 Those purchases will take Sky’s adjusted debt to about 79 billion pounds, S&P said when it lowered the company’s rating by one level to BBB.
 Stock purchases that sent the Shanghai Composite Index to a three-year high today are “irrational,” said Ken Peng, a strategist at Citigroup Inc’s private bank in Hong Kong.
 “Why should this one be different?” Investors bought 997 billion yuan ($16 billion) of shares using margin debt on the Shanghai bourse yesterday, taking the outstanding value of stock purchases through borrowed money to a record 5521 billion yuan, according to data from the bourse.
 It expanded through purchases including Barings Bank in 1995.
 Bitcoins are not now in wide circulation, but can be used to purchase everything from hotel rooms to psychiatric services to coffee.
 sold $17 billion in the biggest dollar-denominated bond offering in more than a year to help fund its $42 billion purchase of Covidien Plc.
 are the largest purchasers of raw milk from farmers in Russia, according to the National Milk Producers’ Union.
 Since Danone and PepsiCo acquired Russia’s largest dairy producers, raw milk purchases have fallen in several regions where the companies operate, the agency said.
 The hotel owner agreed last month to purchase the Four Seasons Resort Scottsdale at Troon North for $140 million on expectations that a rebound in corporate travel will accelerate, said Chairman and President Raymond “Rip” Gellein.
 Resort purchases probably will increase next year as buyers are drawn by higher group spending and a lack of new construction, according to David Loeb, an analyst at Milwaukee-based Robert W.
 Maulay said the purchase price, equivalent to 8 times the target’s earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, topped his 122 billion-pound estimate.
 The larger one, in which owners seek $10 billion, is for vehicles purchased afterward.
 Pearson’s stake was purchased for $138 million and about 603,000 shares of common stock, New York-based Barnes & Noble said in a regulatory filing today.
 is making the rest of North America’s big energy purchases of 2014 look extravagant.
 The Spanish company’s $13 billion deal to buy the Canadian producer was the cheapest among the five largest oil and natural gas purchases on the continent this year, including debt.
 Other notable purchases included Whiting Petroleum Corp’s takeover of Kodiak Oil & Gas Corp.
 Encana’s purchase of Athlon was announced when US.
 consumers spend money on nonessential purchases likeclothes and cars.
 Singapore Air said it doesn’t immediately know how many people purchased those tickets.
 economy is strong enough to withstand a slowdown overseas and tighter monetary policy after the Federal Reserve wound up its asset-purchase program at the end of October.
 The two previous lead plaintiffs were taken off the case after Apple questioned whether their iPod purchases qualified them to be representatives in the class-action case.
 Rogers disqualified the other plaintiff after Apple revealed that the iPods she claimed to have bought were either not covered by the lawsuit or had been purchased with the credit card of her then-husband’s law firm.
 Gates Global The private-equity deal tops Blackstone Group LP’s $54 billion purchase of industrial-products maker Gates Global LLC in July, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Buyout firms have held off on making purchases this year, as valuations climb with stock benchmarks that have reached records.
 The 07 percent increase in purchases matched the highest estimate of economists surveyed by Bloomberg and followed a 05 percent advance in October that was larger than previously reported, Commerce Department figures showed today in Washington.
 BGC Partners also plans to purchase the Swedish and Dutch assets of RP Martin in 2015, it said in a statement today.
 “The growth has been slower than expected, especially recently, and this has caused investors to speculate that they will slow the purchase of metals moving forward,” said Jeff Sica, president of Morristown, New Jersey-based Sica Wealth Management LLC, which oversees $1 billion in assets.
 The purchase would create the largest US.
 Increased appetite for risk has made investors more willing to take on debt to finance equity purchases.
 Italy announced in February 2012 that its initial planned purchase of 131 jets would be reduced to 90.
 16 on charges linked to the investment company’s purchase of shares in oil producer OAO Bashneft.
 The central bank measures, which also include the provision of foreign-exchange loans and additional repurchase auctions, come after the Finance Ministry bought rubles today to arrest the worst depreciation since 1998.
 The Bank of Russia said two days ago it will boost the limit on 28-day foreign-exchange repurchase auctions to $5 billion from $15 billion.
 “Excluding military action out of Russia, I don’t see any reasons for an immediate move” Traders purchase options on the VIX as insurance against share losses because the volatility gauge typically rises as stocks fall.
 It purchased Brussels-based ABX Logistics Worldwide SA in 2008.
 and Barclays Plc had predicted a slowdown as the Federal Reserve scaled back its bond purchases.
 In response to analyst questions after the Allergan purchase was announced, Actavis management said the company would be looking at opportunities for growth in dermatology and ophthalmology via mergers and acquisitions.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Cyber Monday sales growth is slowing as consumers embrace the convenience of online shopping, spreading out their purchases instead of being lured by one-day specials.
 Overseas Expansion Any purchase will be subject to approval by the Bank of Portugal as well as European Union and Chinese regulators, Haitong said.
 With $39 trillion in foreign exchange reserves in China and increasingly internationalized companies seeking to diversify incomes geographically, purchases abroad are on the rise.
 for $235 million, the first purchase of an overseas brokerage by a mainland securities firm.
 “We advanced substantially our mutual understandings of policy priorities” Reserves declined to $997 billion at the end of November, less than half of the $204 billion at the end of 2013, as the monetary authority spent dollars to support the hryvnia and helped state-run energy company NAK Naftogaz Ukrainy repay its debts and purchase natural gas.
 The Governing Council expects to consider a proposal for broad-based asset purchases including sovereign debt at the next monetary-policy meeting on Jan.
 Shanghai Electric Power is in preliminary contact with EON to purchase its Italian assets, Reuters reported yesterday citing an official at the Chinese company it didn’t identify.
 He declined to name the companies he’s shorting, in which an investor sells a security after borrowing it and hopes to repurchase the asset later at a lower price before returning it to the lender.
 ‘Less Worried’ The bank this week vowed to keep the main rate at zero further into 2016 and said it was planning for all eventualities, including further postponing increases and measures including asset purchases, lending and negative rates, with currency interventions as a last resort.
 The company has posted better results by transforming itself various times over the years with its acquisitions and is doing so again with the purchase of Anhanguera, he said.
 The gauge has rebounded 11 percent from a low in October amid optimism the economy is strong enough to withstand a slowdown overseas and tighter monetary policy after the Federal Reserve wound up its asset-purchase program.
 No purchase price was disclosed in statements issued by EDF, BASF, Eni and Moscow-based Gazprom.
 There’s no decision yet if the potential investment will involve the purchase of new shares or an existing stake from majority shareholder Maran, the person said.
 It purchased Brussels-based ABX Logistics Worldwide SA in 2008.
 MMK’s export revenue is sufficient to cover international loans and purchase raw materials abroad, spokesman Dmitry Kuchumov said, while declining to comment of possible corporate loans rate increases.
 phone companies in talks with BT can “see the writing on the wall” BT is considering a purchase of EE or O2, the UK’s two biggest mobile operators.
 That’s the most since 2005, when Telefonica’s purchase of O2 was the industry’s top announced transaction of the year.
 Vodafone purchased fixed operators Kabel Deutschland Holding AG in Germany and Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in Spain.
 Benefiting from a smaller debt load than peers, Vermilion is bolstering efforts to purchase North American and European assets after oil’s decline of more than 40 percent since June, Donadeo said.
 “The fact that we’ve got a clean balance sheet puts us in a position where we will look at acquisitions,” Donadeo said in a phone interview yesterday, adding that the company made purchases during periods of depressed oil prices and economic turmoil in 1998 and 2009.
 Households wary of taking on too much debt are being deliberate in using their credit cards to make purchases.
 Non-revolving loans, including borrowing for vehicle purchases and college tuition, rose $123 billion in October, the Fed said.
 In August, purchases ran at a 175 million pace, the strongest since January 2006.
 New-home purchases were down 37 percent from November 2013 on an unadjusted basis, today’s report showed.
 Existing Homes Sales of new properties, which are tallied when purchase contracts are signed, are considered a more timely measure of the market than sales of previously owned dwellings, which are counted when a sale is final.
 That’s the lowest level since then-Fed Chair Ben Bernanke signaled that the central bank could start to slow its monthly pace of bond purchases if the economy showed sustained gains, setting off an increase in interest rates.
 The benchmark seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability in the banking system, climbed 135 basis points, or 135 percentage point, to 524 percent in Shanghai, according to a weighted average compiled by the National Interbank Funding Center.
 Investors bought 1057 billion yuan of shares using margin debt on the Shanghai exchange yesterday, taking the outstanding value of stock purchases through borrowed money to 6484 billion yuan, according to data from the bourse.
 Singapore’s state-owned investment company will purchase a portion of the equity investment held by Silver Lake Partners LP, Virtu said in a statement today.
 agreed to form an alliance with the owner of Japan’s most popular shopping-rewards card to offer targeted online advertising based on past purchases, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Its “T Card” program allows members to earn points on purchases at locations nationwide including JX Holdings Inc.
 The debt purchases may take place as soon as this week, he said.
 operation, now based in Boston, expanded in 2009 with the purchase of Sovereign Bancorp Inc.
 The legislation also would ban another round of military base closings and continue purchases of radar-jamming jets made by Chicago-based Boeing Co.
 More recently, Carter worked with Gates to scrap dozens of weapons programs as defense budgets were pared back, including halting the purchase of the F-22 Raptor, a stealth fighter jet made by Lockheed Martin Corp.
 As the Pentagon’s acquisitions chief from 2009 to 2011, he cited competition for the Navy’s new Littoral Combat Ship as a model for weapons purchases.
 The S&P 500 has rebounded 11 percent from a low in October, as optimism in the economy overshadowed concerns about an end to Fed bond purchases and a slowdown overseas.
 The purchase brings the total value of outbound acquisitions from Japan this year to $509 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 stocks along with the “substitution effect” of investors selling Treasuries to fund purchases of company bonds helped push yields higher, said Ian Lyngen, a government bond strategist at CRT Capital Group LLC in Stamford, Connecticut.
 The portion of shoppers who used Amazon to begin their search for online purchases doubled in the third quarter to 39 percent from 2009, according to Forrester Research Inc.
 You press a button and a couple of minutes later, a MacBook arrives” Mapping Deliveries Guitar Center Inc, a Google Express partner, is seeing purchases of lighter products such as guitar strings or keyboard stands.
 as its largest shareholder, doubled its size in 2008 by outmaneuvering New York-based Citigroup to purchase Wachovia Corp.
 The purchase, agreed to in June, should close in “mid-2015,” GE said.
(Bloomberg) -- Regulators pushed back by three weeks their informal deadline to complete consideration of Comcast Corp’s proposed $452 billion purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 30, aiding efforts to reward investors, and the Fairfield, Connecticut-based company also can still repurchase more than $10 billion of stock under its buyback plan.
 Abu Dhabi’s national carrier Etihad Airways made a string of purchases, including a multibillion-dollar investment in Alitalia SpA.
 Growth in loans and deposits, along with the purchase last year of a C$33 billion Visa Inc.
 The bank said it has yet to purchase shares under its existing program that ends Jan.
 “In the past, a television might have been the largest purchase.
 Kroger has increased sales with its purchase of the Harris Teeter Grocery chain earlier this year and by selling more organic and natural food under its Simple Truth label.
 Chinese companies may spend as much as $15 billion on overseas property purchases this year, encouraged by a depressed residential housing market, Knight Frank LLP wrote in a report earlier this month.
 It has been in touch with Deutsche Bank AG about financing the potential purchase, the person said.
 Buying Climate A gauge of the buying climate, which shows whether now is a good time to purchase goods and services, climbed to the highest since August 2007, while the measure of personal finances, the strongest of the three components, was little changed.
 The company repurchased $65 billion of its stock in the year that ended Sept.
 A Stryker purchase of Smith & Nephew may be much more positive for earnings if it isn’t structured as an inversion, Morgan Stanley analysts said late yesterday.
 Stryker’s deals include the purchase of Small Bone Innovations Inc.
 is awaiting regulatory approval for its $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV, and is using the purchase to expand its pay-TV, Internet and wireless service to Latin America.
 The company last year completed its biggest acquisition, adding the Cobre Panama project through the purchase of Inmet Mining Corp.
 For Patrick Drahi, the Franco-Israeli billionaire who controls Altice, the purchase of the assets would be a second major deal this year as the European phone industry consolidates to reduce costs and revive earnings.
 Oi hired Banco BTG Pactual SA in August to explore a purchase of Telecom Italia SpA’s stake in Tim Participacoes SA, Brazil’s third-largest phone company.
 Public demand for time on BA’s simulator “fleet” is likely to grow further if availability opens up on machines that replicate the cockpits of the A380 superjumbo and Boeing 787 Dreamliner, which were purchased last year and are still being used intensively as more planes join the roster.
 The purchase, valued at about C$125 billion ($11 billion), was approved by Canada’s government yesterday.
 UltraTech’s production capacity will rise by 8 percent to about 65 million metric tons a year after the purchase, the Mumbai-based company said in an exchange filing.
 The company is discussing the purchase of Jaiprakash’s cement plants in the states of Uttar Pradesh, Madhya Pradesh and Andhra Pradesh, people with knowledge of the matter said Dec.
 This will be Birla’s second purchase of Jaiprakash’s assets in 15 months.
 Borrowing costs from Austria to Ireland fell to records today amid speculation slowing growth and the risk of deflation will prompt the European Central Bank to extend its asset-purchase program to include euro-area sovereign debt.
 Boost Inflation “The ECB will do everything to boost inflation and that will lead to an increase in debt purchases,” said Stefan Kreuzkamp, the chief investment officer at Deutsche Asset & Wealth Management in Frankfurt, which oversees $124 trillion in assets.
 Turner’s previous record was set in July 2010, when “Modern Rome -- Campo Vaccino” was purchased by the J.
 The financing was part of David Werner’s $900 million purchase of the property this year.
 Bank of China plans to purchase 7 Bryant Park, a tower under construction by Hines, for about $600 million, a person with knowledge of the matter said this week.
 Falling oil prices will prompt importers to “wait until the oil gets even cheaper and delay purchase,” and that also exacerbates the imports data, said Larry Hu, head of China economics at Macquarie Securities Ltd.
 GM, which didn’t set a date to resume wholesale deliveries, will deliver Chevrolet, Opel and Cadillac cars that have already been purchased at the agreed-on price.
 Bull Market The gauge has risen 175 percent during the five-year bull market that began in March 2009, propelled by better-than-estimated corporate results and three rounds of Fed bond purchases.
 Madalena should also consider a share repurchase, merger or sale of the company, Maglan said.
 The euro area’s other peripheral nations have been insulated by speculation that the European Central Bank, led by Draghi, may extend its asset-purchase plan to include government bonds as soon as next month.
 and Repsol SA’s $13 billion purchase, including debt, of Talisman Energy Inc.
 JP Morgan, which advised Repsol on its Talisman purchase, was No.
 Other notable Canadian outbound transactions included Amaya Gaming Group Inc’s purchase of Oldford Group Ltd, the parent company of PokerStars, for $45 billion in June, making it the largest publicly held online gaming company in the world.
 was the biggest purchase of a US.
(Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc is receiving $750 million of funding from Canada’s export financing agency to help it purchase BlackBerry Ltd.
 received $500 million in April to fund the purchase of telecommunications and energy equipment, and EDC provided more than 180 million euros in September for Madrid-based Telefonica SA.
 That’s the segment of the market where there’s best value right now” Oaktree Capital Group LLC, the world’s biggest distressed-debt investor, is using the declines to purchase energy obligations, according to its co-chairman Howard Marks.
 First-time buyers accounted for 31 percent of all purchases in November, today’s report showed.
 Bernanke signaled that the central bank could start to slow its monthly pace of bond purchases if the economy showed sustained gains.
 The movie, a farce about a plot to kill North Korea’s leader, was rented or purchased online more than 2 million times from Dec.
 The purchase of BBVA’s 297 percent stake will make Citic International Financial Holdings Ltd.
 has lost about 12 percent of its value since his purchase of the shares 11 days ago stoked speculation of a turnaround for the carrier.
 The shares surged after the purchase by Rare Enterprises on speculation a capital infusion is closer, before erasing the gains.
 In addition to individual donors, Soboroff said the nonprofit Police Foundation contributed $250,000 to the purchase of the first units.
 Even at A$250 a share, a Transfield purchase would add to Ferrovial’s estimated earnings next year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 milk processor, said it was forced to charge more to cover the cost of raw-milk purchases that were “unprecedented in our history,” Chief Executive Officer Gregg A.
 The legislation would let the A-10 aircraft of the Cold War era keep flying and continue purchases of radar-jamming jets made by Boeing Co.
 detention facility in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, and bar the purchase of Russian rocket engines not already under contract for national-security space launches.
 The index has risen 45 percent this year on speculation the central bank will extend interest-rate cuts and as investors boosted stock purchases with borrowed money.
 Medtronic Bonds Medtronic sold bonds in seven parts to help fund its purchase of surgical gear maker Covidien Plc, instead of using cash kept overseas, because of US.
 “Google’s blog post today is a transparent attempt to deflect focus from its own conduct and to shift attention from legitimate and important ongoing investigations by state attorneys general into the role of Google Search in enabling and facilitating illegal conduct -- including illicit drug purchases, human trafficking and fraudulent documents as well as theft of intellectual property,” Kate Bedingfield, a spokeswoman for the MPAA, said in a statement yesterday.
 The cash raised has gone toward $200 billion of repurchases and dividends in that period.
(Bloomberg) -- Hungary’s central bank will take control of unprofitable MKB Bank to reorganize the lender that the state recently purchased from Germany’s Bayerische Landesbank.
 He was sentenced to house arrest by a Moscow court in September after a money-laundering investigation connected to the $25 billion purchase of shares in oil producer OAO Bashneft.
 European equities rebounded from the biggest drop in seven weeks after two officials familiar with deliberations said the central bank will consider a proposal for broad-based asset purchases at the next monetary-policy meeting on Jan.
 The ECB’s council expects to consider a proposal that includes sovereign-debt purchases at the next policy meeting on Jan.
 Governor Raghuram Rajan, who left the central bank’s benchmark repurchase rate at 8 percent for a fifth meeting on Dec.
 called off its $55 billion purchase of Shire Plc.
 and Lorillard Inc, AT&T Inc’s $66 billion purchase of DirecTV, and Comcast Corp’s $68 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc, the biggest transaction of the year.
 said it may terminate the purchase of a 24 percent stake in Greentown China Holdings Ltd.
 to purchase a stake in Greentown if the company chooses to proceed with the acquisition after adjustment, Caixin reported, citing a person close to the deal.
 financial institution whose customers made Target purchases from Nov.
 “The incentive for companies and households to draw down financial assets and purchase real assets is rising,” the Deutsche Securities economists wrote in a Dec.
 Emerson announced in November it took a $508 million charge related to the acquisition of Chloride Group Plc, which the company purchased in 2010 and soon thereafter saw its sales of uninterruptible power supplies dragged down by a weak European economy.
 Draghi’s comments damped speculation the central bank was poised to start a program of sovereign-debt purchases known as quantitative easing after policy makers kept interest rates unchanged.
 The ECB expects to consider a package of broad-based asset purchases including sovereign debt next month, two central-bank officials familiar with the deliberations said.
 Metals manufacturers increased purchases of construction materials and other equipment while electronics companies boosted spending for production of smartphone parts.
 Apple, based in Cupertino, California, said dismissal of the case is warranted because it discovered during the trial that the single named plaintiff in the class-action lawsuit -- whose claims are meant to represent what happened to other iPod customers -- never directly purchased any of the devices covered by the complaint.
 While Rogers said she was troubled by Rosen’s belated disclosures about her purchases and her lawyers’ failure to sufficiently vet their plaintiff, the judge said removing her doesn’t affect or diminish the interests of the 8 million other potential class members who may be eligible for damages in the case and whose claims she has a duty to protect.
 Rogers ordered the consumer lawyers to provide Apple yesterday with information about potential substitute plaintiffs and their iPod purchases.
 Adelanto issued $7065 million of adjustable-rate bonds in 2005 and purchased an interest-rate swap from Piper Jaffray to help protect against rising rates and to lower borrowing costs.
 The city also purchased an insurance policy from Ambac guaranteeing payments on the swap.
 to purchase goods from abroad.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, fell 71 basis points to 546 percent in Shanghai.
 ‘Concerted Effort’ Today’s purchases are “probably part of a concerted effort by the government to convince the public and market participants that the ruble is undervalued,” Ivan Tchakarov, Citigroup Inc’s Moscow-based economist, said by e-mail today.
 Investors bought 1218 billion yuan ($197 billion) of shares using margin debt through the Shanghai Stock Exchange yesterday, taking the outstanding value of stock purchases with borrowed money to an all-time high of 6055 billion yuan, according to data from the bourse.
 China Bonds China’s clearing agency for exchanges said yesterday that it won’t allow bonds rated below AAA or sold by issuers graded lower than AA to be used as collateral for short-term loans obtained through repurchase agreements.
 Resources Drop The surge in chip purchases contrasts with a slump in acquisitions of overseas oil and gas assets following corruption probes into senior management at state-owned companies linked to former Chinese Politburo member Zhou Yongkang.
 This year, Chinese purchases of overseas energy assets are set to fall to $94 billion, the lowest since at least 2008, Bloomberg-compiled data show.
 Crescent Point Energy Corp, which made about 40 oil and natural gas asset purchases in Canada in the past decade, is looking for bargains from rivals with high debt loads, Chief Executive Officer Scott Saxberg said in a Dec.
 Aker is encouraged by the success of recent deals such as Det Norske Oljeselskap ASA’s $27 billion purchase of Marathon Oil Corp’s Norwegian unit, he said.
 It’s also possible to purchase whole loans.
 European Stimulus Speaking yesterday after the last policy meeting of the year, Mario Draghi damped speculation the European Central Bank was poised to start a program of sovereign-debt purchases.
 The ECB’s Governing Council expects to consider a broad package of asset purchases including sovereign debt next month, two euro-area central-bank officials familiar with the matter said.
 The purchase helped Delta expand service across the North Atlantic, the busiest international travel market -- and stirred union concern that jobs would be threatened if the Atlanta-based carrier let Virgin jets do more flying.
 South Africa’s $42 billion purchase of jets, warships and helicopters from companies including ThyssenKrupp AG and BAE Systems Plc, agreed in 1999, is being probed by a judicial commission following persistent allegations of corruption in the awarding of the contracts.
 The IPO and simultaneous purchase of property make Fibra Mty a landlord to tenants including phone company Axtel SAB, cement maker Cemex SAB and consultancy Accenture Plc.
 The IPO and asset purchase will create a cash windfall for Desarrollos Delta, the developer founded by David Garza Laguera.
 There have been more purchases of Shanghai stocks by global investors, or northbound flows, than by mainland investors buying Hong Kong shares.
 Mainland investors purchased a net 42 billion yuan, from an aggregate quota of 250 billion yuan.
 Its last ice-cream deal was the 2011 purchase of Ingman Ice Cream Oy AB.
 That purchase includes a business that sells additives used in fracking.
 Slowing Growth The central bank has cut the benchmark interest rate 12 times since 2011 and purchased foreign currency to weaken the shekel and help exports, bringing reserves to a record $876 billion at the end of August.
 They already have banks or lawyers over here that allow them to make purchases” Russia is struggling to reverse a rout in the ruble with emergency measures including 75 percentage points of interest rate increases and more than $10 billion of ruble purchases as President Vladimir Putin confronts the country’s deepest financial crisis since 1998.
 They dropped to third during the first six months of this year, behind Italians and French purchasers, the broker said.
 Russians accounted for 21 percent of home purchases worth more than 10 million pounds during the six months to October, up from 13 percent in the prior six months, Knight Frank LLP said in a report Nov.
 More stimulus may come in the form of broad-based asset purchases if needed, he said.
 In May, Zell led the approximately $500 million purchase of Decameron Hotels & Resorts, which operates in countries including Jamaica and Colombia.
 For investors, working with the established hoteliers is “a shorter trip to the cash register than building new,” said William Sipple, managing director at Denver-based HVS Capital Corp, which consults on Caribbean hotel purchases.
 SMBC Trust Bank Ltd, a subsidiary of Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corp, will purchase Citibank Japan Ltd’s retail banking operations that include 24 trillion yen ($20 billion) in deposits of about 740,000 customers, around 1,600 employees and 32 branches, the lenders said in a joint statement today.
 The purchase comes as Sumitomo Mitsui seeks to get more business from high-net-worth individuals in a country with about $14 trillion in household financial assets and generate more fee income.
 The central bank will continue to purchase between 8 trillion yen to 12 trillion yen of government securities in total each month, it said.
 CDS Cuts The bank will probably shrink its book of repurchase agreements and reduce inventory at its interest-rate trading unit, said Alevizos Alevizakos, a Keefe, Bruyette & Woods analyst based in London who rates the stock underperform.
 and ZF Friedrichshafen AG’s purchase of TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 It helps issue loans ranging from $1,000 to $35,000 and then lists them on its website, where the investors can purchase the debt.
 At the same time, policy makers said that language was “consistent” with their prior guidance that rates would be held near zero for a “considerable time” after they ended their asset purchases in October.
 Indirect bidders, a group of investors that include foreign central banks, purchased 648 percent at the sale, the most since Bloomberg started keeping records in October 2004.
 shares rose after the planemaker boosted its quarterly dividend by 25 percent and expanded a share-repurchase plan to $12 billion, the largest in its history.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- With Federal Reserve bond purchases no longer providing a boost for the equity market, US.
 The carrier reiterated as recently as October the risk should it have to pay Airbus Group NV a penalty after the planned purchase of six A380 superjumbos fell through.
 18 to purchase Saputo Bakery, Canada’s leading snack cake maker, for $103 million.
 “The Saputo Bakery purchase is in line with the company’s strategy to consolidate itself in the Canadian market and strengthen its brand in specific categories,” Contreras, who is based in Mexico City, said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Boosting Profit Bimbo’s plans to purchase Saputo Bakery, a subsidiary of Saputo Inc, was the third acquisition this year.
 The Canada Bread purchase from Maple Leaf for $15 billion in May provided an immediate boost to Bimbo’s net income, which increased 31 percent in the third quarter from a year earlier.
 in 2015 and “the recent purchases will continue to improve the numbers,” he said.
 Debt Levels Following the Canada Bread purchase, Bimbo’s net debt climbed to a five-year high of 335 times Ebitda in the second quarter from 223 in the first quarter, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Americans divested $94 billion more securities than they purchased during the first 10 months of this year, the most for the period according to Treasury data dating back to 1977 compiled by Bloomberg.
 Russia sold about $48 billion in market interventions and provided $98 billion under foreign-currency repurchase agreements in the week through Dec.
 Funds placed under foreign-currency repurchase agreements will be returned to the stockpile, according to the statement.
 The hedge fund firm purchased James River for more than $560 million in 2007.
 Fernandes, by contrast, has racked up nearly 13,000 tweets and images posted to Instagram, including a topless self-portrait and the cover of documents for the purchase of 50 Airbus Group NV jets.
 Cannell acknowledged that DeMarse, who took her position in 2012, has been improving results at the company by cutting expenses and with acquisitions including a purchase of The Deal LLC, which covers mergers and acquisitions news.
 household purchases, which account for almost 70 percent of the economy, rose at a 32 percent annual pace, compared with a previously reported 22 percent.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer agreed in June to buy most of the assets for 124 billion euros ($152 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever, and the purchase should close next year.
 Ferrovial, a builder that also manages infrastructure such as toll roads, remains an investor in Heathrow, having led the 101 billion-pound purchase of the company then known as BAA Ltd.
 The segment will include the Weatherford units that provide drilling fluids and additives to produce oil from wells, as well as some existing businesses and a pipeline flow-improver company purchased from Phillips 66 this year.
(Bloomberg) -- The prospect of European Central Bank starting sovereign-debt purchases in 2015 pushed Spain’s 10-year yields down by the most in three months this week, with record-low rates proving no deterrent to investors.
 said today it expects the ECB to begin government-bond purchases at the start of next year.
 Pimco, manager of the world’s largest bond mutual fund, said it predicts the ECB will start euro-area sovereign-debt purchases to boost the region’s inflation outlook.
 and the $49 billion purchase of industry leader PokerStars by Amaya Gaming Group Inc.
 in 2012, the largest-ever aerospace purchase.
 The company is going to be “aggressive with share repurchase,” buying back as much as $3 billion of stock, Hayes said.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Workers at ING Vysya Bank Ltd, which is being purchased by India’s Kotak Mahindra Bank Ltd, have sought job and wage guarantees from the billionaire founder of the acquirer.
 Since Tesla is selling cars that can top $100,000 to very wealthy people, the price at the pump is not a prime motivator in that consumer’s purchase decision, he said.
 “Although the recent decline in oil prices has caused concern about EV demand, we believe EV purchasers are focused on the long-term benefit of not being exposed to oil price fluctuations,” he said.
(Bloomberg) -- The back-up bidder for Revel AC Inc, now having the right to buy the shuttered Atlantic City, New Jersey, casino, wants the bankruptcy judge to cut the $954 million purchase price by $84 million in view of alleged improprieties in the auction process.
 The purchase price for the casino’s assets should be $87 million, not the $954 million offered by Glenn Straub’s Polo North Country Club Inc.
 5, when Straub wants the court to cut the purchase price.
 Straub said his original cash bid of $90 million should be the starting point for calculating his purchase price.
 Next, he wants a $3 million break-up fee applied to the purchase price because the estate is receiving a “significant” financial benefit by retaining Brookfield’s $11 million deposit.
 22 explaining a proposed reorganization plan where secured lenders led by Icahn-affiliated funds will purchase the properties in exchange for debt and a $100 million loan.
 The combined purchase price is $425 million.
 The ECB last month embarked on a purchase program and the central bank’s president, Mario Draghi, has called for regulatory changes to support the goal of boosting the market.
 Lotus Corp, a retailer based in Hong Kong, said the reason he left was known only to him and Wal-Mart and was unrelated to price markups or bulk purchases.
 The notes will be guaranteed by 9 billion reais ($34 billion) owed to Petrobras by Eletrobras, as the utility is known, from the purchase of fuel for power plants, Energy Minister Edison Lobao told reporters in Brasilia today.
(Bloomberg) -- India’s benchmark gauge of protection against stock market swings rose for the first time in four days after the longest stretch of index option purchases by foreigners in two months.
 Overseas investors yesterday bought a net $1972 million of CNX Nifty Index options, capping an eighth day of purchases, the longest streak since Oct.
 Foreigners also purchased $862m of Nifty futures, the first inflow in three days.
 The exchange connect allows overseas investors to purchase an aggregate 300 billion yuan ($48 billion) of mainland shares, with authorities saying the quota may be increased over time.
 18 the central bank will start sovereign-debt purchases, if needed.
 Allstate, which sells policies through agents, purchased online car-insurance seller Esurance in 2011 in a challenge to Progressive’s business, and said it would offer home policies as well.
 Progressive said the deal announced today is expected to be completed by April 1, and that it intends to purchase the rest of ARX over the next six years.
 4 that policy makers “won’t tolerate” a prolonged period of low inflation, and that officials discussed “all assets but gold” as potential targets for purchases.
 Dealmaking Activity The purchase adds to what has been the busiest year for chipmaker deals since 2011.
 Before the 2008 financial crisis, banks purchased shares inthousands of private-equity and venture-capital funds.
 Foreign investors purchased a net 7,159 three-year debt futures contracts, the most since Oct.
 It was worth it for Dallas real estate investor Alan Box, whose purchase of a one-fourth interest in a Learjet via leasing company Flexjet a decade ago was driven chiefly by a desire to ensure that family members could enjoy getaways to their ranch in Crowheart, Wyoming, with canines in tow.
 Household purchases, which account for almost 70 percent of the economy, rose at a 32 percent annual pace in the third quarter, compared with a previously reported 22 percent, today’s GDP report showed.
 “It’s a result of core strength” Today’s figures for November consumer spending showed broad-based gains in purchases.
 The seven-day repurchase rate, a gauge of interbank funding availability, tumbled 118 basis points since Dec.
 The board approved additional purchases on Dec.
 19 as long as Trian owns less than 13 percent, although ownership may exceed that as a result of company actions such as stock repurchases.
 Proceeds from the bonds were partly used to fund a purchase of Eagle Ford shale assets from Royal Dutch Shell Plc.
 The ECB’s Governing Council expects to consider a proposal for broad-based asset purchases including sovereign debt at its next monetary-policy meeting on Jan.
 Some ECB officials favor a government-bond purchase program exceeding 1 trillion euros ($123 trillion), German newspaper Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung reported today, citing a person familiar with the matter.
 The euro sank the most since September as two European Central Bank officials said policy makers may consider broad-based asset purchases in January.
 “This is strictly a request for information related to individual trades in our client accounts” Canaccord Genuity, Canada’s largest non-bank brokerage, fell 16 percent in Toronto trading on Friday alongside Amaya’s 18 percent drop after Quebec’s securities regulator said it’s looking into trading activities tied to Amaya’s purchase of Oldford Group Ltd.
 It hired Banco BTG Pactual SA in August to explore a purchase of Telecom Italia SpA’s local wireless unit, Tim Participacoes SA.
 The hedge fund run by billionaire Paul Singer, one of Caesars’s biggest bondholders, bought credit-default swaps before entering negotiations with Caesars in September and has continued to purchase the derivatives, according to the people, who asked not to be named because the trades are private.
 Chief Executive Officer Domhnal Slattery said in an interview that Avolon’s $64 billion in aircraft orders and sale-leaseback agreements constitutes “locked-in growth,” while listed status will leave it better placed to pursue plane purchases and acquisition opportunities.
 Both hired more temporary workers, updated technology, and invested in infrastructure to make sure they could handle rising demand from online purchases that caught them off guard last year.
 Investors bought 997 billion yuan ($16 billion) of shares using margin debt on the Shanghai Stock Exchange yesterday, taking the outstanding value of share purchases through borrowed money to a record 5521 billion yuan, according to data from the bourse “Leverage is one factor,” Andy Xie, a former World Bank economist who’s one of the 50 most influential people in global finance according to last year’s ranking by Bloomberg Markets magazine, said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 output, but are positioning themselves to purchase more if Congress ends export restrictions.
 Former CEO Josef Ackermann made that purchase to reduce the company’s reliance on its investment bank.
 The picture, which cost an estimated $80 million to make and market, took in more than $15 million in online rentals and purchases in the four days after its Dec.
 More than half of the assets being purchased by KWE are in London and southeast England and the acquisition includes the Travelodge hotel in King’s Cross, according to the statement.
 The lending unit of Japan’s second-biggest bank by market value will purchase the operations from Citibank Japan Ltd.
 Crescent Point Energy Corp, which made about 40 oil and natural gas asset purchases in Canada in the past decade, is looking for bargains from rivals with high debt loads, Chief Executive Officer Scott Saxberg said in an interview.
 “It will need to broaden asset purchases, and sovereign bonds will need to be part of the mix.
 It started purchases of covered bonds in October and asset-backed securities last month.
 4 that the Governing Council has discussed all assets except gold for the potential expansion of its purchase programs.
 Policy makers including Executive Board member Sabine Lautenschlaeger and Bundesbank President Jens Weidmann have both spoken out against sovereign-bond purchases, saying they undermine the incentive for governments to make structural adjustments and would have to overcome high legal hurdles.
 “Odds of large-scale asset purchases are rising, with a pre-announcement possible on Jan.
 are making purchases that expand operations outside of Africa’s second-largest economy to escape the slowest pace of growth since the 2009 recession.
 The central bank has kept the benchmark one-week repurchase rate unchanged at 825 percent since August after partially reversing a rate increase in January.
 has said it will purchase Dial a Bed, valued at 200 million rand.
 AT&T’s presence in Mexico since announcing the purchase of Iusacell on Nov.
 It’s under no great pressure to purchase America Movil’s assets, said Dave Novosel, an analyst at Gimme Credit LLC.
 gained 17 percent to C$9697, an all-time high, after regulators yesterday approved Burger King Worldwide Inc’s purchase of the company on the condition it maintains employment levels and list the company in Toronto.
 company’s largest purchase.
 “But if one has a clear sense of where valuation lies, there are quite significant opportunities” Borsa Performance The Borsa Istanbul main index is also still about 10 percent below its record high on May 22, 2013, before the Federal Reserve said it was considering ending its extraordinary bond purchases, also known as quantitative easing.
 The surcharges also don’t adjust as long as prices remain within a certain band and the company’s fuel purchase contracts aren’t based on daily price swings.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, said that Dec.
 Worldwide purchases on MasterCard credit and debit cards totaled $24 trillion in the first nine months of 2014, a 12 percent increase from the same period a year earlier, the company said in October.
 The purchase includes positions in base and precious metals, iron ore, coal, crude oil and oil products, US.
 His comments damped speculation the central bank was poised to start a program of sovereign-debt purchases known as quantitative easing, or QE.
 Stocks briefly erased losses after two euro-area central-bank officials familiar with deliberations said the ECB’s Governing Council expects to consider a proposal for broad-based asset purchases including sovereign debt next month.
 economy is strong enough to withstand a slowdown overseas and tighter monetary policy after the Federal Reserve wound up its asset-purchase program.
 The Bank of Japan purchased 374 billion yen ($312 million) of ETFs, on a day when the Topix index rose at the trading break and the close.
 It’s the first time the BOJ has bought after stocks climbed in the morning, with all of the central bank’s other purchases coming on days the Topix fell, according to Tokai Tokyo Securities Co.
 The BOJ started investing in ETFs in December 2010 as part of an asset-purchase program aimed at bolstering trading, and on Oct.
 The purchase includes 24 trillion yen ($20 billion) in deposits of about 740,000 Citigroup customers, around 1,600 employees and 32 branches.
 The covered-bond purchase program is its third in six years and has prompted buyers of the notes from Union Investment Institutional GmbH and Erste Asset Management to scale back holdings.
 The ECB bought 178 billion euros of covered bonds in the six weeks of its asset-purchase program from Oct.
 DBS completed the $220 million purchase of Societe Generale SA’s Asian wealth-management business in October, boosting its assets under management to S$88 billion ($67 billion).
 Puregold’s rebates on purchases and a program that offers to improve the stores of its top buyers with signage have attracted low-income shoppers and owners of so called sari-sari stores, neighborhood shops that retail fast-moving consumer goods from sodas, sardines, cigarettes, sugar to soap.
 The ECB’s Governing Council expects to consider a proposal for broad-based asset purchases including sovereign debt at its next monetary-policy meeting on Jan.
 He doesn’t favor stock repurchases with “the market this high,” Ballmer, the company’s biggest individual shareholder, said in a tweet yesterday.
 Microsoft repurchased $289 billion worth of its shares in the most recent quarter.
 The purchase will boost Air China’s fleet capacity by about 8 percent by available metric-ton kilometer over December 2013, excluding adjustments to fleet structure such as the disposal of old aircraft, it said.
 They found that the Florence, Italy based company had the deepest offer of styles available for online purchase across most luxury categories.
 Supply Mismatch “There appears to be a supply-and-demand imbalance in Treasuries in 2015, given the expected purchases from foreign investors, domestic real money and banks, as well as demand due to longer Treasury index duration after quantitative easing,” the strategists wrote.
 Banks have stepped up their bond purchases with excess cash on hand, as deposits ballooned to a record $104 trillion as of Nov.
 The BOJ has bought 1756 billion yen of real estate investment trusts since December 2010, when it began the purchases.
 The Ferry Building was acquired in the Equity Office takeover, while 100 Montgomery was a later purchase.
 office property since a group led by Boston Properties purchased the General Motors Building in New York for a record $28 billion in 2008, according to Real Capital Analytics Inc.
 It purchased Hanson Plc, a British building materials company, for about $183 billion in 2007 with returns from the deal damaged by the subsequent financial crisis.
 Data today showed purchases of previously owned US.
 The Reserve Bank left its benchmark repurchase rate unchanged at 575 percent last month and cut its inflation forecasts.
 The fully furnished home purchased by Persson has $5,600 toilets and an 18-seat screening room.
 In contrast, the Federal Reserve ended its third round of bond purchases in October amid a mounting recovery in the world’s largest economy.
 Employers are dismissing fewer workers and adding staff as household purchases pick up, driven by a drop in gasoline costs that will keep boosting the economic expansion.
 Rights Management Apple was curious about how RealNetworks was able to get around Apple’s digital rights management software that prevented music purchased elsewhere from running on the iPod, Cue said.
 The named plaintiffs no longer have a right, or standing, to sue given that none of them purchased an iPod during the period covered by the lawsuit, Bill Isaacson, Apple’s attorney, said in court papers.
 Mainland traders are permitted to purchase 105 billion yuan of Hong Kong-listed equities.
 The purchase is Franco-Israeli tycoon Drahi’s second major deal this year, bringing annual sales at Altice’s businesses to more than 15 billion euros as European carriers merge to reduce costs and revive earnings.
 This month, it completed a purchase of smaller French carrier Virgin Mobile.
 It hired Banco BTG Pactual SA in August to explore a purchase of Telecom Italia SpA’s stake in its local wireless unit, Tim Participacoes SA.
 “Investing in Asian banks is worth considering even if it’s a minority stake purchase,” said Sato.
 to jointly purchase Visteon’s stake was described as a “win-win” situation for both Hankook and Halla Climate by Shin Chung Kwan, an analyst at KB Investment & Securities Co, before the deal was announced.
 During next year, AAdvantage or Dividend Miles program members who buy first- or business-class tickets will earn rewards based on the fare purchased, in addition to normal awards for distance flown and the member’s elite status level, the airline said today.
 next year will shift loyalty programs to base awards on fares purchased instead of the traditional miles flown.
 In a year when debt underwriters from Bank of America Corpto Barclays Plc predicted a slowdown as the Federal Reservescaled back from its debt purchases, issuance has soared as adecline in benchmark borrowing costs that almost no oneanticipated pushed yields close to record lows.
 The share of homes sold to first-time buyers hit its lowest level since 1987, the National Association of Realtors reported in November, as factors such as soaring student debt and delayed marriages depressed purchases by younger buyers.
 The movie, which opened in more than 300 locations, was also available for rent and purchase at Google Play and other websites.
 Sony made the film available for rent and purchase on Dec.
 These include Facebook Inc’s $19 billion purchase of WhatsApp Inc.
 The transaction won’t include the purchase of any real estate, Solomons said.
 2 left the benchmark repurchase rate at 8 percent for a fifth straight meeting.
 Bidder Participation Indirect bidders, an investor class that includes foreign central banks, purchased 587 percent of the notes at the auction, compared with 65 percent last month, the most since December 2004.
 The purchase “will broaden our portfolio, diversify our end market exposure and strengthen our global footprint” Emerson said in June it was considering alternatives for the unit and that a decision would be made by the end of the year.
 Tight mortgage-lending standards, a barrier to more purchases by first-time buyers, will ease, 18 of 24 respondents said.
 Former Beatle Paul McCartney had also tried to purchase the catalog.
 He declined to comment on a possible purchase of Citigroup Inc’s Japanese consumer-banking business.
 MetLife announced in June a plan to repurchase $1 billion of shares, its first buyback since 2008.
 The insurer said in its latest filing that about $9671 million of stock has been repurchased under the earlier plan.
 The changes “restores some balance to the attractiveness of customers’ saving options, and should give them more choice as to how they use their assets in retirement” Five months before the next general election, Osborne also announced in his Autumn Statement an overhaul of stamp duty on property purchases, introducing marginal rates that will only apply to the portion of the price above a series of thresholds.
 The PBOC didn’t offer repurchase or reverse-repurchase agreements today, according to traders at primary dealers required to bid at the auctions.
 Citigroup argues that it effectively delivered the metal to Mercuria under the terms of a sale-and-repurchase agreement by handing over warehouse receipts.
 Bull Market The Dow has risen about 175 percent during the bull market that began in March 2009, propelled by better-than-estimated corporate results and three rounds of Fed bond purchases.
 Owners of the companies in talks with BT can “see the writing on the wall” BT is considering a purchase of EE or O2, the UK’s two biggest mobile operators.
 government bond auctions, Fed debt purchases.
 “It will help in the long term, as it is another reason for consumers to sign up for Prime, which brings in $99 per year and drives higher overall purchase activity” Manhattan Project Amazon’s new building on 34th Street in Manhattan, which the company has said will be primarily office space, will serve as a delivery hub for Prime Now orders.
 Bernanke suggested the central bank could begin reducing asset purchases within months.
 during its purchase by Legg Mason Inc.
 Within four years of the purchase, the unit was contributing 40 percent of Legg Mason’s total fee revenue of $35 million, Financial World magazine reported in 1990.
 “We expect the rally in Turkish rates to be led by dynamic policy easing by the Central Bank of Turkey” The benchmark one-week repurchase rate has been at 825 percent since July as central bank Governor Erdem Basci fought off government pressure to lower borrowing costs to boost growth.
 Policy makers lowered the main one-week repurchase rate by 175 basis points in the three months from May, partially unwinding a January increase that helped halt the lira’s slide to a record.
 Household purchases climbed 06 percent, the most in three months, after a 03 percent October gain that was larger than previously estimated, figures showed.
 With Christmas just days away, retailers are counting on the visits to drum up gift purchases and impulse buys.
 and the purchase of Securitas Direct AB by Hellman & Friedman and Bain Capital Partners.
 broadband provider so a purchase of O2, owned by Spain’s Telefonica SA, or EE, a joint venture between Deutsche Telekom AG and France’s Orange SA, would restore the former state telephone monopoly to a dominant position in the country.
 BT’s purchase of a mobile operator would change that in an instant, making it the biggest British company to offer the full “bundle” of all four services -- known in the industry as “quadplay”.
 Christmas Release “The Interview,” a comedy about a fictional assassination of North Korean leader Kim Jong Un, was shown in more than 300 locations on Christmas Day without incident, and was also available for rent and purchase at the Xbox store, a Sony website and Google Play, among others.
 Defense Department, which last year endeda contract to purchase Russian helicopters for the Afghanmilitary.
 That has prompted consumers to seek record purchases of the fuel from overseas.
 Mitsui, which since 2003 is part of the holding group that controls Rio de Janeiro-based Vale, is expanding partnerships with the world’s largest iron-ore producer after announcing last year the purchase of 20 percent in Vale’s VLI cargo unit for 151 billion reais ($582 million).
 The Federal Reserve began tapering its bond purchases in December 2013 and has said it will respond to new economic data when setting monetary policy.
 Persistently weak inflation has allowed Federal Reserve policy makers, who are scheduled to meet next week, room to keep interest rates near zero after ending monthly asset purchases in October as the economy strengthens.
 Homebuilders are waiting for the millennial generation to increase buying, a boom that could take years to materialize as student debt, tight credit and delayed child-bearing depress their housing purchases.
 For Krishnamurthy, the retired bank employee in Mumbai, the brick in a box was the last straw after more than 20 purchases on Snapdeal.
 It leapfrogged bailed-out companies partly through acquisitions, including the purchase of a non-US.
